ntroduction (like Perry'smessy shopper) are just such cases.14 However, against the skeptics, the proposal I will develop highlights what makes de se thought philosophically distinct and important: while any full folk psychological action explanation presupposes such thoughts, they falsify the assumption that rationalizing contents should be shareable.15 Building on the previous account, my present suggestion for de se thoughts has two main ingredients: an appeal to reference-fixing presuppositions, and an appeal to metarepresentational individuators. Let me briefly introduce these two ingredients focusing on the linguistic case, before extending them to our target, de se propositional attitudes. (i) Reference-fixing presuppositions. Although the state of information we end up in by accepting \"John stole the camera\" and \"it was John who stole the camera\" is the same, these two sentences pack up that information they convey in different ways. The second, cleft sentence presupposes that someone stole the camera, but not the former, plainer sentence. For present purposes, it will do no harm to think of presuppositions along the well-known lines that Stalnaker () has suggested.16 Speech acts like assertion take place relative to a common ground, a set of already 12 Peacocke (, ch. ; , ch. ; , ch. , ), Higginbotham () and Howell () have also defended related views (cf. Howell's (, –) discussion of \"objection two\", a version of the problem posed by taking the proposal on the first interpretation above). Below I indicate ways in which I think my proposal improves on theirs. 13 CF. Böer & Lycan (), Crimmins (), and Richard () for other \"two-factor\" proposals in a similar spirit. 14 Cf. also Moss (, –). 15 Cf. Dilip Ninan's contribution to this volume for an account of what the problem that de se thoughts pose is in response to the skeptics with which I sympathize. 16 My own views, although strongly influenced by him, differ at some points (cf. García-Carpintero b). I think of all speech (andmental) acts, including ancillary acts such as presupposing and referring, as constitutively normative; in particular, I think of presuppositions as normative requirements, constitutive of some representational acts, that their contents are already known. I also think that some linguistic presuppositions are semantically triggered. \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 OUP CORRECTED PROOF – FINAL, //, SPi token-reflexive presuppositions and the de se  accepted propositions. Linguistic presuppositions are requirements on the common ground, whose satisfaction should be checked at an ideal time just after the utterance is made (because it might well be that it is the utterance itself that generates the common ground information that satisfies them) but before the ensuing assertion is accepted- in which case it then goes to conform the common ground, licensing further presuppositions in the ensuing discourse. The difference between our two sentences lies in that an utterance of the cleft sentence will feel inappropriate (at presupposition evaluation time) if it is not common ground that someone stole the camera. But the state of information that we get into by accepting either of our sentences will be the same. Consider then an utterance of \"he is hungry\". The proposal agrees with the direct reference theorist that the asserted content is a singular proposition, x is hungry, for some contextual assignment to x. It is expressed, however, in a context in which another singular proposition is presupposed-in this case, one semantically triggered by something akin to a Kaplanian character for \"he\"-which we could express thus: x is the male picked out by the demonstration associated with he,17 where the bold-faced \"he\" refers to the relevant token. This semantically triggered presupposition will typically be supplemented by further pragmatically triggered presuppositions, specifying additional features of the intended demonstrated referent, perceptually accessible or accessible from previous discourse.18 (These presuppositions, by the way, illustrate the point made in the previous paragraph about the time at which presuppositions are to be appraised.) The descriptive identification embodied in such presuppositions is \"reference-fixing\" and not \"meaning-giving\", in Kripke's () sense. This is not, it should be clear, a reductive view: far from aiming to reduce singular representational states/acts to descriptive general ones, it assumes primitively singular attitudes.The suggestion is only that general descriptive information helping to fix the individuals the utterances are about is a constitutive feature of them.This information figures in associated presuppositions. But the presuppositions are themselves singular, and not just because they may mention singular token representational states; the intended referents, if there are any, also figure in their contents. Singularity, like presuppositionality, is here understood as a constitutive feature of the representational devices, a \"semantic requirement\" (Fine ) on them-a fact to be embedded in a theory of such representations, which must be grasped for them to be fully comprehended.19 It is thus that singular terms are de jure rigid, inKripke's () sense. 17 This statement of the presupposition contains another presupposition associated with the definite description, which I do not unpack further for the sake of perspicuity. 18 Proposals along these lines are quite standard nowadays in the linguistic semantics literature; cf. Heim & Kratzer (), Maier (), and Hunter (). Cf. also Maier's contribution to this volume, which extends that sort of account to mental states in a way that I take to be entirely compatible with the proposal I outline below. 19 Singular representations thus understood may fail to have an object; there are, e.g., singular presuppositions associated with singular terms in fictions that are merely pretend. Our theoretical claims are to be understood as made in the framework of a free logic. Also, the proposal raises the question whether \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 OUP CORRECTED PROOF – FINAL, //, SPi  manuel garcía-carpintero (ii) Metarepresentational individuators. The presuppositions described in the previous paragraphs are de lingua (Fiengo & May ); they are about linguistic expressions-in fact, in that particular case, reflexively about tokens of the very linguistic expressions conveying them. The outlined proposal applies to utterances paradigmatically expressing de se thoughts. Thus, an utterance of \"I am hungry\" asserts that x is hungry, presupposing that x is the utterer of I. I will now extend these two features to the underlying de se propositional attitudes. (i) Reference-fixing presuppositions in mental acts. Our target is not total, holistically undivided mental states (the explananda for possible world theories such as Lewis's and Stalnaker's), but distinct mental states/acts in them. Folk psychology supports this choice.Themost compelling consideration of Davidson's () immensely influential causal account of rationalizations is that \"a person can have a reason for an action, and perform the action, and yet this reason not be the reason why he did it\" (Davidson : ); the force of this argument depends on distinguishing specific potential rationalizations (combinations of beliefs and desires, or what have you) in the full mental state of the subject. Similar considerations have been provided for a causal element in doxastic justification-the basing relation (Audi ):20 a subject might have an undefeated propositional justification for a belief he has in fact formed, and the belief still be unjustified, if he in fact formed it on the basis of wishful thinking or other irrational beliefs.21 Frege puzzles can arise at the level of the presuppositions themselves, which after all are ultimately nothing more than background attitudes: if this man is Joseph, how come I do not make the connection when I presuppose in one context, of him, that he is the demonstrated male when a given token is produced, and, in another, that he is picked out by the naming practice towhich a given token of 'Joseph' belongs? In reply, as it will transpire below, I am assuming something like the apparatus of Fine's () Semantic Relationism (cf. also Heck ). In some cases we assume anaphoric relations among the singular terms we deploy in thought, in some others we don't; in the latter cases, but not in the former, the variables we use in the metalanguage to characterize the presuppositions can be assigned different values. Unlike Fine, I think these anaphoric dependences are token-reflexive monadic properties, invoked in additional presuppositions; see below. This raises the further worry whether the initial presuppositions are needed: am I putting forward a redundant, overdetermined set of explanations? But they are independently needed, to capture contextually valid inferences (he is Bolivian, therefore a male is Bolivian) which we are disposed to make as part of our full linguistic competence. 20 Doxastic justifications are reasons why one has the beliefs one does; propositional justification, reasons for which one's beliefs would be justified, if one were to form them in the proper way on their basis. Of course, there might be ways for holists to grant that, for some purposes, we can isolate specific states in a whole belief state. 21 As indicated above, in his contribution to the present volume Stalnaker motivates his adoption of a Perrian account with the point that even when Lewis's two gods' ignorance is eradicated and (given their omniscience) they come to accept a proposition including only the actual world, they still have different cognitive perspectives on the world. In the proposal I'll make, this is predicated on the different presuppositions theymight associate with the judgments they both accept-say, the ones (with the same content) they would express, respectively, with \"I am on the coldest mountain\" and \"He is on the coldest mountain\". This account requires abandoning Stalnaker's holism, crucially distinguishing in our explanations specific parts of a subject's full mental state. I understand that, in using centered base worlds to model Perry's belief states in his more recent framework, and inmotivating it with the consideration just rehearsed, he is granting that his earlier appeal to holism to defend the first interpretation of the token-reflexive proposal will not do. \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 OUP CORRECTED PROOF – FINAL, //, SPi token-reflexive presuppositions and the de se  I'll be discussing presupposition-like states related tomental acts, such as judgments and decisions;22 it is mental acts of this sort that figure prominently in the examples motivating the category of de se thoughts, such as the realization and consequent decision in themessy shopper's epiphany. Consider for illustration andmotivation one of the examples typically used in discussion of the compatibility of anti-individualism and self-knowledge (cf. Schroeter  for a recent discussion, influential in what follows). Long ago you once saw Domingo singing Othello, and now remember him singing the same opera last night; you put together the two thoughts:Domingo's voice is now darker than it was. In doing this, you are assuming that the relation of internal (de jure) coreference obtains between the two Domingo-representations occurring in your comparative thought (the second embedded in the anaphoric \"it\" in its expression). That assumption might be wrong: you might be confused. Perhaps, unbeknownst to you, you are now on Twin-Earth, having been transported there in your sleep some time ago. Now, on the one hand, there are very good reasons-elaborated by Schroeter ()-to think that the contribution of representations such as the one for \"Domingo\" to the thought-content in our example should be the referent (if there were one); they add to the traditional reasons for direct reference applied to thoughts- say, the rigidity of those representations, established by considering their intuitive possible-world truth conditions. They have to do with our impressions about what would be the sensible policy when discovering a case of confusion-not necessarily one as dramatic as the previous one: it may just be a more ordinary one in which information originating in two twins has been lumped together. The intuitively rational thing to do will be to split the Domingo-file into two, a Domingoe for the Earth one and a Domingote for the new one, keeping in each one the information clearly coming from each, and getting rid of the pieces that cannot be ascribed.23 This sensible policy suggests that the representational system is constitutively intended to keep track of objects, which individuate the contents of states deploying them when everything goes well. On the other hand, the links of internal coreference just described are merely assumed; they are not explicit judgments of identity. There of course are such explicit identity judgments; the initial Domingo identification in the example might have been like that-I might have suddenly come to judge in the middle of yesterday's performance that this is the same guy I once listened to in this same opera. But I could be a true fan, who bought the tickets simply assuming this. In any case, 22 In \"Belief and Presupposition\", a talk that Josep Macià gave at the XXI conference of the ESPP (Granada, Spain, //), he argued that only mental acts such as judgments, as opposed to tacit beliefs, can have presuppositions, and he suggested some tests to establish their presence based on their verbal expression. 23 Cf. Recanati  for a recent examination of the substantive content behind the helpful metaphor of mental terms as files or dossiers, which I will be using. Pryor (ms) provides good reasons to replace the metaphor with an account in terms of nodes in (something like) graphs. \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 OUP CORRECTED PROOF – FINAL, //, SPi  manuel garcía-carpintero whatever originally happened last night, today's judgment Domingo's voice is now darker than it was simply assumes coreference with previous representations. As has often been pointed out, any well-functioning system intended to inferentially put together information from persistent individuals needs such implicit identifications, on pain of launching a regress.24 On the proposal I am making, internal coreference is understood as a mental presupposition, i.e., as an intentional, contentful state that is a constitutive ancillary part of some mental acts, judgments, decisions, etc.25 This contrasts with views on which the relation is explained as a purely formal, quasi-syntactic one.26 Such formal relations should underpin it, to the extent that some form of physicalism is correct, as I think it is. But this is not what de jure coreference is. Let me provide some intuitive considerations in support of this claim. Thus, consider how Schroeter () characterizes internal coreference: First, obviousness . . . the subject matter is simply served up to your conscious attention as the same . . . Second, rational incontrovertibility. Given your understanding of the name, you cannot rationally accept the claim ['Domingo \u0002=Domingo'] . . .The relevant standard is one of minimal rationality: to deny the simple de jure identity claim is so obviously irrational that it would call into question your basic logical capacities . . .Third, epistemic primitiveness. When you take two of your own words as samesaying, the question of independent justification seems out of place. In discussing the linguistic case, defenders of a syntactic approach to de jure coreference such as Fiengo &May () are encouraged by the fact that in formal languages the relation is indicated by occurrence of the same expression-type, and in natural language this might be so in some cases.27 But in other cases it is indicated by using expressions of a different type-to the extent that we classify types in a non-questionbegging way. Thus, the reflexive pronoun in \"Óscar loves himself \" internally corefers 24 Cf. Heck , –, and Recanati , – for recent discussions. 25 As part of a general argument against accounts of de jure coreference like the one I am assuming, Pinillos (, ) questions this suggestion. Recanati (, –) and Goodsell (, ) offer good critical discussions, although Goodsell (, –) also objects to an account along the lines of the one I am assuming. I cannot go into a full defense of the view here; I mention it only to motivate the appeal to presuppositions of mental states by means of an example that is independently useful for our discussion. 26 Cf. Sainsbury & Tye () and Heck () for recent defenses, and references there to previous work in the same direction, by Fodor and others. Heck posits \"formal relations\" among thoughts, which he elucidates by appeal to logically significant relations between symbols in formal languages. But, as I have argued elsewhere (cf. García-Carpintero ), those relations themselves have semantic significance. My reasons there are very similar to Fine's (, ). 27 Of course, most proper names are common names, or they could be; but there is a default that uses of the same name throughout a discourse corefer, when their occurrence does not violate Binding Principles. (In ordinary discourse, an utterance of \"Domingo is Domingo\" presupposes that the two are prima facie different names; otherwise, it would be a violation of Principle C of BindingTheory. In some contexts-say, in philosophical or logical discussions-such violations are allowed: \"if everybody hates Óscar, then Óscar hatesÓscar\"; cf. Fiengo&May (, –).)The fact that the principle applies only by default questions the assumption that it is a formal one, strictly speaking. Heim () and Macià () offer sensible accounts of the semantic import of the Binding Principles in terms of presuppositions. \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 OUP CORRECTED PROOF – FINAL, //, SPi token-reflexive presuppositions and the de se  with \"Óscar\", and so does the pronoun in \"Óscar loves his mother\" in the proper context-i.e., when the communicative referential intentions of the speaker make it so. Fiengo &May introduce a technical notion of sameness of expression, on which the name and the pronouns would count as tokens of the same type when they occur coindexed.That notionmight be syntactically justified, and relative to it this claimmight be correct: \"Speakers cannot knowingly intend to use tokens of the same expressiontype to refer to different things. That occurrences of the same expression-type corefer is inherent in the design of the language\" (Fiengo & May (), ). But, obviously, ordinary speakers cannot have intentions involving Fiengo&May's technical notion of identity of type, because they are not aware of it; while, on the other hand, in alternative contexts they might use tokens of the same expression \"his\" (in an intuitive sense of sameness of expression that speakers can intentionally advert to) in \"Óscar loves his mother\" to intend a disjoint referencewith \"Óscar\". Itmight be true that when speakers intend coreference they are deploying a grammar with coindexing and type-identity of the sort Fiengo &May defend; but it would beg the question to take this as sufficient to establish that \"anaphora is a matter of grammar\" (Fiengo &May (), ), or that there is \"nothing intensional\" (Heck (), ) when speakers/thinkers intend de jure coreference. I have illustrated the claim that mental acts also involve presuppositions with a sort of example central for my discussion. But of course, if the idea works at all, there will be many other, more familiar examples. In the linguistic case, presuppositions are on the Stalnakerian account propositions that must be accepted as part of the common ground for the speech acts to which they are related to be felicitous. In the psychological case, presuppositions would be pieces of background (mis-)information, invoked for some reason in making a given judgment or decision. Thus, in the way my interlocutor would be presupposing that my football team suffered a humiliating defeat yesterday when he says \"I'm sure you didn't enjoy the match\", I was also presupposing it in thinking when I woke up, I should have gone to the movies instead. And, on the present view, when I judge I am hungry I presuppose that the person of whom I am predicating being hungry is the thinker of this very judgment. (ii) Mental metarepresentational individuators. The presuppositions of coreference described in the previous paragraphs are crucially about the mental representations that are vehicles for the mental acts of which they are ancillary components. This assumes a language of thought, but for our present purposes we do not need to make very controversial assumptions regarding its nature.28 We only need to ascribe to ordinary thinkers an implicit understanding of the token-reflexive contents we claim they assume; they could manifest it simply by saying things like \"that which I am thinking about now is what I was thinking about before\". The temporal indexicals 28 García-Carpintero () defends the assumption. Cf. Böer & Lycan () and Richard () for related views. \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 OUP CORRECTED PROOF – FINAL, //, SPi  manuel garcía-carpintero there would be referring to the token representations that serve as vehicles for their thoughts. They do not need to have developed concepts of tokens vs. types, or mental representational vehicles. As I havementioned before, otherwriters have advanced views of de se thoughts that I take to be related to the present elaboration of the Perrian view. Peacocke (, ch.  and ) further develops a view he had already defended in previous work about the concept associated with \"I\" in reason-sensitive thoughts such as beliefs and intentions, and also in more primitive \"I\"-representations in perceptual or bodily experiences to which the former harks back. As in Perry's work and in the present proposal, he also characterizes the cognitive significance of such representations by means of a (token-reflexive) reference rule, which he is at pains to distinguish from contentconstituents of the relevant attitudes. Alas, like Perry he also says precious little of a positive nature about the role the reference rule is supposed to play in characterizing the personal-level, conscious first-personal awareness that the subjects of those states are supposed to have; while it is quite clear at crucial junctures that he is assuming this awareness. Castañeda coined a technical device, quasi-indicators such as \"he*\", dedicated to signal de se ascriptions in attitude-attributions. He (, ) characterizes quasiindicators as follows (to stick to our examples, I slightly modify the passage so that it concerns \"he*\" in the ascription \"Perry has learned that he* is making amess\", which I assume to be made to report the messy shopper's epiphanic utterance of \"I ammaking a mess\"): (i) [I]t does not express an indexical reference made by the speaker; (ii) it appears in oratio obliqua; (iii) it has an antecedent, namely [\"Perry\"], to which it refers back; (iv) its antecedent is outside the oratio obliqua containing \"he*\"; (v) \"he*\"is used to attribute, so to speak, implicit indexical references to [Perry]; that is, if [Perry] were to assert what, according to [the ascription], he knows, he would use the indicator \"I\" where we, uttering i[t], have used \"he*\". Castañeda considered the possibility that \"he himself \" might play that role in English, but this has been compellingly questioned. Interestingly, at that time, some linguists were independently exploring the presence in natural language of so-called logophoric expressions, more or less with the same features that Castañeda ascribed to his theoretically posited quasi-indicators; cf. Schlenker () and references there. Chierchia () andHigginbotham () have shown that PRO (the implicit subject of infinitive clauses linguists posit following Chomsky) also appears to behave in English like a quasi-indicator.Thus (to borrow a common example from the literature), imagine that John, a candidate in an election, entertains a thought that he would express by uttering \"I will win the election\". In that case, we could accurately report his thought by both () and (): () John expects that he will win the election. () John expects PRO to win the election. \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 OUP CORRECTED PROOF – FINAL, //, SPi token-reflexive presuppositions and the de se  However, imagine now that John is so drunk that he has forgotten that he is a candidate in the election. He watches someone on TV and thinks that that person is a terrific candidate, who should definitely be elected. Unbeknownst to John, the candidate he is watching on TV is John himself. In that situation, it intuitively seems that only the purely de re report () would be correct; () feels like an incorrect description of the situation, a false report. Higginbotham () advances a token-reflexive proposal like the one developed here to characterize the attitudes ascribed in these constructions. I am avoiding here a discussion of the semantics of attitude-ascriptions, focusing only on the nature of the ascribed attitudes.29 With respect to that,Higginbotham's proposal is ambiguous in the way Stalnaker's () was, between the first and the second interpretation discerned by Perry; in fact, he also seems to have inmind the first one.This exposes his account to the objections raised by O'Brien (, ) and Recanati (, ch. ). Both consider the case of a schizophrenic patient who believes that some mental states he is consciously aware of are not really his, but those of some other person that have somehow been implanted in him. In Recanati's example, the patient is introspectively aware of the occurrence of the judgment that in normal circumstances he would express by \"I am good and omnipotent\". Hemay as a result accept that the owner/judger of this state is good and omnipotent, but he does not accept that he is the owner of that thought; the owner is \"the other\" who has implanted it. Recanati (, –) contends: . . . this is a counterexample, because the subject is in a certain state (he consciously entertains a certain thought), the content of the state reflexively refers to the subject of the state (whom the deluded subject takes to be different from what it actually is), yet the subject does not entertain a de se thought, to the effect that he himself is good and omnipotent. What this shows is that being in a state with a reflexive content is not sufficient to ground a self-ascription. Recanati is right that being in a state with a reflexive content is insufficient for firstpersonal thought; this is just the point that Perry makes about the inadequacy of Stalnaker's suggestion on the first interpretation.30 We should distinguish between 29 Some discourse reports (ascriptions of saying, telling and so on) \"plug\" presuppositions in their ascribing clauses-which then are not projected as presuppositions of the ascriptive discourse itself- ascribing them instead to the reported discourse: \"Peter said that it was Johnwho stole the camera\". Similarly, attitude ascriptions can reportmaterial presupposed on the present view in the ascribed attitude.Thatwould be the role of indicators of features of modes of presentation in general in theories such as Richard's (), Crimmins's (), or Pietroski's (), and in particular of the token-reflexive material contributed by PRO in reports such as (), which in Higginbotham's apparatus is represented as 'σ (e)'. 30 Higginbotham (, –) discusses these cases, in connection with the relation between de se thought and immunity to error through misidentification, to be mentioned below. He represents himself as providing what seems to be an alternative defense of the token-reflexive account, but I fail to see how it works. In my view (developed in García-Carpintero forthcoming), the case of the schizophrenic shows that mental actions such as the judgment that I am good and omnipotent, as much as physical actions such as making a mess, are only de facto IEM. In abnormal circumstances, the ordinary grounds one has to selfascribe them survive as grounds for the existential generalization, someone is making a mess, someone is judging that he himself is good and omnipotent, while still leaving it open whether it is oneself who is doing them. For this to be possible, some other state has to be genuinely de se and immune to misidentification error (the impression of being executing those actions, in the suggestion in the main text). \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 OUP CORRECTED PROOF – FINAL, //, SPi  manuel garcía-carpintero two different mental states. There is, in the first place, the judgment j about x, to the effect that x is good and omnipotent, made by deploying a representation that constitutively triggers the token-reflexive reference-fixing presupposition, x is the judger of j. There also is the impression i about x, to the effect that x is judging the judger of that very judgment j to be good and omnipotent, had by deploying another reference-fixing token-reflexive presupposition about i, x is the owner of i. Normally, when one is in the latter belief-state, one is thereby also in the former; but this is not so in the case of the schizophrenic patient. Hence, as indicated Recanati is right that to be in a state with a reflexive content is not sufficient to ground a self-ascription.The proposal, however, is that the reflexive content provides the constitutive first-personal reference-fixing presupposition associated to an element of the state's representational vehicle. It provides the way through which the corresponding content-constituent is accessed in virtue of the subject's being in that state. No such presupposition is in place in the case of the schizophrenic patient that Recanati considers, who fails to assume that he himselfmakes the relevant judgment. (Amore complex token-reflexive content does capture the significance of the impression-state of the patient: the owner of this thought is under the impression of judging that he himself is good and omnipotent.) In the previous pages I have offered an elaboration of Perry's account of de se thoughts. To sum it up, these are representational states including de jure referential items (mental files, dossiers, or nodes in a sort of graph), which constitutively refer through an associated ancillary reference-fixing presupposition-a contentful state identifying the referent as the owner of that very state. The same schema applies to Frege cases in general; the difference between \"Hesperus\"-thoughts and \"Phosphorus\"-thoughts lies also in associated ancillary reference-fixing presuppositions. Skeptics about thede se are right that examples like Perry'smessy shopper are just Frege cases. But the proposal shows why de se thoughts are philosophically important. While they are ubiquitous (as Castañeda's, Lewis's, and Perry's examples vividly illustrate, any full rationalizing explanation of our actions will involve them), if the proposal is correct we should abandon one of the traditional tenets about intentional contents, namely, their shareability. For although anybody can have a thought about the owner of a given mental state of mine, only I can have a thought about myself by correctly presupposing that my thought is about the owner of the very thought of which this presupposition is an ancillary constituent. This is a form of Perry's (, –) \"limited accessibility\" doctrine, althoughmild by his lights (Perry (), ).31 Even if the proposal is wrong, the fact that a forceful contender to account for a ubiquitous type of thought has this feature suffices to make it philosophically significant: it points to a clear sense in which thought is necessarily from a particular perspective. 31 What is the advantage of this proposal over Frege's own \"limited accessibility\" view?Why is it milder? It is not so much that it is milder, but that it is clearer when it comes to its commitments about the source of the limitation. Its main advantage lies in its generality; I take it to be an application of a general account of indexical expressions in thought and language. \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 OUP CORRECTED PROOF – FINAL, //, SPi token-reflexive presuppositions and the de se  To be sure, the present proposal might benefit from further elaboration. We need to explain better how is it that mental acts like judgments and decisions involve forms of presupposing, and what it takes for subjects to presuppose in the relevant sense.32 However, I take it that it is of some help in making progress on the issues I raised at the end of the previous section for Perry's account, and related proposals by Higginbotham and Peacocke. In particular, it answers the problem of explaining how states intrinsically have cognitive significances of their own, andhow they interactwith those constituted by contents in a straightforward way: states are themselves attitudes with content, ancillary to the mental acts whose full cognitive significance they help to characterize. We are left with the issue of justification. The form of limited accessibility the account involves implies that the proposal, as I indicated above, is saddled with the same problems in accounting for de se communication as Lewis's or Perry's original proposals. To deal with it, we can easily co-opt some of the accounts provided on behalf of centered-worlds accounts; cf. Kinderman's contribution to this volume. But can we say anything of a positive nature in defense of the account? Relevant here are global considerations concerning the way it handles the data for Frege cases in general, in comparison with alternative views. I think the data require positing modes of presentation-although a fuller defense of this would require dealing with syntactic accounts like Fiengo&May (), Sainsbury&Tye (), andHeck () at greater length than I have done above. As earlier defenders of \"two-factor\" proposals like Boër & Lycan (), Richard (), or Crimmins () insisted, and contemporary two-dimensionalists such as Chalmers admit, such accounts are better placed than straightforward descriptivists such as Lewis to do justice, inside an essentially Fregean framework, to the data for direct reference, some of which I highlighted previously. Two-factor accounts, however, have an integration problem, of which the one I raised in the previous section for Perry's is a particular case; the present proposal is well placed to overcome it. Another relevant piece of datum has to do with the explanation of epistemic features that appear to be related to de se thoughts, such as cogito thoughts and the phenomenon unveiled by Wittgenstein () and Shoemaker () that the latter calls \"immunity to error through misidentification\"-even though the connection is not straightforward, for there are de se thoughts that do not exhibit these features, and 32 In a passage (mentioned above) that shows that my elaboration of his views does not depart too far from them, Perry (, ) distinguishes belief from a different attitude: \"we have a lot of 'positive doxastic attitudes' towards various kinds of propositions. For example we are attuned to propositions about the strength of gravity on earth, or the correct manner for keeping one's balance while bicycling, or the way English syntax works, that we don't believe.\" Perry's distinction here, like the one I envisage, is analogous to the one Ortega y Gasset () makes between \"ideas\" and \"beliefs\" (he uses the latter term for the presupposing attitudes), and the more famous but quite similar distinction made by Wittgenstein (). This is further developed in García-Carpintero (forthcoming), in connection with the relation between de se thought and the phenomenon that Shoemaker () describes as immunity to error through misidentification. \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 OUP CORRECTED PROOF – FINAL, //, SPi  manuel garcía-carpintero there are non-de se thoughts that do exhibit them.Whilewriters such asHigginbotham (, ) and Peacocke (, chs.  and ) invoke these phenomena in favor of Fregean accounts, Recanati (, , ) argues for a property account on the grounds that it better explains IEM. I have questioned those claims (García-Carpintero ), and in a companion piece (García-Carpintero forthcoming) I argue that the presuppositional account provides a satisfying explanation of the phenomenon. All in all, I am not as much interested in arguing that the philosophical accounts I favor are better than their rivals, as I am in showing that they are at least as satisfactory. For all I can tell, the epistemic situation in philosophy is not unlike hermeneutical undertakings such as the interpretation of novels and films. While there definitely are wrong views, it might well be that different proposals deal comparably well with the data, and there is no philosophical evidence to establish the validity of one among them. That might well be ultimately the case when it comes to deciding between property and full-proposition accounts of de se thoughts. Acknowledgments Financial support for my work was provided by the DGI, Spanish Government, research project FFI--P and Consolider-Ingenio project CSD-; and through the award ICREA Academia for excellence in research, , funded by the Generalitat de Catalunya. Thanks to Gregory Bochner, Herman Cappelen, Annalisa Coliva, Bjørn Jespersen, Jose Díez, Marie Guillot, Alisa Mandrigin, Daniel Morgan, Ernest Sosa, Stephan Torre, and Clas Weber for very helpful comments, and to Michael Maudsley for the grammatical revision. References Audi, Robert. (). \"Belief, Reason and Inference\", Philosophical Topics XIV, –. Boër, S.E. & Lycan, W. (). Knowing Who, Cambridge, MA: MIT Press. Cappelen, Herman & Dever, Josh. (). The Inessential Indexical, Oxford: OUP. Castañeda, Hector. (). \"'He': A Study in the Logic of Self-Consciousness\", Ratio , –. Castañeda, Hector. (). \"On the Logic of Attributions of Self-Knowledge to Others\", Journal of Philosophy , –. Chierchia, Gennaro. (). \"Anaphora and Attitudes De Se\", in R. Bartsch, J. van Benthem and P. van Emde Boas (eds), Semantics and Contextual Expressions, Foris, Dordrecht, –. Chisholm, Roderick M. (). The First Person, Minneapolis, University of Minnesota Press. Crimmins, Mark. (). Talk about Beliefs, Cambridge, MA: MIT Press. Davidson, Donald. (). \"Action, Reasons and Causes\", Journal of Philosophy , –. Egan, Andy. (). \"Epistemic Modals, Relativism and Assertion\", Philosophical Studies , –. Fiengo, R. & May, R. (). De Lingua Belief, Cambridge, MA: MIT Press. Fine, Kit. (). Semantic Relationism, Oxford: Blackwell. García-Carpintero, Manuel. (). \"The Philosophical Import of Connectionism: A Critical Notice of Andy Clark's Associative Engines, Mind and Language , –. \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 OUP CORRECTED PROOF – FINAL, //, SPi token-reflexive presuppositions and the de se  García-Carpintero, Manuel. (). \"Indexicals as Token-Reflexives\", Mind  (), –. García-Carpintero, Manuel. (). \"A Presuppositional Account of Reference-Fixing,\" Journal of Philosophy xcvii (), –. García-Carpintero, Manuel. (). \"Logical Form: Syntax and Semantics\", Wittgenstein Today, A. Coliva & E. Picardi (eds.) Il Poligrafo, Padova, , –. García-Carpintero, Manuel. (). \"Two-dimensionalism: a Neo-Fregean Interpretation\", in García-Carpintero, M. & Macià, J. (eds.), Two-Dimensional Semantics, Oxford: Oxford University Press, –. García-Carpintero,Manuel. (). \"Fictional Singular Imaginings\", in Jeshion, Robin (ed.),New Essays on Singular Thought, Oxford: Oxford University Press, –. García-Carpintero, Manuel. (). \"The Self File and Immunity to Error Through Misidentification\", Disputatio (Portugal) , (), –. García-Carpintero, Manuel. (a). \"Introduction: The Problem of Empty Representations\", in García-Carpintero, M. & Martí, G. (eds.), Empty Representations: Reference and NonExistence, Oxford: Oxford University Press, –. García-Carpintero, Manuel. (b). \"Accommodating Presupposition\", Topoi, DOI: ./s---. García-Carpintero, Manuel. (forthcoming). \"De Se Thoughts and Immunity to Error through Misidentification\", Synthese. Goodsell, Thea. (). \"Is De jure Coreference Non-transitive?\" Philosophical Studies : –. Hawthorne, J. & Manley, D. (). The Reference Book, Oxford: Oxford University Press. Heck, Richard G. Jnr. (). \"Solving's Frege's Puzzle,\" Journal of Philosophy , –. Heim, Irene. (). \"Anaphora and Semantic Interpretation: a Reinterpretation of Reinhart's Approach\" in Sauerland, U. & Percus, O. (eds.), The interpretative Tract, MIT working papers in Linguistics Vol. , Cambridge, MA: MITWPL. Heim, I. & Kratzer, A. (). Semantics in Generative Grammar, Oxford: Blackwell. Higginbotham, James. (). \"Remembering, Imagining, and the First Person\", in A. Barber, Epistemology of Language, Oxford: Oxford UP, –. Higginbotham, James. (). \"On Words and Thoughts about Oneself \", in Stojanovich, I., Recanati, F., and Villanueva, N. (eds.), Context-Dependence, Perspective, and Relativity. Berlin: Mouton de Gruyter, –. Howell, Robert. (). \"Self-Knowledge and Self-Reference\", Philosophy and Phenomenological Research , –. Hunter, Julie. (). \"Presuppositional Indexicals\", Journal of Semantics  (), –, doi: ./jos/ffs. Kaplan, David. (). \"Demonstratives\", in J. Almog, J. Perry and H. Wettstein (eds.), Themes from Kaplan, Oxford: Oxford University Press, –. Kripke, S. (). Naming and Necessity, Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press. Lewis, David. (). 'Attitudes De Dicto and De Se', Philosophical Review , –. Also in D. Lewis, Philosophical Papers vol. , Oxford: Oxford University Press. Macià, Josep. (). \"On the Interaction of Syntax-Semantics-Pragmatics: A Case Study\", Gutiérrez-Rexach, J. (ed.), From Words to Discourse. (Current Research in the Semantics/ Pragmatics Interface (CRISPI), Volume ). Magidor, Ofra. (forthcoming). \"The Myth of the De Se\", Philosophical Perspectives. \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 OUP CORRECTED PROOF – FINAL, //, SPi  manuel garcía-carpintero Maier, Emar. (). \"PresupposingAcquaintance: AUnified Semantics for DeDicto, De Re and De Se Belief Reports\", Linguistics and Philosophy  (), –. Moss, Sarah. (). \"Updating as Communication\", Philosophy and Phenomenological Research lxxxv, –. Ninan, Dilip. (). \"De Se Attitudes: Ascription and Communication,\" Philosophy Compass (), –. O'Brien, Lucy. (). Self-Knowing Agents, Oxford: OUP. Ortega yGasset, José (). \"Ideas y Creencias\", in hisObras Completas, vol. , Madrid: Alianza, , –. Pagin, Peter. (). \"What Is Communicative Success?\" Canadian Journal of Philosophy , –. Peacocke, Christopher. (). Sense and Content. Experience, Thought, and their Relations, Oxford: Clarendon Press. Peacocke, Christopher. (). Truly Understood, Oxford: Oxford University Press. Peacocke, Christopher. (). The Mirror of the World, Oxford: Oxford University Press. Perry, John. (). \"The Problem of the Essential Indexical\" Noûs , –. Also in his The Problem of the Essential Indexical and other Essays, Oxford: Oxford University Press, , –, from which I quote. Perry, John. (). \"Postscript to The Problem of the Essential Indexical\", in his The Problem of the Essential Indexical and other Essays, Oxford: Oxford University Press, , –. Perry, John. (). \"Stalnaker and Indexical Belief \", in J. Thomson & A. Byrne (eds.), Content and Modality: Themes from the Philosophy of Robert Stalnaker, Oxford: Clarendon Press, –. Perry, John. (). Reference and Reflexivity, nd Edition, Stanford: CSLI Publications. Pietroski, Paul. (). \"Fregean Innocence,\" Mind and Language , –. Pinillos, N. Ángel. (). \"Coreference and Meaning\", Philosophical Studies : –. Pryor, James. (ms). \"Acquaintance, mental files and mental graphs\", draft //. Recanati, Francois. (). Perspectival Thought, Oxford: Oxford University Press. Recanati, Francois. (). \"De re and De se\", Dialectica , –. Recanati, Francois. (). \"Immunity to Error through Misidentification: What It Is and Where It Comes from\", in S. Prosser and F. Recanati (eds.), Immunity to Error Through Misidentification: New Essays Cambridge University Press, –. Recanati, Francois. (). Mental Files, Oxford: Oxford University Press. Richard, Mark. (). Propositional Attitudes, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. Sainsbury, M. & Tye, M. (). Seven Puzzles of Thought, Oxford: Oxford University Press. Schaffer, Jonathan. (). \"Necessitarian Propositions\", Synthese , –. Schlenker, Philippe. (). \"Indexicality and De Se Reports\", in Semantics. An International Handbook of Natural Language Meaning, Heusinger, K., Maienborn, C., and Portner, P. (eds.), Morton de Gruyter, Berlin, –. Schroeter, Laura. (). \"The Illusion of Transparency\", Australasian Journal of Philosophy , –. Schroeter, Laura. (). \"Why Be an Anti-Individualist?\" Philosophy and Phenomenological Research , –. Schroeter, Laura. (). \"Bootstrapping Our Way to Samesaying\", Synthese  (), –. Shoemaker, Sidney. (). \"Self-Knowledge and Self-Awareness\", Journal of Philosophy lxvc, –. \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 \u0002 OUP CORRECTED PROOF – FINAL, //, SPi token-reflexive presuppositions and the de se  Soames, Scott. (). Beyond Rigidity, New York: Oxford University Press. Sosa, Ernest. (). \"Propositions and Indexical Attitudes\", in H. Parret (ed.), On Believing, Berlin: Walter de Gruyter, –. Stalnaker, Robert. (). \"Assertion\", in P. Cole (ed.) Syntax and Semantics , New York: Academic Press, –. Stalnaker, Robert. (). \"Indexical Belief \", Synthese , –. Also in R. Stalnaker, Context and Content, Oxford: Oxford University Press, , –, to which I refer. Stalnaker, Robert. ().Our Knowledge of the Internal World, Oxford:OxfordUniversity Press. Torre, Stephan. (). \"Centered Assertions\", Philosophical Studies , –. Weber, Clas. (). \"Centered Communication\", Philosophical Studies , –. Weber, Clas. (). \"Indexical Beliefs and Communication: Against Stalnaker on SelfLocation\", Philosophy and Phenomenological Research XC (), –. Wittgenstein, Ludwig. (). The Blue and Brown Books, ed. Rush Rhees, New York: Harper and Row. Wittgenstein, Ludwig. (). On Certainty, English translation by D. Paul and G.E.M. Anscombe, Oxford: Basil Blackwell."}
{"meta": {"title": "Absolute Present, Zen and Schrödinger’s One Mind", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Bruza, Peter", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "Erwin Schrödinger holds a prominent place in the history of science primarily due to his crucial role in the development of quantum physics. What is perhaps lesser known are his insights into subject-object duality, consciousness and mind. He documented himself that these were influenced by the Upanishads, a collection of ancient Hindu spiritual texts. Central to his thoughts in this area is that Mind is only One and there is no separation between subject and object. This chapter aims to bridge Schrödinger’s view on One Mind with the teachings of Dōgen, a twelfth century Zen master. This bridge is formed by addressing the question of how time relates to One Mind, and subject-object duality. Schrödinger describes the experience of One Mind to be like a timeless now, whereas subject-object duality involves a linear continuum of time. We show how these differing positions are unified in the notion of ‘absolute present’, which was put forward in the philosophy of Nishida Kitarō (1871–1945). In addition, we argue that it is in this notion of absolute present that the views of Schrödinger, Dōgen and Nishida meet.", "date": "2019", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/RAMAPZ", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2020-02-07T05:32:33Z"}, "text": "Chapter 16 Absolute Present, Zen and Schrödinger's One Mind Peter D. Bruza and Brentyn J. Ramm Abstract Erwin Schrödinger holds a prominent place in the history of science primarily due to his crucial role in the development of quantum physics. What is perhaps lesser known are his insights into subject-object duality, consciousness and mind. He documented himself that these were influenced by the Upanishads, a collection of ancient Hindu spiritual texts. Central to his thoughts in this area is that Mind is only One and there is no separation between subject and object. This chapter aims to bridge Schrödinger's view on One Mind with the teachings of Dōgen, a twelfth century Zen master. This bridge is formed by addressing the question of how time relates to One Mind, and subject-object duality. Schrödinger describes the experience of One Mind to be like a timeless now, whereas subjectobject duality involves a linear continuum of time. We show how these differing positions are unified in the notion of 'absolute present', which was put forward in the philosophy of Nishida Kitarō (1871–1945). In addition, we argue that it is in this notion of absolute present that the views of Schrödinger, Dōgen and Nishida meet. 16.1 The Principle of Objectivation Perhaps you can cast your mind back to your first encounter with the scientific method at school. It may have proceeded something like the following: In the midst of a small group of students a candle is placed and you are asked to light it up. Thereafter you are required to record a series of observations, for example, what is the temperature in the orange part of the flame, the blue part of the flame, or of the wax. At different times you are asked to measure the height of the candle, and record any changes in the colour or consistency of the wax. In this, or other ways, we come P. D. Bruza (\u0002) Faculty of Science and Engineering, Queensland University of Technology, Brisbane, QLD, Australia e-mail: p.bruza@qut.edu.au B. J. Ramm Independent Philosopher, Fremantle, WA, Australia © Springer Nature Switzerland AG 2019 J. Acacio de Barros, C. Montemayor (eds.), Quanta and Mind, Synthese Library 414, https://doi.org/10.1007/978-3-030-21908-6_16 189 brentynramm@gmail.com 190 P. D. Bruza and B. J. Ramm to learn that science involves making observations about some phenomenon, and these observations are input into a scientific understanding of that phenomenon. It is usually not told, however, what the underlying assumptions are. These are taken as given. First, there is the assumption that the phenomenon is an \"object\". By this it is meant that the candle has clearly defined boundaries which allows us to isolate and distinguish the candle from non-candle phenomena. In addition, that the candle is undoubtedly an object can be seen in the instructions given to the students such as \"the object under investigation\" etc. An object is assumed to have properties, the values of which can be established by \"observation\", that is making a measurement of one of the properties, e.g., a particular value of temperature, or a particular colour of the flame. It is also assumed that the properties are independent of each other, for example, by measuring the height of the candle, we don't affect the colour of the wax. Another assumption is that the object persists through time, for example, at different instants we can make record the height of the candle. At each such instant of measurement, there is no doubt that it is the same candle that is being observed and measured. Usually nothing much is said about the observer. We are simply told to observe the candle, but who or what the observer is remains unknown and somewhat irrelevant to the process. We are told that the observations are \"independent of the observer\", not much more than that. By observing the candle, we come to tacitly understand that we can peek at the object from the shadows so to speak – as our observations do not influence the object. Finally, we assume that even when we are not observing the candle, it still exists as an object external to ourselves as observers. Erwin Schrödinger, one of the founders of quantum theory described the principle underlying our candle scenario as \"objectivation\". By this he meant, .. the thing that is also frequently called the hypothesis of the real world around us. I maintain that it amounts to a certain simplification which we adopt in order to master the infinitely intricate problem of nature. Without being aware of it and without being rigorously systematic about it, we exclude the Subject-of-cognizance from the domain of nature that we endeavour to understand. We step with our own person back into the part of an onlooker who does not belong to the world, which by this very procedure becomes an objective world. This fragment is quoted from an essay (Schrödinger 1992b, p. 118) the goal of which was to elucidate two general principles underlying the scientific method, the \"principle of objectivation\" being one of the two. This quote is striking in a number of ways as it seems to contradict some of the assumptions listed above in relation to our observation of the candle. Firstly, the term \"hypothesis\" is explicitly mentioned in relation to the \"real world\". As students of science, we are not usually led to hypothesise whether the world around us is real, but as stated above, we simply accept that the candle exists in a reality external to ourselves. Secondly, even though we are taught to be systematic and rigorous when conducting our observations, Schrödinger points out that we are not systematic or rigorous about something else, namely what he calls the \"Subject-of-cognizance\". At this point we won't go into detail about what the Subject-of-cognizance might be, but simply point out that by assuming the role of the observer of the candle, something of seeming significance is being excluded, and that exclusion is done brentynramm@gmail.com 16 Absolute Present, Zen and Schrödinger's One Mind 191 without awareness that something is being excluded. Finally, he states something very extraordinary: By our stepping back \"as an onlooker\", the world becomes \"objective\". 16.2 Enter the Subject-of-Cognizance It would be mistaken to think that Schrödinger's essay was a criticism of the scientific method. Rather, he was trying to clarify the scientific method in the context of Western science and psychology in the early 1940s. Schrödinger states the Subjectof-cognizance as being excluded in the principle of objectivation. By bringing it back in, the philosophical problem of the subject-object relation trails in its wake. There is a relevant historical context in which to consider this age-old problem. While quantum theory was being developed, it seemed that new insights into the subject-object relation may be achieved. The reason for this is that in experiments made on quantum particles, choices made by the observer had a pronounced effect on the quantum-object being observed. It seemed no longer case that the observer (the subject) could peek at the object while residing in the background. For example, Jammer (1974, p. 161) states that Pascal Jordan emphatically stated the very act of observation was creating the object being observed. In addition, Jordan seems to have at least considered subjectivism, \"we ourselves produce the results of measurement\" [Wir selber rufen die Tatbestände hervor] (Jordan 1934, p. 228). Despite some of the founders of quantum theory leaning toward subjectivism, it made many physicists, both then and now, decidedly uncomfortable. In the meantime it has been well documented how the field of quantum physics circumvented subjectivism by means of the Copenhagen interpretation (e.g., see Rosenblum and Kuttner 2006).1 Schrödinger's position in regard to the subject-object relation was not a circumvention, but radically to the point. At the very end of his essay he states (Schrödinger 1992b, p. 127): All this was said from the point of view that we accept the time-hallowed distinction between subject and object. Though we have to accept it in everyday life \"for practical reference\", we ought, so I believe to abandon it in philosophical thought. . . The world is given to me only once, not one existing and one perceived. Subject and object are only 1Chalmers and McQueen (2014) have recently argued in support of consciousness playing a causal role in collapsing the wave function. They posit the existence of m-properties which can never be superposed. Whenever a superposed property becomes (potentially) entangled with an m-property it necessarily collapses into a definite state. Consciousness is a natural candidate for an m-property since it cannot be superposed; for example, I cannot experience red and not-red simultaneously in the same location. This hypothesis has the theoretical virtues of: (1) providing a potential solution to the measurement problem, in particular, an explanation for why measurement collapses the wave function into a definite state, and (2) gives consciousness a causal role in the physical world. Schrödinger goes further than Chalmers and McQueen's dualist theory by holding that the physical world is in fact constituted by conscious experience. brentynramm@gmail.com 192 P. D. Bruza and B. J. Ramm one. The barrier between them cannot be said to have broken down as a result of recent experience in the physical sciences, for this barrier does not exist [emphasis added] Schrödinger's mention of \"recent experience in the physical sciences\" alludes to the previously mentioned reconsideration of the problem of the subject-object relation raised by quantum physics. Schrödinger's stance is very unorthodox in two respects: (1) there is no duality between subject and object (the orthodox position is that there is an inherent distinction) and (2) the only world that is \"given\" is the one that is actually being perceived. This runs counter to the orthodox view that the world exists independent of our perception of it. 16.3 Zen and One Mind Subjectivism A perception sudden as blinking, that subject and object are one, will lead to a deeply mysterious wordless understanding; and by this understanding you will awake to the truth of Zen This is a quote from Huang Po (d 850) a well-known master from the Chinese period of Zen known as Chan (Blofeld 1958). The essence of Huang Po's quote is the same as Schrödinger's, namely that subject and object are one in a spontaneous act of perception. Moreover, Chan teaches that this perception is a discontinuity in the sense that it is not simply revealing a pre-existing non-dualistic form of reality. More specifically similar to Huang Po's \"perception sudden as blinking\", Schrödinger wrote in a letter to Bruno Bertotti, one of his students (Bertotti 1985): . . . the very, very old Indian TAT TWAM ASI (This art thou) [subject-object are one] is, of course, not a physical but rather a metaphysical statement. It is so simple that it is impossible to explain it. It cannot be grasped by the intellect, but it may spring up in you at some occasion like a spark, and then it is there and will never really leave you, even though it is not a practical maxim to use every hour of your life. [emphasis added] In the history of Zen there are many stories of such spontaneous experiences. They are often expressed in relation to perception via a particular sense modality, for example, the sense of sound. Monk: Where can I enter Zen? Master Gensha: Can you hear the babbling brook? Monk: Yes, I can hear it. Master Gensha: Then enter it there. The oneness of subject and object is a holistic experience of there being no distinction between that which is hearing (subject), the act of hearing, and that which is heard (the object). Such experiences directly undermine the distinction and assumed separation between an observer (subject) perceiving a candle (object). If subject and object are one, what then is doing the observing? This is a very important question in Zen. It is common to assume the subject, the one doing the observing, is a product of consciousness in an individual's brain, and it would brentynramm@gmail.com 16 Absolute Present, Zen and Schrödinger's One Mind 193 therefore be understandable to define Schrödinger's Subject-of-cognizance in this way. However, he himself did not adhere to such a definition. Schrödinger rejected this theory for two reasons. Firstly, because \"the stuff from which our world picture is built, is yielded exclusively from the sense organs as organs of the mind, so that every man's world picture is and always remains a construct of his mind and cannot be proved to have any other existence.\" (Schrödinger 1992a, p. 122). Unsurprisingly then, the mind itself cannot be found within this construct. He points out secondly, that no one has ever observed consciousness in the head or body. The scientist rather finds only \"millions of cells of very specialized build in an arrangement that is unsurveyably intricate\"(ibid., p. 123). He goes on \"nowhere you may be sure, however, far physiology advances, will you ever meet the personality, will you ever meet the dire pain, the bewildered worry within this soul.\" (ibid., p. 124). In summary, we cannot find mind in the world because our world picture is constructed by the mind. Moreover, \"The reason why our sentient, percipient and thinking ego is met nowhere within our scientific world picture can easily be indicated in seven words: because it is itself that world picture. It is identical with the whole and therefore cannot be contained in it as a part of it.\" (Schrödinger 1992a, p. 128). The mind is thus the container of the world picture, not something within that picture (ibid., p. 136–137). We have seen examples of Scrödinger's philosophical method, which is in the spirit of 'radical empiricism' as employed by William James (1976). Based upon experience he rejected the separability of subject and object, and hence the hypothesis of an independent world. This method, combined with philosophical arguments further lead him accept the conclusion that rather than many consciousnesses, there was in fact only One Mind, and hence one observer. In fact, Schrödinger stated in the 1950s that his world view was formed by Spinoza and Schopenhauer. In particular, the view that he formed when he was 30-years old, and never changed, was that of the One Mind presented in the Upanishads (Bitbol 1999). Bruno Bertotti was one of Schrödinger's students and was clearly intimate with his views (Bertotti 1985). Bertotti's defined of Schrödinger's world view as \"rational mysticism\" and summarized it as follows: \"his main philosophical theme, namely that all existents, in particular the individual consciousnesses, are manifestations of a Single Mind\". Why did he hold this view? In another essay, Schrödinger refers to inevitable paradoxes that spring from a single source which he termed the \"arithmetic paradox\" (Schrödinger 1992a). He defines this paradox as \"The many conscious egos from whose mental experiences the one world is concocted\". More specifically (Bertotti 1985), The most wide-spread attitude is, so I believe, the following: there is one real world and this naturally accounts for its making the same impression on Mr. A, Mr. B, etc., etc .. to me it seems the greatest and absolutely inexplicable marvel that \"we all live in the same world\". . . Why marvel? Well, you see, my world is built up of my sensations, the world of Mr B is built up of Mr B's sensations. There is absolutely no communication between Mr B's sensations and mine. . . Is it not then actually an unaccountable marvel that these \"two worlds\", built as it were from entirely different material, coincide? brentynramm@gmail.com 194 P. D. Bruza and B. J. Ramm It is apparent from the preceding that Schrödinger did not subscribe to the common sense view that the correspondence between the sensations of Mr. A and Mr. B. is due to them both perceiving the same external reality. He rejected this doubling of the world into appearance and reality, and any empirically suspect notions such as Kant's thing-in-itself (Schrödinger 1992a, p. 127), hence this solution was unacceptable to him. He also rejected Leibniz's \"fearful doctrine of monads\" (ibid., p. 129). Although Leibniz's view avoided mysterious things in themselves and did not make the error of locating consciousness in things, it entailed a splittering of the universe into numerous non-interacting worlds. Schrödinger's resolution of the arithmetic paradox once again involved adopting a radically unorthodox position (ibid): There is obviously only one alternative [to the paradox], namely the unification of minds, or consciousnesses. Their multiplicity is only apparent, in truth there is only one mind. This is the doctrine of the Upanishads. And not only of the Upanishads. The mystically experienced union with God regularly entails this attitude. Schrödinger's view is there is only \"one mind\", not individual consciousnesses. Therefore, the only possible observer is this One Mind. Finally, Schrödinger, again employing a method of radical empiricism argued: The doctrine of identity (of all minds) can claim that it is clinched by the empirical fact that consciousness is never experienced in the plural, only in the singular. Not only has none of us ever experienced more than one consciousness, but there is also no trace of circumstantial evidence of this ever happening anywhere in the world. (ibid, p. 130) This observation does not logically entail his conclusion since an absence of evidence of multiple consciousnesses is not the same as evidence of absence of multiple consciousnesses. Nevertheless, as an empirical argument, no evidence for something (for example unicorns, Homerian gods etc.) provides a reason for not believing in that thing. Furthermore, the phenomenology was not meant to stand alone, but to work in conjunction with his other philosophical and empirical arguments. Did Schrödinger ever attempt to incorporate his world view based on the One Mind into his scientific theories? Bertotti was unable to uncover any tangible attempt, however in Bertotti's description of Schrödinger's vision, he does allude to the possibility of there being one (Bertotti 1985): On the one hand the essential unity of the world arises from its fragmentation among the individual consciousnesses not because of a cogent philosophical argument, but through a 'mystical' awareness; on the other hand this very 'oneness', being independent from the single observers, makes quantum mechanics unacceptable and urgently requires a new theory. [emphasis added] The question left dangling is whether a scientific theory could be developed around the One Mind. Such a question would seemingly need to bridge Eastern philosophy and the realism of contemporary science. The rest of this chapter will not attempt to present such a bridge, but rather focus on the concept of time – a concept which is core to both sides of the bridge. brentynramm@gmail.com 16 Absolute Present, Zen and Schrödinger's One Mind 195 16.4 Subject, Object, Time, NOW Let us go back to the scenario of observing the candle. Recall that one of the tacit assumptions was that the object (the candle) persists through time and the observer can make observations at various time instants. Regardless of having \"stepped back as an onlooker\", it is reasonable to assume that the observing subject similarly persists through time as illustrated by Fig. 16.1. This diagram represents two states of the observer, where, for example, +1 represents the observer is in the state attending to the candle and −1 represents a state in which the observer has become distracted. In this way the state of the observing subject can be modelled as having a linear temporal trajectory through a space of two possible states. As mentioned in the introduction, a feature of this time-based mode of observation is a seeming separation between observer (subject) and observed (object), which both Huang Po and Schrödinger deny. Contrast this time-based account with Huang Po's \"a perception sudden as blinking that subject and object are one\", which suggests the experience of One Mind is a discontinuity. This notion of discontinuity also accords with Schrödinger's observation mentioned earlier \". . . it [one mind awareness] may spring up in you at some occasion like a spark\". But does such a state of One Mind persist through time? In his philosophical exploration of time Schrödinger (1992c) inquires into whether science and philosophy can illuminate religious beliefs about life and death and the transcendence of time. He approvingly interprets Kant as having proposed that: To be spread out in space and to happen in a well-defined temporal order of 'before and after' is not a quality of the world that we perceive, but pertains to the perceiving mind which, in its present situation anyhow, cannot help registering anything that is offered to it according to these two card-indexes, space and time. (p. 144) Schrödinger again poses doubt as to whether space and time are qualities of an objective world. He asks, even if we do accept the hypothesis of an objective world, on what basis are we to decide whether an experienced feature belongs to our mind or the world (ibid, p. 145–146)? This being said, the most insightful point to take away from Kant, according to Schrödinger, comes from Schopenhauer's reading of Kant: State +1 –1 t1 t2 t3 t Fig. 16.1 The state of awareness of an observing subject brentynramm@gmail.com 196 P. D. Bruza and B. J. Ramm The great thing was to form the idea that this one thing 'mind or world' may well be capable of other forms of appearance that we cannot grasp and that do not imply the notions of space and time. This means an imposing liberation from our inveterate prejudice. There are probably other orders of appearance than the space-time like. (ibid., p.146) What would an experience beyond space and time even be like, and how does it apply specially to One Mind awareness? Once again Schrödinger answers this question from direct experience: Mind is by its very nature a singular tantum. I should say: the over-all number of minds is just one. I venture to call it indestructible since it has a peculiar time-table, namely mind is always now. There is really no before and after for mind. There is only a now that includes memories and expectations (Schrödinger 1992a, p. 135). The state of One Mind, then, according to Schrödinger, is experienced as a kind of timeless NOW. He denies that 'before' and 'after' apply to the experience of the present moment. Rather 'before' and 'after' are constructed in the timeless NOW by memory and expectation. Schrödinger's phenomenological descriptions of this timeless present moment are echoed in spiritual traditions, with a particular affinity with Zen Buddhism, as is evident from D. T. Suzuki's summary of Zen: Zen is emphatically a matter of personal experience; if anything can be called radically empirical it is Zen. No amount of reading, no amount of teaching, no amount of contemplation will ever make one a Zen master. Life itself must be grasped in the midst of its flow; to stop it for examination and analysis is to kill it, leaving its cold corpse to be embraced. (Suzuki 1954, p. 132) Dōgen, a twelfth century Zen master, provides descriptions of temporal experience that are particularly relevant to those of Schrödinger. Dōgen2 (1200–1253) was one of the most prolific writers amongst Zen masters of old and contributed an extensive collection of articles on various topics (Tanahashi 2010a,b). The chapter of relevance to the present discussion is titled \"The time being\" (sometimes translated as \"Being time\" (Dōgen 2010). The time being has a characteristic of flowing. So-called today flows into tomorrow, today flows into yesterday, yesterday flows into today. And today flows into today, tomorrow flows into tomorrow. Because flowing is a characteristic of time, moments of past and present do not overlap or line up side by side [emphasis added] This position aligns with Schrödinger's because it denies a linear succession of time instants. In the following passage, Dōgen also alludes to the subject-object mode of awareness as being connected to the orthodox linear notion of time: In your study of flowing, if you imagine the objective to be outside yourself and that you flow and move through hundreds of thousands of worlds, for hundreds, thousands and myriad of eons, you have not devotedly studied the buddha way. 2Zen master Dōgen was the founder of the Soto sect, one of the two main schools of Zen Buddhism in Japan. brentynramm@gmail.com 16 Absolute Present, Zen and Schrödinger's One Mind 197 Here Dōgen implies that it is illusory to assume an objective universe through which an individual moves through space and time. The striking element here is that the objective universe seems so ordinarily real, so real that it doesn't bear questioning. In Zen, however, the objective universe is viewed as an almost perfect illusion where \"devotedly studying the buddha way\" involves earnestly questioning the assumed reality of the objective universe to directly understanding the reality of this illusion. This understanding is a not a conventional understanding, but rather, as Huang Po states \"a wordless understanding\", which is brought about by experiencing One Mind awareness. Such a radically subjective understanding of space and time as found in Zen is again reflected in Schrödinger's writings when he says about the conscious mind that: It is the stage, and the only stage on which this whole world process takes place, or the vessel or container that contains it all and outside which there is nothing. (Schrödinger 1992b, p. 136). There is one philosopher who is uniquely positioned to bridge Dōgen's view of time and Schrödinger's view of One Mind. His name is Nishida Kitarō. Nishida trained in Zen Buddhism and according to D.T. Suzuki, an authoritative Zen scholar, Nishida had an enlightenment experience which deeply influenced his views about the ultimate nature of reality. In the context of this article, Nishida's experience can be construed as a direct experience of Shrödinger's One Mind. Rather than write from a spiritual perspective like the ancient Zen masters, Nishida was determined to write about the essence of reality in a way that would be acceptable to the contemporary philosophy. With this choice, Nishida was unknowingly subscribing to Schrödinger's rational mysticism in the sense that his philosophy presents itself as a rationalism that proposes to analyze reality which has been grasped on the basis of a profound religious, or spiritual experience. Whilst Nishida does not use the term One Mind, he does directly refer to it in terms of the self as a borderless \"absolute present\". He states (Raud 2004), When I speak of ourselves being singular focal points of the world determining our individualities through self expression, this does not mean that I conceive of the self necessarily in terms of the logic of objects. It is rather, a singular centre of the absolute present that includes in itself the eternal past and future. This is why I call the self a momentary self determination of the absolute present . . . And the world of the absolute present is the sphere with infinite radius and no circumference, which has a center everywhere. Nishida's view refers to the 'logic of objects'. By this he meant something very similar to the Schrödinger's principle of objectivation, namely that the logic of objects occurs when the subject steps back as an observer thus rendering a universe of objects. Moreover, Nishida's 'absolute present' resonates with Schrödinger's notion of the timeless NOW, but in Nishida's view, this 'absolute present'3 also includes both future and past. This view clearly aligns with Dōgen's, \"today flows into tomorrow, today flows into yesterday, yesterday flows into today. . . \". 3Nishida also uses the expression 'eternal now' elsewhere in his writings. brentynramm@gmail.com 198 P. D. Bruza and B. J. Ramm In contrast to the 'logic of objects', Nishida proposed the 'logic of absolutely contradictory self-identity'. This logic is the foundation of Nishida's philosophy, which was deeply influenced by his practice of Zen (Kozyra 2018). Kozyra (2018, p. 432) describes Nishida's logic as when \"the subject transcends itself and perceives the object 'through becoming the object'. We perceive the world in our absolutely contradictory self-identity with the world\". This definition clearly has the same essence as Schrödinger's One Mind in which subject and object are one. Nishida's term 'absolute present' may seem like a term which is time-based, but Nishida's quote above also importantly refers to space, which he describes as boundless and without a center. Raud (2004, p 44.) interprets the \"center\" as equating to an individual subject or 'conscious self'. He further argues that the dichotomy of space and time obtains from the standpoint of such a self. This dichotomy is transcended when these time and space unite in 'contradictorily selfindexical' point of view. Raud stresses that the unification should not be posited as being outside the context of reality, because when the self determines itself to be the 'absolute present', then the self is none other than reality itself. This reality paradoxically manifests a borderless space in which seemingly distinct phenomena have no separation and is a timeless NOW which includes time. It is at the 'absolute present', Schrödinger, Dōgen and Nishida converge. 16.5 Closing Reflections: The Illusion of Time's Arrow Here we have investigated Schrödinger's views on subject-object non-duality and the One Mind hypothesis. We also showed how he questioned subject-object duality by denying that an observation is the relation of the objective time of an object and the separate subjective states of an observer. For Schrödinger space and time, if they are anywhere at all, belong to the observer-observed unity (not outside of it). Schrödinger also sought for a liberation from time through philosophy and mystical modes of experience, particularly in the timeless NOW. As a scientist, however, he was not content with these philosophical and mystical approaches by themselves. His thinking was also constrained by the findings of the sciences. We would like to close by asking: how do his reflections on time accord with physics? In fact, Schrödinger believed that the non-objectivity of time is also supported by physics. In his thoughts on science and religion (Schrödinger 1992c), he grappled with the enduring mystery of the arrow of time. The problem is that for observers, time seems to flow uniformly in a single direction from past to future. Yet the laws of mechanics are symmetrical (Schrödinger 1992c, p. 151). The arrow of time is not fundamental to these laws. As a consequence, there is no reason to believe that the world is not like a film that could be played backwards as well as forwards. To explain this, Schrödinger draws upon Boltzmann's statistical theory of time. Boltzmann demonstrated that the arrow of time could be explained by the second law of thermodynamics that a system tends towards greater entropy. That is, time is not physically fundamental in this view, rather the reason that eggs do not unbreak brentynramm@gmail.com 16 Absolute Present, Zen and Schrödinger's One Mind 199 is not because they cannot, but because it is simply a very unlikely event. For Schrödinger the statistical theory of time's arrow provided further support for Kant's theory that time is subjective. There is however a tension that Schrödinger does not resolve, namely in the formalization of quantum theory, time has both an objective and fundamental treatment. Interestingly, however, a number of recent studies have experimentally linked the thermodynamic arrow of time to quantum theory. One study showed that a sub-system tends towards equilibrium because of quantum entanglement of its particles with surrounding systems (Linden et al. 2009). This means that a cup of coffee will tend to cool down (reach equilibrium) because of the entanglement of its particles with surrounding air particles. Another study demonstrated that the thermodynamic arrow of time could be reversed when two particles were initially quantum mechanically correlated (Micadei et al. 2017). This shows that the thermodynamic arrow of time is relative to initial conditions, it is not an absolute. The important point of these findings is that time is not a background flow that things happen in, but is reducible to the mechanics of the systems themselves. It is an open question whether time will eventually be eliminated from all fundamental physical theories, including quantum theory. Important steps in this direction have been made by Julian Barbour. Barbour (1999) assumes that time is a derivable notion based on change. He presents a theory based on a configuration space U , each point of which is a particular configuration of all matter in the universe (called a 'now'). A path between two points is a curve where time is derived from differences between the configurations corresponding to the points on the curve. One of the consequences of Barbour's theory is that it parsimoniously supports a timeless Newtonian dynamics (Barbour 2009). When Schrödinger penned his views about One Mind, his exalted place in the history of science had already been assured. Nevertheless, his unorthodox views on such matters were politely ignored, and even today these views are relatively unknown. In the mean-time quantum theory has become the most stunningly successful theory ever devised by humans. To date, quandaries raised by quantum theory such as subject-object duality remain unresolved. There are some small signs, however, that such foundational issues are being revisited. For example, Malin (2003) has written an intriguing account of the foundations of quantum theory from a Western philosophical perspective. What is very striking about this book is its third part titled \"Physics and the One\". Following from Schrödinger, Malin argues that the next step for science is to transcend subject-object duality. In this regard, Malin issues a thought provoking and daring question: \"The quest for the One Mind calls for the transcendence of the subject/object mode. Can science participate in this quest?\". Acknowledgements The first author respectfully dedicates this article to Professor Shimon Malin, who made the first author aware of Schrödinger's views on One Mind as well as for his thought provoking views about quantum theory. The first author also thanks Michel Bitbol for the inspiring discussions in the subject area of this article. brentynramm@gmail.com 200 P. D. Bruza and B. J. Ramm References Barbour, J. (1999). The end of time: The next revolution in physics. Oxford/New York: Oxford University Press. Barbour, J. (2009). The nature of time. arXiv:9003.3489v1. Bertotti, B. (1985). The later work of E. Schrödinger. Studies in History and Philosophy of Science, 16(2), 83–100. Bitbol, M. (1999, August). Schrödinger and Indian philosophy. http://michel.bitbol.pagespersoorange.fr/Schrodinger_India.pdf. (Online; Accessed September 06, 2018) Blofeld, J. (1958). The Zen teaching of Huang Po. New York: Grove Press. Chalmers, D., & McQueen, K. (2014, May). Consciousness and the collapse of the wavefunction. A lecture given by Davis Chalmers at Göttingen University. From: http://ieet.org/index.php/ IEET/more/chalmers20140806 Dōgen. (2010). The time being. In K. Tanahashi (Ed.), Treasury of the true Dharma eye: Zen master Dōgen's Shobo Genzo (Vol. 1, pp. 104–111). Boston: Shambhala. James, W. (1976). Essays in radical empiricism. Cambridge: Harvard University Press. Jammer, M. (1974). The philosophy of quantum mechanics: The interpretations of quantum mechanics in historical perspective. New York: Wiley. Jordan, P. (1934). Quantenphysikalische bemerkungen zur biologie und psychologie. Erkentniss, 4, 215–252. Kozyra, A. (2018). Nishida Kitarōs philosophy of absolute nothingness (zettaimu no tetsugaku) and modern theoretical physics. Philosophy East and West, 68(2), 423–446. Linden, N., Pospescu, A., Short, A., & Winter, A. (2009). Quantum mechanical evolution towards thermal equilibrium. Physical Review E, 79(6), 061103. Malin, S. (2003). Nature loves to hide: Quantum physics and reality, a Western perspective. New York: Oxford University Press. Micadei, K., Peterson, A., Souza, R., Sarthour, I., Oliveira, G., Landi, T., & Lutz, E. (2017). Reversing the thermodynamic arrow of time using quantum correlations. arXiv:1711.03323. Raud, R. (2004). 'Place' and 'Being-Time': Spatiotemporal concepts in the thought of Nishida Kitarō and Dōgen kigen. Philosophy East & West, 54(1), 29–51. Rosenblum, B., & Kuttner, F. (2006). Quantum enigma: Physics encounters consciousness. Oxford/New York: Oxford University Press. Schrödinger, E. (1992a). The arithmetic paradox: The oneness of mind. In E. Schrödinger (Ed.), What is life? With mind and matter and autobiographical sketches (pp. 128–139). Cambridge/New York: Cambridge University Press. Schrödinger, E. (1992b). The principle of objectivation. In E. Schrödinger (Ed.), What is life? With mind and matter and autobiographical sketches (pp. 117–127). Cambridge/New York: Cambridge University Press. Schrödinger, E. (1992c). Science and religion. In E. Schrödinger (Ed.), What is life? With mind and matter and autobiographical sketches (pp. 128–139). Cambridge/New York: Cambridge University Press. Suzuki, D. (1954). An introduction to Zen buddhism. New York: Grove Press. Tanahashi, K. (Ed.). (2010a). Treasury of the true Dharma eye: Zen master Dōgen's Shobo Genzo (Vol. 1). Boston: Shambhala. Tanahashi, K. (Ed.). (2010b). Treasury of the true Dharma Eye: Zen master Dōgen's Shobo Genzo (Vol. 2). Boston: Shambhala. brentynramm@gmail.com"}
{"meta": {"title": "Absolute time before Newton", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/book", "creator": "Bexley, Emmaline", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "This thesis provides a new analysis of early contributions to the development of the theory of absolute time—the notion that time exists independently of the presence or actions of material bodies and has no material cause. Though popularly attributed to Newton, I argue that this conception of time first appeared in medieval philosophy, as a solution to a peculiar theological problem generated by a widespread misrepresentation of Aristotle. I trace the subsequent evolution of the theory of absolute time through to the seventeenth-century, and argue that Newton, if anything, retreats from a full endorsement of the doctrine.", "date": "2009", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/BEXATB", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2020-04-22T03:41:29Z"}, "text": "Absolute Time Before Newton Emmaline Margaret Bexley Submitted in total fulfilment of the degree of Doctor of Philosophy December 2007 History and Philosophy of Science Programme School of Philosophy Faculty of Arts, The University of Melbourne iii Abstract This thesis provides a new analysis of early contributions to the development of the theory of absolute time-the notion that time exists independently of the presence or actions of material bodies and has no material cause. Though popularly attributed to Newton, I argue that this conception of time first appeared in medieval philosophy, as a solution to a peculiar theological problem generated by a widespread misrepresentation of Aristotle. I trace the subsequent evolution of the theory of absolute time through to the seventeenth-century, and argue that Newton, if anything, retreats from a full endorsement of the doctrine. Unlike absolute space, absolute time was absent from the philosophy of the Greeks, entering Western thought in the thirteenth century. Absolute time was first proposed as a negative thesis in response to a perceived irreconcilability between the popular theory of time, then seen as Aristotle's, that time was an attribute or effect of the motion of the primum mobile, and Biblical evidence from Joshua X 13, in which Joshua commands some heavenly motion to stop, but time continues. A pivotal moment in the development of theories of absolute time came at the close of the Scholastic period, in 1597, when the Jesuit philosopher Francisco Suárez built on these earlier ideas about time and proposed a theory of absolute time startlingly similar to the later absolutism of the neo-Epicurean atomistic philosophers. While Suárez's theory of time was dualistic, and he proposes one kind of time that is unmistakably Scholastic, his tempus imaginarius, which he describes as an infinitely extended immutable temporal flux that exists independently of material being, is very much of the early modern period. It is, however, in the work of Pierre Gassendi, the well known founder of seventeenth century neo-Epicurean atomism, that we see the first, and arguably the only, fully fledged theory of absolute time. Gassendi implanted absolute time into the Epicurean dualism of bodies and the void of absolute space. For Gassendi, time and space are truly absolute, and are ontologically prior to all other existing things-even God. iv Gassendi also removed the locus of God from changeless and atemporal extramundane eternity to our everyday world of change and decay, a radical move. I close the thesis with an investigation of the absolute time of Isaac Newton. Ironically, given that Newton is the most well-known absolutist, he in fact retreated from the true absolute time proposed by Gassendi, and instead described time as an affection of substance. For Newton however, following Henry More, this substance was not some mundane body or motion, but the spatially and temporally extended substance of God. Declaration This is to certify that (i) the thesis comprises only my original work towards the PhD, (ii) due acknowledgement has been made in the text to all other material used, (iii) the thesis is less than 100,000 words in length, exclusive of tables, maps, bibliographies and appendices. Emmaline M. Bexley, December 2007 v Acknowledgements I have had the pleasure of being taught by some incredible teachers who are in many ways responsible for this thesis ever coming to be. I would like to thank them here, though I cannot thank them enough: Helen Derrick, a gifted teacher who introduced me to the pleasure of learning; Dr Don Ferrel, who gave me the wise advice that universities are an intellectual sand-box in which to play; Mark Zangari, who encouraged me to go on to postgraduate study, and Dr Kristian Camilleri, who cosupervised the final stages of this research in the formal sense, but helped me to think my way to some useful conclusions during many good chats all the way through. I thank Professor Brian Ellis, who got me interested in problems of space and time, and who suggested I pursue this research topic. In particular, I would like to thank Dr Keith Hutchison, my primary PhD supervisor, for teaching me by example what it is to be a scholar, and patiently allowing me to find my way. This research was supported by a Melbourne Research Scholarship, and I thank the University of Melbourne and its benefactors for providing the means to undertake it. Also, I thank Professor Howard Sankey for driving me hard enough in fourth year to win such support. Professor Simon Marginson and Professor Richard James were kind enough to allow me time away from my work to complete this project. Of course, the long process of writing a doctoral thesis requires the support of a circle of frank and fearless friends. I have been very lucky in this respect to have the support of: Dr Fiona Fidler and Dr Julie Connolly, who gobble up philosophical discussion like crème brûlée, as well as Leslie, Ros, Sharna, Robyn, Christine, Steve and Sarah May and all those who have helped me keep my head screwed on straight through this long process (as well as some very good cats). I also thank Zoltan Feher, with whom I know I shall enjoy what comes next very much indeed. I also thank my parents. My father, John Bexley, bought me books on cosmology and challenged me as a child to find a triangle whose angles did not add to 180 degrees (unsurprisingly, but after numerous attempts, I failed). I wrote this thesis with him in mind as the reader. Finally my mother, Gretel Bexley, who would have been surprised but delighted to know I had done this, and was always surprising and delightful herself. vi vii Table of Contents Abstract iii Declaration iv Acknowledgements v Introduction 1 1. A circle sown amongst the spheres: Averroes and earlymedieval interpretations of Aristotle on time 7 A note concerning the Aristotelian texts 12 Aristotle on the Relationship of Celestial Motion to Time 13 Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle on time 15 Two Responses To Averroean Time 21 Thomas Aquinas 22 Robert Kilwardby 27 Conclusion 29 2. Heaven standing still: Early Absolute-Like Time 31 Duns Scotus' response to the story of Joshua: Potential and privative time 33 The Potter Again: Peter Aureole 42 The Paris Decree of 1277 45 What Of Aquinas? 52 Conclusion 54 3. If the motion of heaven is made twice as swift... Ockham's nominalist response to the problematic nature of time 57 Against the Reality of Time 60 Time Qua A Concept 63 A Problem For Ockham? 66 The significance of Ockham's contribution 73 4. A flowing and successive space: Francisco Suárez and Imaginary Time 75 Suárez's Metaphysical Disputations 77 The Connection Between Time And Being: Intrinsic Time 79 Extrinsic Time: 'The Immutable Flux' 86 Francisco Suárez, Metaphysical Disputation 50, Section IX 91 An absolute space-time? 94 Resting Bodies and the Immutable Flux 94 Measured Time 96 Beings of Reason and 'Imaginary Time''. 97 Historical Significance Of Suárez's Account Of Time 102 Ties to Medieval Scholasticism 103 The Significance of the Uncaused Temporal Reference Frame. 105 A last look at Scholastic theories of time in the secondary literature 107 viii 5. If God reduced the whole universe to nothing, time would still flow: Gassendi and 17th Century Epicureanism 115 Pierre Gassendi 118 Side-stepping heresy: Pantheism and the 'whole in every part' doctrine 129 Walter Charleton: The Popularisation of Gassendism in England 132 Conclusion 137 6. The permanent Expansion or Amplitude of the radical Essentiality of God: The retreat from independent absolute time 139 Henry More on God as an extended being. 140 Newton's absolutism 148 Some treatments of Newton in contemporary philosophy 156 Conclusion 163 Conclusion 165 Bibliography 171 Appendix: Extract from Francisco Suárez, Metaphysical Disputation 50, Section IX Latin Text 179 1 Introduction The problem this thesis begins to solve was first suggested to me by Professor Brian Ellis (now a Professorial Fellow) of the former Department of History and Philosophy of Science at the University of Melbourne, when I was casting around for a PhD research topic, interested particularly in the ontology of time. Brian suggested that (to paraphrase): \"Someone should find out where Newton got his theory of time. Absolute space was around in ancient philosophy, but absolute time seems to be a modern idea.\" The more I looked into the problem, the less clear cut it became. Explanations like those of Pierre Duhem and Piero Ariotti, which I discuss later in this study, were simply not compelling, and other references in the secondary literature are sparse. This lack of scholarship began to seem less surprising when it became clear that most of the early primary evidence was to be found in works yet to be translated from the Latin, making collecting the evidence for this study a long and laborious process. This thesis, then, comprises my answer for Brian: absolute time, or the notion that time exists independently of the presence or actions of material bodies and has no material cause, first appears in the medieval period where it was tentatively proposed in response to the irreconcilability of the then dominant pseudo-Aristotelian theory of time (according to which time was an effect of the motion of the primum mobile), with biblical evidence from Joshua X 13: On the day on which the Lord delivered the Armorites to Israel Joshua said to the Lord in the presence of the children of Israel: \"Oh sun, move not over Gibeon, Oh moon, over the valley of Aijalon.\" And the sun and moon stood still while the nation avenged itself on its enemies. So it is written in the Book of the Just.1 In fact, the idea that time is an effect of the stellar motion was not Aristotle's. In the Physics, Aristotle argues that time is an effect of motion generally, and that the stellar motion is only appropriate as the primary measure of time. It was Aristotle's medieval Islamic commentator, Averroes, who seems to have been responsible for the 1 Biblia Latina (Vulgate) cum Glossa Ordinaria. (Latin text on p. 30) My translation. 2 popularisation of the stellar model of time, which he saw as the only plausible cause for time that Aristotle could have intended. In response to the irreconcilability of the Joshua passage and Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle, John Duns Scotus and Peter Aureole proposed, at the close of the thirteenth century, that time may in fact have no cause-a negative thesis in response to Averroes. Such partially absolute notions of absolute time were expanded upon by the late scholastic philosopher Francisco Suárez, whose work comprises the pivotal moment in the development of theories of absolute time. In his voluminous Metaphysical Disputations, Suárez put forward a dualistic account of time, which retained the relational Aristotelian idea of time as an attribute of being, and which he called 'intrinsic time,' as well as proposing a second kind of time, the all-embracing 'immutable flux,' or 'imaginary time.' It seems probable that Suárez did not consider this second kind of time as 'imaginary' in the sense of 'a figment of the imagination' but rather in the sense that we can only apprehend it through the use of our reason, for while 'real' it is also immaterial and intangible in character. Suárez's account of this immutable flux is highly reminiscent of the work of later philosophers such as Newton. Yet for Suárez it is intrinsic time which we really refer to when we speak of time. Suárez was unwilling to take the final step away from attributive or relational theories of time and to describe it primarily as something physically uncaused and absolute. It is in the work of neo-Epicurean atomis`t Pierre Gassendi in the mid-17th century that we see the first, and most 'pure,' example of absolute time. Of time, Gassendi wrote that: ...if God reduced the whole universe to nothing, we comprehend that time would still flow; we also understand that if God would wish to recreate the universe, time would flow in the interval between its destruction and recreation.2 One could not have a clearer example of a statement of absolute time. In proposing time to be absolute, a move not made by ancient atomists who saw time as relational, 2 Gassendi, Syntagma Philosophicum. Translation by Milič Čapek in \"The Conflict Between the Absolutist and the Relational Theory of Time Before Newton,\" Journal of the History of Ideas, vol. 48, 1987, p. 222. 3 Gassendi revised the old Scholastic categories of being, dividing being into substance, attribute, time and space. For Gassendi, the old metaphysics simply could not accommodate time and space. After Gassendi, we see a retreat from the idea that time is truly absolute, and that it exists without reliance on anything else. Both Henry More and Isaac Newton claimed that time is in fact an attribute of God's infinity. Unlike Gassendi, who saw time as ontologically prior to being, even God's being, More and Newton paint space and time as attributes of being, asserting that if there is a being it must necessarily have spatio-temporal breadth. Thus Newton says in the General Scholium to the second edition of the Principia that God: ...is not Duration and Space, but he endures and is present. He endures forever, and is every where present; and, by existing always and every where, he constitutes Duration and Space. 3 Newton and More were in agreement that time is only absolute in respect of created being, but is an accident of the extended spirit of God, and their work represents a retreat from full-blown absolutism. This thesis is structured to observe key episodes in the development of theories of absolute time, and thus is not exhaustive. Much of this thesis constitutes new or expanded research on the history of theories of absolute time, as there has been little scholarship on early theories of absolute time to date. Some commentators embrace parts of my story and I discuss them in the relevant sections. There are, however, two oft-cited scholars of absolute time whom I discuss in some detail. The most prominent is Pierre Duhem, who argued in his very widely read Système du monde of 1916 that spatial and temporal absolutism were born in response to the Paris Decree of 1277, along with vacua and the acceptance of the possibility of other worlds. I show that Duhem's story is full of historical errors, for example the requirement for the Decree to have an extremely wide-reaching effect in medieval European philosophy when in fact it was very localised in scope, relating to the 3 Newton, Scholium to the Definitions, Sir Isaac Newton's Mathematical Principles of Natural Philosophy and his System of the World, translation Andrew Motte (1729), revised Florian Cajori, Berkeley, University of California Press, 1966, p.6. 4 activities of certain masters at the University of Paris. In Chapter Three I also show how Duhem knowingly mistranslates a key piece of evidence in his work on absolute time. Difficulties such as these reduce the credibility of Duhem's account of the reasons for the introduction of absolute time. Piero Ariotti is another, more recent, author I discuss and is often cited by those writing about absolute time. Ariotti's thesis is that absolute time was first proposed as a response to the Copernican hypothesis, which, by effectively immobilising the sphere of stars, removed the possibility that time could result from the stellar motion. I show how Ariotti also misrepresents the writings of a number of thinkers whose work he uses as evidence. More compellingly however, Ariotti's thesis cannot account for early examples of absolute time, such as that found in the work of Duns Scotus and Aureole. Nor can he account for proposals of absolute time made by thinkers who embraced the Ptolemaic cosmology, such as Suárez. At the very end of this study, I also discuss some approaches to Newton's theory of time taken by modern philosophers. John Earman, for example, claimed that: \"Newton's reasoning is a paradigm case of scientific theorising; a theoretical construct, absolute space, is postulated in order to make possible a general account of the motion of bodies and in particular to explain certain actually observed phenomena...\"4 Earman refers here to Newton's absolute space, but his remark could equally be aimed at time. Earman has put the cart before the horse; Newton adds little to the theories of absolute time (and space) available to him, and it is more plausible to suppose that his general account of kinematics and dynamics is built upon the metaphysical system he has chosen, rather than vice-versa. This attitude to Newton's metaphysics has been a consistent feature of 20th Century philosophical critiques of Newton, founded on Mach's famous criticism that \"this absolute time ... is neither a practical nor a scientific value; and no one is justified in saying he knows aught about it. It is an idle metaphysical conception.\"5 I give examples of 20th Century philosophers, in particular Stephen Toulmin, who reinterprets sections of the 4 Earman, \"Who's Afraid of Absolute Space,\" Australasian Journal of Philosophy, 1970, p. 296. 5Mach, The Science of Mechanics, Open Court, 1960, p. 273. 5 Principia in order to argue away the metaphysical assumptions and provide what he calls \"a happier reading\" of Newton. Finally, many of the quotations used as evidence here are my own translations from the original Latin, and in these cases I have included the Latin in footnotes. Where I have been able to access original texts I have relied upon them, unless a recognised translation was available (in which case the translation was checked against the original). However, in a number of instances texts were not available to me in the original language, and in these cases I have had to rely solely on translations by others. All translators are cited in the footnotes. 6 7 1. \"A circle sown amongst the spheres\": Averroes and earlymedieval interpretations of Aristotle on time In the Physics, Aristotle argues that time must be intimately connected to motion, and result either from motions of the mind (thoughts), from motion generally, or from a single motion such as that of the primum mobile. It seems clear that Aristotle thought time to be caused by motion generally, and he explicitly warns against the view that time might be an effect of the stellar motion. Despite this, his medieval commentator, Averroes, argued that Aristotle did in fact intend time to be an effect of the motion of the primum mobile - an interpretation which, through Averroes' work, became standard amongst medieval philosophers. In order to address properly in Chapter Two the reasons for the introduction of absolute time in the Medieval period, which was as a direct response to Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle, I investigate here in some detail Aristotle's account of time and Averroes' interpretation of it, as well as considering it's reception by selected early medieval philosophers. In the Physics, Aristotle begins his deliberations on time with a celebrated rejection of the possibility that time can exist independently: Some of [time] is past and no longer exists, and the rest is in the future and does not yet exist; and all time... is entirely made up of the no-longer and the not-yet; and how can we conceive of that which is composed of non-existents sharing in existence in any way? (Phys. 217b 34 – 218a 36) 6 All English translations from the Physics taken from the Loeb edition, London, Heinemann, 1929, translated by Wicksteed & Cornford, unless otherwise noted, as are the Greek examples. 8 Since time cannot be a substantial entity, Aristotle concludes that it must be somehow related to motion, since we are only aware of the passing of time \"when we are aware of some motion or change\" (Physics 218b20-219a3). Aristotle considers whether time may be ontologically tied to individual changes, but rejects this view on the basis that \"when any particular thing changes or moves, the movement or change is in the moving or changing thing itself or takes place only where that thing is; whereas 'the passage of time' is current everywhere and is in relation to everything\" (218b10-15). The denial that time can have independent (substantial) existence is common amongst the various schools of Greek philosophy. Even atomists like Epicurus (and, later, Lucretius), denied that time could have an independent existence, 7 although they thought space to exist independently of material being. Indeed, it is arguable that none of the classical philosophers believed time to have an independent existence (Plotinus on occasion seems to be a temporal absolutist, but on close inspection it is obvious he is not8). Aristotle's relativistic account of time is not, then, unusual amongst his contemporaries. After a long examination of possibilities, Aristotle concludes that time results from motion generally. He argues that prior and posterior, or 'earlier' and 'later'-those ideas which are central to our understanding of what temporal transition is-can be drawn as a conclusion from premises about (local) motion. Aristotle begins by proposing the lemmas, a) \"the primary significance of 'before and afterness' is the 7 Lucretius, De rerum natura, 459-63: \" tempus item per se non est, sed rebus ab ipsis consequitur sensus, transactum quid sit in aevo, tum quae res instet, quid porro deinde sequatur; nec per se quemquam tempus sentire fatendumst semotum ab rerum motu placidaque quiete.\" 8 Time, for Plotinus, is generated by the world Soul, as it seeks to progress towards the perfect eternal 'Unity' which created it. Says Plotinus: ...one might perhaps ask time... to tell us how it did come into being and appear. It might say something like this about itself; that before, when it had not yet, in fact, produced this \"before\" or felt the need of an \"after,\" it was at rest with eternity in real being; it was not yet time, but itself, too, kept quiet in that. But since there was a restlessly active nature which wanted to control itself and be on its own, and chose to seek for more than its present state, this moved, and time moved with it... (Plotinus, Enneads, Vol III, chapter 7, s11, 10-15. Translated by A.H. Armstrong.) Plotinus denies, however, that it is correct to interpret Plato as believing that time is an effect of the motion of heaven (the standard modern interpretation), but rather that we should think of the motion of heaven as that which gives us an idea of the motion of the world Soul, which is time (Plotinus, ibid, 13 18-35). So, for Plotinus, time is related to the yearning of the imperfect physical world to attain the perfection of the eternal world. However, he warns, \"... if someone were to say that time is in something unsubstantial or unreal, it must be stated that he is telling an untruth...\" (ibid, 13 4951). It seems implausible to interpret such passages from Plotinus as being claims that time is absolute. 9 local one of 'in front of', and 'behind'. There it is applied to order of position;\" and b) a motion is the movement of a body between two such positions. Therefore, \"since there is a before-and-after in magnitude, there must also be a before and after in movement in analogy with them\". Further: \"there is thus a before and after in time, in virtue of the dependence of time upon motion\" (Phys. 219a10-20), the premise he has supported earlier. Concluding that time results from locomotion generally, Aristotle gives his famous definition of time: Time is...the number of motion with respect to the prior and posterior. (αριθμος κινησεπς κατα το προτερον και υοτερον) (219b2-3) The meaning of 'number' in this definition is not immediately obvious. For Aristotle, 'prior' and 'posterior' seem to hold significance in the definition of how time 'numbers' motion, insofar as they realise the ontological relationship between the 'before and after' of space, and the 'earlier and later' of time. However, even Aristotle himself does not consistently adhere to his difficult notion of non-temporal before-and-afterness. In contradistinction to his first lemma cited above-\"the primary significance of 'before and afterness' is the local one of 'in front of', and 'behind'. There it is applied to order of position\"-which occurs in Book iv of the Physics, in Book viii he says that in respect of motion, priority (or 'before and afterness') can have three meanings: 1) causal priority (a causes b); 2) temporal priority (a is earlier than b); and 3) priority in respect of perfection of nature (a is more perfect than b) (260b 15-20). There is no mention here of priority in motion being dependent upon spatial priority. The place of temporal priority in this rather vague set of explanations can be clarified by reference to the Categories, Chapter 12, 14a25-14b 23. Here he says: \"Primarily and most properly the term [priority] has reference to time: in this sense the word is used to indicate that one thing is older or more ancient than another.\" He also gives the alternate definitions of 2) sequential priority ('one' is prior to 'two'); 3) order, in the sense that in reading and writing the letters are prior to the syllables; 4) priority of perfection; and 5) causal priority. It seems quite significant that in neither Book viii of the Physics, nor in the Categories does Aristotle so much as mention place as the 'primary signification' of priority. If it is true that both works were composed later 10 than Book iv of the Physics (as I claim on p. 11, following) then Aristotle must have undergone a change of heart about the dependence of before and after upon space and motion. Another difficulty is that of the correct translation of κινησις (motion). Although κινησις is generally translated into English simply as 'motion', Aristotle often also uses the term in the Physics to mean change generally, equivalent to μεταβολη; indeed, κινησις is used by Aristotle at various times for a) local motion; b) changes other than generation and corruption; as well as c) change generally.9 Given the range of options, it would seem equally reasonable to interpret Aristotle as saying time is 'the number of change...', as the 'number of motion...' However, Aristotle's main argument explaining the relationship between time and κινησις points to the more restricted interpretation of κινησις as 'local motion' (equivalent to φορας) in so far as it is connected with time, as I show below. The probability that Aristotle believed time to be an accident of locomotion is supported by his further belief that other characteristics of time are a result of its ontological subsistence upon motion. For example, elsewhere in the chapter on time he argues: ...movement corresponds to linear magnitude (μεγεθει), and time to movement, in being a quantity, in being continuous, and in being divisible; for it is from linear magnitude that motion takes on these qualities, and from motion that time does. (Phys. 220b 24-28) Here, Aristotle proposes that there is a kind of hierarchy of being. Linear magnitude is a species of being which has certain characteristics-continuity, divisibility, and belonging to the kind 'quantity'-and its attributes, movement and time, share these characteristics. However, because time is 'a number' of motion, it is not, like motion itself, fast or slow: 9See also Ross, Aristotle's Physics, Oxford, Clarendon Press, 1936, pp. 7-8. 11 ...we do not speak of time itself as 'swift or slow', but as consisting of 'many or few' of the units in which it is counted, or as 'long or short' when regarded as a continuum. It would not be swift or slow, even if we supposed it to be the counter that counts, not the dimension that is counted (which it really is); for abstract numbers are in no case swift or slow...(220b1-5) This assertion seems to be an attempt to counter the rather obvious objection that time seems to be constant, whereas motions are inconstant. Obviously, for Aristotle, time does not share all of the characteristics of the motions from which it springs. The connection between time and locomotion is made more explicit in Aristotle's discussion of the moment, or 'now' (νυν), in the temporal continuum. As the argument sketched earlier suggests, it is the motion of the body along the magnitude of its trajectory which lends to time the ever changing aspect of its before-andafterness. In the following argument, the connection between the mobile moment and the body in motion is made explicit: It is evident, too, that neither would time be if there were no moment, nor would the moment be if there were no time. For, just as the body in locomotion and that locomotion belong to each other, so the number of the body in locomotion and the number of the locomotion are to each other. For time is the number of locomotion (φορας αριθμος), and the moment corresponds to the moving body as the numerical monad (μονας αριφμου). (219b34-220a510) Aristotle seems to be attempting to impart the impression of the moving body being 'linked' to the moment, with the moment/body flowing through time/magnitude-ofmotion as a kind of inseparable pairing. This idea of the moment/moving-body being that which counts numerable motion is a little clearer in the following passage: ...as stated before...a motion follows a magnitude, and time follows a motion. And a travelling object, by which we know the motion and the prior and posterior in it, follows a point in a similar way. And whatever this may be (whether a point or a stone or some other such thing), it is the same, but its relations alter (just as the Sophists 10 Translated by the author, with reference to Wicksteed and Cornford. 12 regard Corsicos in the Lyceum as being distinct from Corsicos in the Agora)...(219b152211) So, when we say \"now\", we mean different things depending on the relationship between 'now' and our surroundings. The moment itself remains the same, just as it is the same Corsicos whether he is in the Lyceum or the Agora, yet the conditions under which it is true to use the term 'now' of his situation are continually changing. It is significant that Aristotle links the mobile moment with a moving stone, and Corsicos's change of place. Aristotle's' definition of time-for all its difficulties-is that time is an effect of locomotion generally. A note concerning the Aristotelian texts Problematically, Aristotle's discussions of time fall throughout his works, and are not always logically in keeping with one another. For example, Aristotle's main treatise on time comprises Chapters X-XIV of Book iv of the Physics. The opinions Aristotle expresses here are similar to those expressed in briefer references to time in On the Heavens, and Generation and Corruption. It seems probable that On the Heavens, and Generation and Corruption belong to Aristotle's middle period of writings (after the death of Plato, but before Aristotle founded the Peripatos in the Lyceum), and it is plausible that the first four books of the Physics were also composed during this time.12 The similarities in the treatment of time in these works bear out this hypothesis. Discussions of time in these works are characterised by Aristotle's insistence that motion is ontologically prior to time. However, Aristotle expresses quite a different view of time in his brief discussions of the subject in the final books of the Physics, as well as in the Categories. The final books of the Physics probably derive from Aristotle's time in the Lyceum, and certain similarities between Aristotle's treatment of the notion of 'priority' here and in the Categories suggest the Categories also to date from this time, although this hypothesis is at best uncertain (as I suggested earlier, p.8). In these works, Aristotle seems to think time to be a more independent entity than in the earlier works. Unfortunately, the views he expresses 11 As above. 12 Following Ross, Aristotle's Physics, pp. 1-19; and Ross, Aristotle, London, Methuen, 1960, pp. 7-19; \"Volume I: Greece and Rome\" of Copleston's A History of Philosophy, New York, Newman Press, 1971, pp. 268-76, was also consulted. H. J. Easterling, in \"The Unmoved Mover in Early Aristotle\", Phronesis, vol. 21, 1976, supports Ross's hypotheses. 13 here are never expounded in full. Such irregularities in Aristotle's treatment of time might well be ascribed to a change of heart concerning the ontological status of time between Aristotle's middle and late periods. Ross, in Aristotle, argues that the Categories, as part of the Organon, belong to Aristotle's middle period, although he notes that the work is possibly not authentic.13 Conversely, Copleston dates the Organon to Aristotle's late period.14 Although Ross's arguments are convincing, I concur with Copleston, in view of the similarities in the definition of 'priority' in the Categories and the final books of the Physics. Aristotle on the Relationship of Celestial Motion to Time The belief that Aristotle considered time to be caused by the first celestial motion has been popular for some eight-hundred years, and remains so in some recent literature on early theories of time, despite the compelling evidence that he thought time to be an attribute of motion generally. For example, in his Commentary on Aristotle's Physics, Thomas Aquinas gives the interpretation: ...time is consequent upon only the one first motion by which all other motions are caused and measured. And thus there remains only one time.15 Writing in 1652, Walter Charleton says: And Aristotle, as every Pedagogue hath heard, after a long and anxious scrutiny, positively and magisterially determines Time to be, Numerum Motus (coelestis ac primi) secundum Prius et posterius, the Number of the First Coelestial Motion, according to former and later...16 Writing three-hundred years later, in 1973, Piero Ariotti says: For Aristotle... only the heavenly bodies instantiate time. Their motion, and only their motion, is time.17 13 Ross, Aristotle, pp 9-10; p. 18. 14 Copleston, A History of Philosophy, p. 273 15Aquinas, Commentary on Aristotle's Physics, Lecture 17, 573-574. Translated by R. J. Blackwell, R. J. Spath and W. E. Thirlkel, London, Routledge & Kegan Paul, 1963, pp. 256-7. 16 Walter Charleton, Physiologia Epicurio-Gassendo-Charletonia, or a Fabrick of Science Natural, Upon the Hypothesis of Atoms founded by Epicurus, repaired by Petrus Gassendus, augmented by Walter Charleton, New York, Johnson Reprint Corp., 1966, p. 74. 17 Piero Ariotti, \"Toward Absolute Time: Continental Antecedents of the Newtonian Conception of Time,\" Studi Internazionali di Filosophia, v. 5, 1973, p. 144. 14 It is this interpretation which was the most common in the medieval period, and it is this interpretation of Aristotle which forms the basis of discussion in the following chapter-it is the interpretation to which some medieval philosophers responded with the first proposals of absolute time. Yet these interpretations are wrong, for in the first chapter on time in Book iv of the Physics, before he begins to put forward his own views on time, Aristotle gives a very explicit injunction against the notion that time might be caused by the motion of the primum mobil (following Plato: Timaeus, 38b) or by the existence of the sphere itself: ...some have identified time with the revolution of the all embracing heaven and some with the that heavenly sphere itself... [However, in response to the former position] a partial revolution is time just as much as a whole one is, but it is not just as much a revolution; for any finite portion of time is a portion of a revolution, but is not a revolution. Moreover, if there were more universes than one, the re-entrant circumlation of each of them would be time, so that several different times would exist at once. And as to those who declare the heavenly sphere itself to be time, their only reason was that all things are contained 'in the celestial sphere' and also take place 'in time,' which is too childish to be worth reducing to absurdities more obvious than itself. (Phys. 218a31-218b9) The motion of the sphere does , however, play a very important role in Aristotle's understanding of time, but not its progenitor. Towards the end of the section on time in Book iv of the Physics, Aristotle discusses the importance of circular locomotion to time, but in terms that indicate quite clearly that such motion is important as measure only: And now, keeping local motion (φορα) and especially rotation in mind, note that everything is counted by some unit of like nature to itself-monads monad by monad, for instance, and horses horse by horse-and so likewise time by some finite unit of time. But as we have said, movement and time mutually determine each other quantitively; and that because the standard of time established by the movement we select is the quantitive measure both of that movement and of time. If, then, the standard once fixed measures all dimensionality of its own order, a uniform rotation will be the best standard, since it is easiest to count. Could Aristotle have stated more clearly that a uniform circular rotation, such as the motion of the primum mobile, is significant for measure only? 15 Aristotle further shows how time can measure all change, even though it seems to be primarily connected with changes in place. Locomotion is a species (indeed the prime species) of change generally, and one member of a species can be used to number the other members, even though by genus they are not the same. Time, then, can number other forms of change, just as: ...it is correct to say that the number of sheep and of dogs are the same number, if that of sheep and that of dogs are equal; but it is not the same decad in each case, nor are the units of one the same as the units of the other...(Phys. 224a2-5) Thus the heavenly motion is important to all forms of change as their measure, even though in his main argument Aristotle connects time primarily with locomotion. Aristotle has told us that time is an effect of all motion, and that one motion does stand above the rest, but not as progenitor of time-as measure. Despite this, Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle has worked its way into the minds of philosophers and historians through the centuries and is the way Aristotle is often remembered. In the following section we investigate the apparent beginnings of this myth. Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle on time Throughout the first half of the first millennium, Greek thought and writing found homes in cities around the eastern rim of the Mediterranean from Alexandria through Antioch and Edessa to Constantinople. Aristotle's texts were translated into Syriac, and from Syriac to Arabic, as Islam began to grow in the latter part of the first millennium. As Islam spread west around the southern shores of the Mediterranean, the works of Aristotle followed, eventually finding a home across the mouth of the Mediterranean in the Islamic communities of Spain, where they were translated from the Arabic to Latin. So fastidious were these translations that they were often more exact than later Latin translations from the original Greek, which came east into Europe after the fall of Constantinople during the Crusades.18 Averroes, or Ibn Rusd (c. 1126-1198), is the most significant of Aristotle's Spanish/Islamic commentators. 18 Charles E. Butterworth, preface to Averroes' Middle Commentaries on Aristotle's Categories and De Interpretatione, Princeton, Princeton University Press, 1983, pp. ix-xi. 16 Just as medieval philosophers simply referred to Aristotle as 'the Philosopher,' Averroes was, for them, 'the Commentator.' Averroes is significant to the history of theories of time not only because of his role as the primary commentator Aristotle in the West, but, more importantly, because of his part in popularising the idea that the causal seat of time in Aristotelian physics must be the motion of the first heaven. Averroes did not seek simply to explain Aristotle's ideas through his commentary, but to 'fill in the gaps' in what he appears to have conceived of as 'Greek Philosophy.' That he believed 'Greek Philosophy' could be understood as an integrated system of knowledge is evidenced by his willingness to substitute Plato's' Republic for Aristotle's Politics (which was unavailable to him), and by his integration of Aristotle's physics of motion (from the Physics) with Aristotle's celestial mechanics (from De Caelo) in his De Substantia Orbis.19 In his attempt to normalise not only Aristotle's own philosophy, but Greek philosophy more generally, Averroes was forced to add pieces of his own devising to the jigsaw of pieces of ancient philosophy at his disposal. His treatment of Aristotle's philosophy of time evidences a partial reliance on Platonic doctrines, as well as a willingness to insert his own ideas where Aristotle's seemed problematic. Given that Averroes' commentaries were often not so much interpretations of Aristotle, as Averroes' attempted clarification of Aristotle, one can hardly imagine the impact Averroes' ideas would have had on the reader. The presentation of the work would itself have reinforced this impact, with the passages of Averroes' commentary interpolated with Aristotle's own text. Averroes believed time to be a result of the motion of the primum mobile. He often refers to this simple explanation of the propagation of time, for example in the Latinised Substantia Orbis- ...the celestial sphere possesses time as something subsequent to it and as one of its accidents...20 and in the more recently discovered Sefer ha-derusim ha-tib'iyim- 19 Stuart MacClintock, \"Averroes\", Encyclopedia of Philosophy, New York: Macmillan, 1967 p. 221. 20 Averroes, On the Substance of the Celestial Spheres (De substantia orbis), translation by Arthur Hyman, Cambridge, Medieval Academy of America and Israel Academy of Sciences and Humanities, 1986, p. 85, lines 72-6. 17 ...the world, that is to say the celestial body, is a condition for the existence of time and prior [in nature] to it... and: If time is imagined to be something abstract21, outside of the circle [of the celestial body], it is imagined to be something other than it really is. ...When time is imagined to be what it really is...[it is imagined to be] a circle sown amongst the spheres...22 But Averroes' conception of time is in fact more complicated than these simple definitions suggest, and it was no doubt the sophistication of his interpretation of Aristotle on time that made his views seem so plausible to so may medieval philosophers. Averroes begins his commentary and interpretation of Book iv of Aristotle's Physics by contemplating Aristotle's argument that we are only aware of time when we are aware of some motion or change. As I discussed earlier, in Book iv of the Physics, Aristotle calls time \"the number of motion with respect to the prior and posterior.\" Averroes agreed that time is connected to motion and/or change, but yet is not the same as motion. He pondered three possibilities: 1) that time is motion in the soul; 2) that the perception of time results from any motion whatsoever; and 3) that the perception of time results from one particular motion. He cites Galen as one who believed that Aristotle meant, by his definition of time, that time is a motion of the soul (or an artefact of the thinking soul). Yet he dismisses Galen's view on the grounds that Aristotle has said we are aware of time \"when we are aware of some motion or change\", and if time were only reliant upon motion in the soul it would be sufficient for us to imagine some resting, changeless body, which does not seem to be what Aristotle means.23 Averroes also dismisses the second possibility, that any motion is time, but his dismissal gives us a clue to his eventual answer: 21 Averroes is not here speaking of absolute time, but of time qua the simple duration of an existing thing, in the sense that 'every thing has a time.' This is opposed to 'true' time, which is \"a consequence of motion and motion a consequence of the thing moved.\" See Narboni, \"ad Question V\", cited in Averroes, Averroes Questions in Physics From the Unpublished Sefer ha-derusim hatib'iyim, Dordecht, Kluwer Academic Publishers, 1991 Quest. three, note 36, p. 67. 22Averroes, Averroes' Questions in Physics, translation by Helen Tunik Goldstein, pp.5-6. 23Averroes, Aristotelis Opera cum Averrois Commentarius, Vol. IV, Venetiis apud Junctas, 1562, Frankfurt, Minerva, 1962, Vol. IV, comm 97, 177M-178A. My translation. 18 We do not say ...that to sense time is to sense ourselves in the presence of any motion, [or] in the presence of any imaginable change. It is evident that to sense ourselves in the presence of time [being] to sense any motion primarily and essentially is impossible, because if it were so, it would be the case that time is multiplied by the multiplication of sensible motions-indeed of [any] imaginable motions. However to sense time will not be to sense any motion primarily, but rather this-[that] when we sense whatever motion, we sense that one motion of which time is an accident...24 Time then, is not simply an action of the mind, nor can it be connected to motion generally, because that would result in a multiplication of times. Averroes is left with the third possibility, that time is connected to one special motion. But, ponders Averroes, how do those who do not perceive that special motion directly perceive time? He suggests that we must be able to access that unique motion through the perception of any motion-indeed, if this is possible, we will side-step the problem of explaining how someone blind, or out of sight of the unique motion, should understand time. In recognising this possibility, Averroes refers to Plato's allegory of the cave: [If time results from] some particular motion, for example the motion of the celestial body, then he who does not perceive some particular hour [of its motion] will not perceive time, or will not perceive it entirely. For, concerning those who were imprisoned underground from childhood, Plato said that if they were not able to comprehend time except through the comprehension of some sensible motion, for example the motion of heaven, then they would not perceive time, because they had never perceived the motion of the celestial body.25 24Averroes, Aristotelis Opera, Comm 98, 178L-M. \"Nos autem dicamus, quem nos sentire tempus est apud sentire quemlibet motum, & apud imaginari quamlibet transmutationem manifestum est.n.quod nos sentire tempus apud sentire quemlibet motum primo, & essentialiter impossibile est. quoniam, si ita esset, contingeret ut tempus multiplicaretur per multiplicationem motuum sensibilium, immo motuum imaginabilium. si autem sentire tempus per sentire quemlibet motum non fuerit primo, & essentialiter, sed pp hoc, quia, cum sentimus quemcunq, motum, sentimus illum unum motum, cui accidit tempus...\" My translation. 25Averroes, Aristotelis Opera, Comm 98, 178G-H. \"...si posuerimus ipsum sequi aliquem motum proprium, v.g. motum corporis coelestis, tunc qui non senserit ipsum omnino: ut dicit Pla. de incarceratis a pueritia sub terra, f. quod, si non comprehenderet nisi per comprehensionem alicuius motus sensibilis, v.g. motus coeli, tunc isti incarcerati non sentirent tempus, quia nunquam senserunt motum corporis coelestis....\" My translation. This reference to Plato seems misplaced. Averroes uses the allegory of the cave to show the difficulty in time being a particular motion (the heavenly motion), since those who are unable to perceive that motion seemingly must have no perception of time. Yet in the allegory of the cave 19 Averroes answers his problem by thinking about what motion and change tell us about time. If we could sense that one unique motion of which time is the accident through the perception of any motion whatsoever, his problem would vanish. His ingenious answer to the problem before him takes into consideration from whence (in an Aristotelian universe) the plethora of motions around us ultimately spring: [W]hen motion is sensed, time is sensed primarily and essentially. It is by reason of motion [that] we sense ourselves to be in a changeable existence, and to be changeable ourselves, because we are in this existence. ... It is on that account that we sense time primarily, and it is manifest that we do not sense ourselves to be in a changeable existence except through the transmutation of heaven. If heaven stood still, it would be possible for us to exist in an unchanging existence-but that is impossible.26 Averroes has made good use of Aristotle's theory of the cause of motions. Throughout the Physics Aristotle refers to the role of the 'prime mover', speculating that since one motion is the mover of another, there must ultimately be some unmoved mover, in order that there be a first cause of all motions. Since the unmoved mover is the primary mover of the stars, the sphere of stars is the first motion in the chain from which any motion springs (thus primum mobile). Averroes deduces that since any motion or change that we might observe or experience has the celestial motion as its primary cause, we sense time in any motion, because time is an attribute of that motion to which all motion is causally connected. What Averroes has concocted is a kind of emanation theory of time. Averroes' early conception of how human thoughts are formed is reminiscent of this line of reasoning. He suggested that the celestial sphere is a being moved by its own intelligence, imparting the 'will' to move to each successive sphere/being, until the lunar sphere inspires thought in the individual. However, he moved away from this 'chain of (Republic VII), Plato is trying to demonstrate the delusions of the populace and the difficulty in coming to an enlightened understanding of a higher reality-a rather different purpose than that which Averroes ascribed to him. 26Averroes, Aristotelis Opera, Comm 98, 179B. .\"..motus igitur, qui cum sentitur, sentitur primo, & essentialiter tempus, est motus, ex quo sentimus nos esse in esse transmutabili, & nos transmutari, quia sumus in hoc esse...est illud, ex quo sequitur nos sentire tempus primo. & manifestum est quod nos non sentimus nos esse in esse transmutabili, nisi ex transmutatione coeli. &. si esset possibile ipsum quiescere, esset possibile nos esse in esse non transmutabili: sed hoc est impossible...\" My translation. 20 consciousness' theory to the simpler motive theory later in his life.27 In any case, it is evident that Averroes' idea of time being inherent in any individual motion through that motion's relation to the first motion, is linked to all motions having their ultimate cause in the motion of heaven. Intriguingly, Averroes seems to have felt obliged to forge his own way in solving the complexities of Aristotle's account of time. He expresses his frustration emotively in a passage from his commentary: ...we do not perceive motion, nor time, except when we perceive ourselves to be changed, because we are in a changing existence. ...And in this manner we can consider time to follow the motion of the celestial body, and that he who never perceived the celestial body will perceive time. All men are agreed that time follows the motion of heaven, and I could not reconcile this problem for myself, except after a great time. [In] whatever [else] I have written concerning time, I have acceded to the interpreters, but not in this...28 Why was it so difficult for Averroes to understand Aristotle's ideas about the celestial cause of time? Since 'Aristotle's' definition of time as the result of celestial motion was so popular during the medieval period, and was the theory to which early temporal absolutism provided the antithesis, this question needs answering. And the answer seems to be, quite simply, that that Averroes found his interpretation difficult because Aristotle said no such thing, as we have seen earlier. Plato, however, did hold the view that time had a celestial cause, and came into existence with the universe (Timaeus, 38b)-an opinion mentioned by Aristotle as being held by Plato alone (Physics 251b 17). Like Aristotle, Plato believed time to be a kind of number, but Plato allowed that only heavenly motion is associated with time. In the Timaeus, Plato explains how the creator made time as a mobile image of perfect and changeless eternity, \"circularly rolling itself according to number 27See Herbert A. Davidson, Alfarabi, Avicenna, and Averroes, on Intellect, and Theories of Human Intellect, New York, Oxford University Press, 1992, pp. 223-225; and Barry S. Kogan, Averroes and the Metaphysics of Causation, Albany, State University of New York Press, 1985, pp. 250-255. 28Averroes, Aristotelis Opera, Comm 98, 179F-G. \"...quod nos non percipimus motum, neq, tempus, nisi cum perceperimus nos transmutari, quia sumus in esse transmutabili...secundum hunc modum possumus ponere tempus sequi motum corporis coelestis: & quod sentiet tempus qui nunquam sensit corpus coeleste. & ideo omnes conveniunt in hoc, quod tempus sequitur motum coeli. & ista quaestio nunquam potuit dilucidari mihi, nisi post magnum tempore: & quicquid scripsi de tempore, secutus sum expositores, sed hic non.\" My translation. 21 (αριθμον)\" (Tim. 38a).29 He goes on to argue that the heavenly bodies were created with \"natures necessary to the joint fabrication of time\" (Tim. 38e).30 Plato also writes that the sun, moon, and other planets were created by God \"for the making of time, that time might be born...\" (Tim. 38c).31 Thus in many ways, Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle is reminiscent of Plato's theory. Plato, however, says in the Timaeus that all the celestial bodies participate in a \"joint fabrication of time\", rather than the first sphere-an important difference which conflicts with the causal mechanism for the generation of time supported by Averroes. The fact remains, however, that Averroes' attempt to synthesise Greek philosophy, for example feeling able to substituting Plato's Republic for Aristotle's then known but unavailable Politics, may have encouraged him to follow Plato in his interpretation of Aristotle, despite the seemingly obvious conflict between their two views of time. Two Responses To Averroean Time Averroes' works were well known to European philosophers of the medieval period, and are particularly associated with the work of the 'Latin-Averroists,' Boethius and Siger of Brabant, both masters of the Arts Faculty at Paris in the 1270's. While the works of 'radical' Averroists like Siger and Boethius make an interesting story, it is more illuminating, in terms of making sense of the impact of Averroes on the 'mainstream' philosophy of the time, to consider here the writings of two less extreme thinkers, both of whom evidence quite different reactions to Averroes' time-as-of-thesphere model within the more traditional schools of philosophy. These thinkers were both Dominican theologians, one active in France and Italy, and one in England: Thomas Aquinas and Robert Kilwardby. 29Quotes from the Timaeus follow the translation of Thomas Taylor, Timaeus and Critias, Washington, Pantheon, 1944, unless otherwise mentioned. 30In Greek: συναπεργαζεσθαι χρονον. Calcidus's Latin translation has 'tempori pouenire,' in Plato, Platonis Timaeus Interprete Chalcidio cum Eiusdem Commentario, ed. Ioh. Wrobel, (Lipsiae, B. G. Teubneri, 1876 ed.), Frankfurt, Minerva, 1963 31In Greek: \"...κρονου γενεσιν, ινα γεννηθη κρονος,...\" Chalcidus has, \"...genituram temporis uolentis creari...\" See also W. von Leyden, \"Time, Number, and Eternity in Plato and Aristotle\", Philosophical Quarterly, vol. 14, 1964, p. 48. 22 Thomas Aquinas Thomas Aquinas is perhaps best known for his many attempts to reconcile Aristotelian rationalism with Christian revelation. This drive allowed him to achieve such subtle feats of reasoning as showing that the universe could have been created by God without necessarily having a beginning in time (because creation from nothing- ex nihilo-does not mean creation after nothing-post nihilum).32 Aquinas is significant to this study because he adopted an Averroistic interpretation of Aristotle on time and left that interpretation within the huge legacy of Thomistic thought. This legacy is apparent in many of the thinkers I discuss in later chapters, who follow the dominant (Averroean or indeed Thomistic) interpretation of Aristotle on time, using it as the basis of their rejection of relational models of time. The identification of Aquinas's sources is significant to our understanding of his choice to champion the sphere model of time. Aquinas had a number of editions of the Physics available to him when he wrote his commentary on it-a Greek to Latin translation of the first two books; William of Moerbeke's Greek Moerbekana; and three other Arabic to Latin translations, one of which included Averroes' commentaries. Traditionally, Aquinas is thought to have relied on the Greek to Latin translation of the Moerbekana, however he is thought to have relied on other editions for the first of the eight books of his commentary of the Physics, possibly Bacon's.33 There is also evidence that Aquinas was influenced in the succeeding chapters by the Christian Latin editions/commentaries of such thinkers as Giles of Rome, Roger Bacon, and Albert the Great, among others.34 Aquinas was, of course, aware of the Islamic translations, and wrote a number of treatises against the Averroists, Islamists, and pagans. In his commentary on the Physics, Aquinas finds a number of occasions to mention the commentaries of Averroes (although he often seems to take a fairly dismissive view of them)-certainly, then, he had studied Averroes' own commentaries. 32Aquinas, De aeternitate mundi, in S. Thomae Aquinatis Opera Omnia, (vol. 3), Stuttgart, FrommannHolzboog, 1980; See also Ferdinand Van Steenberghen, Thomas Aquinas and Radical Aristotelianism, Washington, D.C., The Catholic University of America Press, 1980, p. 12-15. 33 Vernon J. Bourke, Introduction to Aquinas' Commentary on Aristotle's Physics, J. Blackwell, R. J. Spath and W. E. Thirlkel, London, Routledge & Kegan Paul, 1963, p. xix. 34Franz Pelster, 'Die Uebersetzungen der aristotelischen Metaphysick in den Werken des hl. Thomas von Aquinas\"; Canon Mansion, 'La theorie arist. du temps.' Both cited in Vernon J. Bourke's introduction to Aquinas' Commentary on Aristotle's Physics, p. xix-xx. 23 Should we assume, then, given Aquinas's hostility to Islam, and evident heavy reliance on the Christian Greek to Latin translations of Aristotle, as well as his often dismissive attitude to Averroes, that Aquinas arrived at his interpretation of Aristotle independently, perhaps influenced by the neo-Platonism also inherent in medieval Christian thought? To do so would seem quite plausible, yet this does not seem to be the case. The following passage from Aquinas's commentary provides-I believe- indisputable evidence that Aquinas relied heavily on Averroes' commentaries for his rendering of 'Aristotelian' time. Aquinas does not cite Averroes as the source of these ideas, so it is worth quoting the passage verbatim, in order to compare the startling similarity to the Averroean passages discussed earlier. In reference to Physics 219a2-b8, Aquinas says: ...[T]here is a difficulty that arises here concerning the perception of time and motion. If time is consequent upon a sensible motion outside the soul, it follows that he who does not sense that motion will not sense time... But if time is consequent upon a motion of the soul, it would follow that things are not related to time except by the mediation of the soul. And thus time will not be a thing of nature but an intention of the soul, by way of an intention of genus and species. And if time is consequent upon all motion universally, it would follow that there are as many times as there are motions. But this is impossible, because two times are not simultaneous, as was said above [In reference to Phys. 218b3]. To answer this it must be known that there is one first motion which is the cause of all other motion. Hence, whatever is mutable in existence is such because of that first motion, which is the motion of the first mobile object. Moreover, whosoever perceives any motion, either existing in sensible things or in the soul, perceives a mutable existence, and consequently he perceives the first motion from which time follows. Hence, whoever perceives any motion perceives time, although time is consequent upon only the one first motion by which all other motions are caused and measured. And thus there remains only one time.35 It is difficult to decide the degree of significance to attach to Aquinas's failure to cite this view as Averroes'-because to Averroes it most certainly belongs. The argument is almost identical to Averroes' précis of his own argument occurring at 179 E-G of 35Aquinas, Commentary on Aristotle's Physics, Lecture 17, 573-574, pp. 256-7. 24 his 98th commentary, Book IV, Summa III, Cap. III, of Aristotle's Physics. There Averroes cites and explores three possibilities, concerning Aristotle's suggestion that we only sense time when we sense motion, and Aquinas does exactly the same: a) time is a particular motion b) time is a motion of the soul36 c) time is any motion In both Averroes' précis of his own argument, and in Aquinas's commentary of Aristotle, the same conclusion immediately follows the discussion of these three possibilities-that we sense time in any motion because that motion is ultimately linked to the first motion, of which time is an attribute. Can there be any doubt that Aquinas has based his interpretation of Aristotle exactly on Averroes'? It is possible the two shared a common source, yet Averroes claims to have come to his own interpretation independently, when he says: \"In whatever else I have written concerning time, I have acceded to the interpreters, but not in this...\" Although the commentary to the Physics contains Aquinas's most detailed explication of the propagation of time, reference is also made to the role of the heavenly sphere as the cause of time in On the power of God, and in some of his Quodlibetal Questions. For example, in Quodlibet 11, Quest. 4: ...it cannot be said that the motion of angels is measured by the continuous time which is the number of the motion of heaven, because the motion of angels does not depend upon the motion of heaven.37 36Aquinas' discussions of points a and c are essentially identical to Averroes'. Aquinas' discussion differs from Averroes' only in the reason for denying point b. Averroes refutes the view, which he cites as Galen's, on the grounds that if time were motion of the soul it would suffice to imagine an unmoving body, whereas Aristotle specifically says that we are only aware of time when we sense motion. Aquinas, however, refutes b on the grounds that if time were motion of the soul it would not be a thing of nature (and therefore not created by God). The difference is not significant to this study-Aquinas has obviously drawn heavily on Averroes in all other particulars. It is interesting to note, however, that the Paris Decree of 1277 censured the view that \"eternity and time have no existence in reality, but only in the mind\" (article 200). Aquinas' commentary was probably written in 1268-9 (see Bourke's introduction to the Commentary, p. xx), but Aquinas' alternative refutation of point b shows an awareness of the theological implications of his interpretation of Aristotle. His and Averroes' 'time-as-of-the-sphere' interpretation of Aristotle did not, however, escape censure from other philosophers on theological grounds-this is a subject of a following chapter. 37Aquinas, Quaestiones Quodlibetales, in S. Thomae Aquinatis Opera Omnia, (vol. 3), Stuttgart, Frommann-Holzboog, 1980. \"...non enim potest dici quod motus angeli mensuretur tempore continuo quod est numerus motus caeli, quia motus angeli non dependet ex motu caeli.\" p. 499. My translation. 25 This example shows how Aquinas incorporates Averroes' 'emanation' theory of the connection between heavenly motion and time into his other doctrines-the motion of an angel is not 'in' time, because angelic motion has no causal connection with the material world. It seems quite clearly evident that Aquinas, who went to great pains to reconcile the Aristotelian science with Christian revelation, was susceptible to the Averroean strands of Aristotelianism. Aquinas' adherence to Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle's definition of time also allows him to side-step one of the great problems posed by Aristotle's definition of time. Both modern and medieval writers have picked up on the potential for circularity in Aristotle's assertion that we can draw temporal 'before-and-afterness' from a before and after in spatial magnitude. A criticism by the modern writer Denis Cornish sets out the basis of the problem. Cornish discusses this problem in his 1976 article, \"Aristotle's Attempted Derivation of Temporal Order from that of Movement and Space\". As I discussed above, for Aristotle, time gains its before-and-afterness through the movement of the 'now,' which in turn corresponds to the mobile body. Although the now is in essence always the same, it is in a sense better described as a string of distinct nows, due to the change in its relations as it moves. Aristotle argues that when there is a change in the now, due to the changing relations of a body in movement, the forward motion of time is the result. At least two apparent nows-a 'before' now, and an 'after' now-are therefore necessary for there to be time. Cornish argues that the reduction of the motion of the now through time to the motion of the body through spatial magnitude is untenable, since it is impossible to show an objective, non-temporal before and after in spatial magnitude. Unless this can be done, Aristotle's argument stands guilty of circularity. Cornish's criticism rests on the argument that even if spatial positions can be considered as an ordered continuum of points, they cannot tell us anything about time, because we cannot specify in which direction a motion from one position on the 26 continuum to another proceeds-there is no objective 'in front of' or 'behind.'38 It is only through a consideration of time that we can specify a direction in motion, and therefore a 'before' and 'after'. Cornish concludes that \"[t]he asymmetry of movement through space is at least partly a function of time, and cannot be determined merely in spatial terms.\"39 The derivation of temporal order-and thereby the asymmetry of time-from an objective spatial order seems markedly problematic. In his article, Cornish mentions that Aquinas, too, brings up the possibility that unless Aristotle can specify a non-temporal 'before' and 'after' in the premises of his argument that time is anisotropic because motion is, then his argument will stand guilty of circularity.40 Although Cornish notes that Aquinas believed that there is no circularity, he fails to recognise the significance of Aquinas's denial (although this is not important to Cornish's argument, which is primarily a criticism of Aristotle). The relevant passage from Aquinas is as follows: [After outlining Aristotle's argument from magnitude:] If someone objects to the above definition by saying that the before and after are determined by time and thus the definition is circular, it must be said that the before and after are placed in the definition of time insofar as they are caused in motion by magnitude and not insofar as they are measured by time.41 The argument put forward by Cornish, that there is no objective direction in linear magnitudes generally, is reasonably clear, and it is unlikely that it would have eluded someone of Aquinas's prowess that this is the case. Yet Aquinas would not have been thinking of the magnitudes followed by general motions, despite it being reasonably clear to us today that this was Aristotle's intention. Aquinas would have been thinking of time as stemming from one specific motion-that of the primum mobile. If this is the case, we have a subtly different situation. The sphere of stars follows a motion from east to west. If we accept that this motion is unshakeably uni-directional (as Aquinas quite likely would have), then there is a non temporal 'in front of'-to the 38Cornish, \"Aristotle's Attempted Derivation of Temporal Order from That of Movement and Space\", Phronesis, vol. 21, 1976, p. 249. 39Cornish, p. 249. 40Cornish, p. 245. 41Aquinas, Commentary on Aristotle's Physics, p. 259. Translated by R. J. Blackwell, R. J. Spath and W. E. Thirlkel. 27 west of a given star; and a true 'behind'-to the east of a given star. Although Cornish's criticism can be fairly levelled at Aristotle, who seems quite clearly to believe time to stem from motion generally, it cannot so clearly be applied to Aquinas's understanding of Aristotle, because Aquinas has sided with Averroes' interpretation, which is that time stems from the first heavenly motion only. This example illustrates a way in which Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle is superior to Aristotle's own theory. Robert Kilwardby It would be simplistic to suggest that the Averroean interpretation of Aristotle on time held complete sway in the medieval psyche. Many thinkers denied such an interpretation and it is useful to examine the thought of one example of such a philosopher to appreciate the diversity of views on both Aristotle in particular , and his views on time in particular, current during the medieval period. Robert Kilwardby was an ardent Augustinian, as is evident from even the briefest perusal of his work, On Time. Like St Augustine, Kilwardby believed that time \"is not one of the things outside the mind.\"42 Yet Kilwardby is more than willing to give Aristotle's alternative view a fair hearing. Although he does not necessarily agree with Aristotle, he is confident that Averroes' interpretation is mistaken-a denial which is further evidence of Averroes' influence. This opinion is stated clearly and succinctly in the following passages: 1) In Question 10, \"In what way is time the same for everyone if it is only in the motion of the heavens?\" ...Averroes' statement that the motion of the first heaven is the subject of time and is involved in the definition of 'time', seems contrary to the express word of Aristotle... ...when [Aristotle] defines 'time' he says that it is the number not of circular motion but of motion simply. This would be an inadequate statement, if Averroes was right about the motion which is the subject of time. 42Kilwardby, On Time and Imagination, Oxford, Oxford University Press, 1993, translated by Alexander Broadie, p. 25. 28 Moreover, Aristotle later asks of what kind of motion time is the number, and he replies that it is the number of every kind of motion, so that in so far as motion exists, time is its measure. Hence, time is the number of motion simply and not of some particular kind of motion. He could not have been more explicit on this matter. 2) In Question 11. \"On the unity of time.\" But ... a difficult question arises concerning the unity of time... There is an easy answer to this question if we rely on Averroes. For he would say that time is numerically one in respect of the numerical unity of one subject, viz. the motion of the first moveable thing, and this is indicated by a remark of Aristotle's towards the end of the chapter on time, where he says that it seems that time is the number of the motion of the sphere, because it is by that motion that other motions are measured. But in the same chapter there are many explicit statements which are contrary to the foregoing judgement, as was said in the previous question. It should therefore be said that it is possible to consider time so far as it is known and limited and defined by fixed termini, and to consider it simply, so far as it is unlimited and undefined and not yet denoted by fixed termini. According to the first way of considering time, time is numerically one simply from the unity of a subject which is numerically one. According to the second way it is one through the unity of essence and of definition and by the essential unity of the subject, not in respect of number but of essence... [Aristotle] says [time] 'seems to be' [the number of the motion of the sphere] because he has in mind not every kind of motion of the sphere but every motion of the sphere with respect to an existence which is limited and determinate for the purposes of measuring other motions. But if time is to be considered without qualification and with respect to its unlimited and indeterminate existence then it is one in essence and definition like the changed and continuous existence which is in every motion.43 Kilwardby's rebuttal of Averroes' certainly seems far more in keeping with Aristotle's own words than does Averroes' interpretation. Kilwardby is not concerned as to whether Aristotle or Averroes are correct in their assessment of what time is, he is concerned only with seeing whether Averroes' treatment of time is in keeping with Aristotle's. Kilwardby's argument also shows that he recognises the important difference between time itself, and mere measures of time. He correctly 43Kilwardby, On time, 39-51, pp. 35-37. 29 argues that when Aristotle speaks of the place of the sphere in understanding time, the sphere is important as measure only, not as the progenitor of time, which has its seat in motion generally. Conclusion Aristotle explicitly rejected the notion that time is an effect of the motion of the primum mobile, arguing instead that time results from motion generally. In attempting to explain the unity of time, Aristotle's commentator, Averroes, fell upon an interpretation of Aristotle which had the motion of the primum mobile as the cause of time. Averroes evidently took some trouble coming to this conclusion, which he seems to have reached through a process of deduction rather than textual analysis. The importance of Averroes' interpretation to the medieval understanding of Aristotelian time cannot be overstated-as 'the Commentator,\" Averroes was a key conduit of Aristotelian thought to the West. We can see the impact of Averroes' interpretation in the work of Thomas Aquinas and Robert Kilwardby. Aquinas, an influential philosopher of the period in his own right, apparently lifts his own reading of Aristotle on time straight from Averroes. The alignment of these two thinkers on this issue might well have further strengthened the place of the Averroean interpretation in medieval philosophy. Kilwardby rejects Averroes' interpretation, yet his rejection is further evidence that the Averroean interpretation was the 'main game' at the time. In the following chapter we turn to the first proposals that time may be an absolute entity; proposals formed explicitly in response to a rejection of the possibility that time might be caused by celestial motion. 30 31 2. \"Heaven standing still\": Early Absolute-Like Time With the idea that time is an effect of heavenly motion firmly set in the medieval psyche, a major problem emerged: this notion of time could not be reconciled with the Bible. Averroes had reasoned that \"If heaven stood still ...we would exist in an unchanging existence.\" Yet in the Old Testament, Joshua (X 13) is said to have fought a battle under an un-moving sky while time continued. Some who used this conflict to reject the theory that time is caused by heavenly motion responded with a novel claim-that time has no physical cause at all. In the 5th century, St Augustine, who believed time to be a mental artefact, set out an argument rejecting Plato's theory that time results from the celestial motion: I once heard a learned man say that the motions of the sun, moon, and stars constituted time; and I did not agree. For why should not the motions of all bodies constitute time? What if the lights of heaven should cease, and a potter's wheel still turn round: would there be no time by which we might measure those rotations and say either that it turned at equal intervals, or, if it moved now more slowly and now more quickly, that some rotations were longer and others shorter? And while we were saying this, would we not also be speaking in time? ...O God, grant men to see in a small thing the notions that are common to all things, both great and small. Both the stars and the lights of heaven are \"for signs and seasons, and for days and years.\" This is doubtless the case, but just as I should not say that the circuit of that wooden wheel was a day, neither would that learned man say that there was, therefore, no time... Let no man tell me, therefore, that the motions of the heavenly bodies constitute time. For when the sun stood still at the prayer of a certain man in order that he might gain 32 his victory in battle, the sun stood still but time went on. For in as long a span of time as was sufficient the battle was fought and ended.44 Some believe that the \"learned man\" St Augustine refers to in the passage is Plato himself-a rhetorical device only, given St Augustine and Plato's historical distance from one another. Regardless, the description of time St Augustine refutes is clearly the Platonic doctrine. The 'certain man' who prays for the sun to stand still is Joshua; the story conveyed in the Bible's Joshua X 12-14. In the biblical passage, Joshua prays for the Sun and Moon to stand still so that his army will have more time to defeat the Amorites in battle, a prayer God answers, and the battle is fought under an unmoving sky: On the day on which the Lord delivered the Amorites to Israel Joshua said to the Lord in the presence of the children of Israel: \"Oh sun, move not over Gibeon, Oh moon, over the valley of Aijalon.\" And the sun and moon stood still while the nation avenged itself on its enemies. So it is written in the Book of the Just. Thus the sun stood, in the middle of heaven, and did not set for the space of one day. Neither before nor since has there been so long a day, with the Lord obeying the voice of man, and fighting for Israel.45 Although the passage only refers explicitly to the motions of the sun and moon, this disagreement between St Augustine and Plato has very obvious repercussions for 44St. Augustine, Confessions, Book 11, Chap. XXIII. Translation by Albert C. Outler, in vol. VII of the Library of Christian Classics, Chapters XIV-XVII, XXI-XXVIII. For comparison, the original Latin text is: \"Audivi a quodam homine docto quod solis et lunae ac siderum motus ipsa sint tempora, et non adnui. Cur enim non potius omnium corporum motus sint tempora? An vero, si cessarent caeli lumina et moveretur rota figuli, non esset tempus quo metiremur eos gyros et diceremus aut aequalibus morulis agi, aut si alias tardius, alias velocius moveretur, alios magis diuturnos esse, alios minus? Aut cum haec diceremus, non et nos in tempore loqueremur aut essent in verbis nostris aliae longae syllabae, aliae breves, nisi quia illae longiore tempore sonuissent, istae breviore? Deus, dona hominibus videre in parvo communes notitias rerum parvarum atque magnarum. sunt sidera et luminaria caeli in signis et in temporibus et in diebus et in annis. Sunt vero, sed nec ego dixerim circuitum illius ligneolae rotae diem esse, nec tamen ideo tempus non esse ille dixerit. \"...Nemo ergo mihi dicat caelestium corporum motus esse tempora, quia et cuiusdam voto cum sol stetisset, ut victoriosum proelium perageret, sol stabat, sed tempus ibat. Per suum quippe spatium temporis, quod ei sufficeret, illa pugna gesta atque finita est.\" 45 Biblia Latina (Vulgate) cum Glossa Ordinaria, (facsimile reprint, editio princeps Adolph Rusch, Strassburg, 1480/81), Turnhout, Brepols, 1992, p. 447. \"Tunc locutus est io sue si die qua tradidit ammorreum in conspectu filioru israel. dixitquam coram eis. Sol contra gabaan ne mouearis et luna contra vallem baylon steteruntquam sol et luna donec ulciferetur se gens de inimicis suis. Nonne scriptum est hoc in libro iustorum. Stetit ita quam sol in medio caeli et non factinavit occumbere spacio unius diei. Non fuit antea nec postea tam longa dies obediente domino voci homis et pugnante pro israel.\" My translation. 33 Averroes' rendering of time, repercussions not lost on the medieval thinkers John Duns Scotus and Peter Aureole, whose negative theses against Averroes and Aquinas comprised the first moved towards modern temporal absolutism. Duns Scotus' response to the story of Joshua: Potential and privative time John Duns Scotus (c.1265-1308), a Franciscan academic and theologian, was active at both Oxford and the University of Paris, where he wrote commentaries on the Sentences of Peter Lombard, as was usual for a young academic of the time. The most interesting examples of Duns Scotus' work on time occur in the Oxford commentary (the Scriptum Oxoniensis), where he draws much of his inspiration from Aristotle's Physics. Unfortunately no overt commentary on the Physics by Duns Scotus is available to us,46 so we must make do with the Scriptum, and some of Duns Scotus' Quodlibetal Questions. Although the discussion of time in these works is not extensive, it is adequate, both detailed and revealing. Often critical of both Aristotle and St Augustine, Duns Scotus still manages to find in their ideas inspiration for new thoughts of his own. Such inspiration is especially evident in his rejection of Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle's thoughts on time (although Duns Scotus seems to accept the Averroean interpretation as a correct interpretation of Aristotle). In Disputation Two of Book Two of the Scriptum Duns Scotus alludes to St Augustine's argument to refute the Averroean theory: Heaven standing still, Peter could walk after the resurrection, and that walk would not be conceived as existing in any time other than our ordinary continuous time. Similarly, even if the first motion of heaven did not exist, the resting of the motion of heaven itself is measured potentially... by that time by which the first motion would have been measured if it were positive and actual. And in that potential time another motion, which was actually existing, could be measured-thus the motion so measured does not necessarily depend upon the motion of the first heaven for its existence, just as 46 A direct commentary of Aristotle's Physics which had in the past been attributed to Duns Scotus is now considered inauthentic (and is attributed to Marsilius of Inghen). See C.R.S. Harris, Duns Scotus, Bristol, Thoemmes Press, 1994, vol. 1, p. 313; and Allan Wolter, Duns Scotus: Philosophical Writings, Edinburgh, Nelson, 1962, p. xxi. Indeed, a close examination of the ideas on time represented in that commentary show them to be at odds with those expressed in the indisputably authentic works. 34 it was with motions in the time of Joshua... [It] suffices only that that motion, when it exists, can be distinctly known according to its own quantity, by a distinct cognition of time, whether this time is actual or potential. Therefore I say that when the motion of heaven does not exist, another motion can be measured by a time, which would coincide with as great a part of the motion of the first heaven, if it existed. In the instance [of the heaven being stopped], the amount of rest coincides with an equal length of [the motion that heaven would have], if that motion existed.47 The passage above refutes two elements of Averroes' theory of time. Most obviously, Duns Scotus denies Averroes' claim that if heaven stood still we would \"exist in an unchanging existence.\" Duns Scotus also denies the causal connection between the first motion and lesser motions, when he argues that motions in the time of Joshua did not \"necessarily depend upon the motion of the first heaven for [their] existence.\" In refuting the impossibility of a stationary heaven resulting in a changelessness in the world below, and in denying the necessity of the causal connection between heavenly motion and earthly motions, Duns Scotus makes what is a bold new claim: that \"motion, when it exists, can be understood clearly according to its own quantity, through a clear understanding of time.\" In other words, that we understand motion through time, and not the other way around. In the discussion that follows I shall show how Duns Scotus uses the important distinction between a measure and the thing measured to support his claim that time is an quasi-absolute flux, independent of motions for its existence. 47Duns Scotus, Quaestiones in Quartum Librum Sententiarum (Scriptum Oxonensis), in Opera Omnia-Editio Nova, (apud Ludovicum Vives, MDCCCXCV), reprinted Westmead, Gregg International Publishers, 1969, lib. II, dist. II, quaest. XI, 'Utrum Angelus possit moveri in instanti?' \"...stante coelo, poterit Petrus post resurrectionem ambulare, et tamen ista ambulatio non fingetur esse in tempore quodam alio a communi tempore nostro continuo. Similiter etiam non existente primo motu coeli, mensuratur quidem quies ipsius motus coeli potentialiter ... tempore illo quo motus primus mensuraretur, si esset positive et actualiter, et in illo tempore potentiali potest mensurari motus alius tunc actualiter existens, ita quod non est necesse mensuratum a motu primi coeli dependere in esse, vel essentia a motu illo, sicut fuit motus sub tempore Josue...tantum sufficit, quod motus iste, quando est, possit distincte cognosci secundum quantitatem suam ex cognitione distincta temporis, et hoc vel actualis vel potentialis; et ita dico, quod quando iste motus coeli non erit, poterit tamen alius motus mensurari per tempus hujus motus primi coeli, inquantum scilicet motus ille posset fieri cum tanta parte illius motus si esset, et numc est cum tanta parte quietis cum quanta pars motus posset esse\". My translation. 35 In Disputation XLVIII of Book Three of the Scriptum Oxoniensis Duns Scotus refers to St. Augustine's work explicitly, and makes an important point, recognising the observation made by Aristotle, and seemingly missed by Averroes and Aquinas, that time itself is not the same as a mere measure of time, and that the one does not depend for its existence upon the existence of the other: If it is argued that the measured cannot exist without the measure, I argue that...this is not true concerning an accidental measure, which measures through application or coextension, as an ell measures a piece of cloth. It is obvious that a quantity of cloth does not depend on the quantity of an ell. In this manner, the first motion, considered according to the relation of measure its successive extension holds to other motions, is a measure of [those other motions] through application or coextension... Book 10 of Joshua supports this view. Joshua fought while the sun and moon stood still, and with those bodies stopping it might seem too great an irregularity for all heaven, and all other motions. [Yet] St. Augustine says in Book 11 of the Confessions, \"Heaven standing still, the potter's wheel turned.\"48 Duns Scotus demonstrates a clear appreciation of the difference between the measure and the measured (mensura and mensuratum), arguing again that even without the motion of heaven other motions would continue, as would time itself. In one of Duns Scotus' quodlibetal questions he goes much further: time would continue even if all motions ceased: With no motion existing, there can [still] be a rest, even properly considered... Even the unchanging disposition [of a resting body] corresponds to a proper measure, which is a time, between any two instants of which an extent of flux, or an interceding motion, can be imagined. And in this manner, if time is a measure of motion, or flux, that uniform existence will have a time-perhaps not actual and positive, but potential and privative.49 48 Duns Scotus, Scriptum Oxonensis, lib. IV, dist. XLVIII, queast. II, 'Utrum in judicio vel post, cessabit motus corporum coelestium?' \"Si arguatur, mensuratum non potest esse sine mensura, respondeo... non est verum de mensura accidentali, quae per applicationem vel coextensionem mensurat, sicut ulna mensurat pannum. Patet quod quantitas panni non dependet a quantitate ulnae; ex hoc solo modo, motus primus acceptus secundum suam extensionem successivam cum relatione mensurationis ad alios motus, est mensura eorum per apllicationem vel coextensionem... Pro ista responsione adducitur illud Josue 10. quod ipse pugnavit stante Sole et Luna, et per consequens toto coelo, ne illis stantibus, et allis omnibus corporibus motis, esset nimia irregularitas in moyu istorum corporum coelestium; et Augustinus, undecimo Confess. Stante coelo movetur rotula figuli.\" My translation. 49Duns Scotus, Quaestiones Quodlibetales, in Opera Omnia-Editio Nova, (apud Ludovicum Vives, MDCCCXCV), reprinted Westmead, Gregg International Publishers, 1969, quaest. XI, 'Utrum 36 How should we understand Duns Scotus' claim about potential and privative time? It is useful to pause here and consider to Aristotle's position on a similar conundrum, which may shed light upon Duns Scotus' approach to the 'privative' or 'potential' time undergone by resting bodies. In Book iv of the Physics, Aristotle says that \"the passage of time is current everywhere alike and is in relation to everything\" (Phys. 218b 13-15), but he does not seem to intend a ubiquitous 'potential' time-as we saw in the previous chapter, Aristotle defines time as an effect of all motion. However, Aristotle does consider how a resting body, undergoing no motion, is in time. Aristotle's answer here is a little unsatisfactory, but has important similarities to Duns Scotus' idea, above. Aristotle argues that: ...we conceive of time as immanent in everything in earth and sea and sky...because time, being the numerator of motion, pertains to such motion wherever it exists, as an affection or disposition of it (namely, that it is either actually counted in units or potentially countable in such); and all things in the material universe are susceptible of motion (for they all have position [τοπω] which is subject to change), and time and movement run in pairs both potentially [δυναμιν] and actually. (Phys. 223a16-22) Elsewhere in the Physics, Aristotle defines change as \"the progress of the realising of a potentiality, qua potentiality, for example, the actual progress of modification in any modifiable thing, qua modifiable\" (Phys. 201a10-15). This definition implies that changes exist only in virtue of the natural and inherent capacity for change in the thing which is undergoing that change. Because motion is a kind of change, the 'rules' of change apply to motion. Motion, therefore, is the realisation of a preexisting potential for motion. Aristotle further argues that from this it is evident that something which has no capacity for motion could not properly be defined as 'at rest'. Rest is an unactualised potential for motion in a thing which is capable of motion (Phys. 221b 12-15). If we are going to define time as ontologically parasitic upon motion, then it seems at least reasonable that it can also be described as parasitic upon unactualised, potential motion, or rest. If temporal transition can be related to both potential motion and actual motion, argues Aristotle, it must exist alike both Deus possit facere, quod, manente corpore et loco, corpus non habeat ubi sive esse in loco.' \"...nullo motu existente, posset esse quies aliqua etiam proprie accepta... ...etiam uniformi dispositione correspondet propria mensura, quae est tempus, inter cujus quaecumque duo instantia imaginata posset tantus fluxus sive motus intercipi, et ita si tempus dicitur mensura motus, sive fluxus, illa uniformis existentia habebit tempus, licet non uniformiter actuale positivum, sed potentiale et privitivum.\" My translation. 37 everywhere and for all things, since all bodies are necessarily composed of elements which have a natural capacity for motion. But Aristotle faced a problem. How do we relate time, or 'number' time, in respect of potential motion? It may be that something which is in a state of potential motion is only 'potentially' undergoing temporal transition. This possibility, however, is at odds with Aristotle's assertion that time exists alike both everywhere and for all things. If, on the other hand, something which is at rest is to be actually numbered by time-to undergo temporal transition, and be 'in' time-we must ask just how such an object is to be connected to temporal transition. Let us imagine how we would connect time to a resting object using Aristotle's 'before and after' definition of numbering. We might imagine comparing a photograph of an apple with an actual existing apple. Aristotle says that the 'now', or moment, moves through time in a way analogous to that in which a projectile moves through its motion. The now is therefore always the same, yet always distinct, as \"the sophists distinguish between Corsicos in the Lyceum and Corsicos in the market place\". It is the moment which gives time its earlier and later, by distinguishing two or more apparent 'nows', as the relations of the moving now alter. We can see, therefore, that in the photograph, the apple is not 'in' time. The photograph represents only one 'now' in the life of the apple, so there is no before and after, and therefore no time. In the case of the real apple, however, we can designate a real-time 'before', say \"right now\", and a realtime 'after', say \"now\". In this way, the apple can be said to be in time, as Aristotle seems to suggest, because it has a before and after which can be 'numbered'. But the apple moves through no magnitude. The before and after of the apple is described in merely temporal terms-a temporal before and after only-again, contrary to Aristotle's argument that we understand time as a number of motion in the sense that the before and after of place and magnitude translate directly to temporal transition via the movement of a body through before and after points in the magnitude of the body's motion. If we can situate the apple in time because we need only designate a temporal before and after, then in this instance, time is treated, in a way, as absolute (this problem is related to that referred to by Dennis Cornish in the previous chapter, page 24). Such a possibility seems to be contrary to Aristotle's idea that the number by which time is counted off is in the before and after of motion through magnitude. Aristotle seems to be confused about how to explain the exact 38 nature of the relationship between temporal ordering, and motive ordering upon magnitude, as on a line. We cannot, however, know if it was a problem like this that caused Duns Scotus to shy away from a more Aristotelian answer to the conundrum of the temporality of a resting body. In the passage above, Duns Scotus lays his metaphysical cards on the table much more clearly than Aristotle-he seems to be saying rather explicitly that the temporal flow from a before point to an after point is temporal only and has no ontological or causal connection to time, for example when he says: \"With no motion existing, there can [still] be a rest, even properly considered.\" Whereas Aristotle stopped short of saying that potential time actually has a flux which can properly be considered as temporal, Duns Scotus seems quite sure that there is a solely temporal flow from instant to instant, even where there is no motion whatsoever. Duns Scotus also argues that the mobile 'now,' or moment, can be understood by the intellect by virtue of its understanding of time from past experience. ...the intellect, having a conception of actual and positive time, can come to know its quantity by applying it to that duration, this being the quantity it would have positively if it were a positive time.50 For Aristotle, 'potential time' was time that attached to a body undergoing 'a potential for motion', or what we would call rest. Duns Scotus seems to mean something a little different when he speaks of 'potential and privative' (potentiale et privativum) time. Duns Scotus says quite explicitly that a 'normal' time really does exist in the absence of (heavenly) motion-\"Heaven standing still, Peter could walk after the resurrection, and that walk would not be conceived as existing in any time other than our ordinary continuous time.\" So why is this time privativum? Of what is it deprived? In the absence of motion, time is deprived of its measure. It is no less real than 'our continuous ordinary time', but it is not understood by us in its relation to a known motion, which is the way we normally judge the passing of time. In the 50Duns Scotus, Quaestiones Quodlibetales quaest. XI, 'Utrum Deus possit facere, quod, manente corpore et loco, corpus non habeat ubi sive esse in loco.' \"...intellectus habens notitiam temporis actualis et positivi, applicando eam ad istam durationem uniformem, potest cognoscere quantitatem ipsius, scilicet quod tantam haberet positive, si esset tempus positivum.\" My translation. 39 passage above, Duns Scotus tells us that it is our understanding of positive time which allows us to measure a time deprived of motion. The suggestion that we have some special access to positive time in the absence of motion can be better understood when we have an understanding of Duns Scotus' theory of knowledge. Duns Scotus proposed that we have an intuitive' intellectual understanding of the things in the world around us, based on the relationship that they bear to one another. Thus in the absence of one of two objects, we can still understand the relationship they would bear to one another if both were present, and in the absence of any object, we can still quite clearly conceptualise the object if we have met with its kind before (once we have seen a copse of trees, for example, we can recognise the form in other trees we come upon, or consider a tree in our mind even if no trees are present). Duns Scotus asserts that: [It is] helpful to distinguish [an] act of the intellect at the level of simple apprehension or intellection of a simple object. One is indifferent as to whether the object is existing or not, and also whether it is present in reality or not. We often experience this act in ourselves, for universals and the essences of things we grasp equally well whether they exist extramentally in some subject or not, or whether we have an instance of them actually present or not...51 In the same way as, for Duns Scotus, we might consider the idea of a tree by reference to physical trees we remember (even of no tree is present), so can we comprehend measures of time, such as that given by the motion of the sphere, even if that motion is stopped: ...the intellect, having a conception of actual and positive time, can apply this to the uniform duration [of potential or privative time]... Our knowledge of motion can be used as a measure of the real and existing time which passes in the absence of the motions we usually use as a measure. The important point here, though, is that although we might normally understand time as it occurs in conjunction with a motion, we can still perceive that 'ordinary continuous 51Duns Scotus, Quodlibetal Questions, F. Alluntis and A. B. Wolter (trans), quoted in Duns Scotus: Metaphysician, by the same, Lafayette, Purdue University Press, 1995, p. 175. 40 time' flows even in the absence of any motion whatsoever. In effect, Duns Scotus is arguing for time as an independent flux. Significantly, the passages above form parts of Duns Scotus' quodlibetal questions. The quodlibetal questions were posed at special bi-yearly disputative sessions in which masters could be asked to answer questions on any topic, by other masters, students, or indeed any interested person. Such questioning was 'off the cuff', and graduating students were required to take part. Thus the question of what would become of temporal passage if there were no motions of bodies can be seen as a topic of interest to others than Duns Scotus-in this instance, at least, Duns Scotus is not speaking of his own thoughts and interests alone, but of issues of interest to many. The quodlibetal nature of these passages of Duns Scotus' demonstrates, again, a serious concern for the implications of Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle's theory of time-a concern shared by those who asked the questions to which the quodlibets form the answer. To accept Averroes' assertion that if the sphere were to stop, time would stop, is to question the literal veracity of the Joshua passages. Duns Scotus' answers, and his use of the Joshua story, evidence the seriousness of such issues to philosophers of his time. Yet why does Duns Scotus not simply say, with St. Augustine and Kilwardby, that time is a purely mental construct? Or why does he not say that Aristotle merely meant to associate time with motion generally? (Even though Kilwardby disagreed with this idea, he is still able to see it as Aristotle's true intent.) It seems quite reasonable to ask why Duns Scotus has gone to the trouble of constructing a new way of understanding time, why he seems to have taken the step of proposing it to be (in effect) absolute. The answer is surely that he has exhausted all other possibilities. Averroes had proposed that there were only three credible possibilities for the source of time: that it was an artefact pf the thinking mind; that it was an effect of motion generally, or that it was an effect of the heavenly motion. Averroes himself showed that the first two possibilities were not logically possible. Duns Scotus uses St Augustine's story to show that the third is not, either. In Book IV of Duns Scotus' commentary on the Sentences, before discussing what a cessation of heavenly motion would portend for time, Duns Scotus refers to Averroes: 41 ...according to Averroes, in his commentary on the chapter on time in the Physics, if someone were not to perceive some change, other than merely in an act of imagining, he would not perceive time, thus time would not exist. And [he says] time is not able to exist without the motion of heaven, because time is a passion of the first motion.52 Duns Scotus is referring to the passages of Averroes discussed in the previous chapter. Averroes showed that it was untenable to maintain that time is simply an act of the imagination, or an effect of motion generally, and concluded that time was diffused throughout the world from the motion of the primum mobile. Aquinas, also, saw the problem associated with the first two possibilities, and concurred with Averroes' conclusion (Aquinas, Commentary on Aristotle's Physics, Lecture 17, and discussion here facing note 33). Unfortunately, I cannot find a fuller discussion by Duns Scotus of the Averroes passage than that given above, yet it seems quite plausible that Duns Scotus, like Aquinas, would have recognised the difficulties in proposing time to be of the mind, or of motion generally. Since he has himself discredited Averroes' and Aquinas' idea that time is of the motion of heaven, Duns Scotus is left with no other choice but to say that it is an independent flux. The full range of reasonable possibilities for a physical cause of time-one special motion; motion generally; thought-have been exhausted with Duns Scotus' denial that it can be produced be the first motion. It is unfortunate that Scotus does not go so far as to ask, \"would time continue in its flux in the absence of bodies\". He only asks about time in the absence of the motions of any bodies: one gets the impression, however, that Scotus would answer that time would flow in the absence of bodies. Yet even if this were so, one could not describe Scotus' concept of time as a 'theory' of absolute time. He does not go into the categorical or ontological status of time, or ask any important questions about what it is against which, or through which, time flows (in the way Newton proposes that time is an aspect of God's limitless duration, an idea that we investigate in the final chapters of this study). Yet his thoughts on temporal transition are a fascinating first step in the move away from relational theories of time as caused by physical processes, like those of Averroes and Aristotle. 52Duns Scotus, Scriptum Oxonensis, lib. IV, dist. XLVIII, queast. II, \"...secundum Averroem 4. Physics. cap. de Tempore, com. 2. si quis non perciperet aliquem fluxum, nisi tantum in actu imaginandi, adhuc perciperet tempus; si ergo tunc tempus erit, et tempus non poterit esse sine motu coeli, quia tempus est passio primi motus...\" My translation. 42 The Potter Again: Peter Aureole Duns Scotus was not alone in using Joshua to reject Averroes' theory of time and to replace it with an absolute-like time. The French theologian, Peter Aureole, like Duns Scotus a Franciscan, put forward a description of time which had much in common with Duns Scotus'-although he relies more heavily on St. Augustine's hypothesis that time has the action of the mind as a significant part of its definition. Like Duns Scotus and unlike St. Augustine, however, Aureole contends that time has a real existence in the world outside of the mind and without the motion of bodies. Aureole seems not to believe that time is a product of the motion of the first heaven, and in this his reasoning reflects the ideas of St. Augustine before him: Even if the movement of the first mobile were not to exist, the mind could still capture time in some particular movement, the movement of a potter's wheel, for example. Here is confirmation of this: the battle directed by Joshua occurred in time. This time, however, was not the movement of the first mobile. Every time the mind perceives that there is a changing existence, it perceives time. Time therefore, considered as a continuous quantity and not as determined by measure, has for foundation any movement whatever; in fact, whoever perceives a movement, perceives successive parts. By taking the parts succeeding each other in this movement, he distinguishes the ones coming before and the ones coming after; and the before and after of movement is time.53 Aureole's idea seems very similar to Aristotle's. He uses the Joshua story to counter Averroes' Platonistic interpretation of Aristotle, and seems also to assert that time is related to all motion. He also says, with Aristotle, that the sphere is a good measure of time, but is not itself time. Yet because Aristotle draws time as a conclusion of, and in effect as a product of, the motion of a body through a magnitude, he was at somewhat of a loss to explain the ubiquitous nature of time, or the temporal status of a body at rest. Aureole answers 53Peter Aureole, Commentariorum in secundum librum Sententiarum, dist. II, queast. I, art. 4, (p.41), quoted in Pierre Duhem, Medieval Cosmology: Theories of Infinity, Place, Time, Void, and the Plurality of Worlds, edited and translated by Roger Ariew, Chicago, University of Chicago Press, 1985, p. 304. 43 this problem by showing how an appeal to the idea of locomotion can assist us in understanding the necessary ubiquity of the instant-though time does not rely for its existence on such motion: According to what the mathematicians imagine, a flowing point engenders a line, as the present instant engenders time by flowing. But if there can exist only a single point, there can exist only a single line. And: . . . if there were an infinity of movements, the mind can establish a unique notion of time; thus it measures all the instantaneous changes by the same present instant, all the movements by a single past and a single future. How do we know that there is only one instant? Aureole calls on simple assertion: At the instant in which I am speaking, in this same present instant, the king of the Tartars sits; therefore there is no present instant for us and another for the Tartars.54 Aureole certainly seems to be saying that the present instant, or 'now', exists outside of the mind, in the tangible world: the world common to both the Tartars and the writer of the text. He also says that the 'now' is caught up somehow with motion generally, although the above passages do not make that relationship clear. The following passage, however, does help clarify the relationship between the mind, the 'now', and motion: Time consists of something that exists outside the mind and of something that does not exist outside the mind. In fact, whether the intellect considers or does not consider them, the indivisibles of time and of movement exist outside the mind. On the other hand, the past and future, between which the indivisibles establish continuity, have no being if the mind does not conceive them. Therefore, if one calls something having a certain positive nature a being existing outside the mind, time and movement are beings only in the mind. The parts of time taken together have no positive nature, except insofar as the mind takes these parts together, conceives them all as in actuality, and concludes from this conception the succession that binds them, that distinguishes what came before and what is coming later. If one understands positive being, or being 54Aureole , ibid, p. 302. 44 external to the mind, in this manner, one must say that time and movement are beings only in the mind.55 This passage helps us to understand Aureole a little better. It seems that time, in the sense of temporal transition, exists outside the mind. However, since past no longer exists, and the future is not yet to be (an argument common to Aristotle, St. Augustine and Averroes, which is taken up by Aureole), then they do not have an actual concrete existence as 'things'. As Aristotle said, \"that which is composed of nonbeings cannot partake of substance\" (Phys., 218a 4). In order for time, which is made up of the nonbeings of past and future, to have 'positive being', Aureole calls on the act of reason drawing these insubstantial instants together. Aureole's suggestion is similar to St. Augustine's. Augustine said time was the action of the mind as \"it expects, it attends and it remembers.\" Yet St. Augustine did not account for the way that this 'temporal continuum' attached to the physical world. Aureole goes farther, suggesting that the moment is real, and independent of motions, or of the action of the mind. It is the role of the mind, however, to construct a feeling of connectedness between past and future. Time then, is 'real' in the world, yet fleeting, and it gains it 'wholeness' from the mind. The passages of Aureole cited earlier now make more sense. The mind grasps the flow of the objective instant, by seizing upon its flow \"along the changing and successive parts of movement.\"56 Having thus understood the flowing instant, the mind can then conceive of the succession of instants, giving to time a positive and actual aspect. The 'now', flowing along its continuum, exists separately to the self, and independently of any particular movement; yet the mind only understands time by perceiving in it the union of the instant with a motion. Aureole seems to see himself mainly as a commentator of Aristotle, and frequently moulds himself on, and refers to, the commentaries of Averroes. In the passages from which the above quotations were taken Aureole treats his subject matter as if he is simply expounding the views of Aristotle and Averroes before him. Yet as we have seen, his ideas are, in actuality, quite different to those of his mentors. Unlike 55ibid. 56 ibid., p. 303. 45 Aristotle, Aureole does not draw time as a conclusion of motion through magnitude, but rather considers the action of a moving body as a kind of synchronous metaphor for the motion of the objective instant; a metaphor by which the mind grasps the instant and understands past and future as real things. Unlike Averroes, Aureole believed that time exists independently of the motion of the sphere, and he denies Averroes' theory on the basis of the evidence from Joshua. Aureole's idea of an objective instant, which flows along a temporal continuum which is not merely psychological, or dependent for its existence upon physical motion, represents another important step away from the attributive or relativistic theories of time of Aquinas, Averroes, and Aristotle. Like Duns Scotus, Aureole draws his incentive to divorce the seat of time from the motion of the heavens from the story of Joshua, via an argument handed down to them by St. Augustine. Although the two thinkers' ideas diverge on the point of how the mind conceives of the temporal flux, they both agree that time is, in an important sense, independent of actions in the physical world. The Paris Decree of 1277 I have argued here that the conflict between Averroes' theory of time and the passage from Joshua was a real concern for two medieval philosophers, causing them to move away from physical explanations of the cause of time. The most extensive modern account of the birth of absolute time, Pierre Duhem's 1916 Système du monde, holds the Paris Decree of 1277 as the responsible cause. While Duhem agrees that absolute time enters philosophy during the 13th century, he claims that it was proposed for political, not philosophical reasons: the central claim of Système is that the Parisian Decree of 1277 was responsible for a wholesale change in medieval thought. For Duhem, indeed, the Decree forced the abandonment of Aristotelianism, and thereby an extremely rapid advance toward modernism (which on Duhem's account started over a quarter of a millennium before the common account), resulting in the acceptance of the possibility of void space, other worlds, and absolute time and space. Duhem also indicates throughout the Système that he believes that Aristotle thought time to be generated by the motion of the primum mobile. 46 The two explanations-the Decree and the Joshua passage-are certainly intimately entwined, and Decree refers directly to the passage, yet I think Duhem's thesis is too simplistic. However, both to understand Duhem's thesis, and to further reinforce the significance of the Joshua passage, it is well worth pausing to investigate the Decree itself. In the eleventh century, the University of Paris had developed as part of the cathedral school of Notre Dame. The bishop's chancellor had been responsible for issuing licenses to teach, initially in demand of a fee. Eventually, licenses to teach became free, and, as the university grew, the balance of power shifted away from the chancellor, as representative of the bishop, and towards the masters and students. Interestingly however, in many of the struggles between masters and chancellor, the papacy intervened on behalf of the masters. In 1212, for example, Innocent III took the side of the masters when the chancellor attempted to have them swear an oath of obedience to himself.57 By the middle of the thirteenth century the power of the chancellor had been drastically reduced, and it was the rector of Arts who was in many ways the head of the university. By the 1270's the chancellor, and his immediate superior, the bishop of Paris, would have found themselves in a shaky political situation. That they did feel so is evident in the preamble to the Decree of 1277, issued by Stephen Tempier, Bishop of Paris, on behalf of the insecure chancellor and theology masters, and directed at the ever more powerful arts faculty, on the questionable grounds of Tempier's having been asked by Roman authorities simply to 'investigate' the teachings of some arts masters: We have received frequent reports, inspired by zeal for the faith, on the part of important and serious persons to the effect that some students of the arts in Paris are exceeding the boundaries of their own faculty and are presuming to treat and discuss, as if they were debatable in the schools, certain obvious and loathsome errors, or rather vanities and loathsome follies, which are contained in the roll joined to this letter... in support of the aforesaid errors they adduce pagan writings that-shame on their ignorance-they assert to be so convincing that they do not know how to answer them. So as not to appear to be asserting what they thus insinuate, however, they conceal their 57See David Knowles informative discussion of the beginnings of the university of Paris, The Evolution of Medieval Thought, London, Longman, 1988, pp. 148-151; 156-166. 47 answers in such a way that, while wishing to avoid Scylla, they fall into Charybdis. For they say that these things are true according to philosophy but not according to the Catholic faith, as if there were two contrary truths...58 The Decree of 1277 did not succeed in banishing the ideas of Aristotle, but it still serves as a fascinating record of the ideas in circulation when it was composed. It is difficult to know exactly who each proposition was aimed at, yet the Decree provides a glimpse of the 'threatening' thoughts floating around the campus of the University of Paris in 1277. The stellar theory of time seems to have been one of them as a number of the propositions refer to elements of the theory. For example, the decree forbids one to say: [It is forbidden to say . . .] (80) That the reasoning of the Philosopher proving that the motion of the heaven is eternal is not sophistic, and that it is surprising that profound men do not perceive this. (156) That if the heaven stood still, fire would not burn flax because God would not exist. (190) That the theologians who say that the heaven rests at one time or another argue from a false supposition, and that to say that the heaven exists and does not move is to utter contradictories. These propositions bear, to varying degrees, on Aquinas' and Averroes' assertions that time is a product of the motion of the sphere, and also provide support for those siding with the evidence of the Joshua story, and also demonstrate that the argument between St. Augustine and Averroes was a point of contention in the university of Paris in 1277. Duhem's argument that the Decree of 1277 was solely responsible for the invention of absolute time (and many other theories) is highly problematic. It relies on often dubious interpretations of the medieval texts in question (as I demonstrate immediately below), as well as an acceptance of the idea that the Decree would have held weight not just in Paris, but throughout Medieval Europe. The first problem, that 58All propositions and quotations of the decree drawn from, Fortin and O'Neill (translators) \"Condemnation of 219 Propositions,\" Medieval Political Philosophy: a Sourcebook, R. Lerner and M. Mahdi (eds), Toronto, Collier-Macmillan Canada, Ltd., 1963. 48 of interpretation, is perhaps the most serious, for Duhem's treatment of the primary texts is often misleading. Clagett notes that \"Duhem's procedure of presenting only parts of crucial passages-often out of context and then only in French translation without the equivalent Latin passages-[makes] it almost impossible to evaluate Duhem's judgements without an extensive search of the manuscripts.\"59 Clagett's criticisms have certainly been borne out in the research for this thesis.60 In particular, a mistranslation by Duhem of article 156 of the Decree undermines Duhem's authority on this matter. Consider the article: \"[It is condemned to say that] If heaven stood still, fire would not burn flax, because God would not exist\" (\"Si caelum staret, ignis in stupam non ageret, quia nec Deus esse.\")61 Duhem, however, translates this passage as: \"Si le Ciel s'arrêtait, le feu n'aurait plus d'action sur l'étoupe, car le temps lui-même n'existerait pas,\" or, \"...fire would not burn flax because time would not exist.\" Duhem goes further, providing the Latin, \"...ignis in stupam non ageret, quia nec tempus esset.\"62 The careful reader of Système will note that next to tempus Duhem has inserted a footnote, \"Au lieu de: tempus, le texte porte: Deus, ce qui est un non-sens.\"63 The original Latin may not 'make sense' for the purposes of Duhem's thesis, but this is certainly no reason to substitute a more sympathetic phrase for the original. Even more problematically, Ariew's English translation of Système repeats Duhem's distortion and puts Duhem's caveat in an endnote, leading the reader even further astray. Duhem's ostensible reason for changing this translation is that otherwise it makes no sense, but this is not obviously true-for example, given Averroes' suggestion that if heaven stood still the world would be incapable of change, the notion of God's nonexistence, if thought of as God's inability to act, makes quite good sense. 59 Marshall Clagett, The Science of Mechanics in the Middle Ages, Madison, University of Wisconsin Press, 1959, p. xxi. 60 Unfortunately I have had to (carefully) use Duhem for some sources on Aureole , as I have not had access to these texts. 61 Fortin and O'Neill have grouped the condemnations according to topic. They provide a correct translation, at (their) proposition 79. 62 Pierre Duhem, Le Système du Monde: Histoire des Doctrines Cosmologiques de Platon a Copernic, Tome VII, \"Le Physique Parisienne au XIVe Siècle,\" Paris : Hermann, 1959, vol. VII, p. 367-8, my bolding. 63Duhem, Le Système du Monde, VII, p. 368, n. 1; Duhem, Medieval Cosmology (Ariew's translations of Le Système), p. 535, n. 11. 49 Furthermore, Duhem's change of translation also undermines his argument that changes in time theory were due to fear of explicit condemnations in the decree, as some of his evidence is clearly dubious. Another difficulty with Duhem's thesis is the apparently slap-dash nature of the decree itself. Fortin and O'Neil suggest that the Decree was a last minute affair, written by a number of authors and with little or no attempt to adequately express the propositions condemned: The work of compiling the syllabus [the condemned propositions] was completed within three weeks after the papal bull ordering the investigation and appears to have been carried out in a somewhat helter-skelter fashion by several masters working independently... No ostensible effort was made to introduce a logical order among [the banned propositions]... Although visibly influenced by Averroism, many of the propositions represent at best a crude version of the genuine Averroistic teaching.64 The exceptionally broad swath of propositions banned also undermines Duhem's thesis: the propositions banned were not just those relating to matters of philosophy and theology, but matters of morality and general behaviour. If anything, the mixed bag of banned doctrines and practices suggests that much of the piety insisted upon was observed in the breach: Item 179: That one should not confess except for the sake of appearance. 155: That one should not care about burial. 172: That pleasure in sexual acts does not impede the act or the use of the intellect. 169: That perfect abstinence from the act of the flesh corrupts virtue and the species. 178: That death is the end of all terrors. The statement is erroneous if it excludes the terror of hell, which is the last.65 One may well read these banned propositions as a list of common behaviours at the University-or else why the need for a ban? The point here is that Duhem's claim suggests the Decree was aimed at a reform of philosophical principles, whereas it is more plausible that it was a somewhat panicked attempt to regain control over a tooindependent faculty. 64 Fortin and O'Neil, \"Condemnation of 219 Propiositions, p. 336. 65 Fortin and O'Neil, ibid, pp. 353-4. 50 The decree did, of course, have grave implications for the individuals singled out by it. Siger of Brabant, the Latin Averroist and 'radical Aristotelian', went to Italy to plead his case, where he was put under house arrest by the papal Curia, and eventually murdered. A similar decree by Tempier several years earlier and condemning only thirteen articles, saw Aquinas leaving Paris altogether, and some have suggested that the Decree was the cause. Some have supposed that the 1277 Decrees of both Paris and at Oxford were aimed largely at Aquinas's work, but this view has since lost much of its credibility. Few of the articles seem to bear much relevance to Aquinas's works, and those which do, target propositions also taught by other masters. It seems much more likely that the decree was proposed to undermine the influence of more radical masters like Siger and Boethius.66 In any case, after Aquinas's canonisation seventy years later the Church rescinded the condemnation of any articles which \"touched on or were asserted to touch on\" St. Aquinas.67 Certainly, the series of decrees instigated throughout the thirteenth century made life difficult for some. They might have helped to eliminate some of the 'radicals' for a time, but they hardly explain the raison d' etre of the philosophies of Duns Scotus and Aureole, for example. Rather, their arguments rejecting Aristotle's theory of time are logical and well reasoned proposals using St. Augustine's evidence from the story of Joshua as a touchstone. It is implausible that they are a consequence of Tempier's decree-they represent a serious cognisance of the problems inherent in Averroes' interpretation, and reflect an apparent concern for literal exegesis. To dismiss the ideas of Duns Scotus and Aureole as demonstrating that they were merely toeing the party line, is to do them an injustice. Duhem would have it that even English thinkers, like Duns Scotus, were in fear of the Paris decree. Yes the English Kilwardby's involvement in the instigation of a weaker version of the Paris Decree at Oxford in the same year is also interesting. One of the articles condemned was that \"time and eternity have no existence in reality but only in the mind\" (art. 200). As Archbishop of Canterbury, and Patron of Merton College at 66See for example: Calvin G. Normore, \"Who was Condemned in 1277,\" Modern Schoolman, v. 72, 1995; and John F. Wippel, \"Thomas Aquinas and the Condemnations of 1277,\" Modern Schoolman, v. 72, 1995. 67Chartularium II, quoted in Wippel, ibid., p. 237. 51 Oxford, with as much to fear from Averroism (or Aristotelianism, as Duhem would have it) as anyone, would Kilwardby himself have espoused a banned proposition (as I showed in the previous chapter) if the Decrees were as heavily policed as they would need to be to bring about a fundamental shift in natural philosophy as Duhem requires? Leland E. Wilshire raises the possibility that Kilwardby's instigation of the decree at Oxford was only marginally concerned with philosophical issues, let alone problems with Aristotle. Kilwardby's shorter version of the decree deals not just with philosophy, but with \"such issues as whether the noun agrees with the verb and the correct way to form syllogistic arguments.\"68 Wilshire raises the possibility that: Kilwardby, sensing something is astir in the intellectual air but not knowing exactly what it is, tries to get at it by demanding academic excellence. Heresy is pervading the university because students and faculty are intellectually sloppy. Tighten things up in grammar, reasoning, and the right analysis of Aristotle (Natural Philosophy) and this dangerous tendency could be stopped.69 If Kilwardby's attack on Averroes' interpretation is anything to go by, he certainly demands a high level of exactitude at least in his own work. Yet the possibility that the Decree was truly an object of real terror for philosophers seems less and less likely. Given the extreme paucity of scholarship on the history of theories of time generally, and absolute time in particular, Duhem's rather overstretched thesis is especially problematic, however it has not been noticed. For example, writing in 1987, Milič Čapek, in his scholarly and extremely useful précis of early theories of absolute time, states in his concluding remarks: There is no mystery about the origin of the concept of absolute time. Its source is the famous decree of the bishop of Paris Etienne Tempier in 1277, according to which God could have created other worlds beyond the sphere of the fixed stars and move the whole spherical cosmos along a straight line into an outside space which obviously 68Leland E. Wilshire, \"Were the Oxford Condemnations of 1277 Directed Against Aquinas?\" New Scholasticism, v. 48, 1974, p. 125-6. 69Wilshire, ibid., p. 132. 52 transcends our finite geocentric universe. This space received the name \"imaginary space\" (in contradistinction to the \"real\" space contained within the celestial spheres), and in analogy with it the concept of imaginary time was formed... Čapek does not give examples of any thinkers who posited an extramundane 'imaginary time' except Francisco Suárez, whom we meet in the following chapter, and who's use of the term 'imaginary' is far more complex than Čapek suggests, and who was born some 271 years after the Decree was invoked. Čapek softens his position somewhat, concluding that: ...It was certainly an exaggeration on the part of Pierre Duhem to regard 1277 as the birthdate of modern science, but it certainly was an important step in the direction of modern cosmology.70 Duhem's thesis is not merely exaggerated: it is founded on misleading evidence. As a final example, one should also be extremely sceptical of Duhem's claim, alluded to in the Čapek passage above, that the Decree of 1277 put an end to the Aristotelian idea that nothing can exist outside the finite universe. The extremely important philosopher Nicole Oresme, writing in 1377, a century after the Decree, claimed: There can be no motion without a natural body, and we have already shown that there is and can be absolutely no body and, therefore, no place, no void, and no time outside the heavens. For this reason, the things outside the heavens are not capable of being in a place and time does not age them... 71 Certainly the Decree did not change Oresme's ideas about what could be outside the primum mobile. This claim of Duhem's is indeed a case of extreme exaggeration. What Of Aquinas? It was the first premise of this chapter that, if one could provide evidence that the sphere had stopped but time continued, then Averroes' ideas about time would be 70 Milič Čapek, \"The Conflict Between the Absolutist and the Relational Theory of Time Before Newton,\" Journal of the History of Ideas, vol. 48, 1987, p 607. 71 Oresme, Le Livre di ciel et du monde, Madison, University of Wisconsin Press, 1968, Book I, Chapter 24, 8-18; Translation by Albert D. Menut, p.163. Elsewhere Oresme does grant that God could exercise his omnipotence to create a world outside the primum mobile, but he argues at length, following Aristotle, that this could never arise from natural causes. He sums up his argument emphatically: \"there never has been, nor will there be more than one corporeal world.\" ibid., p. 1779. 53 severely undermined. St. Augustine, of course, provided that all important counterargument using the evidence from Joshua. So how are we to account for Aquinas's plagiarism of Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle in the light of this patent evidence? In his book, On the Power of God (Queastiones Disputatae de Potentia Dei), Aquinas addresses directly the question of whether or not it is possible for the sphere to stop, but curiously side-steps the evidence from Joshua. Chapter V of Question V, \"On the Preservation of Things by God\", has the title, \"Will the Heavenly Movement Cease at Any Time?\" Aquinas states emphatically that the heavenly movement will not, cannot, cease, until the end of the world prophesied in Revelations comes to pass.72 Aquinas also asks if this cessation will be in time. He replies that, since time is contingent upon the motion of the heaven, that cessation of heavenly motion will not be in time, because, \"if the celestial motion cease, just as there will be an ultimate indivisible point of movement, so will there be of time.\" So, Aquinas argues that the heaven has never stopped,73 will never stop until the end of the world, and, when that end comes, time will also cease, as it must if the heavens stop moving. The five-thousand words or so in his chapter are comprised of twenty-one arguments and objections, which are supported by numerous articles of evidence. A breakdown of the evidence shows where Aquinas's prejudices lie: there are sixteen references to passages of Aristotle; ten biblical passages cited; three references to Averroes; and one reference to St. Augustine. Aquinas demonstrates an intimate knowledge of the Bible, also, he cannot possibly have been unaware of St. Augustine's treatise on time and reference to Joshua in the Confessions. Not only is St. Augustine's treatise directly relevant to Aquinas's ideas about time, but he could hardly have failed to realise the significance of the Joshua passage himself. Although Aquinas refers to diverse historical evidence from the Bible, he fails to mention the Joshua passage, even in order to refute it, and fails to mention St. Augustine's reference to it. The work, On the Power of God invites the conclusion that he deliberately side-stepped St. Augustine's evidence from Joshua. 72Aquinas, On the Power of God, (Quaestiones Disputatae de Potentia Dei), translation by the English Dominican Fathers, London, Burns Oates and Washbourne Ltd, 1933, p. 114. 73Aquinas, On the Power of God, p. 104. 54 Conclusion The theory of time being an effect of the motion of the heavens, popularised by Averroes and Aquinas, suggests that time is constant and uninterrupted because the motions of the heavens are also, and thus that if the sphere stopped its motion, yet time continued, Aquinas and Averroes' theory would be disproved. That vital counter-argument was provided by St. Augustine over five-hundred years before the ideas of Averroes and Aquinas were put forward. St. Augustine's counter-argument took the form of a piece of biblical evidence: the story of Joshua. St. Augustine drew the conclusion that time cannot be an effect of the motion of the heavens, since time clearly continued for Joshua, even though some heavenly motions had ceased. This evidence relies on one holding to a literal exegetic explanation of biblical events. Various propositions in the Decree of 1277 demonstrate that the irreconcilability of St. Augustine's evidence to Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle's theory of time were being seriously discussed. Further evidence is provided by the nature of the Quodlibetal questions directed at John Duns Scotus, at the close of the 13th century. In response to the question of whether time is an effect of the motion of the sphere, Duns Scotus replied that time is a kind of independent flux, which does not rely on the motions of the heavens. Significantly, his main evidence in support of his case is the story of Joshua also put forward by St. Augustine. Duns Scotus argued that even if all motions were to cease, time would still flow. Further, he believes that we could perceive the passing of time even in the absence of a motive measure, basing this idea on his theory of cognition. Duns Scotus' contemporary, Peter Aureole, likewise uses the stopping of the sphere in the story of Joshua to dispute Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle. Aureole also makes time independent of motion. The ideas of both Duns Scotus and Aureole are based on the assumption that the Bible is a valid historical record. While they both obviously emulate Aristotle, they are keen to subject his ideas, as well as those of his commentators, Aquinas and Averroes, to the litmus test of literal exegesis. Their use of the story of Joshua as a foundation to an understanding of temporal passage as unreliant upon motion can be interpreted 55 as a reflection of the clash between the naturalistic, rationalist philosophies of both Aristotle and Averroes, and the theosophy of the time. Pierre Duhem argues that Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle's theory of time (or Aristotle's actual theory, as Duhem would have it) was killed off by the Decree of 1277, and that fear of the decree prompted rebuttals of Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle. Rather, the decree itself might be seen as evidence of the seriousness with which biblical literalism, in this case the story of Joshua, was considered by late medieval philosophers. It seems more likely that Duns Scotus and Aureole proposed their new way of understanding time because, with the removal of the motion of the sphere as a contender for the possible seat of time, there were no other suitable possibilities remaining, than that Duns Scotus and Aureole were simply toeing Tempier's party line. The ideas of Duns Scotus and Aureole both have aspects similar to some of those of later absolutist theories of time. Both, for example, believe that time exists independently of the motions of bodies. Also, both seem to believe that time exists independently of bodies generally, although neither goes so far as to admit this explicitly. Perhaps the thought just did not occur to them. Their ideas are significant steps towards the more developed theories of physically absolute time which would come after them. St. Augustine's example of the story of Joshua is a useful piece of arsenal for any Christian thinker to whom Averroes' interpretation of Aristotle's theory of time seems unpalatable. 56 57 3. \"If the motion of heaven is made twice as swift...\" Ockham's nominalist response to the problematic nature of time William of Ockham was unsatisfied with both the relational account of time, which proposes that it is an accident of some other entity (for Averroes, the motion of heaven), as well as the suggestion that it may be absolute. Ockham's own solution to the problem of time, which was that time does not exist at all, but is a kind of psychological artefact, was itself prone to a number of logical deficiencies, forcing a revision by succeeding philosophers of the traditional Aristotelian categories. William of Ockham was probably born in Ockham, Surrey, at some time in the ninth decade of the 13th century and was thus a contemporary of Peter Aureole. In his time at Oxford, Ockham studied the works of Duns Scotus, so it is plausible that he was aware of Duns Scotus' work on time, and his rejection of time as an independent 'flowing thing' (res fluens) is quite likely directed at Duns Scotus. Certainly both Duns Scotus and Aureole are widely recognised as two of Ockham's most important philosophical influences. Indeed, Ockham's theory of time seems to be, like theirs, that of an absolutist-seems to be, but is not. For he also claimed that time is a mere 'name' for something which does not exist at all outside of the mind. The conflict between his tendency to absolutism in some thought experiments and his insistence on a nominalist account of time laid the groundwork of some key problems of time that would need to be addressed by later thinkers. Ockham's argument against absolutist accounts of time, such as those of Duns Scotus and Aureole, is not simply an attack on the physical independence of time per se. Ockham was concerned with the suggestion that time 'really exists'-whether as a substance or as an accident. 58 However, Ockham's account of time becomes logically incoherent when he insists both that time has no 'real' existence (but is rather an intellectual artefact), and that there is a 'real' regular flux underlying all motions and events in the world-a position he is drawn to on the basis of the Joshua evidence we met in the previous chapter. Ockham argues that to say 'time is', signifies something completely different than to say 'man is', or 'white is'.74 Rather, Ockham believed that 'time' is just a way of thinking about motion: I say that this is true: 'time is'; by which it should be understood through that proposition 'time is', this proposition: 'something is moved, from which the soul measures some motion'. And the Philosopher does not intend anything else through the proposition 'time is'.75 The nominalist description of time as an intellectual artefact is common throughout the history of the philosophy of time. Similarly, Lucretius said of time: Time also exists not of itself, but from things themselves is derived the sense of what has been done in the past, then what thing is present with us, further what is to follow after. Nor may we admit that anyone has a sense of time by itself separated from the movement of things and their quiet calm. 76 As we saw in the previous chapter, St Augustine called time an action of the mind as \"it expects, it attends and it remembers.\" Later Descartes, in the 17th Century, described time as merely a \"mode under which we shall consider a thing in so far as it continues to exist...\"77 74An example used by Ockham, 'Utrum Haec sit Concedenda de Virtute Sermonis 'Tempus est Ens'', Quaestiones in Libros Physicorum Aristotelis, Opera Philosophica et Theologica, vol. 6, edidit Stephanus Brown, St. Bonaventure, Franciscan Institute, 1984, Q. 39, p 500. My translation. 75Ockham, Quaestione, Q. 39, 'Utrum Haec Concedenda de Virtute Sermonis 'Tempus est Ens'' \"Sic igitur dico quod haec est vera 'tempus est', intelligendo per istam propositionem 'tempus est' istam propositionem 'aliquid movetur, unde anima mensurat motum alterius'. Et nihil aliud intelligit Philosophus per illam propositionem 'tempus est'.\" p 502. My translation. 76 Lucretius, De rerum natura, , I 445-6, translated by R.E. Latham, p. 459-63. 77 Descartes, The Principles of Philosophy, in The Philosophical Works of Descartes, translated by Elizabeth S Haldane and G.R.T. Ross, , Cambridge, Cambridge University Press, 1967, Prin. LV, p. 241. 59 Ockham's rejection of the reality of time is couched within his well known nominalist philosophy. For Ockham, only substances, and some kinds of quality, could be considered 'absolute entities'. Ockham defined a substance as that essence of a thing which makes it what it is, and without which it would cease to be. A substance, for Ockham, signifies one particular individual: 'a man', not 'mankind'.78 Further, just as 'a man' is a distinct being, so too can some of his accidents be considered as having such a distinct existence. In Question Two of his seventh Quodlibet, Ockham provides the general rule that any quality that can only be successively predicated as true of the same subject through an act of local motion, should not be considered to be a distinct being (departing from the Aristotelian metaphysics).79 Thus, because a subject can change from red to green without local motion, we can consider these things ('this redness', or 'this greenness') to be distinct beings. For a subject to change from a state of 'curved', to 'straight', however, at least some of its parts must undergo local motion, so the qualities of 'straight' and 'curved' cannot be considered distinct beings-they are only a description given by us to the arrangement of the parts of a thing. Another way of looking at the problem is to consider that it is only by an act of the substance that 'straight' and 'curved' can exist-they cannot signify something separate from straight things and curved things, therefore they are inseparable from substance and cannot be considered distinct beings. Conversely, Ockham says designations such as 'white' and 'non-white' cannot be successively true in a subject unless that subject gains or loses something-'whiteness'-which for Ockham is evident because the transition cannot be accounted for by the subject undergoing a motion, or simply passing through some space of time.80 Therefore 'white' must be something distinct from substance, and thus distinct in its own right. Ockham argued that those words which do not refer to substances or absolute accidents are merely 'names', or mental concepts, rather than 'real' beings (hence 'nominalism'). To be more precise, some terms signify distinct beings-substances 78Ockham treats terms such as 'mankind' as secondary substances, which, as designations of genera or species, etc., exist only in the mind. See Quod. 5, quest. 23, Quodlibetal Questions, translated by Alfred J. Freddoso and Francis E. Kelly, New Haven, Yale University Press, 1991, p. 477. 79Ockham, Quodlibetal Questions, pp. 597-8. 80ibid. 60 and absolute accidents-and are referred to by him as terms 'of first intention'. Other terms signify groups of real individuals-'men'; 'species'-and still others relations between absolute existents or their parts-'double'; 'curved' etc. These secondary terms are mere 'names', not absolute beings. Ockham's logic is notoriously intricate, but for the purposes of this discussion it is enough to note the clear distinction between the absolute existents signified by terms of first intention, which are individual, distinct entities, and those things signified by the various other kinds of terms, which signify absolute existents only distantly, and are for Ockham mental 'names' only-including 'time.' Ockham's theory can be considered as diametrically opposed to Plato's, which places the conceptual priority of substance in the universal concept (which Plato saw as existing in the truest sense), and treats the individual as a secondary 'copy'. Against the Reality of Time For Ockham, theories like those of Duns Scotus and Aureole which treat time, and/or the instant, as if it is a kind of distinct substance, as well as Aquinas/Averroes' theory, which treats time as a kind of accident of the first motion,81 can be placed in the same class of theories about time: namely, those which propose that time, or the instant, is a 'real' individual existent, or an ens. Ockham's discussions of time fall throughout a number of his works. Those used here are primarily the Quaestiones in Libros Physicorum Aristotelis, the Tractus de Successivus, and the Philosophia Naturalis. It should be noted that there has been some doubt in the past about the authenticity of the Philosophia Naturalis, a work used extensively throughout this study. It is now, however, generally considered authentic. Herman Shapiro (in 1957), declared it \"indisputably authentic\",82 while André Goddu (1984) was more tentative, suggesting however, that the work is \"a faithful version of Ockham's opinions in natural philosophy even if it was not written by the master himself\".83 Goddu notes that the contention centres on C. K. Brampton's \"Ockham and his authorship of the Summulae in Libros Physicorum\" published in 196484-however in Goddu's opinion, 81 What Ockham calls an 'absolute accident' since the accident has true existence. 82 Shapiro, Motion, Time and Place According to William of Ockham, St. Bonaventure, Franciscan Institute, 1957, p. 3 83 Goddu, The Physics of William of Ockham, Leiden, E. J. Brill, 1984, p. 6 84 Goddu, ibid. 61 Brampton's case against the Philosophia Naturalis being Ockham's work is \"supported with such an incredible array of conjectures, that his suggestion could hardly have been taken seriously.\" Goddu also cites the Reverend Gideon Gal as considering the work authentic.85 Gordon Leff (in 1975) raised no doubts about the authenticity of the work, suggesting it was produced while Ockham was at Avignon.86 The work is included in the 1984 critical edition of Ockham's Opera Philosophica et Theologica as Ockham's own work, and is assumed in the current study to be genuine. Ockham denies that an instant is something \"distinct from all permanent things\" (distincta ab omni res permanentes) \"as the moderns say\", whether it is a single indivisible mobile moment, flowing through time, or whether it is one in a string of indivisibles (imagine a continuum of 'nows' making up time like a string of pearls). Ockham argues that if the moment were to be something distinct, then it must be either a substance or an accident. Yet a substance (for Ockham) must be either matter or form, or a composite of these, and the moment does not fit this description. If, however, it is not a substance, but an accident, then that thing of which it is an accident must itself be either a substance or an accident. But what could the subject of the instant be? The subject must itself be indivisible (since only indivisible subjects can have indivisible accidents), but the only indivisible substances are the intellective soul, or substance separated from matter (as God separates the substance from the matter of the bread in the Eucharist). Yet the subject of the instant is neither the soul, nor substance separated from matter, so the subject itself must be an accident. We are then left to find this accident's subject, \"et sic in infinitum.\"87 Just as the instant cannot be shown to have a distinct existence, says Ockham, neither can time itself. Ockham gives a number of pieces of evidence to support his case. Ockham sees the heaven88 as the only plausible subject for time. Yet, he argues, this would mean the parts of time were distributed throughout the parts of heaven, and 85 ibid., p. 6 86 Leff, William of Ockham, Manchester, Manchester University Press, 1975. 87 Ockham, Quaestiones, Q. 55, 'Utrum Instans Importet Aliquam Rem Distinctam a Rebus Permanentibus.' pp. 543-45. 88 'mobile' in the Quaestiones; 'caelum' in the Philosphia Naturalis,in Opera Philosophica et Theologica, vol. 6, edidit Stephanus Brown, St. Bonaventure, Franciscan Institute, 1984. 62 there is no great reason why one part of time should be in one part of the mobile rather than another. Also, this hypothesis results in the parts of time existing simultaneously, just as the parts of heaven through which they are distributed exist simultaneously (because a subject must have accidents which are divisible in the same manner as the subject). Nor does it make sense that all the parts of time should be in only one part of the mobile. If this were the case, two accidents of the same species would exist simultaneously in the same subject.89 The problem is reminiscent of Aristotle's assertion that: ...a partial revolution [of the heaven] is time just as much as a whole one is, but it is not just as much a revolution; for any finite portion of time is a portion of a revolution, but is not a revolution. (Phys. 218a31-218b9) Ockham also attacks Aquinas' and Averroes' notion of time, when he states that it is not even safe to suppose that it is not heaven itself, but the motion of heaven, which is the subject of time. Because the motion of heaven is an accident of the extended body of heaven, the motion of heaven is itself extended, as an accident of heaven, by mobile parts existing simultaneously, rendering the same conclusion: that time, as an attribute of motion, which is an attribute of heaven, has parts existing simultaneously, and, again, this cannot be.90 All three rejections of an attributive time reflect the fact that the parts of any possible physical subject for time exist concurrently, while time must have sequentially existing parts. Ockham also calls on Aristotle and St. Augustine in his argument that time cannot really exist at all. Ockham argues that if one part of a whole is not in existence, then it cannot be said that the whole exists. If this is true, then it is even more evident that if no part of a whole exists, most certainly that whole does not exist at all. Yet no part of time exists-because the past has ceased to exist, and the future is not yet in existence, and even a moment can only really be called the division between past and future (via St Augustine, Confessions, XI, XV). Time cannot be composed of ordered 89Ockham, Quaestiones, Book IV, Chap. 2, Q. 37, 'Utrum Tempus sit Aliquid Distinctum a Rebus Permanentibus', pp. 493-495. Also, Ockham, Summula..., p 348. 90Ockham, Summula..., Book IV, Chap. 2. \"Nec valet dicere quod caelum non est subiectum temporis sed motus caeli, nam ille motus est extensus ad extensionem caeli, nam quaelibet pars caeli movetur; igitur et accidens suum sic est extensum, et ita redit idem quod prius, quod tempus est extensum secundum partes simul existentes, et ita tempus esset longum, latum et profundum,\" p348. 63 parts, because that which does not exist cannot have ordered parts; nor can it be continued by successive instants, because past and future instants do not exist, and what does not exist cannot be continued to make something which does exist.91 The argument alludes to Aristotle's assertion that \"that which is composed of nonexistents cannot partake of substance (ουσιας)\" (Phys. IV, X, 218a2-3). Thus, concludes Ockham, time cannot truly exist. Time Qua A Concept We have seen above that Ockham finds fault with pretty much every realist ontology of time proposed by his predecessors. All his denials are based on demonstrations that the range of accounts proposed are subject to sever logical incapacities. So, what is Ockham's answer? He seems rather smug as he wields his famous razor: ...all that which can be preserved [salvari] through such manner of things [i.e. these unfortunate logical impasses], can be understood through this: that the heaven, according to its parts, is in such a place. For if the primum mobile is continuously moved locally, without any acquisition of other things, all things are understood, just as [well as] through that thing...92 While superficially reminiscent of Averroes' account of time, Ockham's theory is very different. For Ockham, time is not the movement of the heaven itself, but our consideration of that movement. He subtly shifts the grounds of explanation away from the ontological and toward the epistemic. Time is just a 'mind-tool,' which helps us to measure motion. If time is to be considered a kind of mental tool, and a tool is only a tool in so far as it has a use, it is best to begin with an understanding of what Ockham sees as the principal uses of time: [The first use for time] is that time is the measure of motions whose quantity is unknown to us, it is through time that we ascertain for how long something is moved, and that one mobile is moved longer than another, for we say that that thing is moved 91Ockham, Quaestiones. \"...si una pars totius non est, totum non est; igitur multo magis si nulla pars totius est, totum non est. Sed nulla pars temporis est, ut patet inductive; igitur etc.\" p 494. Ockham draws here from the Physics, 217b 33-218a 8, as well as St. Augustine's Confessions, Book 11, Chapter XV. 92Ockham, .Summula..., Book IV, Chap. 1, \"...quia omnia quae possunt salvari per talem rem, possunt salvari per hoc quod caelum secundum suas partes est in tali situ. Si enim primu mobile continue movetur localiter absque omni acquisitione alterius rei, omnia salvantur, sicut per illam rem...,\" p. 347. My translation. 64 longer, which is moved in a greater time. Another is that just as motion is measured by time, so too is time a measure of all changeable things,93 for we ascertain through time that one thing, in maintaining its state, lasts, or endures, longer than another. Another is that just as motion is measured through time, as are changeable things, so also time is the measure of rest, since it is through time that we ascertain which things rest longer, which less, and which equally with others. And those are the principal, or chief reasons, on account of which time is proposed, and because of which an understanding of time is necessary to us.94 Ockham extends this theme in the Natural Philosophy in his Tractus de Successivis: [The definition of time] is only a definition that expresses the sense of the word, as the definition one can give to verbs, conjunctions, adverbs, etc. That is so because time cannot receive any other definition. In fact, as we have stated several times, the word time does not signify something single, distinct in its totality from all permanent things, whose nature or being can be expressed by means of definition. But we must imagine that this word signifies the first continual and uniform movement, and that it also signifies at the same time, the soul that conceives the before and after and what is in between the two in this movement. That is to say that this word designates something moving in a continuous and uniform fashion with great speed, and about which the soul says that such a part was first in such a situation and then in such and such other situations. All this is expressed by the word time; some of this is expressed directly and some indirectly- some of it is signified by a verb and some is signified in some way by an adverb.95 So for Ockham, time is both an action (measuring), and the thing by which the action is achieved (the thing used as measure); we posit time simply because we have need 93\"temporalium\". Probably meaning 'wordly thing', ie. 'subject to change', the conceptual opposite of an eternal thing, which is changeless in the Platonic sense. From temporalis, used in the 11th and 12th centuries to signify things which are not eternal. 94Ockham, Summula..., Book IV, Chap. 1. \"...unum est quod tempus est mensura motuum quorum quantitas est nobis ignota, hoc est per tempus certificamur quamdiu aliquid movetur, et quod unum mobile diutius movetur quam aliud: illud enim dicimus diutius moveri, quod in maiori tempore movetur. Aliud est, quod sicut per tempus mensuratur motus ita tempus est mensura omnium rerum temporalium, per tempus enim certificamur quod una res permanens diutius permanet sive durat quam alia. Aliud est quod sicut per tempus mensuratur motus et res temporalis, ita etiam tempus est mensura quietis, quia per tempus certificamur quae res diutius quiescit et quae minus et quae aequaliter quiescit cum alia. Et ista sunt principalia, vel praecipua, propter quae ponitur tempus et propter quae cognitio temporis est nobis necessaria\". p. 349-50. My translation. 95Ockham, Tractus de Successivus, cap. II, fol. 139, col. b, p. 120. Passage translated into English by Duhem, Medieval Cosmology, p. 306. 65 to measure and understand motion, change, and rest. Ockham relies on a kind of conceptual positivism. From the true statement, \"something moves\", the mind can conceive of a relationship of comparison between that object and another. If the first object has a regular motion, it can be used to understand the motion of the second. Accordingly, the motion of the heaven is the primary basis for measuring such motions. It is this conceptual comparison which is 'time'. Ockham provides another reason for considering the first motion to be the primary seat of this conceptual time. In considering Aristotle's claim that time exists alike both everywhere and for all things (Phys. IV, 10, 218b 14), and that \"we conceive of time as immanent in everything in earth and sea and sky\" (Phys. 223a 16-17), Ockham claims that it was the Philosopher's intention simply that all things can be measured by time. This, again, supports his claim that it is the primum mobile which is most properly time-qua-measure, since: ...not all motion is time because not any motion is that, through which all things which are in the earth and sea can be measured. But the first motion is that through which all things which are themselves in the earth and sea can be measured.96 Ockham chooses the primum mobile as the appropriate motion to call time because it encompasses the whole world, therefore any movement can be measured by it. This interpretation of Aristotle again evidences Ockham's commitment to describing time in purely conceptual terms, as a human construct to be used, rather than as a distinct thing which is of itself. Whereas Aristotle said time was 'that which is counted', not 'that which counts', Ockham reverses these words in his interpretation and proposes that time is mensura only, not mensuratum. 96Ockham, Summula..., Book IV, Chap. 11. ...\"quando Philosophus dicit quod tempus est simititer ubique et apud omnes, non intendit quod tempus realiter sit apud omnes illo modo quo motus localis illius corporis est realiter ibi ubi est hoc corpus, sed intendit per istam propositionam 'tempus est ubique et apud omnes' istam 'tempus est illud per quod omnia quaecumque sunt mensurabilia quantum ad durationem motuum et quietum, possunt mensurari',... Ex quo sequitur quod non omnis motus est tempus, quia non quilibet motus est illud per quod omnia quae sunt in terra et mari possunt mensurari. Sed motus primus est illud per quod omnia quae sunt in terra et in mari possunt mesurari,\" p. 372. My translation. 66 The relationship between the measure and the act of measuring is born out in Ockham's denial that we should be tempted to consider the motion of the mobile itself as time qua a thing: In the same manner as the Commentator, I say that not all motion is time, nor even that motion is always time, because the primum mobile is not actually time, except when the parts of its motion are numbered; that is, except when the intellect comprehends that the primum mobile is first in one place, and later, in another.97 In this passage, Ockham is essentially saying that a tool is only really a tool while it is being used-the heaven is only time when it is acting as our clock. Ockham refers to Averroes, citing the Commentator as a fellow believer in the principle that time is an act of measuring accomplished through the comparison of an unknown motion with the motion of heaven, yet, as we have seen, this is a mistaken interpretation of Averroes. Ockham's definition of time is epistemic, rather than ontological. Rather than explaining why time qua a thing is constant, Ockham simply assumes that there is something constant (the motion of the primum mobile), and tells us how we can use this constant motion as a tool to describe and understand unknown motions. Ockham's discussion of why an understanding of time is necessary to us sums up his epistemological guidelines: time is for knowing \"How fast?\", \"How slow?\", \"How long?\". These questions are all answered by comparing the unknown quantity to the known, which is why Ockham describes time as a measure. A Problem For Ockham? Ockham's account of time becomes logically incoherent when he reveals some of his assumptions about time in a passage on the possibility of a change in the motion of heaven. These assumptions are at odds with his otherwise nominalistic account of 97Ockham, ibid., Book IV, Chap. 11\"Ad Commentatorem eodem modo: [the 1637 ed., Philosophia Naturalis Guillielmi Occam, facsimile of the edition of 1637, Vaduz-Liechtenstein, Gregg Press, 1963, has dico] quod non omnis motus est tepus, nec etiam semper motus est tempus, quia motus primus non est actualiter tempus nisi quando partes motus numerantur, hoc est nisi quando intellectus considerat quod mobile prius est in uno loco et posterius in alio.\" , p. 374. My translation 67 time, suggesting he actually believes time to be something 'real' and, furthermore, absolute. In the Quaestiones Ockham carefully lays out an argument showing how we use a known regular motion to measure the regularity of other motions: I say that any lesser motion, through which we are able to divine an understanding of a heavenly motion which was unknown to us, can be called time. This conclusion is made evident through many experiences: by the known motion of a clock we measure [both] the motion of the sun and our works, particularly when it becomes known to us that the motion [of that clock] is uniform and regular. For by making a clock we know how far the sun has passed through its circuit, even if it remains under a cloud. Furthermore, the motion of the sun measures the motion of the clock, [which is] regulated so that [while] the primum mobile passes through the diurnal motion, the clock will pass through its circular course, and in this way one measures the motion of the clock through the diurnal motion. For which reason the known motion of the clock can be used thereafter to measure other motions, for example the motion of the sun. Consequently, each of these motions can be called time in respect of the others.98 The argument is so far straightforward-once we have set our clock by the motion of the sphere, we can use it to measure other motions, even other heavenly motions. The important point here is that it is the motion of heaven which is our primary clock-the motion which, by convention, is the standard by which other measures are set. Yet elsewhere in the same text Ockham proposes a thought experiment concerning the relationship between time and the motion of the sphere, which seems to undermine the simple notion of measure laid out above. One assumption is central to this thought experiment, and that is that the motion of the primum mobile might vary. We have seen in the previous chapter that a literal reading of the story of Joshua's battle 98Ockham, Quaestione, Q. 43. \"Ad istam quaestionem ('Utrum Aliquis Motus Inferior sit Tempus') dico aliquis motus inferior, per cuius notitiam possumus devinire in cognitionem alicuius motus caelestis nobis ignoti, potest dici tempus. Haec conclusio patet per experientias mults: tum quia per motum horologii nobis notum mensuramus motum solis et operationes nostras, maxime quando innotescit nobis quod iste motus est uniformis et regularis, nam facienti horologium est notum quantum solis transivit de circulo, etiam si sol continue sit sub nube. Per motum etiam solis mensurat motum horologii et ordinat ipsum sic quod cum primum mobile complet motum diurnum, horologium comlebit circulum suum, et ita mensurat motum horologii per motum diurnum, quo motu horologii noto potest postea mensurare alios motus, puta motum diurnum et motum solis, et per consequens uterque motus potest vocari tempus respectu alterius.\" pp. 510-11. My translation. 68 requires that God has the power to stop some heavenly motions. In his thought experiment, Ockham asks what would happen if the speed of the first motion were to vary: I say that if the motion of heaven is made twice as swift, it would occur in half the time in which it now occurs, because some other lesser motion which is regular and uniform is the time and measure of the motion of heaven. And because the motion of heaven [would be] twice as swift as now, it [would] coexist with a succession twice smaller than that of the uniform and regular motion measuring the motion of heaven; and if the motion of heaven [were] now more tardy, it [would] coexist with a succession twice greater. Therefore a swifter motion of heaven would have occurred in a twice smaller time than the motion of heaven which occurs now.99 This seemingly obvious passage provides an interesting insight into the assumptions behind Ockham's understanding of time. The inferior uniform motion must be one such as the clock discussed above, since Ockham implied in that passage that we can use any motion as time, so long as it has been first checked against the known regular motion of heaven. Even the wheel of the potter, which St. Augustine discusses in reference to the battle of Joshua, might be used to measure time, as Ockham later states: ... if all the celestial bodies stood still, as it was at the time of Joshua, still some lesser motion would have been able to measure other motions, for instance the potter's wheel, and any other imagined motion. But on that supposed occasion, time was not then the same with celestial motion.100 Thus any regular motion which has been checked against the standard motion of the primum mobile can be called 'time', since any regular motion can serve as a measure of another, less known motion. Yet if it is the motion of the primum mobile which, by 99Ockham, ibid., Q. 40, 'Utrum Tempus sit Motus Secundum Rei Veritatem'. \"...Dico quod si motus caeli fiat in duplo velocior, tunc fiet in mediate temporis illius in quo modo fit, quia aliquis alius motus inferior qui est regularis et uniformis est tempus et mensura motus caeli. Et quia motus caeli in duplo velocior quam nunc sit coexsistit minori successioni in duplo quam motus regularis et uniformis mensurantis motum caeli, et motus caeli tardior nunc coexsistit maiori successioni in duplo, ideo motus caeli velocior fieret in duplo minori tempore quam motus caeli qui nunc est.\" pp. 503-4. My translation. 100Ockham, ibid., Q. 42. \"Ad argumentum principale ('Utrum Secundum Intentionem Philosophi haec sit Vera 'Motus Caeli est Tempus'') nego consequentiam quia si omnia corpora caelestia starent, sicut fuit in tempore Iosue, adhuc aliquis motus inferior posset mensurare alios motus rotae figule et aliquis motus imaginatus. Sed isto casu posito, tunc non esset tempus quod esset idem cum motu caelesti.\" p. 510. My translation. 69 convention, we call 'time' (and use as the standard against which we test other potential 'clocks'), how can we say that the motion of the primum mobile can vary? Strictly speaking, all Ockham should want to say is that the sphere can appear to be slower or faster than other known regular motions. If we are to say that there is an absolute, rather than simply comparative, change in the motion of heaven, it must be a change in respect to some absolute flux. In Ockham's case, he needs a third regular motion-a regular mutans by which real changes in the motion of the sphere, as opposed to changes in other regular earthly motions, can be differentiated. When he says, \"if the movement of the heaven were to become twice as fast, it would be accomplished in half the time it now takes it\", and \"[at the time of Joshua] time was not then the same with the celestial motion\", it seems that Ockham wants the motion of the sphere to be variable against time. The fact that Ockham says a faster motion of the sphere would be measured by some earthly motion is a moot point. The sphere would be twice as fast as an earthly motion whether or not we suppose an absolute background time. From a relativistic perspective, it would be twice as fast whether we say that 'the motion of sphere has become faster', or, 'earthly motion has become slower'. Because Ockham frequently calls a motion 'time' in the simple sense that it can be used as a measure, it is tempting to understand the words, \"half the time it now takes it\", to mean simply 'half the time measured by an earthly clock', and make of Ockham a true relativist. However, elsewhere in the Quaestiones Ockham says of the primum mobile that \"God is able to make motions swifter, and perchance of greater regularity, than the diurnal motion of heaven.\"101 So we must ask of Ockham's discussions on heavenly motion, \"More regular in comparison to what?,\" and \"Faster in comparison to what?\" 'Faster', 'slower' and 'regular' are relative values, and if the sphere is to become absolutely faster, that must be in comparison to some absolute mutans. It is certainly tempting to understand this mutans to be some kind of absolute temporal flow. 101Ockhma, ibid., Q. 45. 'Utrum Secundum Intentionem Philosophi Quilibet Percipiens Tenpus Percipiat Motum Caeli.' \"...secundum intentionem Philosophi, licet Deus posset facer motum velociorem et forte magis regularem quam sit motus diurnus caeli.\" p. 519. My translation. 70 Further, if Ockham were a true relativist, he would have no cause to speak of a variation in the speed of the sphere. Once the sphere has been chosen by convention as the prime regular motion, it makes no sense to say it varies. If the regular motion of the sphere varies in comparison to a regular motion on earth, the fact that we have decided that the sphere has priority as the regular motion which is time, means, by convention, that it is the earthly motion that will be said to have 'changed'. We would not say, \"The sphere has become twice as fast\", but, \"Earthly motion has become twice as slow\". If even our conventional regular motion can be said to vary, then there must be a third mutans implied-yet at no point does Ockham recognise this. The problem can be illustrated by comparing Ockham's words: \"God is able to make motions swifter, and perchance of greater regularity, than the diurnal motion of heaven\", with those of Newton more than 350 years later. In the Scholium to the Principia, Newton says: Absolute time, in astronomy, is distinguished from relative, by the equation or correction of the apparent time. For the natural days are truly unequal, . . . [and] astronomers correct this inequality that they may measure the celestial motions by a more accurate time. It may be, that there is no such thing as an equable motion, whereby time may be accurately measured. All motions may be accelerated or retarded, but the flowing of absolute time is not liable to any change.102 When Newton questions the regularity of the known motions, the statement makes sense, precisely because a truly 'equable' motion would be one which agreed with the perfect flow of absolute time (disregarding other ontological problems with absolute time). When Ockham makes what is essentially the same statement, that there could be a more equable motion than that of heaven, the statement makes no sense, because Ockham denies the real existence of an objective and equable mutans for comparison-he denies the existence of an absolute temporal reference frame. The differing cosmological systems of the two thinkers, and Newton's more precise understanding of the equability of the apparent heavenly motions, makes no difference to what is basically an ontological statement: that 'regular', or 'equable', when used of motion without supplying another ens with which the comparison of 102Newton, Principia, Motte Cajori translation, p. 8. My italics. 71 regularity or equability is made, must imply an assumed standard. We are left wondering just what standard Ockham could supply. Pierre Duhem notices this problem in Ockham too, and argues that it can be explained by referring to Ockham's cognitive theory of our understanding of time. As discussed previously, Averroes believed that we have an intuitive knowledge of the time generated by the motion of heaven, even if we cannot see that motion (in a blind man, for example). Averroes explained this by referring to the way in which the motion of heaven imparts motion into the whole universe. Thus we understand time because the heavenly motion is, in a sense, 'in' us. Ockham tried to reconcile Averroes' words to his own theory. Ockham suggests that, although a blind man cannot know the concept 'heaven moves', he can, once he is aware that he \"exists in an existence subject to change\", see that he must also exist in coexistence with a body moving uniformly and continuously. This understanding is \"a concept proper to the movement of heaven\", so that although the blind man cannot know time directly, he understands the first motion through a 'composite concept'.103 It is not clear, however, how a blind person should feel it to be immediately obvious that he coexists with a continuous uniform motion, simply because he exists in a changing environment. It is difficult to see how the statement, \"There is a regular uniform motion\", follows from, \"I perceive that I am in a changing environment.\" In Averroes, of course, such a statement makes much more sense. Averroes assumes that the 'feeling' of change is in us because it is ultimately caused by the regular movement or change of the first motion. Thus the 'real' time, which actually exists for Averroes, and which is an attribute of the first motion, comes into our soul because the motions of our soul are distant relatives of the motion of heaven. Ockham wants to make a similar connection, but still to say time has no 'real' existence. Duhem believed that this cognitive theory of Ockham's removes the apparent anomaly in the passages discussed above, but he is wrong. He seems to believe Ockham had a cognitive theory of time similar to Aureole's, such that we grasp absolute duration through observed motion and change, and can therefore understand 103Ockham, Quaestiones, Q. 45, 'Utrum Secundum Intentionem Philosophi Quilibet Percipiens Tempus Percipiat Motum Caeli'. pp. 517-20. 72 time in the absence of motion. Duhem calls this idea of the cognition of time, 'Ockham's absolute clock''-l' horologe absolue. However, Duhem's argument rests largely on a questionable translation of the passage in which Ockham discusses a possible change in the heavenly motion. Ockham says that (in the instance of the heavenly motion ceasing) \"some other lesser motion which is regular and uniform is the time and measure of the motion of the heavens.\" Duhem translates this passage as \"un certain mouvement d'ici-bas, qui est régulier et uniforme...,\" or, \"a regular and uniform motion here bellow . . .\",104 which he believes implies a particular motion- that in the mind. Ockham's Latin, quia aliquis motus inferior, qui est regularis et uniformis, can for the most part take this translation, but Duhem seems to disregard the import of the indefinite pronoun, aliquis, meaning 'some', 'something', or indeed 'any other', replacing it with certain-and indeed it is removed altogether in Ariew's English edition. Duhem's translation, though only a subtle variation on the Latin, has serious implications. Problematically for Duhem, Ockham does generally seem to mean that any regular (tested) motion can 'be' time, and not a 'particular' motion, or certain mouvement. Although Duhem does provide the Latin for this particular phrase (perhaps suspecting he is going to far here?), a reader without recourse to the full text of Ockham's Quaestiones in Libros Physicorum Aristotelis,105 one would be hard pressed to refute Duhem's central claim. This problem with Duhem's account is similar to the one we met with in the previous chapter. Further, Duhem's simplistic argument fails to account for two important and basic factors: 1) Ockham believed mental concepts, other than terms of first intention, do not signify real beings; and therefore, 2) time, as Ockham argues at length, has no distinct existence. Duhem's argument paints Ockham as a hypocrite, making an implicit reference to the existence of something he has explicitly denied. I think Ockham has simply found it impossible to divorce a sense of time as 'something real' from the formal demands of his nominalism. Is seems implausible that Ockham would make such long and frequent efforts to argue that time is not a res absoluta if he overtly holds a theory of absolute time. Ockham's absolute time is implicit, and in conflict with his broader theory of time, not explicit and in tandem to it. 104 Duhem, Le Système du Monde, VII, p. 381; Duhem, Medieval Cosmology, p. 311. My translation. 105 See, in particular, Quaestione 40, Quaestiones, 'Utrum Tempus sit Motus Secundum Rei Veritatem.' 73 The significance of Ockham's contribution to the development of an ontology of absolute time Ockham's significance to the history of theories of time lies both in the manner of his rejection of time as a res absoluta, as well as in his 'mistake' in speaking of real changes in the temporal flow. Ockham clarified the difficulties that a theory proposing time to have primacy of existence-to be a 'substance'-had to overcome within Scholastic metaphysics. Time is not a kind of matter, nor is it a form. It does not seem to fit into the traditional metaphysical categories at all. Nor can time be an accident. Ockham goes beyond the exegetical difficulties Duns Scotus and Averroes find with the relational theory, and points out that time, if it is an accident of heavenly motion, does not share the qualities of that motion in the way Scholastic metaphysics requires of an accident. However, Ockham's own solution to the problem, that time does not in fact have 'real' existence of any kind, again fails the 'Joshua test.' If we want to be able to say that God can effect a 'real' change in the motion of heaven, it does not do to consider that motion to be our conventional clock. The first problem is significant because it suggests that, in order to define time as a real and independent entity, a reworking of the traditional metaphysical categories will be necessary. In the 17th Century Pierre Gassendi, perhaps the most significant absolutist we study here, did just that. Gassendi accepted that time (and space) are special sorts of entities, separate from the traditional categories of being. However, before we examine Gassendi's absolute notion of time, we must turn our attention to one of the most important and intriguing thinkers in the transition from Medieval Scholastic thought to the early modern era-Francisco Suárez. His conception of time marks a crucial turning point. 74 75 4. \"A flowing and successive space\": Francisco Suárez and Imaginary Time Francisco Suárez's dualistic account of time charts a path between the medieval and the modern, placing a scholastic account of time within an absolutist framework. While insisting that the temporal nature of created being is an attribute of the being itself, he also situates such beings in an absolute temporal reference frame similar that of later thinkers. Suárez's proposal of a recognisably modern absolute temporal reference frame comprises a pivotal moment in the story of absolute time. At the close of the Scholastic period, theories of time had accumulated a number of problems. Averroes had argued that all possible physical causes for time, save the motion of heaven, were subject to logical inconsistencies. Duns Scotus and Aureole had demonstrated that Averroes' theory conflicted with biblical evidence. Ockham had argued that all these accounts conflicted with traditional metaphysics. Francisco Suárez, to whom we turn here, reworked the traditional metaphysics and proposed a new kind of time, an 'immutable flux,' which had many of the hallmarks of mature temporal absolutism of later thinkers such as Gassendi and Newton. Although Francisco Suárez (1548-1617) is not primarily recognised for his work on time, his work is, undoubtedly, of great significance to the history of the development of absolutist theories, since his discussion is one of the earliest long treatises on time (extending over sixty pages), and includes detailed arguments supporting the view that physical actions take place within an absolute temporal reference frame. Whereas some of the thinkers discussed in previous chapters (Duns Scotus, Aureole) contributed to this idea by suggesting that time exists independently of physical 76 changes, their ideas were mainly negative theses responding to perceived problems with the dominant view that time is caused by the celestial motions. Unlike Duns Scotus and Aureole, Suárez provides a positive thesis which is based on his revision of traditional, Scholastic metaphysics. He argues that the ordering of earlier and later events can only be understood by conceiving events as existing within the embrace of a \"flowing and successive space\" which he refers to as \"entirely necessary and immutable in its own flux\" (omnino necessarium et immutabile in suo fluxu)- something at least very like an absolute temporal reference frame. Yet it would be simplistic to describe Suárez only in terms of his absolutism, since for him, there is a second kind of time, a 'real' time, which is still tied to material being. He sees this kind of time as something which is ontologically tied to the most intimate existence of objects, so that for him there is no 'global time' but rather a plurality of individual continua of time-one for each distinct being. He calls this kind of time 'intrinsic time' (tempus intrinsecum). Suárez's theory of time is thus dualistic. He proposes an 'intrinsic time', linked to beings, which exists within a second order absolute temporal reference frame, or 'immutable flux'. Most of the literature referring to Suárez's rendering of time, however, fails to account for intrinsic time, and this creates a distortion in the way Suárez's description of time is perceived. Because Suárez's description of the immutable flux is so similar to many later seventeenth century accounts of absolute time, such as Newton's, his comparatively early contribution to the popularisation of absolute time is of obvious importance, yet too frequently simplistically rendered. A fairer rendering also must provide an account of the reasoning behind his proposal. Both strands of his dualistic account of time need to be taken into consideration. Here, I shall detail both pieces of Suárez's account of time, investigating its conceptual links to previous accounts of time, such as Aristotle's, Duns Scotus', Aureole's and Ockham's. Especially important here is Suárez's use of Joshua X13 to support his proposal of the immutable flux. Is he is proposing an absolute spacetime? Can he deal adequately with resting bodies in his account of time where previous thinkers had failed? These questions are central to an understanding of the historical significance of Suárez's work to the development of theories of time. 77 Suárez's Metaphysical Disputations Born in Granada in 1548, Suárez joined the Jesuit order in 1564, and went on to study philosophy, and later theology at the University of Salamanca. In 1571, while a professor of philosophy, he was ordained to the priesthood, and went on to teach at Salamanca, Segovia, Valladolid and Coimbra, and held the chair of theology at both Rome and, later, Alcala. In 1593 Philip II of Spain appointed him to the chair of theology at the University of Eurora where he published the voluminous Metaphysical Disputations106-his major work. As well as this work on metaphysics, Suárez wrote important treatises on law and theology, including a counter-reformationist attack on James I. The Metaphysical Disputations, Suárez's opus magnus, is comprised of fifty-four disputations totalling over two-thousand pages in the modern (Latin) edition-a huge work by any standard. In the work, Suárez not only gives his opinion on a vast array of metaphysical topics, but reflects on the views of practically every major philosopher before him, over seventy-seven hundred citations of two hundred and forty five authors, generally with reference to the specific primary source material. Both the breadth and depth of the topics discussed by Suárez, as well as the amazing number of other thinker's ideas referred to, lead Schopenhauer to laud his work as \"an authentic compendium of the whole scholastic wisdom\"107-and this is no exaggeration. Schopenhauer also mentions a rumour that Descartes always carried a copy of the Metaphysical Disputations when he travelled.108 The work was one of the most widely read text books of its time in both Catholic and Protestant universities, and continued in its popularity for over two-hundred years after its publication.109 It is a great shame for the non-Latin reader that it has never been fully translated into English,110 and, outside of specialist circles, has been largely forgotten as a foundation stone of early-modern learning in introductory university courses. 106For further biographical details see Jorge Gracia, \"Francisco Suárez: the Man in History,\" American Catholic Philosophical Quarterly, vol. 65 (3), 1991. 107Doyle, \"Introduction\" to Suárez, On Beings of Reason, Milwaukee, Marquette University Press, 1995, p. 14. 108For a discussion of opinions on Descartes' knowledge of Suárez's work, see Doyle, ibid., p. 14, note 80. 109Stephen H. Daniel, \"Seventeenth Century Scholastic Treatments of Time\", Journal of the History of Ideas, vol. 42, 4, 1981, p. 589. 110Disputations 5-7, 10, 11, 17-19,31 and part of 23 are available in English. See, for fuller bibliographic detail, Freddoso's bibliography to Suárez, On Efficient Causality, Yale University Press, 1994, pp. 409-11. 78 As its title suggests, the Metaphysical Disputations is a work solely focused on the nature of being. The most immediate thing the reader will notice is Suárez's approach to writing a comprehensive treatise on metaphysics. Rather than merely providing a commentary on Aristotle's Metaphysics following Aristotle's ordering, as previous writers had done, Suárez attempts a more systematic approach to the topic, an intention he states clearly in his prefatory note.111 The decision was a near first in treatments of metaphysics and created a fashion for following the Suárezian ordering.112 Suárez orders his work by beginning with a discussion of being and existence at its most general level, and those properties of being which can apply to it in any of its forms. He then moves on to consider the causes of being, and the manner of existence of God ('eternal', or 'infinite' being) and God's creations ('created', or 'finite being'). Suárez is then at liberty to divide finite being into substances, accidents and their kinds. Finally, Suárez closes with a discussion of those forms of being which appear to have no substantial existence at all, and which can only be divined by reason. These include imaginary beings, as well as the privation and negation of being, and the relationships which may hold between beings but which are solely artefacts of reason. Suárez's treatment of time, mostly to be found in the sixty or so pages of Disputation Fifty (\"Concerning the Predicate 'When' and the Duration of Things Generally\"), is highly original while still retaining strong links to earlier scholastic authors. Conversely, some passages would be quite at home in Newton's \"De Gravitatione et Equilibrium\". The extent to which Suárez's treatment of time manages to capture much of the essence of two such disparate modes of thought as scholasticism and modern philosophy is impressive. \"If one looks at Suárez carefully,\" Jorge Gracia remarks, \"it becomes evident that he is both the last major medieval theologian and 111Suárez, Disputationes Metaphysicae, (Editio Nova, Paris 1866), Hildesheim, Georg Olms Verlagsbuchhandlung, 1965, \"Ratio et discursus totius operis. Ad lectorem.\" pp. lxv-vi. 112For a listing of comments on this topic by a number of historians, as well as a discussion of possible precursors to the 'non-Aristotelian' ordering, see Doyle, ibid. p. 8, note 50. For an overview of the topic ordering of the Suárezian categories see Fredosso, p. xvi-xvii of his \"Introduction\", to Suárez, On Efficient Causality, ibid. 79 the first major modern philosopher.\"113 This remark is aimed at the Metaphysical Disputations as a whole, but I shall seek to demonstrate how well Suárez's treatment of time, in particular, also justifies this opinion. Although we are primarily concerned here with Suárez's absolute-like 'immutable flux', the problem of intrinsic time should be addressed first, for the role of the immutable flux in Suárez's account of time is to contain the intrinsic durations of bodies. Suárez's 'intrinsic time' is worth discussing not simply because it seems to be the 'kind' of time Suárez himself considers to be of primary metaphysical significance, but because the logic Suárez uses to explain intrinsic duration is transferred by him into his portrayal of the immutable flux. Most importantly, however, without a thorough discussion of intrinsic time, any discussion of the immutable flux will fail to capture completely the elegance of Suárez's detailed rendering of time. Although there are a great number of articles and volumes focusing on Suárez's general metaphysics, there are very few scholarly works addressing his account of time.114 For the most part in this study I rely on translations, sometimes rather lengthy, from the original Latin. The Connection Between Time And Being: Intrinsic Time Disputation 50, the disputation on time, is the seventh largest disputation of the fiftyfour-good evidence for the importance Suárez placed upon the complex problem of time. Throughout the disputation, Suárez is continually at pains to show that an object does not undergo temporal transition in a purely passive way-that it is not simply floating in a temporal continuum to which it holds no real ontological connection. Suárez proposes that there is an \"intrinsic time\" (tempus intrinsecum) which inheres in each individual body, and is peculiar to it, allowing the 'when-ness' 113Gracia, \"Francisco Suárez, the Man in History\", p. 262. 114 Milič Čapek in his brief but extremely useful \"The Conflict Between the Absolutist and the Relational Theory of Time Before Newton,\" discusses Suárez's importance as an early contributor to theories of absolute time and Stephen H. Daniel mentions Suárez in his \"Seventeenth Century Scholastic Treatments of Time,\" although Daniel does not fully address the import of imaginary time. Piero Ariotti discusses Suárez on time in a number of articles, but Ariotti's work is prone to many errors and misinterpretations of key writers, as I discuss below. 80 of a moment in a body's history to be actively predicated of something 'in' the body. By describing time as intrinsic to a body, Suárez avoids defining the 'when' of a body simply as a merely nominalistic description of a relationship between that body and some accepted regular motion, as Ockham does, for example. Indeed Stephen Daniel argues that Suárez's account of time is a conscious rebuttal of earlier nominalist accounts of time.115 Because, for Suárez, intrinsic time is ontologically connected to being itself, intrinsic time is divided into the same categories as being, and each kind of being has a kind of intrinsic time suited to it. Suárez describes God as an instance (the only instance) of eternal being, with an eternal intrinsic duration unique to him (aeternitas ... per essentiam est attributum solius Dei). Here, however, we are primarily interested in the duration of worldly things, or created, changeable being. For our purposes this means moving or 'successive' beings, as well as resting beings-what Suárez refers to as permanentia (Suárez also discusses the intrinsic time of angels, but that need not concern us here). An analysis of intrinsic time is perhaps simpler to understand in respect of successive beings-or what we would simply call mobile bodies. (Though it is worth noting that Suárez sees moving and resting bodies as exhibiting quite different states of being. Below, I shall primarily focus on moving bodies, and will discuss resting bodies towards the end of this chapter.) To begin his discussion of what kind of being successive time has, Suárez asks what kind of physical existence best exemplifies true succession. For him, this is the moving body. A moving body most truly undergoes a successive existence, because by its motion it is continually changing and becoming 'new': ...nothing is a successive being, which can be subjected to successive duration, except motion... And this is because nothing is of itself in a state of continued succession except insofar as it is in the act of becoming: not all at once, but acquiring its being by degrees. Therefore continuous succession, primarily and of itself, only exists in motion.116 115Daniel, ibid., p. 591, referring to Suárez, Disputation 50, XII, 13-16. 116Suárez, Disputatione Metaphysicae, 50, VIII, 4. \"...in rerum natura nullum est ens successivum, quod supponi possit ad durationem successivum, nisi motus ... Et ratio est, quia nihil est per se in 81 Suárez's conception of motion, which \"acquires its being by degrees\", has the act of successive change as its defining attribute-it can never realise its 'whole being' at once. Although this idea of an act of successive being is relatively easy to grasp, Suárez's explanation of how intrinsic duration inheres in motion is much more difficult. Because such duration is 'intrinsic' to the being, Suárez refuses to define it with respect to anything outside the existence of the motion, and only in respect of the relationship one part of such intrinsic time bears to another, and to the parts of the motion itself. Thus Suárez's description of intrinsic time can be explained in the manner of an ordered temporal continuum, which exists in concert with the ordered continuum of the motion it inheres in-\"...in motion\", says Suárez, \"there are as many parts of duration, as ... there are parts of motion.\"117 We usually think of time as something which allows us to say that something is fast or slow, or of 'a long time', or 'a short time'-a comparative relation. Intrinsic time is defined purely in terms of an ordered succession within the motion. The parts of time inhering in a motion are only considered in relation to each other-the Aristotelian 'before and after.' The intrinsic time of one motion cannot be compared with that of another.118 This becomes clearer when we consider the path of a motion in purely spatial terms. Consider the whole motion of a heavenly body's orbit simply in terms of the path it describes through space. In the kind of Ptolemaic system Suárez pursues we could consider the orbit of the sun as represented by a completed circle. This image of the sun's path is similar to the time-lapse photographs of the apparent motion of the stars which we often see. When Suárez talks about a body's 'motion' (motus) separately from its intrinsic time, he refers to something like the completed circle of stellar light in such a photograph; to mean the entire motion considered at once. Considered this way, we can see how two 'motions' of the same body will have the same intrinsic continua successione, nisi quatenus est in fieri, per quod non simul, sed paulatim aquirit suum esse; ergo continua successio primo ac per se est tantum in motu.\" My translation. 117Suárez, ibid., 50, IX, 5. \"... sunt in eo motu tot partes durationis, quot sunt partes motus...\" p. 952. My translation. 118ibid., 50, IX, 4, p. 951-2. 82 duration regardless of their relative speed. Regardless of whether a planet was moving quickly or slowly on its circular path, two orbits are, in a sense, the same. They have the same 'whole motion.' Thus, since intrinsic time is linked to this esse of such motion, both a fast and a slow orbit have the same amount of intrinsic time: ...there is no distinction in a thing between [its] duration ...and that existence of which it is the duration... For in the same motion, for example in one circulation of heaven, there is the same real duration, because it is the same real existence of such a motion...119 Intrinsic time lends the quality of succession-or successiveness-to motion, and nothing more. It exists, in a metaphysical sense, to explain the temporality and transience of non-divine being-being which has change quintessential to it; being which is not eternal. To make this difficult point clearer, we might imagine a person running. Suárez says that in the same motion there is the same amount of intrinsic duration, or as many parts of intrinsic duration as there are parts of motion. We might think of the path along a race track down which a runner runs as equivalent to that runner's 'motion' (in the Suárezian sense), and, for convenience's sake, of the runner's footfalls as the parts of time/motion. Imagine the following line is the 'motion', or path of the runner, and the asterisks the parts of time/motion, or the runner's steps: * * * * * * Whether the runner were moving quickly or slowly, the spatial dimension of his motion would be the same. Similarly, the footfalls, or parts of time, would also occur in the same places. Suárez uses intrinsic time to show how motions contain succession. Each part of the motion only exists during its allotted part of intrinsic duration. In this ordered continuum, the parts of time only bear relation to their corresponding parts of motion, and to each other. One part proceeds from the next, and no two exist simultaneously. Thus intrinsic duration is basically the ordered 119Suárez, ibid. \"...non colligitur distinctio in re inter durationem illam, ...et illud esse, cujus est duratio... Nam in eodem motu, verbi gratia, unius circulationis coeli, eadem est realis duratio, quia idem est reale esse talis motus...\" My translation. 83 continuum of the parts of a body's existence, each part of which only exists alone such that for the given moments x, y and z in the intrinsic duration of a body, then: ~(x R x) and if (x R y) then ~(y R x) and if (x R y) and (y R z) then (x R z) where R is the relation 'exists earlier than'. Thus intrinsic duration signifies only the existential succession of the parts of a motion. All that is needed for the motion to become truly four dimensional, and to have 'successive existence', is that each 'part' of the motion takes part in a continuum of actualisation, and actively exists only in unison with its corresponding 'part' of intrinsic duration, like a spark running along a fuse wire. Suárez sees his idea of intrinsic time as the act of the ordered successive existence of the parts of motion, as being in line with Aristotle's doctrine which we met with in chapter 1: Nor does this differ from the definition of time given by Aristotle, that time is the number of motion according to prior and posterior, that is, that it is the number of the parts of motion succeeding themselves according to prior and posterior. Therefore the parts of motion themselves exist, which compose time according to that manner of existence, which they have in the nature of things, which is according to the succession of prior and posterior alone...120 Suárez seems to see the main feature of motion 'acquiring its being by degrees', through the joining of the parts of motion to the parts of that motion's intrinsic duration, as lying in the act of ordering of its prior and posterior parts of being. Thus he appeals to Aristotle's terminology of time as a 'number' of motion, seemingly insofar as, in the set of numbers, each unit holds the same logical relation to the others, as do the parts of a successive intrinsic duration to one another. 'Four' comes after 'three'-it is in the definition of 'four' to come after 'three.' 120Suárez, ibid., 50, IX, 1. \"Neque ab hoc discordat definitio temporis ad Aristotele data, quod sit numerus motus secundum prius et posterius, id est, quod sit numerus partium motus sibi succedentium secundum prius et posterius; ergo ipsamet partes motus sunt, quae tempus componunt secundum illum existentiae modum, quem habent in rerum natura, qui solum est secundum successionem prioris et posterioris...\" p. 951. My translation. 84 There is an important difference, however, between Aristotle's rendering of time and Suárez's. As I discussed earlier, Aristotle saw time as ontologically dependent upon motion. For Aristotle, motion has a more basic place in the 'family tree' of being than time does. This results in the difficulty that it seems impossible to define a nontemporal 'prior and posterior' in motion, upon which time can establish its own 'before and after.' Unlike Aristotle, who derives the temporal succession from a supposed pre-temporal succession in motion, Suárez sees intrinsic time as that which allows motion to be successive, such that \"time has succession apart from movement, but not vice versa.\"121 It seems that Suárez took the idea of the relative ordering of the parts of intrinsic duration from his interpretation of Aristotle's idea of time as 'the number' of motion. However, by making time in this respect internal to a motion, as expressing the same kind of ordered continuum as the set of numbers, he yet takes a radically divergent path from Aristotle, Averroes, and the medieval scholastics discussed previously. In the Physics, Aristotle concludes (somewhat problematically) that time cannot be synonymous with motion, because \"when any particular thing changes or moves, the movement or change is in the moving or changing thing itself, or takes place only where that thing is; whereas 'the passage of time' is current everywhere alike and is in relation to everything\" (Phys. 218a 25-30). Likewise, Averroes feels: \"[It is impossible] that time is multiplied by the multiplication of sensible motions.\"122 Duns Scotus and Aureole also try to render time as a single entity, for example Aureole says: \"At the instant in which I am speaking, in this same present instant the king of the Tartars sits; therefore there is no present instant for us and another for the Tartars.\"123 Similar sentiments are apparent in Aquinas and Ockham. While Suárez takes the ideas of his medieval and ancient colleagues quite seriously, by defining intrinsic successive times as internal to each individual motion he must here take a step in a different direction. 121Suárez, 40, IX, 4. Translated in Daniel, ibid., p. 592. 122Averroes, Aristotelis Opera cum Averrois Commentariis, vol. 4, Liber Quartus, Summa Tertia \"De Tempore\", Caput 3, comm 98, 178L-M. 123Peter Aureole, Commentorium in secundum librum Sententiarum, dist. II, Quaest. I, art. 4, (p. 41), quoted in Pierre Duhem, Medieval Cosmology , p. 304. 85 Significantly, Suárez takes his lead on this problem from St. Augustine's discussion of the story of Joshua, in his Confessions. Suárez argues that each individual motion must have its own unique intrinsic time, because: ...in all continuous motion there is intrinsic and real successive duration, and consequently, if the name of time signifies this kind of duration alone, it follows that there is not one and the same time for all motion, but [that time is] multiplied according to the number and multitude of motions, and is various according to the diversity of motions. For this reason, many philosophers have said that there is not one single time, but a plurality. St. Augustine agrees with this opinion when he says: \"I have heard from a certain learned man that the sun and the moon, and the sidereal motion, are themselves the times and years. But why not rather should all bodies not be moved by time? Or if the lights of heaven stopped, and the wheel of the potter moved, is it not time?\" And further down: \"Let no one say to me, therefore, that the heavenly bodies are time, because with the wish of a certain man that the sun should stop, victorious Joshua completed his battle-the sun stopped, but time continued. Through its own space of time, which was sufficient to it, that battle was waged and ended.\" ...[E]verything, which endures in real existence, endures through a real and intrinsic duration, therefore...it endures through a real duration intrinsic to itself, and therefore these durations are multiplied according to the multitude of those things which endure in this manner.124 Unlike Duns Scotus and Aureole, who use the story of Joshua to argue that time is a unified flux unreliant upon motion, Suárez uses the same passage to argue that there is a unique time for each individual motion, and that in this sense time is multiplied by the multiplicity of motions. Both arguments spring from the same premise, that the St. Augustine/Joshua passage shows that time is not the result of a single and particular motion (that of the heaven). The conclusions drawn, however, are in each 124Suárez, ibid., 50, IIX, 6. \"...in omni motu continuo esse intrinsecam et realem durationem successivum, et consequenter, si nomine temporis sola hujusmodi duratio significetur, sequitur non esse unum et idem tempus omnium motuum, sed multiplicari juxta numeram et multitudinem motuum, et variari etiam juxta motuum diversitatem. Quo sensu dixerunt multi philosophi, tempus non esse unum tantum, sed plura. Cui sententiae consonat D. August., lib 11 Confess. c. 23, dicens: Audivi a quodam homine docto, quod solis et lunae, ac siderum motus, ipsa sint tempora et anni. Cur enim non potius omnium corporum motus sint tempora? An vero si cessarent coeli lumina, et moveretur rota figuli, non est tempus? Et infra: Nemo ergo mihi dicat coelestium corporum motus esse tempora, quia et cujusdam voto cum sol stetisset, ut victor Josue praelium perageret, sol stabat, sed tempus ibat; per suum quippe spatium temporis, quod ei sufficeret, illa pugna gesta atque finita est. ...omnis res, quae in esse reali durat, per durationem realem et intrinsecam durat; ergo quaelibet ex his rebus durat per durationem reali sibi intrinsecam; ergo multiplicantur hae durationes juxta multitudinem earum rerum, quae sic durant.\" p. 950. My translation. 86 instance very different. With intrinsic time, Suárez is able to say that there is a real ontological relationship between temporal flow, and actual existence. A separate intrinsic time inheres in the motion of each body, so that it is not merely floating passively in some temporal stream. But can Suárez escape Ockham's difficulties with the differentiation between fast and slow? Well, yes-and no. And it is this question which lies at the heart of Suárez's model of time. The answer lies here-what should we make of this?: [It] is denied that in a same or equal motion there can be more or less duration so far as the actual entity [is concerned]... [An] equal motion is able to endure more or less, but this does not result from its having more or greater parts of duration, but rather from its having those parts more or less transiently [transuentes] (so to speak) or more or less, as it were, compressed and conjoined [compressas et conjunctas], which results from the swiftness of the motion.125 (My italics.) Yet mightn't we ask, \"more or less compressed and conjoined in relation to what?\" Having just said that intrinsic duration is purely internal to the motion, and that otherwise identical fast and slow motions have the same amount of intrinsic duration, this new idea of the parts of intrinsic duration being 'compressed and conjoined' in some apparent medium sounds nonsensical. It is at this point of his discussion that Suárez brings in the notion of the 'immutable flux', or 'imaginary succession'. Extrinsic Time: 'The Immutable Flux' Having investigated Suárez's 'intrinsic time', we can now turn to the other half of his dualistic account of time, the 'imaginary succession', or 'immutable flux'.126 For Suárez, the immutable flux is the extrinsic counterpart of the internally defined time of intrinsic durations. Whereas intrinsic time predicated a 'when' of something in a 125Suárez, ibid., 50, IX, 5. \"...negatur in eodem seu aequali motu esse majorem aut minorem durationem quoad realem entitatem ejus... ...aequalem motum posse magis vel minus durare, quod tamen non provenit ex eo quod habet plures, vel majores partes durationis, sed ex eo quod illas partes habet magis aut minus transeuntes (ut ita dicam) vel magis et minus quasi compressas et conjuntas, quod provenit ex velocitate motus.\" p. 952. My translation. 126 I shall refer to this kind of time (which Suárez generally refers to as the imaginary succession, or successio imaginaria) as the 'immutable flux' for the time being, so as not to confuse the reader with the term 'imaginary' until later in this chapter when what Suárez means by the term will be more fully investigated. 87 moving body-the ordering of the existential parts of a body's motion-extrinsic time can be defined only in terms of its own continued existence, and bears only a passive relation to bodies and motions. As will become apparent, the imaginary succession is quite surprisingly similar to later accounts of absolute time familiar to us from Newton's work, for example. The most important difference is that Suárez's metaphysics limit his ability to describe this kind of time as having 'substantial' existence-a necessary element of a 'full blooded' theory of absolute time. The immutable flux can be thought of as the medium in which the intrinsic durations of bodies reside. It will be remembered that the intrinsic duration of a successive body is merely that counterpart of its motion which allows it its successive existence. Intrinsic duration does not allow us to designate one motion as 'faster' or 'slower' than another since it describes only the relationship of the parts of a particular motion to one another internally, not to the parts of another motion. In the previous section, however, I quoted Suárez as saying: [An] equal motion is able to endure more or less, but this does not result from its having more or greater parts of duration, but rather from its having those parts more or less transiently [transuentes] (so to speak) or more or less, as it were, compressed and conjoined [compressas et conjunctas], which results from the swiftness of the motion. With the immutable flux, Suárez defines the medium in which this compression and unification of the parts of an intrinsic successive duration occur. The way Suárez uses the immutable flux as the medium in which intrinsic durations reside can be illustrated by comparison with a similar issue in Ockham's work. In the previous chapter, I discussed what I called 'Ockham's mistake.' Ockham tried to show that the term 'time' does not in fact denote something which has a distinct existence, but rather that when we speak of 'time' we are merely comparing some unknown motion to a known motion, which is defined as our standard regular measure of 'time', by convention. Ockham then suggested that there can be a real, rather than a merely relative, change in the motion of the first sphere. The nub of the problem was that there can only be a real change in the rate of motion of a body that is called 'regular' by convention, if that motion changes in respect of some other conventionally defined more fixed and regular flux, or mutans. It can only be 88 assumed that Ockham had some form of absolute time in mind, even though he expressly forbade the existence of time as a real, independent entity (although, of course, Ockham's metaphysics limited his willingness to describe time as either attribute or subject).The following passage from Ockham is the one in question: I say that if the motion of heaven is made twice as swift, it would occur in half the time in which it now occurs, because some other lesser motion which is regular and uniform is the time and measure of the motion of heaven. And because the motion of heaven [would be] twice as swift as now, it [would] coexist with a succession twice smaller than that of the uniform and regular motion measuring the motion of heaven; and if the motion of heaven [were] now more tardy, it [would] coexist with a succession twice greater. Therefore a swifter motion of heaven would have occurred in a twice smaller time than the motion of heaven which occurs now.127 However, if Ockham truly thought that the motion of the sphere was the regular mutans which we use by convention to judge the speed or regularity of other motions, we should only be able to say that \"Earthly motion has grown twice slower\", not \"The heavenly motion has grown twice faster\", if the heavenly motion were seen to differ with some 'lesser' earthly motion. Suárez seems to refer directly to Ockham's 'mistake' in his discussion of the immutable flux, although he does not mention Ockham's name. The following passage provides an interesting comparison between Ockham's conundrum, and Suárez's elegant solution of it. Suárez argues that when we consider the 'motion' of the stars in isolation (remembering the time-lapse photographs of stellar motion) a circulation is a circulation: regardless of speed, the 'motion' is the same. However, in the case of a fast orbit of the primum mobile, the sphere would express that same motion in only half as many units of immutable flux: ...if the primum mobile were moved with a twice faster velocity, the unchanged circulation of the equal motion of the sun would be as it is now, for it would be passing unchanged over an equal motion through an equal space; its time, however, would not be the same as that which now is, for now it is the unchanged time of a day, then, however, it would only be half a day. Thus the same motion can exist in an infinitely 127Ockham, Quaestione, Q. 40, 'Utrum Tempus sit Motus Secundum Rei Veritatem'. pp. 503-4. See previous chapter pp. 64-5. 89 small time, just as the same motion can occur infinitely faster. And conversely, if the sun were moved more slowly, it is able, for example, to consume two unchanged days in one circulation. Then the motion would be equal to it, which then is in one day- time, however, would be twice greater. Therefore there is, in a thing, something distinct from motion, since the same motion can occur in an increased or diminished time. First it is responded that it is one thing for there to be more or less real duration in a motion, but quite another that motion itself should endure more or less in accordance with its coexistence with some extrinsic time, whether this be true time, or a concept of the imagination. ...For in the same motion, for example that of one circulation of the heaven, there is the same real duration, for it is the same real existence of such a motion, and consequently it is its same real lasting [in the intrinsic sense], although that whole duration, through a comparison to extrinsic time, or to the imaginary succession, is able to endure more or less, in consequence of that motion's faster or slower passage.128 Thus the imaginary succession is defined as the medium in which the successive instants of intrinsic duration are 'compressed and conjoined'. It is through an extrinsic coexistence with this immutable flux that one of two otherwise identical motions can be said to be 'faster' than another, even though their intrinsic times are identical. I have drawn the following chart to explain the relationship between two otherwise identical intrinsic times (say, of the motion of one revolution of the sun), and their comparative existence within the extrinsically defined immutable flux: 128Suárez, ibid., 50, IX, 3-4. \"Nam si primum mobile duplo majori velocitate moveretur, circulatio integra solis aequalis motus esset ac nunc est, nam esset integer transitus aequalis mobilis per aequale spatium; tempus autem ejus non esset idem quod nunc est; nunc enim est tempus integrae diei, tunc autem solum esset semidiei, et ita potest tempus in eodem motu in infinitum dimimui, sicut potest idem motus in infinitum velocior fieri. Et e converso, si sol tardius moveretur, posset duos, verbi gratia, integros dies in una circulatione consumere, et tunc motus esset aequalis ei, qui tunc est in uno die; tempus autem esset duplo majus; ergo est in re aliquid distinctum a motu, quandoquidem eidem motui fit additio vel diminutio temporis. Respondetur primo, aliud esse in aliquo motu esse plus vel minus durationis realis, aliud vero quod motus ipse plus vel minus duret, secundum coexistentiam ad aliud tempus extrinsecum, aut verum, aut conceptum sen imaginarium. ...Nam in eodem motu, verbi gratia, unius circulationis coeli, eadem est realis duratio, quia idem est reale esse talis motus, et consequenter eadem est realis permanentia ejus, quanquamtota illa duratio per comparationem ad extrinsecum tempus, vel ad successionem imaginarium, majis vel minus durare posset, juxta velociorem vel tardiorem transitum illius motus.\" pp. 951-2. My translation. 90 Illustration 1. Motion in the Immutable Flux In the illustration above, both X and Y have the same 'motion' (or, move through the same amount of space) and thus the same parts of intrinsic duration. However X, the slow motion, coexists with a greater part of the immutable flux. In the lines representing the coexistence with the immutable flux only (to the right), the parts of intrinsic time for Y, the fast motion, are more \"compressed and conjoined\" within the medium of the immutable flux than those of X, the slow motion. One can hardly deny the elegance of Suárez's solution to Ockham's conundrum. Not only can he define a 'when' in a moving object's history, in respect of the 'before and after' of the parts of its successive existence, as something predicated of the object's real being, but he neatly separates the comparative relations of 'fast' and 'slow' from such intrinsic durations by postulating an extrinsic medium in which intrinsic motions reside. But what is this extrinsic flux in and of itself? In order to give a clear impression of just what Suárez intends by postulating this 'immutable flux', it is worth quoting Suárez at some length, so that his argument can be illustrated without interruption. A commentary on the passage follows on the next page. Here, Suárez is discussing the problem of whether God could recreate a past time. 91 Francisco Suárez, Metaphysical Disputation 50, Section IX129 \"Whether the Time in a Thing is Distinguished From Motion\"-Extract from 'Vera Responsio' \"15. However, in order to make better sense of this problem [of how God could reproduce a past unit of time], a distinction must be made between that interval, or, if you will, the imaginary space which our intellect conceives as if necessarily flowing from eternity, and real duration of motion, which is called true and real time [i.e. 'intrinsic time']. This real duration can be considered in two ways: in one manner, absolutely and according to its own reality; and in another manner, as coexisting, and as if filling (or so I say), some part of that imaginary succession with which it is understood to coexist. For, just as we conceive some permanent space in bodies, of which some body existing in a place fills some part, so in a succession of times do we conceive some flowing and successive space, of which some part fills all real flowing motion, such that it might have been motion from eternity. [Such flux] is understood as filling all that space, and coexisting with it. Therefore, if real duration of motion is understood as coexisting with such a part of that imaginary succession, which passes by, and is thus called time past, it is impossible under this connotation, and by the apprehension of reason, that it is brought forth anew, certainly not out of its own part [of the succession], but even from a part of the other extreme. And the reason is, because that flowing imaginary space is conceived as entirely necessary and immutable in its own flux [omnino necessarium et immutabile in suo fluxu], and therefore its part, once understood as past, cannot be understood as returning. For that space, since it is conceived as entirely necessary and uncaused [non causatum], ought even to be conceived as having an intrinsic necessity in flowing, by the order of its own parts, and accordingly, once that part is past it cannot be conceived as returning again. From which if happens that a part of real [intrinsic] time, once it coexists with a past part of that imaginary succession, is unable to coexist with [that part] again. And therefore time past, under this concept of coexisting, or, if you will, of filling every part of successive imaginary space, cannot return. \"16. But in truth, the actual real [intrinsic] duration of past motion, which was likewise time past, is able to occur again, as coexisting with another part of that imaginary 129 So as not to allow footnotes to become too unwieldy, the Latin for this passage, not otherwise available in English to my knowledge, is given in the Appendix. 92 succession. And because duration is conceived by us as greater or lesser when coexisting with a greater or lesser part of that imaginary succession, even if in itself it is not more or less in truth, so it is clearly evident that it is indivisible in duration. Therefore, even if the same duration of the same motion is twice extended, whether it is conceived as extending through two parts of that imaginary succession, and so conceived as a greater duration, or as equal to two, for example, or to three days, certainly it is not really greater in itself, or distinct according to parts, but is in fact the same again. ...[A brief reference to other forms of time follows.]... And indeed, whenever we speak of time past as unrecoverable, or as being unable to return again, either we apprehend that continuous imaginary succession which is entirely necessary and immutable, or, if at the same time we conceive some real duration or circulation of the heaven, we apprehend that as existing in some particular part of that successive interval which is not able either to have been before, nor to be again. It seems St. Augustine spoke similarly in chapter 23 of Book 11 of the Confessions. For when he had related how the battle waged by Joshua existed through its own space of time which was sufficient to it, by the stopping of the motion of heaven, he concluded saying: \"I see therefore that time is something extended.\"...[Other brief references follow.]\" In this passage Suárez proposes a universal succession, uncaused and immutable, which provides the temporal 'container' for the myriad intrinsic successions of individual beings. This 'immutable flux' is truly absolute, so that a repeated intrinsic motion can only coincide with a single portion. Suárez's argument here is that while God could cause an intrinsic time to be repeated, he could only do so in a later part of the immutable flux, which, once a part of it has passed, will not and cannot recur. Is not this idea of Suárez's quite different from the partial theories of Duns Scotus and Aureole? Where these medieval thinkers made only vague suggestions about the need to describe the apparently universal succession which seems to embrace all physical actions, without reliance on those very actions as the cause of the succession, Suárez gives what can easily be called a real (metaphysical) theory of time, accounting for both the temporal succession of individual moving bodies, as well as the temporal 'container' in which the relative durations of various motions take place. The most striking element of Suárez's treatment of the immutable flux is the way in which he seems to have borrowed his description of its successive existence from his 93 description of successive intrinsic times. Just as a successive intrinsic duration allows a motion to \"acquire its existence by degrees\", so the immutable flux is \"conceived as having an intrinsic necessity in flowing, by the order of its own parts\". When Suárez speaks of the impossibility of an intrinsic duration residing more than once with any given part of the immutable flux, it seems that he intends that, 'by the order of its parts', the immutable flux has a similar kind or ordered relation of successive existence amongst its 'moments' as do successive intrinsic durations. By defining successive intrinsic duration as having a kind of existential flux purely by the relation of active existence which its parts hold to one another, Suárez constructs a way of explaining ordered existence which can be extended to his description of extrinsic time-again, like the ordered 'flow' of numbers. An obvious criticism which can be levelled at ideas such as the flow of absolute time in an empty universe is that concepts such as flow presuppose a relation between that which flows and that which it flows against. A river, for example, flows in relation to its banks. The statement, an \"intrinsic necessity in flowing, by the order of its own parts\", implies that the relation of 'flow' is more properly described by Suárez as a relationship of existing before or after in the parts of the immutable flux. No outside entity is strictly necessary as that to which the 'flow' corresponds. The flow is a result of successive existence in the parts of this extrinsic time. An important difference between intrinsic and extrinsic durations, however, is that intrinsic durations are 'elastic'-they can be 'compressed and conjoined', or, indeed, expanded, within the realm of the immutable flux. This extrinsic time, on the other hand, is \"conceived as entirely necessary and immutable in its own flux\". The distinction is important. With intrinsic times, there was no way of saying that they were 'fast', or 'slow', since fast and slow are relative terms, terms designating an external comparison between two motions. The parts of an intrinsic duration bear relation only to the other parts of that same intrinsic duration. In an important sense, the immutable flux is a 'bottom line' for successive existence. Its parts are ordered in their existence amongst themselves, and the parts of intrinsic durations reside, in their own ordered continuum, within the embrace of the immutable flux. The important metaphysical distinction is that the parts of an intrinsic duration have an active ontological relationship to the motion of which they are a kind of attribute. Their 94 relationship with the extrinsic immutable flux, however, seems only to be a passive one. An absolute space-time? Another relatively important point the reader may have noticed in the long passage cited above, is Suárez's brief mention of a spatial counterpart of imaginary time: \"just as we conceive some permanent space in bodies, of which some body existing in a place fills some part, so in a succession of times do we conceive some flowing and successive space...\" Suárez does propose a spatial counterpart to imaginary time, the spatium imaginarium, or 'imaginary space', and this concept is worth some consideration. It is important to point out, however, that this linking of the ideas of an immutable space and an immutable time probably ought not to be considered in the modern sense of a 'spacetime'. Suárez treats the ideas of 'time' and 'place' in separate disputations, rather than as interrelated entities (as Minkowski does, for example). Further, just as the imaginary succession, which I have been referring to as the immutable flux (generally imaginaria successio), is seen by Suárez as a subject to be discussed in conjunction with Quando-'Time-when', imaginary space is discussed under Ubi-'Place-where'. Again, things take up a certain 'place' within them (as intrinsic time is 'in' a body), and this place is embedded in the 'container' of 'imaginary space'. However for Suárez, space and time, even imaginary space and time, are to be discussed in relation to the things they contain, not as an independent arena which ought to be considered separately to, and before, those things (as Newton considers absolute space and time in the \"Scholium\" to the Principia). This is not a coherent, absolute 'spacetime'. Resting Bodies and the Immutable Flux In previous chapters, I argued that many philosophers, most particularly Aristotle, had difficulty explaining the temporal transition that a resting body undergoes, within their metaphysics of time. The problem is a frequent feature of explanations of time, such as Aristotle's, which explain time as an ontological effect of motion. Suárez seems to side-step this problem of Aristotle's as easily as he does Ockham's problem. As I mentioned in the introductory section, Suárez explains the intrinsic 95 duration of a body as being of the same kind as its esse. Thus successive existence (motion) has a successive intrinsic duration suited to it. Resting bodies (what Suárez refers to as permanentia), can therefore be thought of as having a non-successive intrinsic duration-they must have an unchanging duration which is suited to their unchanging existence. And this is just how Suárez describes bodies at rest. (In the following passage, remember that when Suárez refers to 'duration' simply, he means 'intrinsic duration'. 'Imaginary time' is always more specifically defined): ...for just as rest [quies] is called lasting in the same place, so the duration [of a resting body] is called lasting in the same existence. Therefore just as rest in a thing is no more than the privation of motion, so [its] duration is no more than a negation [of intrinsic duration].130 A resting body has no change in its intrinsic duration, its intrinsic duration is a 'negation'-a nothing. If we return to the chart above which showed comparisons of intrinsic time to the immutable flux, we can see how Suárez's description of intrinsic durations and their place in the immutable flux appears to work as well for resting bodies as moving ones. As well as the two moving bodies, X and Y, imagine a motionless body, Z. The motionless body would not have multiple parts of intrinsic duration, because it does not move through space, and it would not \"acquire its being by degrees\". Yet there is an important sense in which the resting body is successive. When a resting body is coinciding with t2 of the immutable flux, it is clearly 'earlier than' it is at t3. And Suárez clearly does want the resting body to be able to be described as lasting through the succession of the immutable flux: ...by reason of the power of its own actual existence [a thing] happens necessarily in its own imaginary time, or in some of it. And ... if the same unchanging existence is maintained, it is able to coexist to all of that [imaginary succession], even if it is extended in an infinite succession or is conceived as so extending.131 130Suárez, ibid., 50, II, 16. \"...nam sicut quies dicit permanentiam in eodem loco, ita duratio dicit permanentia in eodem esse; ergo sicut quies in re non addit, nisi privationem motus, ita duratio non addit, nisi negationem.\" p. 921. My translation. 131Suárez, ibid., 50, II, 20. \"...res quaelibet ex vi suae actualis existentiae, ut sic, incidit necessario in tempus ipsum imaginarium, vel in aliquid ejus, et ... si eadem existentia immutata perserveret, potest coexistere toti illi, etiamsi in infinitum successive extendatur, seu extendi concipiatur...\" p. 922. My translation. 96 Thus, there is a sense in which a resting body undergoes succession-succession cannot only be explained as an internal, intrinsic attribute of moving bodies. There can be a 'before and after' in resting bodies, and indeed even a moving body can have its successive existence described solely by reference to the immutable flux, and without regard to any 'intrinsic time'. It may seem that Suárez does not need the difficult theory of intrinsic durations at all. This is certainly a problem. Yet we must remember that Suárez postulated intrinsic time so that a body's Quando-its 'time-when'-could be described as something that was a real attribute of it. Suárez wanted to ground the successive 'coming to be' of a motion in something internal to beings. And the answer to our conundrum lies just here. The chart above represents extrinsic comparisons of motions and resting bodies with the immutable flux, and it was as an extrinsic comparison only that Suárez proposed that flux. In a metaphysical sense, a moving body is quite different from a resting one. It is undergoing an apparent change specific to it, and seems to have a different 'kind' of being. This is why only it is described as successive. The resting body, considered on its own, is not changing. Its intrinsic time can reasonably be considered as not successive. The only succession in the resting body is a comparative change of earlier and later. Thus the immutable flux is reinforced as a merely extrinsic kind of temporality. It itself signifies no change in the body, but only a changing extrinsic coexistence with the temporal flow. Only intrinsic times tell us about changes in bodies. The intrinsic succession of moving bodies, as well as the unchanging existence of the esse of resting bodies, which have a non-successive intrinsic duration, are both at home in Suárez's dualistic account of time. They can either be considered in respect of their intrinsic durations, which describe a state of change, or lack of it, which is predicable of the kind of existence the body itself has, or in respect of an extrinsic comparison with the absolute reference frame of the immutable flux, which allows us to make statements about relative order of occurrence, or respective speeds, which are both likewise extrinsic denominations. Measured Time As well as the immutable flux, which, being extrinsic to bodies, is labelled a kind of 'extrinsic time' by Suárez, there is a second, less metaphysically important, extrinsic 97 time which Suárez describes-the measured time of heavenly motion. As most thinkers of his time did, Suárez espoused a geocentric system of the world.132 While the postulation of a motionless heaven does not preclude the use of the apparent motion of heaven as a time-keeping device, a 'real' motion might seem more useful still, and Suárez often speaks of the use of the heavenly motion as a measure of time.133 Unlike Averroes and others, however, Suárez does not use this fact to support an hypothesis that the heavenly motion creates time. Thus, when Suárez speaks of extrinsic comparisons of time, which are either \"real or imaginary\", the 'real' time is the measuring of time provided by the real motion of heaven, whereas the 'imaginary' is the quasi-absolute temporal 'container' of the 'immutable flux'. The motion of heaven, however, is of no importance in Suárez's ontological description of time, and though it is spoken of as an example of an 'extrinsic' time, as the immutable flux is also, measured time should not concern us here. Beings of Reason and 'Imaginary Time''. The notion of 'imaginary time,' and 'imaginary space' require some consideration, at it is difficult to ascertain just what is meant by 'imaginary.' Milič Čapek, for example, believes that references to imaginary space and time refer to the space and time outside of the sphere of fixed stars required by some theologians to allow God to move the cosmos should he wish to do so (as was required in the Decree of 1277 for example). Čapek, however, gives no reference to works which might provide evidence for such a claim.134 Suárez's continued references to the immutable flux as 'imaginary', and as 'a concept of the imagination', may rather seem to imply that it should not be considered as a part of physical reality, but rather as a purely mental construct. This sentiment is evident in Stephen Daniel's overview of Suárez in his précis of seventeenth century scholastic treatments of time: 132 The Metaphysical Disputations was published some fifty years after Copernicus's De Revolutionibus, though some one and three decades respectively before Kepler's Astronomia Nova and Galileo's Dialogues Concerning Two Chief World Systems. (I have found no mention of Copernicus in the disputations I have researched for this study, nor has Daniel found any in the work as a whole, Daniel, ibid., p. 588.) 133See especially, Suárez, Disp 50, X, 11, p. 961. 134 Milič Čapek, \"The Conflict Between the Absolutist and the Relational Theory of Time Before Newton,\" p 607. 98 Though such a description of the imaginary succession might sound like an anticipation of the description of some concept of absolute time (in a Newtonian sense), it is primarily an imaginative construct. ...The positing of a duration in a particular timewhen reflects the existence of a successive enduring entity which does not encompass the total extent of eternity. As such, this imaginary succession can be interpreted as imaginary in itself, but real insofar as it is the relationship of successive durations seen as paralleling eternity.135 Yet Daniel believes that \"the determination of whether the imaginary succession is in any sense 'real' apart from its perception by finite minds ultimately depends on the status of the predicate [When] itself.\"136 Daniel's point is fair, as long as a reading of Suárez on time is mainly restricted to the disputation on time, which is primarily concerned with the predicate When (remember, the disputation is entitled \"Concerning the Predicate When, and the Duration of Things in General\"). Because this disputation is fundamentally an attempt to provide an explanation of what the term 'time-when' signifies, and because, for Suárez, 'time-when' is primarily predicated of something intrinsic to the object in question (hence 'intrinsic time'), any attempt to solve the question of the 'reality' of imaginary time by appeal to the predicate will necessarily lead back to the idea of time only being 'real' in its intrinsic sense. If, however, we are concerned with the status of imaginary time, it seems more reasonable to me that we should consider what Suárez himself has to say about the nature of being of imaginary time qua esse. To do this, we must instead look to Disputation 54, \"On Beings of Reason\", since it is primarily as a being of reason that Suárez sees imaginary time (hence its description as a conceptus imaginarius-an 'imaginary/mental concept'). A perusal of Disputation 54 reveals that imaginary time should not be considered as a mental construct in the sense of 'figment of the imagination', but rather that it can only be apprehended through appeal to reason because it is lacking in substantial form.137 Conversely, intrinsic time can also only be apprehended by reason, but in this case because it is so intertwined with motion that it can only be understood as a 135Daniel, Seventeenth century scholastic treatments of time, p. 595. 136Daniel, ibid. 137Suárez, On Beings of Reason (De Entibus Rationis): Disputation LIV, Milwaukee, Marquette University Press, 1995. Disp. 54, IV, 7, p. 95. Translated by John P. Doyle. 99 separate entity through reasoned analysis.138 Thus intrinsic time is not a 'being of reason', as imaginary time is, since it is ontologically 'linked' to substantial being. If we take into consideration Aristotle's opinion that: \"that which is composed of nonexistents cannot partake of substance (ουσιας)\" (Phys. IV, 218a 2-3. ),139 then we can begin to see what manner of being of reason imaginary time is. Suárez divides beings of reason into three categories: relation, which is any relation invented by the intellect but not absolute140; as well as privations and negations. These last two both represent 'negative being'. \"[P]rivation expresses a lack in a naturally apt subject, but negation expresses a lack in a subject absolutely and without qualification.\"141 Thus 'blind' in a man is a privation-it is a lack of sight in a subject with an aptitude to see. Negation is more difficult. 'Nothing', 'unicorn', and 'imaginary time' would all, for Suárez, be negations, since they all represent a non-existence with no corporeal form of being. Yet, if we think on these three terms, they each seem to be 'non-existences' in quite different ways. So, is imaginary time a negation in the way a unicorn represents a negation of being-it is a mere figment of the imagination-or is it a negation in the way we might call a void a negation-something which has no substantial existence, but can, in some sense, be said 'to be'? Suárez gives us a hint at the answer to this question when he provides an alternative way of categorising beings of reason. As I mentioned earlier, Suárez primarily divides such beings into relations, privations and negations of being. When he attempts to answer the question of why we posit beings of reason, however, he strikes at the heart of the problem of just what we intend when we mention them. He provides a division of beings of reason into three acts of the intellect: [1] First, there is the knowledge which our intellect tries to pursue concerning those negations and privations which are nothing. For since being is its adequate object, our intellect can conceive \"nothing\" only in the manner of being, and therefore when it tries to conceive negations and privations it conceives them in the manner of being. 138Suárez, Disputatione Metaphysicae, 50, IX, 1-2, p. 951. 139 Suárez investigates this idea with respect to successive existence-i.e. intrinsic time (Dips. 50, IX, 19-23, pp. 956-8), but alas not directly in respect of imaginary time. 140Suárez, On Beings of Reason, VI, 1-8, pp. 116-121. 141Suárez, ibid., III, 8, p. 89. 100 [2] ...[A] second cause [derives] from the imperfection of our intellect. For since it sometimes cannot know things as they are in themselves, the intellect conceives them by comparison with one another, and in this way forms relations of reason where there are no true relations. ...But these two [sources or occasions] are founded somehow in [extra-mental] things, or they are ordered to knowing something which can truly be said about those things. [3] However there is a third cause resulting from a certain fecundity of the intellect, which can construct figments from true beings, by uniting parts which cannot be united in reality. In this way it forms a chimera or something similar, and thus it forms those beings of reason which are called \"impossibles\" and are said by some to be \"prohibited\" beings. In these conceptions, however, the intellect is not in error, since it does not affirm those things to be in reality as it conceives them by a simple concept- in which there is no falsity.142 These distinctions show that a negation, such as 'nothingness', which must represent a negation since it lacks substantial form, can be separated from a unicorn or chimera, which has no substantial form because it is a mere 'figment' of the imagination. The first, 'nothingness', is a negation \"ordered to knowing something which can truly be said\" of it-for example, \"There is nothing in this room\". The second, quite differently, is a negation formed by the intellect where it \"does not affirm [the being] to be in reality.\" The above division of beings of reason shows that imaginary time, of possibility, might be said to have some kind of objective being, even though it has no substantial form. It may not be a purely mental construct, as Daniel would have it-indeed Niermeyer's Mediae Latinitatis Lexicon Minus suggests a reading of the medieval use of conceptus as a \"physical conception\", as well as a \"thought or idea.\" 143 The following passages from Disputation 54 provide good evidence that Suárez does indeed consider imaginary time to be a negation of the former kind: [1] [I]maginary space [is conceived] as having dimensions. But, although it is true that space of this kind, when it is so conceived, is a being of reason, it is, however, included 142Suárez, ibid., I, 8, pp. 64-65. 143Niermeyer's Mediae Latinitatis Lexicon Minus, Leiden, E.J. Brill, 1993, suggests a reading of the medieval use of conceptus as a \"physical conception\", as well as a \"thought or idea\". 101 under negation or privation taken in a broad sense. For, that space, apart from dimensions, is something negative. But, in order to explain it, we conceive it and speak of it as if it were something positive. ...This is also the case in the example of imaginary succession, which we conceive apart from real time [i.e. intrinsic time], for which the same reasoning holds as for imaginary space.144 [2] [I]maginary space, which we conceive as having dimensions, is ...a kind of negation. For no subject or real capacity is presupposed for it. ...And the same is true for imaginary succession, which is pictured outside all subjects.145 [3] ...[I]n imaginary succession [there is] a relation of prior and posterior. 146 Just as imaginary space has depth, width and breadth, so imaginary time has a quality of immutable flux. Yet apart from these merely logical or geometrical attributes, neither have tangible properties, although it seems that Suárez believes that they do 'exist'. We might consider the problem from the point of view of the way we speak of a vacuum. We might be discussing a real vacuum existing in a vacuum chamber, yet what are we really speaking of? There is nothing in the chamber. We use the term 'vacuum' to describe something that perhaps doesn't really exist, in any substantial sense. Yet it is 'really there'. In this instance we are treading on the toes of nominalism-there is a sense in which our 'vacuum' is a name only, and could be thought of as an artefact of the intellect. I think by labelling imaginary time a 'being of reason' Suárez is hinting that there is an important sense in which this is true. Yet in his talk of 'no real subject or capacity being supposed of [imaginary time]' 'apart from dimension' there is another sense in which it is \"founded somehow in [extra mental] things, or [is] ordered to knowing something which can truly be said\" about it. I believe the discussion in Disputation 54 provides sound evidence that, so far as Suárez's metaphysics allow, he really does mean that imaginary time 'exists'. Yet his metaphysics deny him the ability to claim that it is a substance, a claim we would want to be able to make about a true theory of absolute time. When we consider imaginary time, we really are merely considering a 'nothingness', a negation of being, just as we are if we speak of a 'real vacuum'. We can only really speak about 144Suárez, ibid., IV, 7, p. 95. 145ibid., V, 23, p. 114. 146ibid., VI, 3, p. 118. 102 imaginary time by using our imagination to conceptualise it, and so it is, quite literally, 'imaginary time'. The writings of the anonymous Coimbra Jesuits give further support to the probability that we should consider 'imaginary' time to be real. Speaking of their own references to imaginary time and space, they say: [These spaces] are habitually called \"imaginary,\" not because they are fictitious, or because they depend only on the idea in the mind and do not exist outside the intellect, but because we imagine them in space as having proportions corresponding to the real and positive dimensions of bodies.147 It would be good hermeneutic etiquette to deny that we could really be sure just what Suárez really intended by the term 'imaginary time', yet some sort of conjecture on the subject is quite important. Suárez's theory of time is quite impressively comprehensive, and his proposal of imaginary time significant to the later development of theories of absolute time. I believe that the evidence that he thought imaginary time in some sense 'real' is quite sound, and that Daniel is incorrect when he says it is merely an imaginative construct. As a detailed account of the logic and metaphysics underlying a non-physically-causal representation of temporal flow, Suárez's work seems quite clearly to represent an important and new voice in the history of theories of absolute time. Historical Significance Of Suárez's Account Of Time Obviously the most significant aspect of time in the Metaphysical Disputations is, for the purposes of this study, Suárez's detailed and cogent account of an uncaused, absolute, immutable temporal 'arena', or reference frame, in which all worldly actions and bodies reside. Because the Metaphysical Disputations was so widely read, to the extent of being used as a textbook in many Catholic and Protestant universities for up to two centuries after its initial publication, the disputation on time is quite evidently a 147 Brundell, Pierre Gassendi: From Aristotelianism to a New Natural Philosophy, Dordrecht, D. Reidel Publishing Company, 1987, p. 66. Brundell further notes that Gassendi makes an identical misinterpretation of St. Augustine as accepting the theory of imaginary space as the Jesuits make, further suggesting his reliance on their commentary. ibid. It is also interesting to note that by 1689 the trend of calling absolute time 'imaginary' had slipped away somewhat. In John Locke's Essay Concerning Human Understanding, published that year, Locke says: \"[Men] term what is beyond the limits of the universe, \"imaginary space;\" as if it were nothing, because there is no body existing in it. Whereas duration, antecedent to all body, and to the motions which it is measured by, they never term \"imaginary...\" Locke, Essay, Book II, Chap. XV. 103 very important factor in the subsequent popularisation of absolute models of time both in England and on the Continent. While Suárez himself seems most concerned with providing a non-nominalistic account of the 'when-ness' inhering in all being, through his proposal of an intrinsic form of duration, the other half of his dualistic account of time, the imaginary succession, provides a significantly more articulate and logically insightful positive depiction of an uncaused temporal succession than the earlier negative proposals of medieval scholastic writers such as Duns Scotus and Aureole. However, besides this important contribution to the evolution of time theory, a number of other factors bear mention. Ties to Medieval Scholasticism Gracia's remark that Suárez is \"both the last major medieval theologian and the first modern philosopher\" is well supported by the disputation on time. As well as providing a broad philosophical base for later seventeenth century accounts of an absolute temporal succession, Suárez's account of time also exhibits strong links to his thirteenth and fourteenth century colleagues. A number of factors evidence Suárez's debt to some of the thinkers before him who were discussed in previous chapters of this paper. 1. Use of St. Augustine's Evidence from Joshua X13. Like the medieval Franciscan philosophers, Duns Scotus and Aureole, Suárez uses St. Augustine's reference to Joshua's battle under an un-moving heaven as the most important piece of hard evidence in support of his proposal of an extrinsic, immutable and successive temporal flux. However, whereas Duns Scotus and Aureole fail to provide a detailed logical account of this flux, preferring to simply suggest that temporality is, in effect, merely the dimension of succession, and does not have a physical cause, Suárez goes further. Duns Scotus and Aureole see the Joshua passage as evidence that temporal succession cannot be the result of the motion of heaven, and reply to the problem by removing the basis of explanation of the temporal flow away from quasi-mechanical physical explanations, such as Averroes', to simply suggesting temporal succession is sufficient to itself and does not require a worldly cause for its propagation. Suárez, conversely, draws two quite separate conclusions from the biblical evidence raised by St. Augustine. On the one hand, he concludes that the 104 evidence from Joshua shows that time cannot result from the action of the heavenly motion, but that, just as a potter's wheel could continue to turn while the heavenly motion was stalled, every motion contains its own intrinsic succession, and time is therefore multiplied according to the multiplicity of motions-a conclusion Aristotle, Averroes, Duns Scotus and Aureole took pains to avoid. Alternatively, however, Suárez argues that time can also be considered extrinsically as an immutable succession embracing all bodies and motions, and uses St. Augustine's argument about the Joshua passage as support. In his account of this extrinsic succession, the main discussion of which concludes with the Joshua passage, Suárez seems quite clearly to be drawing on the ideas of Duns Scotus and Aureole. However, because Suárez's dualistic account of time goes beyond this extrinsic succession, he refuses to describe time as succession only. In one passage, he criticises Aureole for describing time as succession simply, since God himself has an intrinsic duration, yet he is eternal (unchanging), and does not admit of successive existence.148 2. Ockham's 'Mistake'. Suárez also seems to refer to what, in the preceding chapter, I called 'Ockham's mistake', when he shows that, as well as intrinsic durations, the possibility of a change in the rate of the heavenly motion (as per the example of Joshua) also necessitates a description of an extrinsic temporal 'arena' in which such changes can take place. However, although the parallels between the respective passages in Ockham and Suárez are very close, Suárez does not, in this instance, directly mention Ockham's name. 3. The Influence of Medieval Proposals of a Quasi-Absolute Time. Suárez's strong ties to the works of Aristotle, St. Augustine, Duns Scotus, Aureole and Ockham, and his awareness of the ideas of these thinkers, is more quantitatively evidenced by the number of times he cites their ideas in the disputation on time: Aristotle: 32 148Suárez, ibid., 50, III, 2, p. 923. 105 St. Augustine: 18 Duns Scotus: 14 Ockham: 7 Aureole: 4 Of the thirty-one authors cited by Suárez in Disputation 50, Aristotle, St. Augustine, and Duns Scotus appear in the top five (along with Aquinas and Bonaventure, who are mainly discussed in relation to their work on changeless eternity and the aevum), while all five appear in the top eleven. Both such quantitative analysis, as well as textual analysis more generally, and the importance placed upon the Joshua passage as a support of the immutable 'imaginary succession', demonstrate strong links between Suárez's work and the ideas of these other thinkers. The Significance of the Uncaused Temporal Reference Frame. It seems rather obvious that Suárez's immutable flux fits into a category with Duns Scotus' and Aureole's accounts of time, but is very different to Aristotle's, or to Averroes' and Aquinas's. It seems easy to label the side of the line on which Suárez, Duns Scotus and Aureole sit as 'absolutism', and Aristotle, Averroes and Aquinas as being on the side of kinds of relational models of time. Yet they do all have one thing in common. All believed, as Aristotle puts it, that time is \"alike everywhere and for all things\" (discounting Suárez's intrinsic time for the moment). In other words, that the temporal reference frame is fixed and immutable. It is important to note this similarity, as well as the factor which differentiates these two views. The differentiating factor is simply that Suárez's immutable flux, as well as the renderings of time of Duns Scotus and Aureole, describe physically uncaused immutable temporal reference frames, whereas those of Aristotle, Averroes and Aquinas, are each, in their own ways, causal theories of time. If we consider a 'yes' answer to the hypothetical question, \"Would time continue to flow in an empty universe?\", as a criterion of an absolute theory of time, we must exclude Aristotle, Averroes and Aquinas, because the cause of time would be absent in such a universe. While Duns Scotus, Aureole and Suárez fail to pose such a question for themselves, it seems evident that their answer could well be \"Yes\". Thus Suárez's 'immutable flux' should be seen to be of historical importance, not just because of the depth and quality of 106 argument Suárez employs in proposing his immutable temporal reference frame, but because this reference frame is not caused by any physical body or motion. Most of the items of significance listed above look back to Suárez's predecessors: 1) that Suárez seems to draw inspiration for his extrinsic imaginary time from Duns Scotus and Aureole's ideas of time as an extrinsic succession; 2) that Suárez, like Duns Scotus and Aureole, sees St. Augustine's use of the Joshua story as evidence for an uncaused successive temporal 'container' for motion; and 3) that Suárez's account of an immutable extrinsic succession solves Ockham's conundrum. Yet clearly the most significant aspects of Suárez's work for this study as a whole, are the forward looking ones: the strong foundation his metaphysical account of time provides for subsequent seventeenth century accounts of absolute time. Indeed, Milič Čapek feels that, \"There is no question that Suárez's concept of \"imaginary succession\" containing concrete changes and motions differs only terminologically from that of the independent and uniformly flowing time of Newton.\"149 I think Čapek goes a little too far in this claim. Suárez's account of time is very different from Newton's. Most obviously, Suárez sees the simple term 'time' as implying the intrinsic durations of bodies-'imaginary time' is always strictly differentiated from true, intrinsic time, and is always discussed in the sense of a container which holds things, not simply and in its own right and conceptually prior to bodies, as Newton discusses times absolute time in the \"Scholium\" to the Principia. Further, one must always differentiate between the significance of an idea or theory in respect of the developments leading up to it, and its significance to the historian, who has the privilege of seeing what was to grow out of it. For Suárez, his treatment of time takes account of the ideas of his predecessors, and solves problems such as Ockham's conundrum of the possibility of a change in the rate of motion of the first sphere. It is also a radically more detailed and concentrated account of time than those provided by his forebears. To the historian, however, Suárez's treatment of extrinsic imaginary time can be seen to provide the logical and philosophical tools necessary for the further separation of time from physical bodies and motions exemplified by later seventeenth century thinkers, such as Gassendi and Newton. 149 Čapek, ibid., p. 607. 107 Suárez's account of time is quite evidently of great historical importance as a reaction to, and systematisation of, the ideas of his predecessors, resulting in a new and more exact way of speaking about time. Further, it provides a new set of tools for later thinkers to use in their own attempts to explain the problem of temporal succession. A last look at Scholastic theories of time in the secondary literature: Piero Ariotti Before moving on from the Scholastic period to consider absolute time in early modern natural philosophy, I shall pause briefly to consider the work of an historian of theories of absolute time whose proposals about the beginnings of absolute time are quite different to my own. Piero Ariotti, who wrote extensively on the genesis of absolute time in the 1970's, is still frequently cited in the literature.150 I have not referred to Ariotti's work much in the preceding chapters, which contradict his claims, as his work has a simplistic conceptual style, and relies too often on misleading evidence, including decontextualised quotations of primary sources. Ariotti's thesis is that a 'celestial reductionism of time'-the idea that time can be reduced, ontologically, to the motion of the first sphere-was present in Aristotle's work and generally accepted until Copernicus effectively immobilised the first sphere, forcing the invention of absolutism. The thesis is presented in three main papers: the 1972 \"Celestial Reductionism of Time\"; the 1973 \"Toward Absolute Time: Continental Antecedents of the Newtonian Conception of Absolute Time\", and the 1973 \"Toward Absolute Time: the Undermining and Refutation of the Aristotelian Conception of Time in the Sixteenth and Seventeenth Centuries.\" Unfortunately, recourse to the primary source materials used by Ariotti to support his claims often turns up evidence that the selections he cites have been taken out of context (sometimes to the extent that in their original context they mean precisely the opposite of what Ariotti implies) and his work must necessarily be dismissed. 150 Two recent publications citing Ariotti's views are Henryk Anzulewicz's \"Aeternitas – aevum – tempus. The Concept of Time in the System of Albert the Great,\" in the 2001 collection: Porro (ed.) The Medieval Concept of Time: The Scholastic Debate and its Reception in Early Modern Philosophy, Leiden, Brill, 2001; and T. M. Rudavsky's 2000, Time Matters: Time Creation and Cosmology in Medieval Jewish Philosophy, Albany, Suny Press, 2000. 108 It would be odd to spend time here uncovering these difficulties were it not for the frequency with which Ariotti is cited. This frequency of citation should not be surprising, for medieval temporal absolutism is an obscure area of study, and writers needing to make mention of such theories within the context of broader or different discussions must often necessarily rely on secondary studies such as Ariotti's because there is so little else. I shall only provide a selection of problems with Ariotti's work here, to show why the work of this apparently popular writer has not been made use of in this study. Ariotti seems to misunderstand a number of key ideas in medieval and early modern thought, often conflating various ideas one with another. An example is his discussion of Nicole Oresme. After demonstrating how Oresme followed the neoAristotelian theory of time as a product of the stellar motion, he goes on to suggest that Oresme also held, concurrent with the stellar theory, a belief in an absolute time. He begins in a quite straightforward manner: Oresme maintained the celestial reductionism of time of the Aristotelian tradition. Time-he agreed with most of the late scholastics-is the number or measure of the motion of the fixed stars. Oresme, however, was also of the view that duration could be regarded in three different ways. The first way is as duration of successive facts pertaining to changeable things and it is time. The second way is also as succession and pertains to things which are in motion but not undergoing changes and it is called aevum. The third type of duration is as the duration of God. As he put it: And of necessity, the third type is without beginning or end and without succession, but it is at once complete as a whole; and this is the duration of God. 151 The three-way understanding of time Ariotti sees in Oresme is common throughout scholastic thought, and has strong neo-Platonic overtones. For Plato, there are two time-like things, the unchanging eternity of perfect forms apprehended by reason, and the mutable time here on earth, in which change, generation, and corruption take place. For the scholastics, this view fit nicely with Christian tradition. The unchangeable realm of eternity seemed the perfect 'place' for God, who is himself 151 Ariotti, \"Toward Absolute Time: Continental Antecedents of the Newtonian Conception of Absolute Time\", Studi Internazionali di Filosophia, v. 5, 1973.p. 145. 109 unchanging and eternal, leaving the 'temporal world' of change and decay for us humans. All that was left was to suppose another kind of time for created but unchanging beings-angels, for example. This kind of time was sometimes called aevum and sometimes sempiternitas, and its precise nature was a matter of disagreement between scholastic philosophers.152 It is reference to these three 'times' that Ariotti has located in Oresme. The quotation from Oresme nicely explains the eternal realm, which is changeless and ageless, and exists all at once. However, Ariotti completely misses Oresme's point. Perhaps because Newton (and More and Barrow) often equate absolute time with God, Ariotti misconstrues what seems quite plain in the Oresme passage, and concludes that Oresme is talking about absolute time. Ariotti continues: The anticipation by Oresme of the Cambridge conception of absolute time is not limited to calling this type or way of viewing time the duration of God. For in spite of the Scholastic-theological vocabulary used by Oresme, it is clear that he saw this type of time in the same way as Newton saw absolute time: utterly uniform, isotropic and isomorphic as we would say: ...this is the duration of God, as the scripture states: God the exalted and sublime, that inhabits eternity. And the Scripture speaks thus of God himself: For with Him there is no shadow of mutability. God is without past or future, completely in the present: Because neither any moments of past time is lost nor any anticipation of the future. [Italics by Ariotti] It is rather bizarre that Ariotti chooses to italicise the very phrase which makes clear the difference between Oresme's eternity and Newton's absolute time: there is no shadow of mutability...[it] is without past or future. It seems pretty uncontroversial that Newton thinks of absolute time as being the regular mutans. Further, it would be plainly ridiculous to imagine that time, for Newton, has no past or future. Were time thus changeless (in Oresme's sense of having no before or after), it is unclear how any of Newton's Laws of motion could be accommodated. This confusion about the scholastic idea of eternity is present throughout Ariotti's work, and also colours his discussions of early neo-Platonic theories of time-doubly odd, since his key claim is 152 Pasquale Porro (ed.) The Medieval Concept of Time (ibid.) has a number of useful articles exploring the idea of aevum, sempiturnitas and similar kinds of duration. 110 that it was the heliocentric universe which necessitated the development of theories of absolute time. Ariotti also seems to misunderstand the difference between mere measures of time by motion, and theories of time as ontologically dependent upon motion. Worryingly, this misunderstanding, if viewed unsympathetically, could also be seen as misrepresentation of evidence. The most surprising example occurs in all three of the articles I have mentioned above. It surrounds Ariotti's claim that the celestial reductionist account of time was so compelling that even Copernicus himself believed in it. Ariotti cites an extract from Copernicus' Letter Against Werner as evidence: 153 [The celestial] view of time was retained by Copernicus in spite of his revolutionary heliocentrism. In the words of the first of modern astronomers: If one is still in doubt... he should remember that time is the number or measure of the motion of heaven... However, if one turns to the work in question it is exceptionally clear the Copernicus is merely discussing the efficacy of the apparent celestial motions for calculating the seasons (for the purposes of planting crops, etc). Rather unfortunately, Ariotti so constantly conflates talk about mere measures of time, with talk about the actual ontology of time, that he concludes that Aristotle, Ockham, and Suárez, joined Copernicus in holding a reductionistic theory of time.154 I agree with Ariotti that Averroes and Aquinas held such a view, but when one investigates Ariotti's sources for the others, it is clear that, like Copernicus, they are only agreeing that time is best measured by the motion (or apparent motion) of heaven. 153 Ariotti, \"Toward Absolute Time,\" p. 145. 154See Piero Ariotti, \"Celestial Reductionism of Time,\" Studi Internazionali di Filosophia, August 1972; and \"Toward Absolute Time: the Undermining and Refutation of the Aristotelian Conception of Time in the Sixteenth and Seventeenth Centuries,\" Studi Internazionali di Filosophia, v. 5, 1973. 111 Ariotti's conflation of the measure of a thing and the thing itself is particularly evident in his reading of Suárez on time. He takes the following passage from the disputation on time to support his views: ...there is only one time and it is given in the movement of the heavens ... for this movement is the only one in which all the required conditions for measurement are given. This is seen sufficiently in the use that we make of it, for whenever we wish to judge the duration of an action or an inferior movement, we compare it with the movement of the heaven insofar as we can know it.155 Ariotti concludes: \"Clearly, Suárez's view of time is reductionistic.\"156 It seems pretty clear, even just from this passage taken out of context, that Suárez is here only speaking of the measure of time, and if we check the context of the passage in question, this is evidently the case. The only part which sounds odd, is the first sentence, that \"there is only one time\". This doesn't sound Suárezian at all. Ariotti takes his English translation of the passage from a Spanish translation from the Latin. However, if we move straight from Latin to English, this sentence, too, falls into place: ...it is concluded that there is only one time in general, which is a suitable manner of extrinsic measure, and that is in the motion of heaven. (...concluditur unicum esse tempus in universo, quod propriam rationem extrinsicae mensurae habeat, illudque esse in motu coeli.)157 I think it is reasonably clear that Ariotti has not only taken Suárez out of context, but also chosen to ignore the great bulk of the treatise on time, and only to mention Suárez's thoughts on the measurement of time, re-inventing these as his thoughts on the ontology of time. Further, Ariotti's claim that the 'celestial reductionistic' view of time was only dislodged when it became apparent that the lack of motion of the primum mobile (via Copernicus/Galileo), and the inconstant orbits of the other heavenly bodies (via 155Francisco Suárez, Disputationes Metaphysicae, Disp. L, Sect.X, 11; Text and Spanish translation, S. Rabade Romeo, S. Caballero Sanchez and A. Puigcerver Zanon, Disputaciones Metafisicas, Madrid, 1966, vol. vii, p. 246. Quoted in Ariotti, \"Toward Absolute Time\", p. 34. 156Ariotti, ibid. 157Suárez, Disputationes Metaphysicae, 50, X, 11, p. 961. 112 Kepler), precluded the view that time was generated by heavenly motion, is further rebuffed by the fact that Suárez, Duns Scotus, and Peter Aureole, all of whom propose (to varying degrees) that time is absolute, supported a Ptolemaic theory of celestial motions. Suárez, in fact, fails even to mention Copernicus in his work at all, even though the Metaphysical disputations was published some 50 years after Copernicus' publication of De revolutionibus orbium coelestium. The conflation of the Scholastic, neo-Platonic idea of unchanging eternity with absolute time has a broad reach in the secondary literature and is not confined to Ariotti's work. Milič Čapek, for example, proposes that Bernardino Telesio held a theory of absolute time,158 but it is very difficult to decide, after studying Telesio's text, if he really believed in an independent mutans. The first book of Telesio's De rerum natura iuxta propria principia, which contains the chapter on time (\"Quid sit tempus\") was published in 1565-in the historical context, a few decades before Suárez's Metaphysical disputations. The chapter on time is extremely brief (two pages). Towards the end of the chapter, Telesio denies the Scholastic/Aristotelian theory of time, and proposes time to be independent of motion, saying: \"Time in no way depends upon motion, but, it exists by itself, as has been said, and what characteristics it has, it has [them] all from itself, and none from motion.\"159 This passage, taken alone, would seem to justify Čapek's claim that Telesio accepts the concept of absolute time. But what 'characteristics,' as Telesio puts it, does this timeindependent-of-motion have? Telesio says it is a delay (mora), a duration (duratio) or an interval or space (spatium160). This duration does not seem to have a successive quality, but rather time seems 'more or less' to us when bodies move fast or slow. The discussion is brief, and Telesio seems not interested in putting forward his own view of time as much as criticizing Aristotle's. In her overview of Renaissance critiques of Aristotle's theory of time (by which she means what I here call the celestial/Averroean model), Sarah Hutton interprets Telesio's time as \"denuded of all 158 Čapek, ibid., p. 606. 159 Bernardino Telesio, De rerum natura iuxta propria principia, Naples edition of 1586. Book I, Chap. 29, \"Quid sit tempus.\" \"Nihil enim a motu cum pendeat tempus, sed per se (ut dictum est) existat, quas habet conditiones, a se ipso habet omnes, a motu nullam prorsus.\" 160 Čapek, ibid., p. 606, has \"extensio.\" This is probably a typographic error as he also uses the 1586 Naples edition, which has \"spatium\". Both plausibly translate to 'interval,' however-the translation Čapek uses. 113 succession and unencumbered by the movements of physical objects.\"161 Such a time has more in common with changeless eternity than with flowing absolute time. Ariotti's conflation of absolute time and extra-mundane non-successive eternity shows a negligence in his treatment of the primary materials, as does Čapek's, to a lesser extent. Further, Ariotti's thesis does not survive a careful analysis of his sources, nor does it account for pre-Copernican, and non-Copernican proposals of absolute time-and it simply cannot. We now leave the scholastic philosophy behind and turn to early modern theories of absolute time in the work of some key neo-Epicurean atomists-thinkers who do indeed place God's locus in absolute time (and space), but by denying that eternity is an extramundane and changeless place, and insisting it is worldly absolute time (and space) itself. 161 Sarah Hutton, \"Some Renaissance critiques of Aristotle's Theory of time,\" Annals of Science, 34, 1977, p 353. 114 115 5. \"If God reduced the whole universe to nothing, time would still flow\": Gassendi and 17th Century Epicureanism Pierre Gassendi is well known for self-consciously introducing neoEpicureanism into 17th Century natural philosophy. In doing so, he made a key revision of Epicurus' atomism: implanting absolute time into the Epicurean dualism of bodies and void. Gassendi also denied the Scholastic notion that God exists in changeless extramundane space, and made the radical proposal that eternity is successive, and that the locus of God is the temporal world, where he is immanent in absolute time and space. In this chapter, I examine the development of Gassendi's atomistic cosmology and its differences and similarities to ancient atomism, focusing in particular on Gassendi's novel addition of absolute time to the Greek notion of an absolute space, as well as the transition of these ideas of Gassendi's to English philosophy via the work of his English apologist, Walter Charleton. Here I also introduce Gassendi's equation of God's eternity with absolute time, an idea which is examined in greater detail in the next chapter, especially insofar as it was accepted in and adapted to the English atomistic philosophy. In this chapter, however, my key focus is on Gassendi's ideas about time and eternity, rather than their later influences. The atomism of the 17th Century began as a revival and revision of the much earlier atomism of Lucretius, Democritus, and Epicurus. While the Greek atomists were agreed that space has independent or absolute existence, absolute time was absent from their philosophy. Epicurus' (341-270 BC) work is best known to us through the obscure biographer and compiler, Diogenes Laertius, whose Lives and Opinions of the 116 Eminent Philosophers (circa 3rd century AD162) contains what are judged to be copied extracts of Epicurus' work. Epicurus' ideas about time are preserved in Laertius' transcription of Epicurus' \"Letter to Herodotus,\" in Book X of his Lives, where Epicurus calls time a kind of accident. After discussing the nature of the soul, which Epicurus deduces must be material and composed of atoms (since for him the only primary substances are atoms and void), he turns to the nature of accidents. For Epicurus, accidents are those attributes of the primary material substance (atoms) which give it form, and differentiate one entity from another. For example, an Epicurean might say that while both fire and ice are composed of atoms, fire has the attributes of heat and being rarefied, while ice has the attributes of coldness and solidity. For Epicurus, it is \"inconceivable\" that an accident could have an existence independent of its subject (Laert. X 71). This is a view with which we might still be sympathetic today, perhaps denying that 'redness,' for example, can exist independently from 'the red thing' (as opposed to Ockham, for example, for whom redness has substantial being, as we saw in Chapter 3). Epicurus similarly considers time to be a kind of accident. For him, though, it is a little different from the other kinds of accidents which inhere in individual entities. Time, he argues, subsists in everything which moves and changes, or is at rest: We must not investigate time as we do the other accidents which we investigate in a subject, namely by referring them to the preconceptions envisaged in our minds163... We must chiefly reflect upon that to which we attach this peculiar character of time, and by which we measure it. ...we have only to reflect that we attach the attribute of time to days and nights and their parts, to feelings of pleasure and pain and to neutral states,164 to states of movement and states of rest, conceiving a peculiar accident of these to be this very characteristic which we express by the word time.165 This passage is perhaps made clearer by reference to Lucretius on time. Lucretius saw himself not as an innovator, but as a faithful disciple of Epicurus, saying: \"...you 162 The approximate date of the composition given by R. D. Hicks, \"Introduction\" to Diogenes Laertius, Lives and Opinions of the Eminent Philosophers, Loeb, 1925, p. xii. 163 Epicurus seems here to propose a nominalistic approach to understanding accidents, which have no 'real' existence in themselves. 164 He argues that pleasure and pain are themselves the result of the motions of the atoms of the soul. 165 Laertius, Lives, X, 72-3. 117 I follow, O glory of the Grecian race, and now on the marks you have left I plant my own footsteps firm, not so much desiring to be your rival, as for love, because I yearn to copy you...\"166 Following Epicurus, Lucretius says of time: ...besides void and bodies no third nature can be left self-existing in the sum of things... Time also exists not of itself, but from things themselves is derived the sense of what has been done in the past, then what thing is present with us, further what is to follow after. Nor may we admit that anyone has a sense of time by itself separated from the movement of things and their quiet calm. 167 It is deemed likely that both Epicurus and Lucretius borrowed this description of time from Democritus, the father of atomism. None of Democritus works survive, and it is mainly through the works of later philosophers like Epicurus and Lucretius that we can get a sense of his philosophy. However, we can describe the Greek atomistic definition of time as decidedly relativistic.168 The idea of space in Greek atomism is very different, however. For early atomists, space had substantial existence, and could usefully be considered as absolute. It would be difficult to find a more succinct statement of this idea than that attributed by Plutarch to Democritus: \"No-thing exists just as much as thing.\"169 Aristotle gives a fuller description of Democritus's idea of bodies and void: Leucippus and his associate Democritus say that the elements are the full and the empty. They call the one being and the other not-being; being is full and solid, notbeing is empty and rare. And since the void exists no less than body, not-being, they say, exists no less than being. And these are the material causes of existing things. [My italics]170 166 Lucretius, De Rerum Natura, Latham translation, 3 3-6. 167 Lucretius, De rerum natura, I 445-6; 459-63. 168 See also Milič Čapek, ibid., who claims that \"in the ancient Greco-Roman world there was no general conflict between the absolutist and relational theory of time for one simple reason that the latter theory did not have a rival,\" p. 596. 169 Plutarch, Adv. Coloten 8, p. 110 F (DK 68 B 156), quoted in John Mansley Robinson, An Introduction to Early Greek Philosophy: the chief fragments and ancient testimony, with connecting commentary. Boston, Houghton Mifflin, 1968, p. 197. 170 Aristotle, Metaphysics, i. 4. 985b 4 (DK 67 A 6), quoted in Robinson, ibid., p. 196. 118 Lucretius, too, insists that \"all nature as it is in itself consists of two things-bodies and the vacant space through which they move in different directions.\"171 So in the early atomistic philosophy we find an absolute space, or at least a forerunner to absolute space, but, as was the norm until the middle ages, a relational theory of time. We find a very different treatment of time to that of the Greek atomists in the work of the important 17th Century neo-Epicurean atomist Pierre Gassendi: If God reduced the whole universe to nothing, we comprehend that time would still flow; we also understand that if God would wish to recreate the universe, time would flow in the interval between its destruction and recreation.172 So our question here is, how and why did absolute time enter the 17th Century neoEpicurean philosophy? Pierre Gassendi Gassendi's philosophic program began as a radical critique of Aristotelian Scholasticism: I considered that I should strive with might and main to blunt the spearhead of all this credulity [in favour of Aristotle] and try to do something at the same time to lessen the arrogant presumption of the Aristotelians themselves.173 Elsewhere, chastising the Scholastics for their concern with Aristotelian naturalism, he says that: [The Schoolmen] examine nothing in this world. When they enter into their Schools they enter into another nature which has nothing in common with this nature outside.174 Gassendi's early critiques of Scholastic Aristotelianism eventually produced a positive alternative to Scholasticism, through his development of a Christianised Epicureanism. His intellectual journey from critique of Aristotelianism to the 171 Lucretius, De rerum natura, I 419-421. 172 Gassendi, Syntagma Philosophicum, Opera Omnia I, p. 222. Translation by Milič Čapek in \"The Conflict Between the Absolutist and the Relational Theory of Time Before Newton,\" p. 600. Note that Čapek mis-cites this passage as occurring on p. 322 of v. I of the Opera Omnia. 173 Gassendi, Opera Omnia III, 100. Translation Brundell, Pierre Gassendi, p. 19. 174 Gassendi, ibid., p. 16. 119 provision of a revised Epicureanism is aptly and simply illustrated by observing that Gassendi's first major work, published in 1624, was the Exercitationes paradoxicae adversus Aristoteleos, a work following Sextus Empiricus' critique of Aristotelian and Scholastic philosophy; while his final, posthumous work, was the Syntagma philosophicum, a holistic physics and ethics based heavily on that of Epicurus and the Stoics. No doubt aware of the problems inherent in introducing what was rightly notorious as a pagan philosophy, Gassendi argued that the Epicurean philosophy should be seen as no more antithetical to Christian belief than that of Aristotle, who had himself been seen as unorthodox by early medievals: The early Church Fathers were particularly opposed to Aristotle and his philosophy, and they displayed extreme animosity against the followers of Aristotle. But when some philosophers were converted to the faith they began to set aside the more serious errors of Aristotle. ...Therefore, I say, just as it was possible in the case of Aristotelian philosophy, which is now taught publicly, so it is possible with other philosophies such as the Stoic and Epicurean. ...This is the task that I am attempting...175 Gassendi consistently claimed that he held the sanctity of Church doctrine above his pagan mentor: Whenever I come upon not only those more serious subjects of disagreement between Epicureanism and the Faith, but even things that might seem in only a minimal way out of harmony with Christian Doctrine, it is my intention to oppose Epicurus to the utmost of my ability and to uproot his doctrine with all the power of reason that I can muster.176 While the extent of the hostility by the Church to the new sciences may have been overstated by some 19th and early 20th century historians, it is unsurprising that Gassendi would have been keen to distance himself from some of the more extreme pagan or atheistic claims of Epicurus and Lucretius. For example, De rerum natura was widely available in the 17th century, and one can well imagine how the following extract from Lucretius would have been viewed by many: 175Gassendi, ibid, p. 52. 176 Gassendi, Opera Omnia, vol. V, ibid, p. 54. 120 Poor humanity, to saddle the gods with such responsibilities and throw in a vindictive temper! What griefs they hatched then for themselves, what festering sores for us, what tears for our posterity! This is not piety, this oft-repeated show of bowing a veiled head before a stone; this bustling to every altar; this kow-towing and prostration on the ground with palms outspread before the shrines of the gods; this deluging of altars with the blood of beasts; this heaping of vow on vow. True piety lies rather in the power to contemplate the universe with a quiet mind.177 Gassendi's Christianised Epicureanism avoided pagan ideas and ideals such as these. An example of Gassendi's attempt to Christianise Epicureanism was his unwillingness to subscribe to the atheistic belief of the ancient atomists that the world is formed through mere chance. The Greek atomists insisted that chance alone was responsible for the all actions in the world-and for them this included not just the motions and shapes of things, but the existence of the soul, which was thought to be material and, worse, mortal.178 Lucretius felt that it should be no surprise that chance forms all the variety of the universe: So many atoms, clashing together in so many ways as they are swept along through infinite time by their own weight, have come together in every possible way and realised everything that could be formed by their combinations. No wonder, then, if they have actually fallen into those groupings and movements by which the present world through all its changes is kept in being.179 Importantly, the same variety which is so totally unsurprising for Lucretius, is for Gassendi evidence in favour of God's existence and active providence. After considering the variety and utility of nature, he exclaims, \"Oh how weak to be, or how dull an understanding to have, if while such a thing is before one [i.e. the varied world], still chance alone is praised!\"180 Such motivations seem to have encouraged Gassendi's radical revision of Epicureanism which saw him implant God as an active 177 Lucretius, ibid, V, 1193-1203. 178 For Epicurus on the nature of the soul, see Laertius, X 71, ibid. Also Book III of Lucretius' De rerum natura. 179 Lucretius, V, 186-196. 180Gassendi, Styntagma philosophicum (pars secunda, quae est Physica), Sectio Prima, Liber II, De Loco & Tempore, seu spatio, & duratione Rerum. Opera omnia, I. Faksimile-Neudruck der Ausgabe von Lyon 1658, Stuttgart-Bad Cannstatt, F. Frommann, 1964. \"O quam oportet hebetem esse, aut quam reclamantem habere conscientiam, si dum ad ista attenditur, sola interim fortuna laudatur!\" p. 315. My translation. 121 agent into the very fabric of the temporal world. We can see this in Gassendi's discussion of the actions of atoms as directed by God. For Gassendi, the motions of atoms are far from random: ...atoms are the primary form of matter, which God created infinite from the beginning, which he formed into this visible world, which, finally, he ordained and permitted to undergo transformations out of which, in short, all the bodies which exist in the universe are composed. ...[Atoms have] the power of moving and acting which God instilled in them at their very creation, and which functions with his assent, for he compels all things just as he conserves all things.181 Again, rejecting chance as the cause of the motions of atoms, Gassendi could sidestep the inherent paganism of the ancient atomists. 182Elsewhere, rejecting chance as the cause of the world's variety, he exclaims: \"Truly from an agent most wise, most powerful and most free, such as God surely must be, nothing [else] need be required.\"183 While God's active participation in nature was not an unusual assumption amongst thinkers of Gassendi's era, Gassendi, as I show below, took a new turn by making God immanent in the world, and in infinite space and everlasting time. In the Syntagma, Gassendi lays out his argument against the Aristotelian notion of time as causally or ontologically prior to motion, saying: It seems that Aristotle ...correctly guessed the true nature of time, but he missed it when he defined time as the number of motion. For if time is a kind of flow, ...it is independent of motion no less than of rest. ...Also it is false to say that time is the measure of the celestial motion; but rather the celestial motion itself is the measure of time for the reason that the measure ought to be better known than the measured.184 181 Gassendi, Syntagma philosophicum, Physics, Sect 1, Bk. 3; translated by Craig B. Brush in The selected works of Pierre Gassendi, p. 399. 182 Lisa Sarasohn, \"Motion and Morality: Pierre Gassendi, Thomas Hobbes and the Mechanical WorldView,\" Journal of the History of Ideas, Vol. 46, No. 3., Jul. Sept., 1985, pp. 336-7. 183Gassendi, Syntagma philosophicum, Opera omnia, p. 317. \"Verum ab Agente sapientissimo, potentissimo, ac liberrimo, qualem Deum esse par est, nihil tale est requirendum.\" My translation. 184 Gassendi, Syntagma philosophicum, Physicae Sectio I, Liber II; translated by Milič Čapek and Walter Emge, in Čapek (ed.) The concepts of space and time, Boston, Reidel, c1976, p. 198. 122 For Gassendi, Aristotle was correct to associate time with motion, but he had things the wrong way around-time is prior to motion and thus can be measured by motion; it is not the case that motion is causally prior to time. Significantly, in proposing absolute time, Gassendi abandons the traditional categories, going farther than Suárez, and speculating that time (and space) have a unique kind of being deserving a separate place in the categorisation of being: ..the common opinion holds place and time to be corporeal accidents, and consequently that if there were no bodies upon which they depended there would be neither place nor time. ...[However,] place and time do not depend upon bodies and are not corporeal accidents... [since] even if there were no bodies there would still remain both an unchanging place and an evolving time. [All being] is either substance or accident, or place, in which all substances or accidents exist, or time, in which all substances and all accidents endure.185 He introduces his definition of what time is by saying that time has a separate kind of being to other things, and noting how close many of the ancients came to recognising this: That there is a certain affinity [between time and space] was recognised by Aristotle when he explained in the same book together place, void and time; but even much more by Plato [who] distinguished place and time as two different genera from all other things. Thus he, after dividing the properly existing things into five genera, added the sixth genus, in the sense of the passage following Seneca...: \"There is the sixth genus of the things existing in a certain fashion such as the void and time.\" It also seems that Chrisippus had some inkling of it when, according to Stobaeus, [he] he compared these two things... This seems to be true also of Philo...186 For Gassendi, absolute time and absolute space have a unique kind of being and are dissimilar to other worldly things-if anything, Gassendi believed, that which they are most similar in nature to is God, as I shall show below. 185Gassendi, Syntagma philosophicum, Sec. 1, Bk. 2, Chap. 1, translated by Craig B. Brush ibid., p. 384. See also Edward Grant, Much ado about nothing: Theories of Space and Vacuum from the Middle Ages to the Scientific Revolution, Cambridge, Cambridge University Press, 1981, p. 209-10 and see note 182, p. 392, for a detailed discussion of influences on Gassendi in his rejection of the traditional categories for space. 186Gassendi, Sytgama philosophicum, in Čapek (ed.), ibid., pp 198-9. 123 It is clear that Gassendi draws heavily on Suárez's account of time. Nearby in the text to the passage above, Gassendi criticises those who propose 'intrinsic' or 'imaginary' time, but are coy about defining it precisely. He begins his critique with a reference to intrinsic times such as Suárez's: Perhaps you will distinguish, as is customary, intrinsic time from external time; [saying that] the particular motions of inferior things have times which are intrinsic and proper to them and beyond these there is external and universal time... This passage likely to refers to the long passage from Suárez in the previous chapter, in which Suárez argues that there is an immutable flux which embraces the intrinsic time of bodies and motions. Gassendi goes on, criticising the belief that there are two kinds of time (however Gassendi reduces intrinsic time to the heavenly motion, not the motion of bodies generally). His parting shot, however, that imaginary time is the one true time, again echoes the passage from Suárez: ...those who discern and admit the so-called imaginary time... admit that time flowed even before the creation of the heavens and furthermore, they concede that the world could have been created before it was created; and that time flows when the world will cease to exist. But since they are prejudiced, they immediately retreat and claim that besides that imaginary time there is still another time which is truly real in the sense defined by Aristotle... They are prejudiced, I say; for if you look at this matter seriously, there is clearly no other time except that which is called imaginary and which is necessary and which, they admit, continued to flow alone when the heavens were standing still as long as Joshua was fighting the kings of the Armorites.187 Where Suárez, for example, is shy of calling anything but intrinsic time 'real,' Gassendi is quite sure that it is only the immutable flux of so-called imaginary time that is real. 187 Gassendi, ibid., p. 198. 124 Elsewhere in the same text he revisits the Joshua passage, this time clarifying the way we know time when our celestial clock is not moving. Here he seems to recall Duns Scotus' 'potential and privative time': No one really believes that while Joshua was fighting with the Armorites, and the heaven stood still, that no time passed and that the number of hours almost equivalent to the full day did not elapse. As the Scripture testifies: \"Never before, nor after there was such a long day.\" But this length cannot be understood in any other way than as a passage of time. Supposing now the heaven stood still (doubtless it can be stopped by God), do you not see that time would flow in the same way as when the heaven was in motion? You might ask: how could there be hours if the motion of the sun would not mark them off? They would exist, not because they were marked off by the motion of the sun, but because they could be marked off by this motion which then could exist.188 Thus Gassendi ticks off the great themes in the debate about the independent reality of time: it is connected to motion, as Aristotle says (but Aristotle is wrong to make motion ontologically prior to time); it is an immutable flux, as Suárez says (yet Suárez is wrong to propose two kinds of time); following Duns Scotus, it can be thought of as measurable, even when there is no motion existing, through it's inherent potential for measurement by coextension with motion (whether real or imagined). Elsewhere he debunks Ockham's difficulty with a change in the rate of motion of the Sun in a similar manner to Suárez, but without the confusing addition of intrinsic time to his immutable flux.189 The most radical aspect of Gassendi's absolutism, as I mentioned above, is that he describes eternity-the locus of God-as equivalent to absolute time, declaring eternity to be a successive entity permeating mundane reality. Before investigating his claims about the spatiotemporal locus of God it is worth pausing to consider the ideas which he was replacing. In previous sections of this study we have met with the scholastic understanding of eternity only tangentially. The extremity of Gassendi's departure from previous thinking on the place of God is well illustrated through a comparison with the ideas of Nicole Oresme, which are arguably representative of the 188 ibid. p. 201. It is worth noting here that Gassendi subscribed to the Copernican model of the world and was an apologist for Galileo. His reference to the motion of the sun is presumably one made in principle about motions which may be thought by some to cause time. 189 ibid., p. 200. 125 majority opinion of the Scholastics. In the following passages from Livre du ciel et du monde (1377) Oresme paints a typical picture of a neo-Platonic heavenly eternity as the locus of God, which is changeless and exists outside of the celestial spheres: There can be no motion without a natural body, and we have already shown that there is and can be absolutely no body and, therefore, no place, no void, and no time outside the heavens. For this reason, the things outside the heavens are not capable of being in a place and time does not age them... In saying \"the things that are outside the heavens,\" Aristotle refers to the intelligences and principally to the first of these, that is to say, to God. This corresponds to the scriptural passage: For with him there is no change.190 For Oresme, eternity is a changeless state, inhabited only by the perfect-by God- which is also changeless. Because Oresme believed, like most Scholastic philosophers, that time results from the motion of bodies, for him it is impossible for change or decay to exist in God's kingdom. Oresme's rendering of time harmonises with his portrait of the eternal realm. In a longer passage, we see how Oresme divides time into three types: changeless eternity, the temporal world of generation and corruption, and a Scholastic addition to the two Platonic worlds, the 'aevum,' or the time of those things which are created but changeless (such as angels and souls): Generally speaking, with regard to the duration of things, one kind of duration is successive or one part after another, concerning things which are actually in the process of change, and this kind of duration is called time. Another type of duration is successive with respect to things capable of motion which are not actually undergoing change, for example, certain incorporeal creatures [such as the soul]. This kind of duration has no special name, but in Latin may be called aevum. The third type of duration is not successive, but refers to the continuity of everything together and of things which cannot be altered; it is called eternity.191 190 Oresme, Le Livre di ciel et du monde, Book I, Chapter 24, 8-18; Trans. Albert D. Menut, p.163. 191Oresme, ibid, I, 24, 29-40; p. 163. See also the my comments on Piero Ariotti in the previous chapter of this thesis. Ariotti misinterprets Oresme's eternity as absolute time itself. 126 Thus for Oresme duration forms a kind of trinity of the material, the spiritual and the divine, and God acts in our world transcendently rather than immanently. Gassendi's view of time and God could not be more different from Oresme's. He paints space and time themselves-the very fabric on which, for him, nature is woven-as God's immediate realm, an extremely radical departure from most previous thought: How are we properly to explain ourselves as coexisting with God, or (if you will) as lasting a very small part of the duration in which God endures? For indeed, while we exist, we do not imagine two distinct durations [i.e. the temporal and eternal, but] really only one, which with regard to our nature (which begins, and slips away, and moreover is finally ended), is bounded by designable limits; but with regard to the divine nature (which does not begin, nor is it changed, nor is it able to cease) has unlimited extension before and after us. Elsewhere he says: ...as it is proper for created things to be only somewhere with respect to place and sometimes with respect to time, so it is proper for the Creator to be everywhere with regard to place and always with regard to time; and so these distinct attributes belong to him: immensity by which he is present in every place, and eternity by which he persists through every time. 192 With these statements, Gassendi makes clear his belief that there are not two (or indeed three) temporal realities-the duration which marks out this changing world, and the changeless, extramundane eternity in which God dwells-but one: that God's eternity and our changing temporal world are one and the same. By describing God's eternity as interwoven with our natural duration, Gassendi places God in the heart of the actions which take place in the world. Of course, I do not mean to suggest by this that previous thinkers denied that God is omnipotent, but rather to highlight the way in which Gassendi paints God's very domain, his eternity, as right here with us in this 192 Gassendi, Syntagma philosophicum, Opera omnia, vol. 1. p. 227. \" Quam foret satius dicere, coexistere nos Deo, seu durare parte aliquantula durationis, qua Deus durat? Nempe, dum sumus, non duas distictas durationes imaginamur, verum unicam, quae cum respectu naturae nostrae, quae coepit, & labitur, ac desitura tandem est, designabileis terminos contineat; respectu tamen divinae naturae, quae nec coepit esse, nec mutatur, nec cessare potest, diffusionem ante, & post nos, illimitatem habeat.\" My translation. 127 world. We should also note that by bringing the locus of God into the temporal world, 'eternity' in Gassendi's idiom (and many of those after him) comes to mean something more akin to 'never-ending' and 'changeless.' If God exists in our ordinary time, as Gassendi believed, one last great shift away from the Scholastic understanding of time is implied. If God has existed eternally (for ever), so too has time, and it is not the case that it was created with the world. Gassendi argues that: We comprehend that even before there were any things time flowed; and from this we acknowledge that they could have been created by God earlier than they were created- that is, either a short time or a long time or even an eternal time earlier. Even now, while they exist, we understand that time flows in the same tenor as it flowed before; and if God reduced the whole universe to nothing, we comprehend that time would still flow; we also understand that if God would wish to recreate the universe, time would flow in the interval between its destruction and recreation.193 These passages paint a very different picture of reality to the quasi-Platonic mundane temporal world and extra-mundane changeless eternity which Scholastic thinkers saw as God's true kingdom. Where once we had two worlds, we now have but one. It seems at least highly plausible that Gassendi's theory of God's mundane existence is borrowed from Jesuit philosophy-we saw hints that eternity may be temporal in Suárez. Throughout his life, Gassendi seems to have been in intellectual contact with the Jesuits. His first teaching positions at Aix-two years as official diocesan teacher of theology and superintendent of theological education, followed by six years as Chair of Aristotelian Philosophy-were brought to an end when the local Bishop put 193 Gassendi, Syntagma Philosophicum, Opera Omnia I, p. 222. Translation by Milič Čapek in \"The Conflict Between the Absolutist and the Relational Theory of Time Before Newton,\" p. 600. Note that Čapek mis-cites this passage as occurring on p. 322 of v. I of the Opera Omnia. This passage is also fascinating in that it undermines the novelty of Leibniz's claim that Newton's absolute time is nonsensical for implying that God could have made the world earlier-a supposedly irrational state of affairs. Gassendi is quite open on this point. Indeed he says elsewhere: \"it is enough to say that God created the world at whatever moment of infinite time it pleased him; for although he would have had a reason, it would be unknowable to us.\" Syntagma, Opera Omnia, p. 317 (translated Margaret J. Osler in \"Providence and Divine Will in Gassendi's Views on Scientific Knowledge,\" Journal for the History of Ideas, vol. 44, 1983p. 553). This highlights the difference between philosophers emphasising God's omnipotence (Gassendi, Newton), and those interested in his rationality or omniscience (Leibniz). 128 the Jesuits in charge of the college (apparently belatedly implementing the directions of the council of Trent).194 Despite this, he was in correspondence later in his life with such Jesuit natural philosophers as Christopher Scheiner, Athanasius Kircher and Pierre Cazree.195 Comparing Gassendi's treatment of God's immanent presence in time and space to similar discussions by the earlier Jesuit Suárez shows up further obvious similarities in the ideas of these thinkers. Consider Suárez as he explains the difference between duration and eternity: ...to make sense (ad explicando) of the present locations, and durations of things, two infinite spaces are conceived by us: one as if continuing, and everywhere infinitely extended without end; another as if successive, which stretches forth, enduring for ever. And [we understand] both these spaces as if filled, actually and necessarily, by God. Indeed the former [is filled] with his immensity, the latter, with his divine eternity.196 Taken alone, this passage mirrors Gassendi's remarkably closely. But note the tone of caution in Suárez's treatment of eternity: For, just as we conceive some permanent space in bodies, of which some body existing in a place fills some part, so in a succession of times do we conceive some flowing and successive space, of which some part fills all real flowing motion, such that it might have been motion from eternity [quod si fuisset motus ab aeterno].197 The symmetry between Gassendi's God and Suárez's is remarkable, and at least good indirect evidence of some kind of influence. It is noticeable that in the words of Gassendi, as with Suárez, we come across the description of time (and space) as somehow imaginary. While the case for the reality of imaginary time (and space) is not completely clear-cut with Suárez, Gassendi is quite explicit, saying of 'imaginary' beings such as these: 194 Brundell, ibid., p. 1. 195 ibid. p. 17. 196 Suárez, Disputationes Metaphysicae, L, II, 18 (see previous chapter). 197 ibid. For a discussion of the common use of si fuisset as a past potential verbal form, see William Cranston Lawton, 'Fourth Class Conditions,' The Classical Review, Vol. 13, No. 2, Mar., 1899, p.104. 129 [We call them imaginary] not because they do not really exist outside the imagination, but because we imagine their spatial dimensions as being like the bodily dimensions that we are used to observing in corporeal things.198 Elsewhere he makes even clearer that imaginary space and time are real entities in the everyday sense. He describes them as: ...real things, or genuine entities, that actually exist even when no one is conscious of them, and may be distinguished from fictions, such as chimeras and the like, which have no existence except in the mind.199 Where Suárez is a little coy about the reality of time and space, Gassendi is clear. Absolute time is real, and no mere concept of the imagination. Our coexistence with God is also literal and takes place in the one, true, absolute time. This belief comes close to the heresy Bruno was so famously executed for holding, so it is useful to pause and consider theological position of Gassendi's claim. Side-stepping heresy: Pantheism and the 'whole in every part' doctrine While Gassendi believed God to be immanent in absolute space and time, he was cautious about the nature of God's being. For Gassendi, \"We perceive in God... an infinity as if of extension, which we call immensity.\" 200 God is immanent in the fabric of the world, yet we should only consider this immanence \"as if\" it were an example of physical extension. Gassendi warns: \"I say, as if of extension, lest we imagine that the divine substance were extended through space like bodies are\"201 While Gassendi radically transformed the idea of eternity from an extramundane reality to a temporal and successive one, thus moving the locus of God from beyond the world to within the world, he nevertheless retained the common understanding of God's manner of being: Gassendi held only time and space to be extended in the physical sense, saying 198 Gassendi, Opera Omnia, vol. 1. Quoted in Brundell, ibid., p. 66. 199 Gassendi, Syntagma philosophicum, The Physics, Sect. 1, translated by Craig B. Brush, ibid., pp 383-4. 200ibid., p. 384. 201 ibid. 130 of God: \"the divine substance is supremely indivisible and is whole at any time and at any place.\"202 Edward Grant, in his extensive study of the history of theories of space, gives a detailed history of this conception of God as being wholly present in every moment or position, which he calls the \"whole in every part\" doctrine. The idea that God, as spirit, and is wholly present in every moment and place was the common doctrine throughout the neo-Platonic and scholastic traditions, and was mirrored by the idea that the human soul was similarly whole in every part of the body. A very early example of the idea can be found in Plotinus, who said: \"That the Soul of every individual is one thing, we deduce from the fact that it is present entire at every point of the body-the sign of veritable unity-not some part of it here and another part there,\"203 and similarly for God. The idea was likely transmitted to medieval philosophers through translations of the work of John Damascene,204 from which time, says Grant, it became common in the scholastic philosophy. Oresme, who, it will be remembered, described God's eternal domain as extramundane, nevertheless described God's transcendent being as present wholly in every part of the world, saying: \"God in his infinite grandeur without any quantity and absolutely indivisible, which we call immensity, is necessarily in every extension or space or place which exists or can be imagined.\"205 The idea supported the common scholastic doctrine that for (divine or human) spirit to act on corporeal substance a co-presence of the two was necessary.206 The primary role of the whole in every part doctrine is to escape the heresy of pantheism: to suggest that God is physically extended in space and time is to suggest that God can be divided into parts, and that there is a part of God in each created thing. In 1553, Michael Servetus wrote in his Christianismi restitutio, \"God fills all 202 Gassendi, Syntagma philosophicum, in Čapek ibid., p. 94. See also Grant, ibid., p. 210. 203 Plotinus, Enneads, 418 (enn. 4, tr. 9, §1). Quoted in Jasper Reid, \"The Evolution of Henry More's Theory of Divine Absolute Space,\" Journal of the History of Philosophy, vol. 45, no. 1, 2007, p. 88. 204Grant, ibid., note 127, p. 350; see also Reid, ibid., p. 88-9. 205 Oresme, ibid., Bk. II, ch. 2, p. 279. 206 Reid, ibid., p.89. 131 things, even Hell itself.....\"207 Servetus was burned at the stake later the same year Christianismi restitutio was published for the further heresies of Antitrinitarianism (the denial of the trinity and belief that God is one) and anti-paedobaptism (the rejection of infant baptism). Giordano Bruno was also famously burnt at the stake in 1600 for a wide variety of heresies, amongst them pantheism. The notion that God must be whole in every place was still current as late as 1688, when Nicholas Malebranche insisted in his Entretiens sur la Métaphysique et sur Religion: The immensity of God is His substance itself spread out everywhere, and all of it is present everywhere, filling all places without local extension, and this I submit to be quite incomprehensible. ...[But] if you judge of the immensity of God by means of the idea of extension, you are giving God a corporeal extension, [from which it would follow that] the substance of God will no longer be all of it wherever it is.208 In the Syntagma, Gassendi is careful to make clear that while God is immanent in space and time, this does not mean he is physically extended, saying: It is sufficient that God be incorporeal and that he pervade and support the universal machine of the world, but it is not necessary ... that his substance is pulled apart, as it were, and cut up into little pieces which become the individual souls, or forms, not only of men, but also of beasts, even of plants, even of metals, of stones, and every single thing, a theory that is not only impious to mention, but also most absurd, as if an incorporeal being, immeasurable and eternal could be broken up, transferred, and enmeshed and affected by bodies!209 One could not have a clearer rejection on pantheism, as Gassendi, walking so close to the edge with his support of the notoriously pagan philosophy of atomism, evaded the added difficulty of appearing to adopt the heresy of pantheism. 207 M. Servetus, Christianismi restitutio, quoted in Stephen Mason \"Religious Reform And The Pulmonary Transit Of The Blood,\" History of Science, vol. 41, 2003. p. 463. 208 Nicholas Malebranche, Entretiens sur la Métaphysique et sur Religion, trans Morris Ginsberg, quoted in Grant, ibid., p. 222. 209 Gassendi, Syntagma philosophicum, in Brush, ibid., p. 412. 132 I return to the theme of God's possible extension in space and time in the following chapter, below, I focus on the introduction of Gassendism to England by his English apologist Walter Charleton. Walter Charleton: The Popularisation of Gassendism in England The idea of time being coexistent with God's eternity was taken up with great gusto, along with the neo-Epicurean philosophy more generally, by a number of important English philosophers during the 17th Century. The original source seems to be Gassendi, with the mediator the too often forgotten figure, Walter Charleton (16201707). While Charleton's dissemination of the Gassendist philosophy was unashamedly populist, it would be a mistake to underestimate his importance to 17th century philosophy. Indeed Deason notes that, \"In an early notebook entitled Queastiones Quaedam Philosophicae Isaac Newton ... reveals that during his years at Cambridge he read Gassendi, Charleton, and Boyle. [One] entry is taken almost verbatim from Charleton, and the entire notebook exhibits a commitment to the tenets of mechanical philosophy.\"210 While Charleton is not an original writer, but more of an intermediary for Continental thought into England, it is worth overviewing the way in which he made Gassendi's philosophy available to a broad English readership, before moving on to a close examination of more original thinkers in the following chapter. Unlike Gassendi, the Protestant Charleton never missed the opportunity for a snide comment about the Catholic Church. Blessed with what would with understatement be called a healthy ego, Charleton constantly pokes fun at the Scholastic philosophers, to whom he refers as the 'Female Sect', since they are like \"women [who] constantly retain their best affection for those who untie their Virgin Zone\"-doubtless here referring to Aristotle-\"and will never be alienated from immoderately affecting those Authors who had the Maiden head of their minds.\" He is much kinder to those who pursue 'Truth,' among whom he classes Brahe, Kepler and Galileo. He defines these thinkers as those \"whose breasts being filled with true Promethean fire... scorn to submit to the dishonourable tyranny of the usurper, Authority, and will admit of no 210 Deason, \"Reformation Theology and the Mechanistic Conception of Nature,\" in D.C. Lindberg and R.L. Numbers eds, God and Nature: Historical Essays on the Encounter Between Christianity and Science, Berkeley, University of California Press, 1986, p. 181. 133 Monarchy in Philosophy, besides that of Truth.\" He also esteems \"those who dig for truth in the rubbish of the Grecian Patriarchs,\" including \"the immortal Gassendis.\" However, recognising his own unoriginality, he refers to himself as a member of the \"electing sect\" who \"above no Authority, pay a reverend esteem, but no implicit adherence to antiquity, nor erect any fabric of natural science upon foundations of their own laying.\"211 Charleton's Physiologia Epicurio-Gassendo-Charletonia, or a Fabrick of Science Natural, Upon the Hypothesis of Atoms founded by Epicurus, repaired by Petrus Gassendus, augmented by Walter Charleton was first published in 1652, some six years before the first public edition Gassendi's Syntagma and three years before Gassendi's death.212 Following Gassendi, Charleton dismisses the idea of time being consequent upon physical actions, and presents it as an independent flux, \"the twin brother of space.\"213 He reserves some praise for the Jesuits, whom he does not mention by name, but rather as: ...those Worthies... who confest time to be IMAGINARY, such as flowed infinitely in duration before the Creation, and shall continue its flux after the Dissolution of the World.214 We can see already, both in Charleton's disdain for the Aristotelians (in his own case seemingly coupled with a more general anti-Catholic fervour) and in his in some ways incongruous recognition of the contributions of Jesuit philosophy, a parallel sentiment to Gassendi's. His treatment of time is taken straight from Gassendi, although his biting wit makes him far more readable. 211 Charleton, Epicuro-Gassendo-Charletoniana, or, A fabrick of science natural, upon the hypothesis of atoms founded by Epicurus, repaired by Petrus Gassendus, augmented by Walter Charleton, New York, Johnson Reprint Corp., pp. 94-5. See also Thomas M. Lennon, The Battle of Gods and Giants: the Legacies of Descartes and Gassendi, Princeton, Princeton University Press, 1993. pp 97-8. 212 Charleton is thought to have relied on Gassendi's Animadversiones in Decimum Librum Diogenis Laertii (1649), which has an almost identical treatment of space and time to the Syntagma (Mc Guire and Tamny, Certain Philosophical Questions: Newton's Trinity Notebook, p. 20, note 17.) The Syntagma was published posthumously in the 1658 Opera Omnia under the same title, in Gassendi's handwriting, heading the three Tours manuscripts (Tours 706-8). See Brundell, ibid., p. 3. 213 Walter Charleton, Physiologia, p. 75. 214 Charleton, ibid., capitalisation appears in the original work. 134 Charleton begins the chapter on time in his Physiologia by surveying the ideas of previous thinkers. He then puts forward his (and Gassendi's) preferred theory of time. The passage is worth quoting at some length, including as it does numerous points of interest to the current study. He begins with a clear and succinct portrait of the eternal (ever-lasting), absolute, constant temporal flow with which we are familiar from Suárez and Gassendi (all italics in the following passages are from Charleton's original): As Place, or Space, is the total, is illimitate and immense: so is Time, in its totality, non-principiate and interminable. As every Moment of Time is the same in all places: so is every canton or part of Place the same in all times. As Place, whether any, or no Body be collocated therein, doth still persist the same immovable and invariately: so doth unconcerned Time flow on eternally in the same calm and equal tenor, whether any or nothing hath duration therein, whether anything be moved or remain quiet. As Place is uncapable of expansion, interruption or discontinuity, by any Cause whatsoever: so is Time uncapable of acceleration, retardation, or suspension... He goes on to reinforce this understanding of time as absolute by, significantly, turning to the passage from Joshua, which, as we have seen, was so important to medieval statements of independent time, as well as Gassendi's: ...[time moved] on no less, when the Sun was arrested in the midst of its race in the dayes of Joshua, when the Hebrews vanquished and pursued the Amorrhites, than at any time before, or since. As God was pleased, out of the Infinite Space to elect a certain determinate Region for the situation: so hath He, out of Infinite Time, elected a determinate part for the Duration of the World. It is also interesting to note that Charleton uses the biblical story to highlight God's freedom to choose when and where actions can take place. Following Gassendi closely, he goes on to describe how this way of thinking allows us to specify the precise location of an event in space and time: And therefore, as every Body, or Thing, in respect to its HERE or THERE, enjoyes a proportionate part of the Mundane Space: So likewise doth it, according to its NOW and THEN of Existence, enjoy a proportionate part of the Mundane Duration. As, in 135 relation to Place, we say, Everywhere, and Somewhere: so, in relation to Time, we say, Always, and Sometimes. As well as declaring that every body and action has a distinct time and place, he emphasises the relationship between God's infinity and immensity, and absolute time and space: Hence, as it is competent to the Creature to be only somewhere, in respect of Place, and sometimes, in respect of Time: so it is the praerogative of the Creator, to be Everywhere as to Place, and Forever, as to Time. And therefore those two illustrious Attributes, Immensity, whereby He is praesent in all places, and Aeternity, whereby He is existent at all Times, are proper only to God.215 The long passage sketched above sums up, in a single argument, all the important ideas about time which have been discussed in the preceding chapters of this study. 216 While Charleton is drawing here on a number of disparate passages from Gassendi's extensive work, he provides us here with a succinct manifesto, of sorts, for absolutism. Before turning to the reception of atomism in England, it is worth noting a small but important difference between Gassendi and Charleton's understanding of the extended soul. Gassendi's desire to avoid pantheism by falling back on the whole in every part doctrine was not shared by Charleton. Gassendi's refusal to describe God as extended in the Syntagma, published posthumously in 1658 (though circulated in manuscript form before then), is not mimicked in Charleton's colloquialisation of the Syntagma. Charleton is cavalier in his denial of the whole in every part doctrine for God's temporal eternity, saying: Concerning this grand Doubt [the idea that the whole of eternity is present in every 'now'], would Truth have connived, we could most willingly have past it by untouched; because most of our Christian Doctors have fully assented unto them in this particular; 215 Walter Charleton, Physiologia, pp. 75-6. 216 For the sake of the flow of narrative here, I have not included a discussion of Charleton's treatment of what, in Chapter 4, I called \"Ockham's Problem\"-of the difficulty of the Sun increasing it's speed. Those interested in the issue might compare Charleton's text, p. 76 of the Physiologia, with the passages from Ockham in Chapter 4. Charleton, as an absolutist, makes much more sense than Ockham when he pursues a paraphrase of Ockham's argument. See also Gassendi's Syntagma philosophicum, Physciae Sectio I, Liber II; translated by Milič Čapek and Walter Emge, in Čapek (ed.) The concepts of space and time. 136 but since the convulsion of this their opinion doth stagger no Principle of Faith, or Canonical Document made sacred and established by the Authority of the Church; we shall not deserve Excommunication, nor suffer the expurgatory Spunge of Rome, if we question the Congruity of the Definition, and affirm that No man can understand it... [Those who support the whole in every part doctrine say ] that the reason why these Anthropopathical Phrases are tolerable, is because Eternity is Coexistent to our Time: but this is Ignotum explicare per ignotius; for the manner of that supposed Coexistence hath been never explained, and seemeth laid by till the advent of Elias... Nor did they bestow one serious thought upon the consideration of it; for had they, doubtless they must have found their Wit at a loss in the Labyrinth of Fancy... How much better it were said, that we are Coexistent with God; or, that we exist in a small part of that Duration, in which God infinitely existeth? For, while we are, certainly, we cannot imagine Two distinct durations; but one, which in respect to our Nature, that is principiate, mutable, and terminable, doth contain designable Terms; and in respect of the Divine Nature, which is nonprincipiate, immutable, interminable, hath its Diffusion or Extension infinitely long before, and long after us.217 Charleton's words, though elsewhere extremely close to Gassendi's, leave little doubt that for Charleton the idea of the infinite being contained in a point, at least for time, is nonsensical. Charleton's main interest in presenting his apologia of Gassendi's Syntagma appears to have been to popularise Epicureanism while demonstrating that it was 'theologically pure.'218 As we note above, Charleton's transmission of Gassendi's work into England was read by Newton.219 There is also excellent evidence that Charleton's work was closely paraphrased in places by Boyle in his work on atoms- although Boyle could not reconcile himself to absolute time and space.220 These influences are tracked more closely in the following chapter of this study. 217 Charleton, Physiologia, p. 80-81. Notice how Charleton has drawn directly from the Gassendi passage (quoted in the preceding chapter): \"For indeed, while we exist, we do not imagine two distinct durations [i.e. the temporal and eternal, but] really only one, which with regard to our nature (which begins, and slips away, and moreover is finally ended), is bounded by designable limits; but with regard to the divine nature (which does not begin, nor is it changed, nor is it able to cease) has unlimited extension before and after us.\" Gassendi, Opera Omnia, vol. 1, p. 227. 218 See also Robert Kargon, \"Walter Charleton, Robert Boyle, and the Acceptance of Epicurean Atomism in England,\" Isis, 55, 1964, pp 184–192. 219 See Deason, ibid. 220 Kargon, ibid. 137 Conclusion Pierre Gassendi's role in the development of the theory of absolute time is perhaps greater than that of any other thinker. In reworking Epicurean atomism into a plausible replacement for Scholastic Aristotelianism, Gassendi implants the tentative absolutism of Jesuit philosophy into the old Greek dualism of bodies and the void. Gassendi's rendering of absolute time is, however, much stronger than Suárez's, for example. In Gassendi, there is no hint that absolute time is anything other than real. Most radically, Gassendi (followed closely by Charleton) did away with the scholastic notion of an extra-mundane, changeless eternity from which God directs activities in the world transcendently, and this theological shift is central to Gassendi's thought. For Gassendi, eternity and successive absolute time are one and the same. God's 'time' and our time are differentiated only by their respective extents: \"we do not imagine two distinct durations really only one, which with regard to our nature (which begins, and slips away, and moreover is finally ended), is bounded by designable limits; but with regard to the divine nature (which does not begin, nor is it changed, nor is it able to cease) has unlimited extension before and after us\". Thus Gassendi's, and following him, Charleton's, revision of Epicurean atomism allows-indeed provokes-a parallel revision of the locus of God in the cosmos. In the following chapter, I show how this understanding of God as immanent rather than transcendent affected the development of absolute time in More and Newton's philosophy. 138 139 6. \"The permanent Expansion or Amplitude of the radical Essentiality of God\": The retreat from independent absolute time: From Gassendi to More and Newton In closing this study I shall focus on a perhaps surprising claim: that in the philosophy of some English thinkers, most notably Isaac Newton, we see a retreat from Gassendi's claim that time is an independent and absolute entity. For Newton, and preceding him Henry More, time is an effect of being-and in particular of the spatially and temporally extended being of God. While Newton's portrayal of time and space as aspects God's substantial being is well documented, the arguments underlying his ontology of time and space (and that More) and the relationship of time and space to God's being is not, yet it is of particular interest in the context of the development of theories of absolute time. Newton's famous definition of time, that, as is \"well known to all,\" \"...of itself and from its own nature, flows equably without relation to anything external\" must be considered in the context of what was in Newton's day a broadly held ontology of time as an effect of divine being. In De gravitatione et aequipondio fluidorum (c.1670) Isaac Newton, perhaps the most famous absolutist of all, retreated from the truly independent absolute time and space of Gassendi. Newton very explicitly proposed that time and space are, after all, accidents of being: Space is an affection of a being insofar as it is a being... [and] an emanative effect of the primarily existing being, since if any being whatsoever is posited, space is posited. And the same may be asserted for duration: for certainly both are affections or attributes of a being according to which the quantity of each individual's existence is 140 denominated with respect to amplitude of presence [for space] and to persistence in its being [for duration].221 Newton could not state more clearly his belief that time and space are effects of being-in the simple sense, of any existing being. However, he goes on to argue that, from an ontological perspective, time and space are not the 'emanative effects' of any ordinary being, or even of the motion of being. They are attributes of God: Space has an eternal duration and an immutable nature, and this is because it is the emanative effect of an eternal and immutable being...222 This claim is fundamentally different to Gassendi's. Gassendi claimed that time (and space) precede being, even God's being, \"for the reason that the measure ought to be better known than the measured.\" He makes God's infinity and immensity attributes which he has by virtue of his immanence in space and time, and which are in turn primary categories of being. Here, we look at reasons for this retreat from true independent absolute time in the work of More, and, following him, Newton. Henry More on God as an extended being. The development of the idea of (quasi-) absolute time and space as attributes of God's being is clearest in the work of Henry More (1614-1687). Through a number of works written late in his career, More develops the two claims which lead him to consider God as the subject of space and time, the first metaphysical and the second theological: 1) he denies Gassendi's claim that time and space constitute a new class of being, and insists that they must in fact be attributes of something, either corporeal or incorporeal (spiritual); and 2) he denies the whole in every part doctrine, that he believed lead to atheism, leading him to claim that God is necessarily locally extended. From these two lines of thought, More concluded that the entity of which 221Isaac Newton, De Gravitatione et aequipondio fluidorum, Add. Ms. 4003, Cambridge University Library, UK. \"Spatium est entis quatenus ens affectio... spatium sit entis primariò existentis effectus emanativus, quia posito quolibet ente ponitur spatium. Deque Duratione similia possunt affirmari : scilicet ambae sunt entis affectiones sive attributa secundum quae quantitas existentiae cujuslibet individui quoad amplitudinem praesentiae et perseverationem in suo esse denominatur.\" My translation. 222 Newton, ibid. \"Denique spatium est aeternae durationis et immutabilis naturae, idque quòd sit aeternis et immutabilis entis effectus emanativus...\" My translation and italics. 141 time and space are attributes must be an incorporeal being, and that that incorporeal being must be God himself. In a 1648 letter to Descartes, More clearly proposed time to be absolute with reference to material being, arguing that an absolute vacuum must (contra Descartes) be possible, since just as time can exist in an empty universe, so measurable space must be able to exist in a vacuum: ... if God annihilated this universe and then, after a certain time, created from nothing another one, this intermundium or this absence of the world would have its duration which would be measured by a certain number of days, years or centuries. There is thus a duration of something that does not exist, which duration is a kind of extension. Consequently, the amplitude of nothing, that is of void, can be measured by ells or leagues, just as the duration of what does not exist can be measured by hours, days and months.223 More's ideas about the nature of God and the human soul shifted markedly over the course of his career,224 yet his acceptance of the theory of absolute time and space is common throughout his work. In the Enchiridium metaphysicam of 1671, in particular, we see that More did not believe, with Gassendi, that time and space could be considered as new and separate categories of being. More instead followed the majority opinion in insisting space and time (or as he puts it, eternal extension) must belong to the traditional categories of being as either subjects, or as attributes depending on a subject: ...something that is a real attribute of some real subject can be found nowhere else except where in the same place there is some real subject under it. And, indeed, extension is the real attribute of a real subject (namely matter), which however is found elsewhere [where there is no matter, for example in a void] and that independently of our imagination. Indeed, we cannot not conceive a certain immobile extension 223 Henry More, Second letter to Descartes, translation by Alexandre Koyré, From the closed world to the infinite universe, Baltimore, Johns Hopkins University Press, 1968. p. 120. The letter in its original Latin is included in Henry More: A Collection of Several Philosophical Writings, in Two Volumnes, (Cambridge, James Flesher, 1662. Facsimile copy, New York, Garland Publishing Company, 1978) under the title \"Clarisimo Viro, Nobilisimoque Philosopho, Renato Descartes, Henricus Morus Anglus,\" vol. I, pp 71-81. The passage is on pp 73-4. 224 The most thorough investigation of the evolution of More's thought is to be found in Jasper Reid's \"The Evolution of Henry More's Theory of Divine Absolute Space,\" Journal of the History of Philosophy, vol. 45, no. 1, 2007, 79–102. 142 pervading everything to have existed from eternity, and which will exist to eternity (whether we think of it or not) and really distinct, finally, from mobile matter. Therefore it is necessary that some real subject be under tis extension, since it is a real attribute. This argument is so solid that nothing can be more solid. For, if it be shaky, we can indeed conclude the existence of absolutely no real subject in the universe. 225 It is impossible for More to imagine a world devoid of space and time (which he collapses into a single extension which is both 'eternal' and 'infinite' in the quote above). As extension is an attribute, it is obvious to More that there must be some subject to support it. Says Koyré of this passage: \"Henry More is perfectly right. On the basis of traditional ontology-and no one in the seventeenth century (except, perhaps, Gassendi, who claims that space and time are neither substances nor attributes but simply space and time) is so bold or so careless as to reject it or to replace it by a new one-his reasoning is utterly unobjectionable.\"226 Yet while More's insistence that spatial and temporal amplitude cannot be attributes without a subject to support them may well have been unobjectionable to his contemporaries, the problem of finding a subject (and it should be clear by now that More is heading towards God for this task) which might have space and time as properties is a difficult one. It is not a matter of simply asserting a subject for a given attribute; the metaphysical requirements of explanation of the connections are inherently complicated. For example, earlier in this study, I described how William of Ockham took a nominalist approach to the problem of time because he could not find what he saw as a necessarily corporeal subject with appropriate properties to have time as an attribute, and could not accept claims, such as those of Duns Scotus and Aureole, that time could exist somehow per se. Suárez dealt with the problem by proposing two kinds of time, a 'real' intrinsic time which is properly attributable to bodies, and an 'extrinsic flux' about the categorical place of which he was rather vague. Gassendi was forced to admit absolute time (and space) in fact constituted separate categories of being, since he could find no suitable subject-God could not be the subject of space and time because Gassendi denied that God, like space and 225 Henry More, Enchiridium metaphysicam, c. viii, 6. Translated by Alexander Jacob, Henry More's Manual of Metaphysics: A Translation of the Enchiridium metaphysicam (1679) with an Introduction and Notes, pp 56-7. 226 Koyré, ibid., p. 146. 143 time, was locally extended. Nor could he find an appropriate metaphysical category under which to place time and space themselves as subjects. This, however, meant Gassendi was left with three perfect and absolute existents: time, space, and God-a problematic position to take on the uniquity of the Divine. In the earlier Immortality of the Soul (1659), More had proposed a refined definition of substance, dividing it into two kinds: the physical, 'Body', and the spiritual, 'Spirit': I will define... a Spirit in generall thus: A substance penetrable and indiscerpible. The fitness of which definition will be better understood, if we divide Substance in generall into these first Kindes, viz. Body and Spirit and then define Body A Substance impenetrable and discerpible. Whence the contrary Kind to this is fitly defined, A substance penetrable and indiscerpible.227 With his denial of Gassendi's claim that time and space constitute a new class of being, and an insistence that they must in fact be attributes of something, More set himself up for his claim that the subject of these infinite attributes must be God himself. But since space and time are locally extended, surely their subject must locally extended also. In order to make such a claim about God-one which was too much even for Gassendi-More had also to deny the widely accepted whole in every part doctrine. The second line of argument underlying More's idea of God as locally extended in space and time, the rejection of the 'whole in every part' doctrine, is much clearer in More's writings than in the passages from Charleton discussed in the previous chapter of this study-indeed the explicit denial of the doctrine is a hallmark of More's later writings. More was initially a believer in the whole in every part doctrine,228 but 227 Henry More, The immortality of the soul, bk 1, chap iii, i, p. 21, in Henry More: A Collection of Several Philosophical Writings, in Two Volumnes, (Cambridge, James Flesher, 1662. Facsimile copy, New York, Garland Publishing Company, 1978), vol. II, p. 21. 228 For example More, in his Philosophical Poems of 1647, wrote that: For in each Atom of the matter wide The totall Deity doth entirely won, His infinite presence doth therein reside, And in this presence infinite powers do ever abide. 144 became in his later years a great advocate against it, calling it \"holmerianism\" (from the Greek for \"whole in parts\"). Jasper Reid, in his extremely thorough history of the development of More's conception of absolute space (\"The Evolution of Henry More's Theory of Divine Absolute Space\") describes how by the publication of his The Immortality of the Soul in 1659, More openly denied holmerianism, at least for created spirit, calling it: \"the Scholastick riddle, which, I must confess, seems to verge too near to profound Non-sense, That the Soul of man is tota in toto, and tota in qualibet parte corporis.\"229 More's denial of holmerianism for created spirit (that the soul can be whole in itself, and also exist in its totality in each part of the body) and the sentiment underlying it, is not dissimilar to Charleton's dismissal of the holmerianism of eternal spirit seven years earlier. Reid argues that More's eventual denial of holmerianism was made in response to Hobbes' use of the whole in every part doctrine to deny the existence of the immaterial soul. In 1651, in his Leviathan, Hobbes wrote: ...the essence of a man, which (they say) is his soul, they affirm it, to be all of it in his little finger, and all of it in every other part (how small soever) of his body; and yet no more soul in the whole body than in any one of those parts. Can any man think that God is served with such absurdities? And yet all this is necessary to believe, to those that will believe the existence of an incorporeal soul, separated from the body.230 More responded in his The Immortality the Soul of 1659. More quoted the Hobbes passage directly, using it to deny holmerianism as a threat to the belief in the material soul. Reid comments: More could no longer view holmerianism as possibly a foolish but ultimately a harmless eccentricity of the Schools. It was now actually beginning to injure the reputation of spiritualism in general, and threatening to bring about a rise in materialism; if a spirit was going to have to be like that, the materialists felt, then it would surely be far more reasonable not to believe in any such things at all. It thus suddenly became extremely important for More either to provide the theory with a More, The Argument of Democritus Platonissans or the Infinitie of Worlds, in A Platonick Song of the Soul, pp 425-6. See also Reid, ibid., p. 90. 229 Henry More, The Immortality of the Soul, quoted in Reid, ibid. 230 Thomas Hobbes, Leviathan, quoted in Reid, ibid. p. 98. 145 rigorous defense against Hobbes' charge of absurdity, or else to distance himself from any association with it. But More decided that, as a matter of fact, the theory was indefensible.231 By 1662, in the Preface General to his A Collection of Several Philosophical Writings, More was openly claiming that Spirit must be substantially extended: ...it being so mathematically demonstrable that there is that which is properly called Spirit, and that no Being at all can be totally present in distant parts of Matter at once, it does unavoidably follow, that a Spirit is in some sort extended.232 Why should More, and Charleton, not be perturbed by the heresy of pantheism inherent in the claim that spirit is locally extended? Certainly Charleton seems rather playfully snide in his doubt that he must \"suffer the expurgatory Spunge of Rome,\" and no doubt the threat of heresy against what was traditionally a Catholic dogma may have been of little or lesser concern in Protestant England. Indeed, Reid surmises that More saw his support of the theory of God's local extension as an act in accordance with faith: Like most seventeenth-century philosophers, More took Acts 17:28 [\"For in him we live, and move, and have our being; as certain also of your own poets have said, For we are also his offspring\"233] very seriously indeed, and he was inclined to interpret that text in an extremely literal sense. As far as More was concerned, we could be understood to \"live, and move, and have our being\" in God locally, to the extent that the various regions of His own amplitude were what constituted the internal places of His creatures.234 By 1668 More was content to pronounce everlasting extension as an attribute, with the divine spirit as subject: ...that inmost extension or amplitude which will necessarily remain after we have imagined all matter, or whatever else is removeable, removed or exterminated our of 231 Reid, ibid., p. 99. 232 More, A Collection of Several Philosophical Writings, quoted in Reid, ibid., p. 99. 233 Acts 17:28, King James Version 234 Reid, ibid. 146 the world, is to be look'd upon as the permanent expansion or amplitude of the radical essentiality of God.235 Three years later, in the Enchiridion metaphysicum of 1671, More put forward his famous argument that the similarities in the qualities of both God and everlasting extension point to their being one and the same thing: For this infinite and immobile extension will be seen to be not something merely real (which we have noted in the last place) but something divine after we shall have enumerated those divine names or titles which suit it exactly, and with the greatest certainty make it not possible to be nothing, seeing that so many and such excellent attributes fit it. Of which kind are those which follow, which metaphysicians specifically attribute to First Being. Such as one, simple, immobile, eternal, complete, independent, existing from itself, subsisting by itself, incorruptible, necessary, immense, uncreated, uncircumscribed, incomprehensible, omnipresent, incorporeal, permeating and encompassing everything, Being by essence, Being by act, pure Act. There are not less than twenty titles by which the divine numen should be designated, which most aptly suit this infinite internal place which we have demonstrated to be in the universe.236 More's claim for the spirituality of absolute space and time (or temporally everlasting infinite extension, as he saw it) is yet another argument against the feared ranks of 235 More, Divine Dialogues, Containing the Attributes and Providence of God, (Glasgow, Robert Foulis, 1743). Dialogue III, pp 448-9. In a letter to Descartes written much earlier that this passage, in 1648, More had written \"Now, for my part, I consider it to be evident that God is extended in His own manner from this: that He is certainly omnipresent, and He intimately occupies both the entire mundane machine and each individual particle thereof. For how could He impress motion onto matter, as He once did, and as you claim He still does even now, unless He closely touched the matter of the universe, or at least had once touched it?\" Jasper Reid, who quotes this passage in his \"The Evolution of Henry More's Theory of Divine Absolute Space,\" argues that \"what we find when we look a bit more closely at this correspondence overall is that this so-called \"extension\" did not amount to His being spread out with parts outside parts. Instead, it referred merely to His being substantially present in the spatial world,\" Reid p. 92. Reid argues many authors have misunderstood this passage as being an early denial of holmerianism, citing a number of writers (Brian Copenhaver, \"Jewish Theologies of Space in the Scientific revolution: Henry More, Joseph Raphson, Isaac Newton and their predecessors,\" Annals of Science 37 (1980): 489–548, esp. 519– 21; Michael Boylan, \"Henry More's Space and the Spirit of Nature,\" Journal of the History of Philosophy 18 (1980): 395–405, esp. 398–400; J. E. power, \"Henry More and Isaac Newton on Absolute Space,\" Journal of the History of Ideas 31 (1970): 289–96, esp. 289–90; Grant, Much Ado, 223-cited Reid, note 53, p. 93). It is possible Reid is right about More's intent, indeed Reid's argument is convincing. Descartes, however, in his reply to More, appears to believe that More is contending that God is locally extended, saying: \"I am ... surprised... that you suppose that God has partes extra partes, and that He is divisible, and, in short, attribute to Him all the essence of a corporeal being.\" Descartes, Descartes to Henry More, 5, ii, 1649, quoted in Koyré, ibid., p. 117. 236 More, Enchiridium metaphysicam, c. viii, 8. Translated by Alexander Jacob, ibid., p. 57. 147 atheists. Just as he could not accept Hobbes' flirtation with the non-necessity of the human soul, nor could he stomach the clockwork world of the Cartesians, who merely asserted the necessity of God rather than providing for it in their mechanics. Before making this important claim, above, in the Enchiridion metaphysicum More contextualises it as one which ensures God's place in a universe from which Descartes would seek to \"expel him\": [Descartes] tries to conclude from this argument that the Space, which is said to be a void, is the very same thing as that corporeal substance that is said to be matter. I, on the contrary... [conclude from the same reasoning] it to be a certain incorporeal substance, or spirit... And so, through that very dor by which the Cartesian philosophy is seen to wish to exclude God from the world, I, on the contrary (which I am confident will attend me with the happiest success) strive and strain to bring Him back.237 As John Henry has shown, however, there is rather a large flaw in More's conflation of God with space: More's metaphysics require spirit to have the opposite attributes to body, with the result that God is hardly in a position to act upon bodies as he must, as spirit, be entirely passive: [There is a] serious failing in More's theory of space which, as far as I know, has never been pointed out. His painstaking efforts in the Enchiridion metaphysicum to establish his concept of empty space were undertaken because More regarded empty space extended but immaterial -as the perfect exemplar of spirit. Indeed, his claim that the attributes of infinite space show a one-to-one correspondence with the attributes of God is well-known. During his discussion of the attributes of empty space, however, More glosses quickly over the fact that his supreme exemplar of spirit (the active principle in his universe) is so completely passive and inert that it is totally noninteractive.238 This is a big problem, and one with which Newton, following More, also struggles as I discuss below. More's denial of holmerianism, which he came to see as so absurd as to furnish atheists with an argument against the existence of spirit, left him with little choice but to support the local spatial and temporal extension of soul within body, and, by logical 237 Henry More, Enchiridium metaphysicam, viii, 7. Translated by Alexander Jacob, ibid., p. 57. 238 John Henry, \"A Cambridge Platonist's Materialism: Henry More and the Concept of Soul,\" Journal of the Warburg and Courtauld Institutes, Vol. 49, 1986, p. 178. 148 progression, God within the universe. In imagining God as physically extended, More was able to side-step the problem which had lead Gassendi to cast absolute space and time as infinite existents separate from both God and the accepted categories of being. Space and time were restored to their old position as accidents of being. But with More's division of being into the spiritual and physical, time no longer needed a physical subject, such as motion in general, motion of the soul, or the motion of heaven-the three possible subjects which had been the focus of earlier attempts to define time, and which had lead Duns Scotus, Aureole and Suárez to propose a metaphysically problematic quasi-absolute time. Of course, More's time is only absolute in respect of material being, in the sense that it has no material cause. Gassendi, perhaps, is the only thinker (who gives a detailed theory of the ontology of time) to believe time to be properly absolute. In the work of Henry More we can see the detail of the development of his ideas about time in a way we cannot with other English thinkers of his time, who have left us much less in the way of extant texts, for example Newton, with whom it seems appropriate to conclude this study. Not, however, as the thinker whose work is the hallmark of absolutism, but as the thinker whose writings on absolute time are the best known. Newton's absolutism My discussion of Newton here may seem surprisingly brief, considering that it is Newton of whom we probably most often think when speaking of absolute time. Here, I discuss the elements in Newton's work that show his indebtedness to the philosophers I have discussed in previous chapters, but focus primarily on the most interesting aspect of Newton's absolutism-that it forms, in fact, a retreat from the full-blown absolutism of his predecessor, Gassendi. In Newton's ontology of time we see a development and refinement of More's idea that time is an effect of the everlasting existence of God. As is well known, Newton was influenced by More's work on a number of matters. More was Newton's teacher at Cambridge and they shared a friendship until More's death; certainly, there is a well-established direct influence of More's work on 149 Newton's understanding of time and space, and of God.239 In his unpublished papers, Newton builds upon an understanding of God as extended which is very similar to More's, closing the circle, in a way, back to older ideas about time as an accident.240 As I show below, More was forced, eventually, to admit that God must be locally extended, and thus divisible, Newton shows that time and space are not themselves divisible, and thereby avoids claiming the divisibility of God.241 One cannot but begin any discussion of Newton's work on time without quoting the famous passage in his Scholium to the Definitions of the Philosophiae Naturalis Principia Mathematica, where he characterises time (and space and place) as absolute entities: Hitherto I have laid down the definitions of such words as are less known, and explained the sense in which I would have them to be understood in the following discourse. I do not define time, space, place, and motion, as being well known to all. 239 For some examples, see Westfall, Never at Rest: The life of Isaac Newton, Cambridge, Cambridge University Press, 1993; as well as Koyré, ibid, especially p. 190; J. E. Power, \"Henry More an Issac Newton on Absolute Space,\" Journal of the History of Ideas, 31, no. 2; and G. A. J. Rogers, \"Locke, Newton, and the Cambridge Platonists on Innate Ideas, Journal of the History of Ideas, Vol. 40, No. 2. (Apr. Jun., 1979), pp. 191-205. 240 I have not included discussion in this study of Barrow's use of absolute time, nor his (possible) influence on Newton, for the focus of this study is key developments in the idea of absolute time, and I find little in the work of Barrow that is not also to be found in the work of Gassendi. 241 Another possible influence on Newton in his account of time is the anti-Aristotelian philosopher J.B. Van Helmont. Walter Charleton translated a number of van Helmont's tracts, Boyle is known to have used some of his arguments and Newton is said to have studied his works closely (see Allen G. Debus, Man and Nature in the Renaissance, p. 130). Van Helmont's treatise on time is thought to have been a response to, and rejection of, the philosophy of Suarez and the Spanish Jesuits (see Walter Pagel, \"J.B van Helmont, De Tempore, and Biological Time,\" p. 380), and it is probable that he was directly influenced by Plotinus' work (ibid., pp. 389-91). Van Helmont's De tempore, published in 1648 as part of his Ortus Medicinae, provides another case of a neo-Platonic account of time which may initially sound absolute but turns out, on closer inspection, not to be so (as we have seen with Oresme and Plotinus), for example in the following passage: I first considered that when the heaven stood still, no other time existed while the sun stood still than exists now... For even if this detention of the sun was miraculous, duration was certainly not likewise... From that I soon learned that the Duration which they call Time is a real Ens. Also, if time was from the beginning before a creature was made, it cannot be among the created objects (van Helmont, de Tempore, translated by Walter Pagel in \"J.B van Helmont, De Tempore, and Biological Time,\" passages XXV-XXVII, p. 363-4). So far we could be reading from Duns Scotus. But then comes a jarring note: I... believe that true time is pure, without blemish of creature, is everywhere and always immutable and in no way successive (ibid, XXXI, p. 365, my italics). For van Helmont, time is only successive when it is in a motion. Time itself is not successive, but inheres in beings, and their motion gives time its apparent succession. Van Helmont may have influence other aspects of Newton's work, but not this. Van Helmont's time is another example of the belief that perfect and changeless eternity is the primary 'kind' of time; a belief which could not be more different from Newton's insistence on a time which \"flows equably without relation to anything external.\" 150 Only I must observe, that the common people / the vulgar [vulgus] conceive those quantities under no other notions but from the relation they bear to sensible objects. And thence arise certain prejudices, for the removing of which it will be convenient to distinguish them into absolute and relative, true and apparent, mathematical and common. I. Absolute, true, and mathematical time, of itself, and from its own nature, flows equably without relation to anything external, and by another name is called duration... 242 (After this he goes on to differentiate between absolute and relational space place, and motion also.) This passage can be read in a number of ways: at face value, Newton appears to be saying that his characterisation of time, space and place as absolute is something new, and a better characterisation than that usually given (by the common people). In the context of this study, however, it is the claim that time, space and place are materially absolute may be read as that which is \"well known to all.\" Indeed, as has been the main contention of this thesis, a significant number of then wellknown thinkers, including those who are known to have influenced Newton's ideas, such as Gassendi and Charleton, believed time and space to be absolute. Further, his explicit characterisation of time as absolute at the end of the passage above, if read with reference to Newton's unpublished works, suggests that he is contrasting his characterisation of time (and space and place) as absolute with those of other philosophers whom he considers 'vulgar,'243 and that he is likely referring to Descartes. Indeed, in De gravitatione he refers to Descartes' and the Cartesians' ontology of extension, motion, space and time is terms such as \"absurd,\" \"confused and contrary to reason,\" \"repugnant to reason,\" and \"fallacious and unsound.\"244 In the General Scholium added to the second, revised edition of the Principia in 1713, Newton gives a fuller account of his view of time, space and of God. It is likely that these additions were in part a response to attacks by philosophers such as Berkeley on 242Newton, Sir Isaac Newton's Mathematical Principles of Natural Philosophy and his System of the World, translation Andrew Motte (1729), revised Florian Cajori, Berkeley, University of California Press, 1966, p. 6. 243 Koyré agrees with this reading, saying that here \"the relational character of the Cartesian conception of space and time is branded 'vulgar' and as based upon 'prejudices.' Koyré, ibid, p. 167. 244 Robert Rynasiewicz, \"By their Properties, Causes and effects: Newton's Scholium on Time, Space, Place and Motion-II. The Context,\" Studies in the History and Philosophy of Science, Vol. 26, No. 2, 1995, pp 229-300, gives a more lengthy analysis of Newton's contempt for Descartes as it is expressed in De gravitatione. 151 the unmitigated absolutism implied in the first edition.245 Berkeley argued that time and space must be relational, saying, in a criticism that could also rightly have been levelled at Gassendi's absolutism, that if space and time are truly absolute, then \"there is something besides God which is eternal, uncreated, infinite, indivisible, unmutable.\"246 These additions also make clear Newton's opposition to Descartes' vortices and, though more veiled, Leibniz's idle God. Going some way towards meeting criticisms such as Berkeley's, Newton explicitly builds God into his description of space and time in the General Scholium, making clear that time and space are secondary effects of God's being, not separate entities: [God] is Eternal and Infinite, Omnipotent and Omniscient; that is, his duration reaches from Eternity to Eternity; his presence from Infinity to Infinity; he governs all things, and knows all things that are or can be done. He is not Eternity and Infinity, but Eternal and Infinite; he is not Duration and Space, but he endures and is present. He endures forever, and is every where present; and, by existing always and every where, he constitutes Duration and Space. Since every particle of Space is always, and every indivisible moment of Duration is every where, certainly the Maker and Lord of all things cannot be never and no where... Newton also asserts that God is substantially present in the world, saying: God is the same God, always and everywhere. He is omnipresent, not virtually only, but also substantially; for virtue cannot subsist without substance. In him are all things contained and moved; yet neither affects the other: God suffers nothing from the motion of bodies; bodies find no resistance from the omnipresence of God.247 Here, Newton refers explicitly to Acts 17:28 (\"For in him we live, and move, and have our being\"), no doubt to deflect accusations of pantheism. This reference is made immediately after his claim that God is substantially omnipresent. Claiming space and time as attributes of God's spatial and temporal omnipresence, Newton's words are reminiscent of More's: \"...that inmost Extension or Amplitude which will necessarily remain after we have imagined all Matter, or whatever else is removeable, 245 Power, ibid., p. 291. 246 Berkeley, A treatise concerning the Principles of Human Knowledge, Part 1, quoted in Power, ibid. 247 Newton, General Scholium to the Principia Mathematica; ibid. 152 removed or exterminated out of the World is to be look'd upon as the permanent Expansion or Amplitude of the radical Essentiality of God.\" Yet, importantly, unlike More, Newton does not seek to engage at length in a discussion of the occult properties of nature, or of the divine, although he concedes later in the General Scholium that \"to discourse of [God] from the appearances of things, does certainly belong to Natural Philosophy.\"248 In the General Scholium, Newton is a little vague about the manner in which God's substantial presence is manifested in space and time. He says: Every soul that has perception is, though in different times and in different organs of sense and motion, still the same indivisible person. There are given successive parts in duration, co-existent parts in space, but neither the one nor the other in the person of a man, or his thinking principle; and much less can they be found in the thinking substance of God. Every man, so far as he is a thing that has perception, is one and the same man during his whole life, in all and each of his organs of sense.249 The implication here is that God is indivisible, since the human soul is explicitly described as indivisible. This seems like a return to Gassendi's holmerianism, and a step away from More' extended God. The Principia is a notoriously ambiguous work if we are looking for Newton's ontology and metaphysics, and his more detailed thoughts on the ontology of time are to be found elsewhere, particularly in the unpublished De gravitatione et aequipondio fluidorum, which I discussed briefly above. De gravitatione (1670) comprises a sustained critique of Descartes' conception of motion. Newton's discussion here is mainly directed at extension and motion, yet he also reveals much about his ontology of space and, more rarely, time. Pillorying Descartes' claim that body does not differ from extension, Newton makes a claim about extension/space which initially sounds very similar to Gassendi's conception of space and time as being neither substance nor accident but rather comprising a new category of being: 248 Newton, ibid. 249 ibid. 153 ...it may be expected that I should define extension as subject or accident or else nothing at all. But by no means, for it has its own manner of existence which fits neither substances nor accidents.250 Immediately, however, Newton diverges from the Gassendist path, arguing that because extension \"is not absolute in itself, but is as it were an emanative effect of God...\"251 it cannot be a substance.252 Yet neither does Newton allow that extension can be considered an accident in the simple sense, nor even a 'nothing at all' (a la Ockham): Moreover, since we can clearly conceive extension existing without any subject... and we believe [extension] to exist wherever we imagine there are no bodies, and we cannot believe that it would perish with the body if God should annihilate a body, it follows that [extension] does not exist as an accident inherent in some subject. ...And much less may it be said to be nothing, since it is rather a something, and approaches more nearly to the nature of a substance. ...I shall now enumerate not only to show that it is a something, but what it is.253 In showing what kind of a 'something' extension is, Newton explicitly geometricises extension as an absolute infinite which exists independently of material bodies, and by its everlasting existence constitutes both space and time. He shows that space and time are, in fact, special forms of attribute: attributes of God's existence. In doing so, he also rectifies the key problem inherent in More's ontology of time: whether God, as the subject of time (and space) is therefore divisible. Newton's enumeration of the 'something-ness' of extension is given in six postulates.254 I set them out here with a commentary on their significance to the debate about the nature of time (substance, attribute, or something else) begun by Gassendi and continued by More: 250 Newton, Newton, \"De gravitationione et aequipondio fluidorum,\" in Unpublished Scientific Papers of Isaac Newton, ed. and translation, A. Rupert Hall and Mary Boas Hall, Cambridge, Cambridge University Press, 1962, pp 131-2. 251 Ibid., p. 132. 252 Nor, of course, did Gassendi claim time or space to be substances-yet he did believe them 'absolute in themselves.' 253 Ibid. 254 Ibid., pp 132-38. 154 1. We can imagine a space extending in all directions, in which we can distinguish parts whose common limits we might call surfaces; similarly these may be divided with a common limit of a line, and these lines divided to show a point. Neither surface nor line nor point have depth, breadth or dimension. Furthermore this space can be conceived of as containing any number of figures. 2. This space is infinite and unlimited. (During his discussion of this postulate Newton reassures the reader who may fear that such a space is necessarily God, because of the perfection of infinity: \"...by no means[is this so] for infinity is not perfection except when it is an attribute of perfect things.\"255) 3. The parts of space are motionless. Here, Newton shows that the order and relations of the parts of time and space are an essential part of the definition of their being: ...the immobility of space will be best exemplified by duration. For just as the parts of duration derive their individuality from their order, so that (for example) if yesterday could change places with today and become the later of the two, it would lose its individuality and would no longer be yesterday, but today... [so, the] parts of duration and space are only understood to be the same as they really are because of their mutual order and position; nor do they have any hint of individuality apart from that order and position which consequently cannot be altered.256 The important implication here is that if space and time are, indeed, accidents of God's existence (as Newton goes on to claim), we need not suppose that God is a changeable being just because he exists in time. The parts of space and time are themselves necessarily unalterable. In an unpublished draft of the Scholium, Newton makes this claim more explicitly: ...the Duration of a thing is not its flow [ejus fluxio], or any change, but its permanence and immutability in flowing time. All things endure in so far as they remain the same 255 Ibid., pp 135-6. 256Newton, ibid., p. 136. Note the similarity in this line of argument to Suárez's statement that: \"that flowing imaginary space is conceived as entirely necessary and immutable in its own flux [omnino necessarium et immutabile in suo fluxu], and therefore its part, once understood as past, cannot be understood as returning. For that space, since it is conceived as entirely necessary and not caused [non causatum], ought even to be conceived as having an intrinsic necessity in flowing, by the order of its own parts, and accordingly, once that part is past it cannot be conceived as returning again.\" (See Chapter 4) 155 at any time. <The duration of each thing flows, but> its <enduring> substance does not flow, and is not changed with respect to before and after, but always remains the same.257 4. Space is a disposition of being qua being. Further: No being exists or can exist which is not related to space in some way. God is everywhere, created minds are somewhere, and body is in the space that it occupies; and whatever is neither everywhere nor anywhere does not exist.258 This passage is similar to parts of Gassendi and Charleton, yet where they conclude that space and time must, therefore, precede being (even God's being), Newton's draws a very different conclusion: And hence it follows that space is an emanative effect of the primary existence of being, because when any being is invoked, a space is supposed. And the same can be established for duration: plainly both are affections or attributes of being [entis affectiones sive attributa] according to which the quantity of existence of any single thing [individui] is designated in terms of the breadth and continuity of its being.259 In this section of De gravitatione Newton also provides an extremely elegant solution to the conundrum of God's essential unity in an extended space-time (More's difficulty). He simply denies that space and time are themselves divisible. To divide is to 'cut out' a piece of something-and one can no more 'remove' a piece of space or time than 'move' a number to a different place when counting, as Newton argues: ...lest anyone should... imagine God to be like a body, extended and made of divisible parts, it should be known that spaces themselves are not actually divisible, and furthermore, that any being has a manner proper to itself of being in spaces. For thus there is a very different relationship between space and body, and space and duration. For we do not ascribe various durations to the different parts of space, but say that all 257 Newton, Manuscript Add. 3965, Portsmouth Collection. Translated under the title \"Tempus and Locus\" by J.E. McGuire. Original Latin with translation provided in McGuire's \"Newton on Place Time and God: an Unpublished Source,\" British Journal for the History of Science, vol. 11, 1978. This passage paragraph 2, McGuire p. 117. '<>' denote additons in Newton's handwriting. 258 Newton, \"De gravitationione et aequipondio fluidorum,\" ibid., p. 136. 259 Isaac Newton, De Gravitatione et aequipondio fluidorum, Add. Ms. 4003, Cambridge University Library, UK. \"Et hinc sequitur quod spatium sit entis primariò existentis effectus emanativus, quia posito quolibet ente ponitur spatium. Deque Duratione similia possunt affirmari : scilicet ambae sunt entis affectiones sive attributa secundum quae quantitas existentiae cujuslibet individui quoad amplitudinem praesentiae et perseverationem in suo esse denominatur.\" My translation. 156 endure together. The moment of duration is the same at Rome and at London, on the Earth and on the stars,260 and throughout all the heavens. And just as we understand any moment of duration to be diffused throughout all spaces, according to its kind, without any thought of its parts, so it is no more contradictory that Mind also, according to its kind, can be diffused through space without any thought of its parts.261 5. The positions, distance and local motions of bodies are to be referred to the parts of space. This postulate is aimed directly at Descartes' conception of motion, and forms the basis of Newton's mathematicisation of motion in the Principia. Finally, Newton gives his sixth postulate, that space and time are not accidents in any simple sense, but are the necessary effects of the existence God: Lastly, space is eternal in duration and immutable in nature, and this is because it is the emanative effect of an eternal and immutable being. If ever space had not existed, God at that time would have been nowhere; and hence he either created space later (in which he was not himself), or else, which is no less repugnant to reason, he created his own ubiquity.262 Thus time is a being which is immutable and infinite, and is extended without being divisible. It is a special kind of accident which shares its properties with its subject: God. Being an effect of God, the first existing being, time (and space) pre-exist material being, and thus, as Newton says, they approach \"more nearly to the nature of a substance.\" Newton, if anything, retreats from full blown temporal absolutism, and his popular standing as absolutist par excellence is undeserved. Some treatments of Newton in contemporary philosophy While this study is concerned with the history of philosophy, and not with more recent philosophy, an understanding of the intellectual history of absolute time goes quite some way toward solving some problems with Newton's absolutism which have been 260 Note the similarity to Peter Aureole, which I discussed in Chapter Two: \"At the instant in which I am speaking, in this same present instant, the king of the Tartars sits; therefore there is no present instant for us and another for the Tartars.\" Peter Aureole, Commentariorum in secundum librum Sententiarum, dist. II, queast. I, art. 4, (p.41), quoted in Duhem, Medieval Cosmology, p. 304. 261 Newton, ibid., p. 137. 262 Ibid., p. 137. 157 the focus of a number of modern philosophers. By ignoring the importance of absolutism to earlier philosophy (prior to and outside of Newton's work), these accounts skew the intellectual history of the period, resulting in a misreading of the role absolutism played in the development of Newton's philosophy. The following discussion is primarily about space (the key concern of Newton's twentieth century critics) but has obvious bearings on time also. John Earman provides a typical example of the kind of argument often pursued in 20th century philosophical literature on absolutism: ... Newton's reasoning is a paradigm case of scientific theorising; a theoretical construct, absolute space, is postulated in order to make possible a general account of the motion of bodies and in particular to explain certain actually observed phenomena...263 Such a view is at odds with what I would argue is the more reasonable description of events: absolute time and space were, by Newton's time, a regular feature of the Gassendist atomistic philosophic program within which Newton was working. That Newton also took up absolute space and time is totally unsurprising. Newton, however, was able to use the tools he had inherited (absolutism) to make much better sense of certain dynamical entities-such as the law of inertia-than previous thinkers had been able to achieve. Mach's criticism, that \"this absolute time ... is neither a practical nor a scientific value; and no one is justified in saying he knows aught about it. It is an idle metaphysical conception,\"264 is trite from the perspective of the historical context. Absolute time and space were integral parts of the metaphysics of Newton's philosophy and, if the way they make sense of the law of inertia is brought into consideration, they are extremely practical. Consider how neatly Newton, with an absolute spatio-temporal reference frame at his disposal, is able to undermine Descartes' attempted law of inertia: Lastly, that the absurdity [of Descartes' relationalism] may be disclosed in full measure, I say that thence it follows that a moving body has no determinate velocity and no definite line in which it moves. And, what is worse, that the velocity of a body 263 Earman, \"Who's Afraid of Absolute Space,\" Australasian Journal of Philosophy, 1970, p. 296 264Mach, The Science of Mechanics, Open Court, 1960, p. 273. 158 moving without resistance cannot be said to be uniform, nor the line said to be straight in which its motion is accomplished. On the contrary, there cannot be motion since there can be no motion without a certain velocity and determination.265 Within the absolutist strain of the atomistic philosophy, motion becomes something that can be dealt with mathematically and exactly-something which can, indeed, be 'real.' Other 20th century philosophers try to 'excuse' the few overt examples of Newton's metaphysics among his published papers by interpreting them as mere illustrative devices used it for the purposes of exposition only. For example, Stephen Toulmin, in his 1959 \"Criticism in the History of Science: Newton on Absolute Space, Time and Motion (I & II),\" proposes that Newton's absolute space and time serve a merely axiomatic purpose within the Principia. Toulmin proposes that, in the Principia, Newton is at pains to distinguish between relative or apparent motion, and true motion (the kind which effects, and is affected by, forces and so on). Toulmin contends that Newton only posited absolute time and space as entities in so far as they help us distinguish between these two types of motion-there is no need to suppose they held a deeper meaning for Newton: ...one need no more assert that Newton was committed by his theory of dynamics to the objective existence of a cosmic substratum called \"absolute space\" than one need say that a geometer, in formulating his axiom-system, is committed to the quasimaterial existence of an invisible network of geometrical entities interpenetrating the material world, which alone are for him the true straight lines and circles. In either case the question of \"objective existence\" is a red herring.266 For Toulmin, this is a \"happier\" reading of Newton than those which have him attributing real existence to absolute space and time.267 The idea that Newton believed in a real difference between kinds of motion ('apparent,' and 'true'), but did not believe in the objective reality of space and time, is, certainly, an interesting thesis. It is, however, mistaken. 265 Newton, De gravitationione et aequipondio fluidorum,\" in Unpublished Scientific Papers. Translation Halland Hall, ibid., p. 140. 266 Toulmin, \"Criticism in the History of Science: Newton on Absolute Space, Time and Motion (I & II),\" The Philosophical Review, Vol. 68, January and April, 1959, p. 24. 267 Toulmin, ibid. p. 10. 159 His discussion of Newton's rotating bucket experiment makes Toulmin's position clear. Toulmin argues that the experiment is designed only to show that there are two different situations we can be speaking of when we discuss motion. We are familiar with Descartes' assertion that all motion is relative. With the bucket experiment, Toulmin argues, Newton seeks to show that this is not the case, but rather that 'true' motions have a different ontological status to the merely relative. Sometimes motion is only apparent (in which case we will detect no forces at work in the apparently moving body), and sometimes motion is 'real' (in which case we detect forces such as that which makes the surface of the water in our rotating bucket more or less concave). This part of Toulmin's argument should be uncontroversial. Toulmin goes on to assert, however, that this experiment in no way implies, or is intended to imply, that absolute space and time are themselves real. They are merely tools for discussing and thinking about real and apparent motions. Toulmin chastises Mach and other critics of Newton for suggesting the experiment is designed to demonstrate \"the objective existence of a bogus entity, whereas nothing in the passage itself claims more than the dynamical indispensability of a conceptual distinction.\"268 For Toulmin: The problem of absolute space, which is so often treated as though it were a metaphysical one, has in fact been bedevilled by the injection of metaphysical issues... Both Newton's disciples and his critics have been free in their use of the blanket-nouns \"Space\" and \"Time,\" and have used them with little circumspection: they have, in particular, allowed themselves to become preoccupied with one question whose consequences have been only obfuscating-the question whether absolute space and absolute time really exist.269 Nor should the aether be understood as a realisation of absolute space: ...no natural reference-frame, however perfect, could properly be identified with Newton's 'absolute space.' Even supposing that there were an ether... this would be, logically speaking, only one more possible reference-frame providing measures of 268 ibid., p. 27. 269 ibid., p. 23. 160 position, velocity, and the like. It could never, without a category mistake, be said to be absolute space.270 In Toulmin's view, Newton's use of an absolute, real spatiotemporal reference frame should only be understood as a best-case approximation of the conceptual arena in which his theoretical dynamics takes place. Absolute space and time are \"the common ideal toward which both terrestrial and celestial motions-pendulums and satellites- are found to approximate.\"271 Toulmin also makes use of Newton's language in the Scholium to support his thesis, suggesting Newton's use of phrases such as \"if the expression may be allowed,\" \"as it were,\" and the constant differentiation between speaking of 'sensible' or 'mathematical' measures suggests that he is shying away from any suggestion that space and time be considered real.272 Toulmin's argument is philosophically plausible. It relies, however, on an argument to the best explanation: 1) the metaphysical basis of absolute space and time is distasteful to us 20th century philosophers; 2) it is possible to interpret Newton in such a way as to avoid seeing him as committed to the reality of space and time, therefore, 3) let us suppose that Newton was not, in fact, a believer in the reality of space and time. As we have seen, many of Newton's predecessors, as well as his contemporaries, were, in fact, committed to the reality of space and time, as was Newton, as the historical evidence shows. Toulmin's thesis is fascinating, and it is perhaps unfair to criticise him too heavily as it was written before important unpublished works by Newton, such as De gravitatione came to light. Toulmin's argument, however, is mirrored in a more recent article, Robert Rynasiewicz' 1995 \"By their Properties, Causes and effects: Newton's Scholium on Time, Space, Place and Motion.\" Rynasiewicz does not refer explicitly to Toulmin, but his own claim is somewhat similar. Like Toulmin, Rynasiewicz targets critics of Newton's apparent absolutism, like Mach, drawing his bow wider to including both philosophers and historians: Reichenbach, Sklar, Earman, Jammer, Burtt, Westfall and Koyré. Says Rynasiewicz: the criticisms posed by these writers have \"been 270 ibid., p. 21-2. 271 ibid., p. 17. 272 ibid., pp 10-18. 161 largely wasted effort if what is at stake is an understanding of Newton himself rather than the construction of some fictitious advocate of absolutism.\"273 Like Toulmin, Rynasiewicz argues that all Newton wants to show in the Scholium to the Principia is that there are 'real' motions and 'apparent' motions-that \"the main object is to adduce grounds for believing that the absolute quantities [of motion] are indeed distinct from their relative measures and are not reducible to them.\"274 Rynasiewicz takes a very close reading of the Scholium, paragraph by paragraph. He also goes to great lengths to substantiate his thesis through an examination of Newton's language. This discussion centres on Newton's use of the Latin definire, which is often translated in Motte's English edition of the Principia as 'to determine,' but could, arguably more properly, be rendered as 'to define.'275 This difficulty of language presents an interesting problem. Rynasiewicz shows that 17th Century English allowed an even greater overlap in meaning between the verbs 'to define' and 'to determine' than modern English usage.276 Further, it seems that Newton himself was not systematic in his choice of the Latin determinare and definare. Rynasiewicz believes that Newton is not trying to distinguish absolute motion from relative motion (and to prove by deduction the existence of absolute space) in his well known thought experiment with the rotating bucket, but rather, contra Descartes, to show that true motion is not a special case of relational motion, and thus cannot be defined with reference to relational motion. There is certainly no doubt that in some sections of the Scholium, the choice of 'to determine', in the sense of 'to distinguish empirically,'277 and 'to define,' in the sense of 'to differentiate [from some other thing],' has an important bearing on our understanding of what Newton is trying to do. Rynasiewicz ends up having a bet each way-saying it is \"fictitious\" to paint Newton as an \"advocate of absolutism\" but equivocating about the true metaphysical nature of the at least geometrically absolute space Newton espouses. 273 Robert Rynasiewicz, \"By their Properties, Causes and effects: Newton's Scholium on Time, Space, Place and Motion-I. The Text,\", Studies in the History and Philosophy of Science, Vol. 26, No. 1, 1995, p. 133. Note that this is a different article to \"By their Properties... -II. The Context,\" cited earlier.ibid. 274Rynasiewicz, ibid., p. 151. 275 ibid., pp 138-9; 151-3. 276 ibid., p. 152. 277 ibid., p. 138. 162 There certainly seems to be something to these claims. It is uncontroversial that Newton had his sights set on Descartes when he fired off the General Scholium to the Principia. Unpublished sources such as De Gravitatione make it clear that Newton's problem with Descartes' physics was his unsatisfactory discussions about motion, which Descartes considered to be purely relational in all its forms, making his attempted law of inertia all but senseless. Works such as those of Toulmin and Rynasiewicz remind us that it is not the existence per se of absolute space and time which Newton is at pains to make clear in the Scholium to the Principia. What he wants us to take away from his discussion of these entities is an understanding of the difference between 'real' accelerations which require forces, and purely relational motions, which serve descriptive and comparative purposes only. Lamenting the proclivity of some modern philosophers to treat historical works of philosophy in theoretic isolation may seem trite, and arguing that philosophers do not share the interests of historians may be somewhat of a straw man. The issue is not so simple however: for how is one to properly attempt an analysis of a philosophical claim without couching that claim in its (historical) philosophical conceptual scheme? In contradistinction to the interpretations of Newton's treatment of absolute time sketched above, for example, consider the efficacy of the more nuanced understanding of Newton's metaphysics provided by Richard T. Arthur in his paper on Newton's fluxions.278 After a considered examination of the theories of substantial time inherited by Newton from Gassendi/Charleton, as well as a discussion of a possible debt to Barrow, Arthur shows how Newton's fluxions, like his physics, stem from his understanding of time and space, which in turn can in no way be considered a Machian \"idle metaphysical conception.\" Argues Arthur: By comparing [Newton's] work with its precedents in Gassendi and Barrow ...one can see that this mathematical work [i.e. the fluxions] is not independent of his physics, but rests on the same ontological framework: Newton's neo-Platonic concepts of space and time, his geometric physics, and his new mathematics of continuously generated flowing quantities are all bound together in one seamless whole.279 278 Richard T. Arthur, \"Newton's Fluxions and equably Flowing Time,\" Studies in the History and Philosophy of Science, vol. 26, no. 2, 1995, pp. 323-451. 279 Arthur, ibid, p. 326. 163 Arthur demonstrates, for example, that it is only with an understanding of Newton's ontology of time that we can appreciate the important differences between his fluxions and Leibniz's differentials. Whereas Leibniz must invent infinitesimals that he himself regards as fictitious, and then derive real ratios between them, Newton, because of his understanding of time as an absolute flow, is able to derive sequential ratios between real temporal points,280 as Newton himself recognised: I found the method not upon sums & differences, but upon the solution of this probleme: By knowing the Quantities generated in time to find their fluxions. And this is done by finding not prima momenta but primes momentorum nascentium rationes... This Method is derived immediately from Nature her self, that of indivisibles, Leibnitian differences or infinitely small quantities not so.281 Arthur's approach, which takes seriously the metaphysics supporting Newton's mathematics and physics, adds to our understanding of Newton's ideas, unlike the work of Toulmin and Rynasiewicz, which leads us further astray. Toulmin and Rynasiewicz remind us that too many commentators on Newton's work mis-aim their critiques by narrowing their focus to the existence of the absolutes to the exclusion of all else. By not appealing to the broader intellectual milieu of Newton's time, the arguments of Toulmin and Rynasiewicz (and Mach, Reichenbach, et al) expose their weak spot. Why should we believe that Newton spoke of absolute space and time in a special, limited sense (which has the benefit of not offending modern metaphysical sensibilities), when his writing is almost indiscernible from that of more obvious absolutists-Gassendi, Charleton, More? Conclusion There are a number of comments worth making about the radical shift in the definition of time of More and Newton. Firstly, what is radical about it is that it is a reversion to models of time which have time as an attribute of real being. Because (thanks to Gassendi), the eternal realm is now co-located with our own everyday world of generation and corruption, God is himself a 'real' being in our normal sense 280 ibid., 343. 281 Newton, from a 1714 draft of a peice later published posthumously in Philosophical Transactions, quoted in Arthur, ibid., p. 343. 164 of the word. His ubiquity is as real-and of the same ontological class of 'real'-as our being. For Gassendi, More and Newton, God is immanent, not transcendent. While the scholastics defined space-or more properly place-as the extension of a body, so too do More and Newton define it as mere extension. For them, however, it is an attribute of the divine extension. Equally, just as earlier thinkers believed time to be the duration of a mode of existence (the motion a body undergoes), so for More and Newton duration is an attribute of the mode of continued existence of God. Thus More and Newton's time and space are not radical as being the first considered espousals of a truly independent and absolute space and time-that honour goes to Gassendi. More is most concerned with the spiritual properties of being, and Newton publicly shy of supporting a definitive metaphysics, yet between them we can find a concept of substantial being (God) capable ontologically of supporting time as an attribute. Thus the journey started by early scholastic philosophers, who moved away from relational theories of time as they could not find a suitable subject for it, comes to its end when that subject is found, by removing God from the neo-Platonic eternity where he was thought to rule transcendently, to the physical world of change and decay where he was still described as perfect, but said to rule nature through his immanent contact with it in space and time. 165 Conclusion Newton's characterisation of absolute time in the Principia, and his claim that time \"...from its own nature, flows equably without relation to anything external...,\" as well as his corresponding characterisation of absolute space, have been seen by a number of modern philosophers as a post hoc metaphysical claim made to justify the dynamical requirements of aspects of his physics, for example the law of inertia, which requires the existence of absolute equable motions, which in turn presuppose an absolute spatiotemporal reference frame. Such a view is incorrect. Rather, the success of Newton's dynamics can more plausibly be seen as resting on his early acceptance of an absolutist metaphysics of space and time which was popular among a number of his contemporaries, and of which he was neither the originator, nor even the most radical proponent. This study investigated key moments in the long development of the theory that time is absolute, from early proposals in the thirteenth century up to the popularisation of the theory in the seventeenth century. The history of the idea of absolute time is characterised by two key concerns, evident throughout the development of the concept, the one metaphysical and the other theological. The metaphysical concern relates to the problem of finding a place for time in the scholastic and post-scholastic categories of being. The theosophical concerns encompass biblical exegesis, the description of God as transcendent or immanent in nature, and the physical attributes of God (if any). The five century long philosophical tussle over these problems saw a move away from the notion that time is an attribute of physical motion(s) to the radical absolutism of Pierre Gassendi, and finally the acceptance by More and Newton that time is in fact an attribute after all- an attribute of the immanent and extended God. The problem of finding a place for time within the categories of being is present in the work of all the philosophers discussed in this thesis, perhaps with the exception of Duns Scotus and Aureole. Aristotle provides an early example of one of the key problems medieval and Renaissance philosophers faced in defining time qua esse, 166 when he remarks in the Physics that time does not seem capable of substantial existence: Some of [time] is past and no longer exists, and the rest is in the future and does not yet exist; and all time... is entirely made up of the no-longer and the not-yet; and how can we conceive of that which is composed of non-existents sharing in existence in any way? (217b 34 – 218a 3) Aristotle falls back on a definition of time as an attribute rather than a substance, eventually describing it as ontologically parasitic upon motion. Even then, however, he faced logical difficulties in accounting for the temporality of resting objects, and the apparent unity of time in a world comprised of a multitude of motions-problems that remained a concern for later thinkers. For later scholastic philosophers considering Aristotle's theory of time, however, these two problems are not the main issue, for the popular interpretation of Aristotle followed that of Averroes, who, by positing the stellar motion as the seat of time, solved the problem of accounting for the multiplicity of motion and removed the difficulty of accounting for resting bodies. Averroes, however, presented a different kind of problem to scholastic philosophers, and one which necessitated, for some, the first tentative proposals that time may be physically absolute: while Averroes' theory (or rather his interpretation of Aristotle's theory) was metaphysically unproblematic it jarred glaringly with biblical evidence, which was commonly treated as historically accurate. Averroes asserted that if the motion of heaven were to cease, time would also freeze: [W]hen motion is sensed, time is sensed primarily and essentially. It is by reason of motion [that] we sense ourselves to be in a changeable existence, and to be changeable ourselves, because we are in this existence. ... It is on that account that we sense time primarily, and it is manifest that we do not sense ourselves to be in a changeable existence except through the transmutation of heaven. If heaven stood still, it would be possible for us to exist in an unchanging existence-but that is impossible.282 282Averroes, Aristotelis Opera, 179B. .\"..motus igitur, qui cum sentitur, sentitur primo, & essentialiter tempus, est motus, ex quo sentimus nos esse in esse transmutabili, & nos transmutari, quia sumus in hoc esse...est illud, ex quo sequitur nos sentire tempus primo. & manifestum est quod nos non sentimus nos esse in esse transmutabili, nisi ex transmutatione coeli. &. si esset possibile ipsum quiescere, esset possibile nos esse in esse non transmutabili: sed hoc est impossible...\" My translation. 167 Averroes' theory of time as emanating from heaven necessitates the outcome he observes. Patently, such a theory of time conflicts with a literal reading of Joshua X 13: On the day on which the Lord delivered the Armorites to Israel Joshua said to the Lord in the presence of the children of Israel: \"Oh sun, move not over Gibeon, Oh moon, over the valley of Aijalon.\" And the sun and moon stood still while the nation avenged itself on its enemies. So it is written in the Book of the Just. Thus the sun stood, in the middle of heaven, and did not set for the space of one day. Neither before nor since has there been so long a day, with the Lord obeying the voice of man, and fighting for Israel.283 If this passage were to be taken as historically accurate, then time cannot be an effect of heavenly motion, a matter of deduction observed by thinkers from St Augustine to Suárez. For early scholastic philosophers like Duns Scotus and Aureole, the 'Joshua problem' forced a retreat from attributive theories of time and the tentative proposal the time may, in fact, be without a physical cause. This retreat stemmed from the lack of a proper subject for time, were it to be considered an accident, or attribute, of a substantial being. Aristotle had considered the possible subjects for time to be either motions of the soul (thought), motion in general, or the first stellar motion. Having dismissed the first possibility as unsuitable, and Averroes having given sound arguments against the second, the evidence from Joshua left no apparent subject for time remaining. Duns Scotus' and Aureole's assertions that time may be uncaused resolved the problem of a literal biblical exegesis, but left open the problem of accounting for time metaphysically. In the work of William of Ockham, this problem is pursued mercilessly. Having left no metaphysical stone unturned in the quest to find a suitable subject for time, or a way of assessing time to be a substance itself, Ockham concludes that time does not, in fact, exist-that it is not something \"distinct from all 283AuBiblia Latina (Vulgate) cum Glossa Ordinaria, p. 447. \"Tunc locutus est io sue si die qua tradidit ammorreum in conspectu filioru israel. dixitquam coram eis. Sol contra gabaan ne mouearis et luna contra vallem baylon steteruntquam sol et luna donec ulciferetur se gens de inimicis suis. Nonne scriptum est hoc in libro iustorum. Stetit ita quam sol in medio caeli et non factinavit occumbere spacio unius diei. Non fuit antea nec postea tam longa dies obediente domino voci homis et pugnante pro israel.\" My translation, 168 permanent things\" (distincta ab omni res permanentes) \"as the moderns say,\" 284 (aiming this criticism at Duns Scotus) but rather that it \"is only a definition that expresses the sense of the word, as the definition one can give to verbs, conjunctions, adverbs, etc.\" 285 Taking a nominalist approach, Ockham denies time a place in the categories of being altogether. The pivotal stage in the development of absolute time occurs in the work of the late scholastic philosopher Francisco Suárez. Suárez had a dualistic account of time, arguing that there is one kind of time that is intrinsic to bodies, enabling their successive existence to be predicated of something intimate to their being, but also that there is another sort of time, 'extrinsic time,' or the 'immutable flux.' Suárez took this approach in order to preserve time in its place within the traditional categories of being as something attributed to substances: quando, or 'time when.' Striving against nominalist accounts of time, like Ockham's, Suárez was intent to predicate each body's temporality as something intrinsic to that body. While this element of Suárez's approach to time has its roots in scholastic classifications of being (Suárez's key work, the Metaphysical disputation is a systematic reconsideration of the Aristotelian categories), the second half of his theory of time, the 'immutable flux' or 'imaginary time' is difficult to distinguish from that of early-modern philosophers such as Newton-Suárez's account of the immutable flux has all the hallmarks of more developed absolutism. He calls it uncaused, necessary in its own existence, and defined solely by its immutable ordering: ...flowing imaginary space is conceived as entirely necessary and immutable in its own flux [omnino necessarium et immutabile in suo fluxu], and therefore its part, once understood as past, cannot be understood as returning. For that space, ...is conceived as entirely necessary and uncaused [non causatum], [and] ought even to be conceived as having an intrinsic necessity in flowing, by the order of its own parts...286 Yet we should not consider that because Suárez calls this time 'imaginary' that it is a figment of the imagination. Rather, as I argue in the chapter on Suárez, it is termed imaginary as it can only be apprehended through appeal to reason, and that because it 284Ockham, Quaestiones in Libros Physicorum Aristotelis, pp. 543-45. 285Ockham, Tractus de Successivus, cap. II, fol. 139, col. b, p. 120. Passage translated into English in Pierre Duhem, ibid., p. 306. 286 Suárez, Metaphysical Disputations, Disputation 50, Section IX \"Whether the Time in a Thing is Distinguished From Motion\"-Extract from 'Vera Responsio.' My translation. 169 is lacking in substantial form.287 Again, we can see how the difficulty of either describing time as a properly existing substance, or of finding a substance of which it may be an attribute, shaped the development of theories of absolute time. The key moment in the development of theories of absolute time comes in the later work of the neo-Epicurean atomist, Pierre Gassendi. Gassendi is arguably the only thinker to put forward a theory of time (and, indeed, space) which is truly and straight-forwardly absolute. Certainly thinkers such as Bruno and Telesio appear to believe time to be uncaused, but their doctrines comprise mere assertion, whereas Gassendi's treatment of the ontology of time is extensive, considered and reasoned. A life-long critic of the Aristotelian scholastics, Gassendi did away with the traditional categories altogether, proposing that time and space are neither substance nor attribute but between them constitute a separate kind of being, saying: ...place and time do not depend upon bodies and are not corporeal accidents... [since] even if there were no bodies there would still remain both an unchanging place and an evolving time. [All being] is either substance or accident, or place, in which all substances or accidents exist, or time, in which all substances and all accidents endure.288 For the ancient Epicureans, whom Gassendi sought to follow, nature was constituted of atoms and the void, all actions taking place in an absolute-like space. However, the Epicureans (like other ancient philosophers, including Aristotle and Plato) saw time as relational. For the Epicureans, time was an aspect of the motion of atoms. Gassendi's addition of absolute time to the Epicurean metaphysics of nature was a novel and radical proposal, providing the basis for the ontology of time of later thinkers such a Newton and More. In the work of Newton and More we see something perhaps unexpected: a return to the notion that time is, in fact an accident of being. After a lifetime of consideration and reflection about the nature of God, Henry More decided that God, immanent in the actions of nature, must also be physically extended. This view was unlike that of Gassendi, who believed that God was 'whole in every part' of nature. More 287Suárez, On Beings of Reason, (Disp. 54, translated by John P. Doyle), IV, 7, p. 95. 288 Gassendi, Syntagma, Sec. 1, Bk. 2, Chap. 1, translated by Craig B. Brush ibid., p. 384. 170 concluded that space and time are in fact attributes of the temporally and spatially extended God, describing them as: ...that inmost extension or amplitude which will necessarily remain after we have imagined all matter, or whatever else is removeable, removed or exterminated our of the world, is to be look'd upon as the permanent expansion or amplitude of the radical essentiality of God.289 While Newton's writings on the ontology of time are not as numerous as Mores, some of Newton's unpublished manuscripts point to a likely influence of More upon Newton in regard to the nature of God and time. Newton also considered space and time to be attributes of God, echoing More in his contention that God's spatial and temporal infinity constitute space and time: [God] is Eternal and Infinite, Omnipotent and Omniscient; that is, his duration reaches from Eternity to Eternity; his presence from Infinity to Infinity; he governs all things, and knows all things that are or can be done. He is not Eternity and Infinity, but Eternal and Infinite; he is not Duration and Space, but he endures and is present. He endures forever, and is every where present; and, by existing always and every where, he constitutes Duration and Space.290 Thus we see that Newton's absolute space and time is not his alone, but a theory held by a number of his contemporaries. Nor can Newton's absolutism be considered a hallmark of absolutism: Newton's absolutism is mitigated. He did not believe space and time to be uncaused, but merely uncaused by corporeal being. For Newton space and time are attributes-as they were for Aristotle. 289 More, Divine Dialogues, pp 448-9. 290 Newton, General Scholium to the Principia Mathematica; Andrew Motte translation (1729), p.6. 171 Bibliography Adams, Marilyn McCord, William Ockham, vol. II, Notre Dame, University of Notre Dame Press, 1987. Anzulewicz, Henryk, \"Aeternitas – aevum – tempus. The Concept of Time in the System of Albert the Great,\" in The Medieval Concept of Time: The Scholastic Debate and its Reception in Early Modern Philosophy, Pasquale Porro, ed., Leiden, Brill, 2001. Aquinas, Commentary on Aristotle's Physics, Introduction by Vernon J. Bourke, trans. R. J. Blackwell, R. J. Spath and W. E. Thirlkel, London, Routledge & Kegan Paul, 1963. Aquinas, De Aeternitate Mundi, in S. Thomae Aquinatis Opera Omnia, (vol. 3), Stuttgart, Frommann-Holzboog, 1980, work 034 OCM, pp. 291-2. Aquinas, On the Power of God (Quaestiones Disputatae de Potentia Dei), (three vols.), trans. the English Dominican Fathers, London, Burns Oates and Washbourne Ltd, 1933. Aquinas, Quaestiones Quodlibetales, in S. Thomae Aquinatis Opera Omnia, (vol. 3), Stuttgart, Frommann-Holzboog, 1980, work 019 QDL, pp. 438-500. Ariotti, Piero, \"Celestial Reductionism of Time\", Studi Internazionali di Filosophia, August 1972, pp. 91-120. Ariotti, Piero, \"Toward Absolute Time: Continental Antecedents of the Newtonian Conception of Absolute Time\", Studi Internazionali di Filosophia, v. 5, 1973. Ariotti, Piero, \"Toward Absolute Time: the Undermining and Refutation of the Aristotelian Conception of Time in the Sixteenth and Seventeenth Centuries\", Annals of Science, vol. 30, 1973, pp. 31-50. Aristotle, \"Categoriae\", The Works of Aristotle, ed. W. D. Ross, English trans. E. M. Edghill, Oxford, Clarendon Press, 1928. Aristotle, \"Κατηγοριαι\", Organon, edidit Theodorus Waitz, Lipsiae, Sumtibus Hahnii, 1844. Aristotle, On the Heavens, English trans. Stuart Leggatt, Warminster, Aris & Phillips, 1995. Aristotle, Physics, Loeb Edition in Greek (2 vols), and English trans. Philip H. Wicksteed & Francis M. Cornford, London, Heinemann, 1929. Arthur, Richard T., \"Newton's Fluxions and Equably Flowing Time,\" Studies in the History and Philosophy of Science, vol. 26, no. 2, 1995, pp. 323-451. Averroes, Aristotelis Opera cum Averrois Commentarius, Vol. IV, (Latin Text), Venetiis apud Junctas, 1562, facsimile edition, Frankfurt, Minerva, 1962. 172 Averroes, Averroes' Middle Commentaries on Aristotle's Categories and De Interpretation, with an introduction by Charles E. Butterworth, Princeton, Princeton University Press, 1983. Averroes, Averroes' Questions in Physics, from the unpublished Sefer ha-derusim hatib iyim, English translation Helen Tunik Goldstein, Dordecht, Kluwer Academic Publishers, 1991. Averroes, De Substantia Orbis, Hebrew text with English translation and commentary by Arthur Hyman, Cambridge, Medieval Academy of America and Israel Academy of Sciences and Humanities, 1986. Biblia Latina cum Glossa Ordinaria, (facsimile reprint, editio princeps Adolph Rusch, Strassburg, 1480/81), Turnhout, Brepols, 1992. Boehner, O. F. M., \"Introduction\", Ockham, William, Philosophical Writings, translated with an Introduction by Philotheus Boehner, (revised by Stephen Brown), Indianapolis, Hackett, 1990. Bourke, Vernon J., \"Introduction,\" to Aquinas, Commentary on Aristotle's Physics, J. Blackwell, R. J. Spath and W. E. Thirlkel, London, Routledge & Kegan Paul, 1963. Brundell, Barry, Pierre Gassendi: From Aristotelianism to a New Natural Philosophy, Dordrecht, D. Reidel Publishing Company, 1987. Čapek, Milič and Emge, Walter, (eds) The Concepts of Space and Time, Boston, Reidel, 1976. Čapek, Milič, \"The Conflict Between the Absolutist and the Relational Theory of Time Before Newton\", Journal of the History of Ideas, vol. 48, 1987, pp. 595-608. Charleton, Walter, Epicuro-Gassendo-Charletoniana, or, A fabrick of science natural, upon the hypothesis of atoms founded by Epicurus, repaired by Petrus Gassendus, augmented by Walter Charleton, New York, Johnson Reprint Corp., 1966. Clagett, Marshall, The Science of Mechanics in the Middle Ages, Madison, University of Wisconsin Press, 1959 Copleston, Frederick, A History of Philosophy: Volume 1, Greece and Rome, New York, Newman Press, 1971. Cornish, Denis, \"Aristotle's Attempted Derivation of Temporal Order from That of Movement and Space\", Phronesis, vol. 21, 1976, pp. 241-51. Daniel, Stephen H., \"Seventeenth-Century Scholastic Treatments of Time\", Journal of the History of Ideas, vol. 42, 4, 1981, pp. 587-606. Davidson, Herbert A., Alfarbi Avicenna, and Averroes, On Intellect: Their Cosmologies, Theories of the Active Intellect, and Theories of Human Intellect, New York, Oxford University Press, 1992. Deason, G.B., \"Reformation Theology and the Mechanistic Conception of Nature,\" in D.C. Lindberg and R.L. Numbers eds, God and Nature: Historical Essays on the Encounter Between Christianity and Science, Berkeley, University of California Press, 1986, pp. 167-191. 173 Debus, Allen G., Man and Nature in the Renaissance, Cambridge, Cambridge University Press. 1978. Descartes, The Principles of Philosophy, in The Philosophical Works of Descartes, translated by Elizabeth S Haldane and G.R.T. Ross, (in two volumes), Cambridge, Cambridge University Press, 1967. Doyle, John P., \"Introduction\" to Suárez, On Beings of Reason, Milwaukee, Marquette University Press, 1995. Duhem, Pierre, Le Système du Monde: Histoire des Doctrines Cosmologiques de Platon a Copernic, Tome VII, \"Le Physique Parisienne au XIVe Siècle,\" Paris : Hermann, 1959. Duhem, Pierre, Medieval Cosmology: Theories of Infinity, Place, Time, Void, and the Plurality of Worlds, edited and translated by Roger Ariew, Chicago, University of Chicago Press, 1985. Duns Scotus, John, Quaestiones Quodlibetales, in Opera Omnia-Editio Nova, (apud Ludovicum Vives, MDCCCXCV), reprinted Westmead, Gregg International Publishers, 1969. Duns Scotus, John, Queastiones in Quartum Librum Sententiarum (Scriptum Oxonensis), in Opera Omnia-Editio Nova, (apud Ludovicum Vives, MDCCCXCV), reprinted Westmead, Gregg International Publishers, 1969. Earman, John, \"Who's Afraid of Absolute Space,\" Australasian Journal of Philosophy, 1970, pp. 287-319. Easterling, H. J., \"The Unmoved Mover in Early Aristotle\", Phronesis, vol. 21, 1976, pp. 252-66. Epicurus, \"Letter to Herodotus,\" in Diogenes Laertius, Lives and Opinions of the Eminent Philosophers, translation and Introduction R. D. Hicks, Loeb, 1925. Fortin, Ernest L., and O'Neill, Peter D., (translators), \"Condemnation of 219 Propositions\", in Medieval Political Philosophy: a Sourcebook, R. Lerner and M. Mahdi (eds), Toronto, Collier-Macmillan Canada, Ltd., 1963, pp. 335-54. Frank, William A., and Wolter, A. B., Duns Scotus: Metaphysician, West Lafayette, Purdue University Press, 1995. Freddoso, Alfred J., \"Introduction,\" in, Suárez, Francisco, On Efficient Causality: Metaphysical Disputations 17, 18, and 19, Yale University Press, 1994. G. A. J. Rogers, \"Locke, Newton, and the Cambridge Platonists on Innate Ideas,\" Journal of the History of Ideas, Vol. 40, No. 2., Apr. Jun., 1979, pp. 191205. Gassendi, Pierre, Syntagma Philosophicum (pars secunda, quae est Physica), Sectio Prima, Liber II, De Loco & Tempore, seu spatio, & duratione Rerum, Opera omnia, Faksimile-Neudruck der Ausgabe von Lyon 1658, Stuttgart-Bad Cannstatt, F. Frommann, 1964. Gassendi, Pierre, The collected works of Pierre Gassendi, edited and translated by Craig B. Brush, New York, Johnson Reprint Corporation, 1972. Goddu, André, The Physics of William of Ockham, Leiden, E. J. Brill, 1984. 174 Gracia, Jorge, \"Francisco Suárez, the Man in History\", American Catholic Philosophical Quarterly, vol. 65 (3), 1991, pp. 259-266. Grant, Edward, Much Ado About Nothing: Theories of Space and Vacuum from the Middle Ages to the Scientific Revolution, Cambridge, Cambridge University Press, 1981. Harris, C. R. S., Duns Scotus, (two vols.), Bristol, Thoemmes Press, 1994. Henry, John, \"A Cambridge Platonist's Materialism: Henry More and the Concept of Soul,\" Journal of the Warburg and Courtauld Institutes, Vol. 49, 1986, pp. 172-195. Hicks, R.D., \"Introduction,\" in Diogenes Laertius, Lives and Opinions of the Eminent Philosophers, Loeb, 1925. Hutchison, Keith, \"Supernaturalism and the Mechanical Philosophy,\" History of Science, xxi, 1983, pp 297-333. Hutton, Sarah, 'Some Renaissance Critiques of Aristotle's Theory of Time', Annals of Science, 34, 1977, 345-63. Kargon, Robert. \"Walter Charleton, Robert Boyle, and the Acceptance of Epicurean Atomism in England,\" Isis, 55, 1964, pp 184–192. Kilwardby, Robert, On Time and Imagination, introduction and translation by Alexander Broadie, Oxford, Oxford University Press, 1993. Knowles, David, The Evolution of Medieval Thought, London, Longman, 1988. Kogan, Barry S., Averroes and the Metaphysics of Causation, Albany, State University of New York Press, 1985. Koyré, Alexandre, From the closed world to the infinite universe, Baltimore, Johns Hopkins University Press, 1968. Laertius, Diogenes, Lives and Opinions of the Eminent Philosophers, translation with an introduction by R.D. Hicks, Loeb, 1925. Lawton, William Cranston, The Classical Review, Vol. 13, No. 2, Mar., 1899, pp. 100-109. Leff, Gordon, William of Ockham, Manchester, Manchester University Press, 1975. Lennon, Thomas M., The Battle of Gods and Giants: the Legacies of Descartes and Gassendi, Princeton, Princeton University Press, 1993. Lettinck, P., Aristotle's Physics and its Reception in the Arabic World, Leiden, E.J. Brill, 1994. Locke, John, An Essay Concerning Human Understanding, London, William Tegg, Thirty-Eighth Edition. Lucretius, De Rerum Natura, translated by R.E. Latham, London, Penguin, 1994. MacClintock, Stuart, \"Averroes\", Encyclopedia of Philosophy, New York, Macmillan, 1967. Mach, Ernst, The Science of Mechanics, Open Court, 1960. Mason, Stephen, \"Religious Reform and the Pulmonary Transit of the Blood,\" History of Science, vol. 41, 2003, p.459-471. 175 Maurer, Armand A., Medieval Philosophy, New York, Random House, 1964. Mc Guire, J.E., \"Newton on Place Time and God: an Unpublished Source,\" British Journal for the History of Science, vol. 11, 1978, pp. 114-129. Mc Guire, J.E., \"Predicates of Pure Existence: Newton on God's Space and Time,\" Philosophical Perspectives on Newtonian Science, ed. Phillip Bricker and R.I.G. Hughes, Cambridge, MIT Press. Mc Guire, J.E., and Tamny, Martin, Certain Philosophical Questions: Newton's Trinity Notebook. Cambridge, Cambridge University Press, 1983. Mc Inerny, Ralph, Aquinas Against the Averroists, West Lafayette, Purdue University Press, 1993. More, Henry, \"Clarisimo Viro, Nobilisimoque Philosopho, Renato Descartes, Henricus Morus Anglus,\" Henry More: A Collection of Several Philosophical Writings, in Two Volumnes, Cambridge, James Flesher, 1662. Facsimile copy, New York, Garland Publishing Company, 1978, Vol. I, pp 71-81. More, Henry, The immortality of the soul, in Henry More: A Collection of Several Philosophical Writings, in Two Volumnes, (Cambridge, James Flesher, 1662. Facsimile copy, New York, Garland Publishing Company, 1978), vol. II, pp1-234. More, Henry, Enchiridium metaphysicam. Translated by Alexander Jacob, Henry More's Manual of Metaphysics: A Translation of the Enchiridium metaphysicam (1679) with an Introduction and Notes, Zürich, Georg Olms Verlag Hildesheim, 1995. More, Henry, The Argument of Democritus Platonissans or the Infinitie of Worlds, in A Platonick Song of the Soul, Cranbury, Associated University Presses Inc., 1998, pp 405-37. More, Henry, Divine Dialogues, Containing the Attributes and Providence of God, Glasgow, Robert Foulis, 1743. Newton, Isaac, Opticks: or a Treatise of the Reflections, Inflections and Colours of Light, (based on the fourth edition London 1730), New York, Dover Publications, 1952. Newton, Isaac, Sir Isaac Newton's Mathematical Principles of Natural Philosophy and his System of the World, translation Andrew Motte (1729), revised Florian Cajori, Berkeley, University of California Press, 1966. Newton, Isaac, \"De gravitatione et aequipondio fluidorum,\" in Unpublished Scientific Papers of Isaac Newton, ed. A. Rupert Hall and Mary Boas Hall, Cambridge, Cambridge University Press, 1962, English translation (accompanying Latin text) pp. 121-156. Newton, Isaac, De gravitatione et aequipondio fluidorum, Add. Ms. 4003, Cambridge University Library, UK. Available at The Newton Project University of Sussex, East Sussex website: http://www.newtonproject.sussex.ac.uk/texts/viewtext.php?id=THEM00093 &mode=normalized. Niermeyer, J. F., Mediae Latinitatis Lexicon Minus, Leiden, E.J. Brill, 1993. 176 Normore, Calvin G., \"Who was Condemned in 1277?\", Modern Schoolman, v. 72, 1995, pp. 273-281. Ockham, William, Philosophia Naturalis Guillielmi Occam, facsimile of the edition of 1637, Vaduz-Liechtenstein, Gregg Press, 1963. Ockham, William, Quaestiones in Libros Physicorum Aristotelis, in Guillelmi de Ockham, Opera Philosophica et Theologica, vol. 6, edidit Stephanus Brown, St. Bonaventure, Franciscan Institute, 1984, pp. 395-813. Ockham, William, Quodlibetal Questions, 2 vols, translated by Alfred J. Freddoso and Francis E. Kelly, New Haven, Yale University Press, 1991. Ockham, William, Summula Philosophiae Naturalis, in Guillelmi de Ockham, Opera Philosophica et Theologica, vol. 6, edidit Stephanus Brown, St. Bonaventure, Franciscan Institute, 1984, pp. 135-394. Oresme, Nicole, Le livre du ciel et du monde, edited by Albert D. Menut and Alexander J. Denomy, translated with an introduction by Albert D. Menut, Madison, University of Wisconsin Press, 1968. Osler, Margaret J., \"Providence and Divine Will in Gassendi's Views on Scientific Knowledge,\" Journal for the History of Ideas, vol. 44, 1983, pp. 549-560. Plato, \"Τιμαιοσ\", Greek, with French trans. Albert Rivaud, Paris, Societe D'Edition, 1963. Plato, Platonis Timaeus Interprete Chalcidio cum Eiusdem Commentario, ed. Ioh. Wrobel, (Lipsiae, B. G. Teubneri, 1876 ed.), Frankfurt, Minerva, 1963. Plato, Timaeus and Critias, English trans. A. E. Taylor, London, Methuen, 1929. Plato, Timaeus and Critias, English trans. Thomas Taylor, Washington, Pantheon, 1944. Plotinus, Enneads, Vol III, translated by A.H. Armstrong, London, Heinemann, 1988. Porro, Pasquale, (ed.) The Medieval Concept of Time, Leiden, Brill, 2001. Power, J. E., \"Henry More an Issac Newton on Absolute Space,\" Journal of the History of Ideas, 31, no. 2, 289-96. Reid, Jasper, \"The Evolution of Henry More's Theory of Divine Absolute Space,\" Journal of the History of Philosophy, vol. 45, no. 1, 2007, pp 79–102. Robinson, John Mansley, An Introduction to Early Greek Philosophy: the chief fragments and ancient testimony, with connecting commentary. Boston, Houghton Mifflin, 1968. Ross, Sir David, \"Introduction\" and Commentary (to Greek Text), Aristotle's Physics, Oxford, Clarendon Press, 1936. Ross, Sir David, Aristotle, London, Methuen, 1960. Rudavsky, T.M., Time Matters: Time Creation and Cosmology in Medieval Jewish Philosophy, Albany, Suny Press, 2000. Rynasiewicz, Robert, \"By their Properties, Causes and effects: Newton's Scholium on Time, Space, Place and Motion-I. The Text,\" Studies in the History and Philosophy of Science, Vol. 26, No. 1, 1995, pp. 133-153. 177 Rynasiewicz, Robert, \"By their Properties, Causes and effects: Newton's Scholium on Time, Space, Place and Motion-II. The Context,\" Studies in the History and Philosophy of Science, Vol. 26, No. 2, 1995, pp. 295-321. Sarasohn, Lisa T., \"Motion and Morality: Pierre Gassendi, Thomas Hobbes and the Mechanical World-View,\" Journal of the History of Ideas, Vol. 46, No. 3., Jul. Sept., 1985, pp. 363-379. Shapiro, Herman, Motion, Time and Place According to William of Ockham, St. Bonaventure, Franciscan Institute, 1957. Smart, J.J.C., (ed.), Problems of Space and Time, New York, Macmillan, 1964. St. Augustine, Confessions, trans. Vernon J. Bourke, Washington D.C., Catholic University press, 1966. St. Augustine, Confessions. Translation by Albert C. Outler, in vol. VII of the Library of Christian Classics, Philadelphia, Westminster Press. Suárez, Francisco, Disputationes Metaphysicae, (Editio Nova, Paris 1866), Hildesheim, Georg Olms Verlagsbuchhandlung, 1965. Suárez, Francisco, On Beings of Reason (De Entibus Rationis): Disputation LIV, \"Introduction\" and translation John P. Doyle, Milwaukee, Marquette University Press, 1995. Suárez, Francisco, On Efficient Causality: Metaphysical Disputations 17, 18, and 19, \"Introduction\" and translation Alfred J., Freddoso, New Haven, Yale University Press, 1994. Telesio, Bernardino, De rerum natura iuxta propria principia, Naples edition of 1586, facsimile at website of Biblioteca de la Universidad Complutense de Madrid: http://alfama.sim.ucm.es/dioscorides/temp/938467609_37.jpg Toulmin, \"Criticism in the History of Science: Newton on Absolute Space, Time and Motion (I & II),\" The Philosophical Review, Vol. 68, January and April, 1959, 1-29 and 203-27. Van Steenberghen, Ferdinand, Thomas Aquinas and Radical Aristotelianism, Washington, D.C., The Catholic University of America Press, 1980. Von Leyden, W., \"Time Number and Eternity in Plato and Aristotle\", Philosophical Quarterly, vol. 14, 1964, pp. 35-52. Westfall, Richard S., Never at Rest: The life of Isaac Newton, Cambridge, Cambridge University Press, 1993. Whitrow, G.J, \"Berkeley's Philosophy of Motion,\" British Journal for the History of Science, vol. IV, 1954, pp. 37-45. Wilshire, Leland E., \"Were the Oxford Condemnations of 1277 Directed Against Aquinas?\", New Scholasticism, v. 48, 1974, pp. 125-132. Wipple, John F., \"Thomas Aquinas and the Condemnations of 1277\", Modern Schoolman, v. 72, 1995, pp. 233-272. Wolter, Alan, \"Introduction\", Duns Scotus: Philosophical Writings, Edinburgh, Nelson, 1962. 178 179 Appendix: Extract from Francisco Suárez, Metaphysical Disputation 50, Section IX Latin Text \"Whether the Time in a Thing is Distinguished From Motion\"-Extract from 'Vera Responsio,' Disputationes Metaphysicae, (Editio Nova, Paris 1866), Hildesheim, Georg Olms Verlagsbuchhandlung, 1965. 15. Ut autem hoc melius comprehendatur, distinguendem est inter illud intervallum, seu spatium imaginarium successivum, quod mente concipimus tanquem necessario fluens ex aeternitate, et realem durationem motus, quae verum ac reale tempus appelatur. Haec rursus realis duratio dupliciter potest considerari: uno modo, absolute secundum solam suam realitatem; alio modo, ut coexistens, et quasi replens (ut ita dicum) quamdam partem illius imaginariae successionis, cui coexistere concipitur. Nam, sicut in corporibus concipimus quoddam spatium permanens, cujus aliquam partem replet quodlibet corpus in loco existens, ita successione temporum concipimus quoddam spatium fluens et successivum, cujus aliquam partem replet omnis motus realiter fluens; quod si fuisset motus ab aeterno; intelligeretur ut replens totum illud spatium, eique coexistens. Igitur, si realis duratio motus apprehendatur ut coexistens tali parti illius successionis imaginariae, quae praeteriit, et ut sic appelletur tempus praeteritum, impossibile est ut sub ea connotatione et rationis apprehensione iterum producatur, non quidem ex parte sua, sed ex parte alterius extremi. Et ratio est, quia illud spatium imaginarium fluens concipatur ut omnino necessarium et immutabile in suo fluxu; et ideo pars ejus, quae concipiatur ut semel praeterita, non potest concipi ut iterabilis; nam illud spatium, cum concipiatur ut omnino necessarium et non causatum, etiam concipi debet ut habens intrinsecam necessitatem in fluxu et ordine suarum partium, ac proinde, quae semel praeteriit, non potest concipi ut iterum 180 rediens. Ex quo fit ut pars realis temporis, quae semel coextitit parti praeteritae illius successionis imaginariae, non possit iterum ei coexistere. Et ideo tempus praeteritum sub hoc conceptu coexistentis, seu replentis talem partem spatii successive imaginarii, non potest redire. 16. At vero ipsa duratio realis praeteriti motus, quae etiam fuit praeteritum tempus, potest iterum fieri praeteritum tempus, potest iterum fieri ut coexistens alteri parti illius imaginarae successionis. Et quia duratio ut coexistens majori vel minori partii illius successiones imaginariae concipitur a nobis ut major vel minor, etiamsi in se realieter non sit major vel minor, ut clare ptet in indivisibilius durationibus, ideo etiam eadem duratio ejusdem motus si nis extendatur, seu extendi concipiatur per duas partes illius successionis imaginariae, etiam concipitur ut major duratio, seu ut aequivalens duobus, verbi gratia, aut tribus diebus, etiam in se non sit realiter major, aut distincta secundum partes, sed eadem iterum... Et sane, quandocunque loquimur de tempore praeterito ut irrecuperabili, seu quod iterum redire non potest, vel apprehendimus illam continuam imaginariam successionem omnino necessariam et immutabilem, vel, si simul concipimus aliquam realem durationem aut circulationem coeli, apprehendimus illam ut existentem in tali parte illius successivi intervalli, quae neque antea fuisse, nec postea esse iterum potest. Atque it vidur locutus Augustinus dicto capite 23, lib. 11 Confess. Nam cum dixisset, cessante motu coeli, pugnam Josue actam esse per suum spatium temporis quod ei sufficeret, concludit dicens: Video igatur tempus quamdam esse distensionem..."}
{"meta": {"title": "Achievement and Enhancement", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Skelton, Anthony", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "We engage with the nature and the value of achievement through a critical examination of an argument according to which biomedical “enhancement” of our capacities is impermissible because enhancing ourselves in this way would threaten our achievements. We call this the argument against enhancement from achievement. We assess three versions of it, each admitting to a strong or a weak reading. We argue that strong readings fail, and that weak readings, while in some cases successful in showing that enhancement interferes with the nature or value of achievement, fail to establish that enhancement poses an unusual threat to achievement.", "date": "2020", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/FORAAE-2", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2020-03-19T14:52:37Z"}, "text": "ARTICLE Achievement and Enhancement Lisa Forsberg1 and Anthony Skelton2* 1Faculty of Law, Oxford Uehiro Centre for Practical Ethics, and Somerville College, University of Oxford, Oxford, United Kingdom, and 2Department of Philosophy, University of Western Ontario, London, Canada *Corresponding author. Email: askelto4@uwo.ca Abstract: We engage with the nature and the value of achievement through a critical examination of an argument according towhich biomedical \"enhancement\" of our capacities is impermissible because enhancing ourselves in this way would threaten our achievements. We call this the argument against enhancement from achievement. We assess three versions of it, each admitting to a strong or a weak reading. We argue that strong readings fail, and thatweak readings, while in some cases successful in showing that enhancement interfereswith the nature or value of achievement, fail to establish that enhancement poses an unusual threat to achievement. Keywords: Achievement; difficulty; effort; competent causation; well-being; perfectionism; enhancement Achievement, at one time neglected, is now a growing preoccupation in normative ethics. In this paper, we engage with the nature and the value of achievement through a critical examination of the argument that \"enhancement\"1 of our capacities is impermissible because it would threaten our achievements. We call this the argument against enhancement from achievement, or the AEA. We construct the argument and determine its strength and its effect on the philosophical understanding of achievement's nature and its value. We articulate three versions of theAEA; each admits to a strong or a weak reading.We argue that strong readings fail to establish that enhancement always interferes with the nature or value of achievement and that weak readings, while in some cases successful in showing that enhancement interferes with the nature or value of achievement, fail to establish that enhancement poses an unusual threat to achievement. Our examination of the AEA clarifies and evaluates a common objection to enhancement, while providing a lens through which to analyse accounts of the nature and the value of achievement. Articulating the argument against enhancement from achievement The AEA is not explicitly formulated but rather gestured at by both its critics and proponents. A version appears in Robert Nozick's Anarchy, State, and Utopia. In his discussion of hedonism, Nozick introduces a \"transformation machine,\" a machine that could \"transform us into whatever sort of person we'd like to be\" (1974, 44). He remarks that one would not \"use the transformation © The Author(s) 2019. Published by Canadian Journal of Philosophy. This is an Open Access article, distributed under the terms of the Creative Commons Attribution licence (http://creativecommons.org/licenses/by/4.0/), which permits unrestricted re-use, distribution, and reproduction in any medium, provided the original work is properly cited. 1We take enhancement to be biomedical interventions used to \"alter the characteristics of already healthy persons\" (Douglas 2008, 228). For example, blood doping in cycling and Modafinil or Adderall use to improve focus or concentration. The AEA has primarily been raised in regard to enhancement of this sort, but it could also apply to nonbiomedical forms of enhancement (as could our arguments). Canadian Journal of Philosophy (2019), 1–17 doi:10.1017/can.2019.43 machine to become as one would wish\" (44). Indeed, some would be reluctant to use the machine \"at all\" (44n). Nozick also introduces the \"experience machine,\" a simulation machine equipped to supply any pleasurable experience one desires. Nozick imagines that the experience machine offers on balancemore pleasure than one can receive in theworld outside themachine. Still, he thinks that, as with the transformation machine, we would be reluctant to hook up to the experience machine. This suggests that things other than pleasurable experiences matter to us, including being a certain way (43, 44). Our reluctance to use the transformation machine, he argues, indicates that \"something matters in addition to one's experiences and what one is like\" (44; italics in original). Nozick suggests that we would not use the transformation machine because it would mean accomplishing things \"easily\"; there would be, if the machine was used indefinitely, \"no limits we need to strain against or try to transcend\" (44n; italics in original). The problemwith the transformationmachine, then, appears to be that it equips one with capacities that make it easy to accomplish things that are ordinarily difficult. What is lost is something like achievement-one actively bringing about some end through a challenging process. Another instance of the AEA appears in Michael Sandel. He claims (2007, 25) that \"[i]t is one thing to hit seventy home runs as a result of disciplined training and effort, and something else, something less, to hit themwith the help of steroids or genetically enhanced muscles. Of course, the roles of effort and enhancement will be a matter of degree. But as the role of the enhancement increases, our admiration for the achievement fades. Or rather, our admiration for the achievement shifts from the player to his pharmacist.\" On his view, \"[t]he more the athlete relies on drugs or genetic fixes, the less his performance represents his achievement\" (26). Similarly, Eric Juengst asks whether achievements realized with the aid of enhancement might be \"hollow\" and so lacking the noninstrumental value they would ordinarily possess (1998, 39). A more precise AEA may be expressed as follows. The Argument against Enhancement from Achievement: Enhancement undermines achievement either by interfering with something qualifying as an achievement or by interfering with achievement's nonderivative value. To specify the AEA further, something must be said about the nature and value of achievement. There is consensus that an achievement comprises a product and a process (Bradford 2015, 12ff.; Hirji 2019, 526–27, 538, 543; Hurka 2011, 97–118; Portmore 2007, 1–2). These can be distinct, as in performing research on a disease and discovering a cure, or the same, as in running amarathon. On the most developed accounts, an activity counts as an achievement just in case (i) the process is difficult and (ii) the agent competently causes the product (Bradford 2015, 25; vonKriegstein 2019a, 60;Hurka 2006, 221; 2011, 106, 98).When an activity is not difficult and/or not competently caused, it fails to qualify as an achievement. Broadly, there are two views on how achievements acquire value: perfectionist and welfarist. On the former, achievements are valuable because they involve perfecting certain of our capacities (Bradford 2015, 121–23; Hirji 2019, 541–42). According to the most prominent perfectionist view, the capacities perfected or excellently exercised in achievements are rationality and willing (Bradford 2015, 121–23; for other varieties of perfectionism, see Hirji 2019; Hurka 2006). On welfarist views, achievements are valuable because they are noninstrumentally good for or beneficial to welfare subjects. Achievements might be good for one because engagement with reality makes one noninstrumentally better off, and achievements in part involve agents conforming reality to their intentions, or because meeting one's goals makes one noninstrumentally better off and achievements are a subset of one's goals (Keller 2004), or because achievements themselves make one noninstrumentally better off (Griffin 1986). On the first version of the AEA, enhancement causes an activity not to involve the requisite amount of difficulty. On the second version, enhancement interferes with the agent causing the product in the right way. In each case, enhancement prevents an activity from qualifying as an 2 Lisa Forsberg and Anthony Skelton achievement. On the third version, what one achieves with the aid of enhancement is, because of what is involved in the achievement, lacking in the properties providing its value. In addition, it seems that each of the three versions of the AEA-focusing on difficulty, causation, and value-can be given a strong or a weak reading. On the strong reading: The Strong Argument against Enhancement from Achievement: Enhancement undermines achievement either by preventing something from being an achievement or by emptying it of its nonderivative value. At least some AEA proponents seem to hold this version. However, it might be implausible that enhancement either altogether prevents activities in which it is used from qualifying as achievements, or that it completely eliminates their nonderivative value. We might therefore also consider an alternative, weaker, reading of the AEA: The Weak Argument against Enhancement from Achievement: Enhancement undermines achievement either by making something a lesser achievement or by reducing its nonderivative value. It might be more charitable to attribute this, weaker, reading of the AEA to its proponents. On this view, the concern is that enhancement would, rather than preventing some activity in which it is used from being an achievement, render it a lesser achievement, or, rather than eliminating an activity's nonderivative achievement value, reduce it. To give the AEA the fairest possible hearing, we consider both the strong and the weak readings of the argument's various renditions. Enhancement and difficulty On the strong reading of the AEA's first version, which focuses on difficulty, enhancement makes activities that would otherwise have constituted achievements \"too easy,\" thereby preventing them from being achievements.2 Call this: The Insufficient Difficulty Argument: Enhancement undermines achievement by reducing the amount of difficulty involved in realizing the product below that which is required for it to qualify as an achievement. Many hold the intuitively plausible view that difficulty is an important feature of achievements and that it involves effort.3 The thought is that provided one exerts a sufficient amount of effort, one's activity counts as difficult and therefore as an achievement. One natural idea is that the amount of 2Sandel maintains that one, though not themain, problemwith biomedical enhancements is that they \"undermine effort and erode human agency\" (2007, 26). The President's Council on Bioethics says that \"[i]n those areas of human life in which excellence has until now been achieved only by discipline and effort, the attainment of similar results bymeans of drugs, genetic engineering, or implanted devices looks to many people ... to be 'cheating' or 'cheap.' Many people believe that each person should work hard for his achievements. Even if we prefer the grace of the natural athlete or the quickness of the natural mathematician-people whose performances deceptively appear to be effortless-we admire also those who overcome obstacles and struggle to try to achieve the excellence of the former. This matter of character-the merit of disciplined and dedicated striving-is surely pertinent. For character is not only the source of our deeds, but also their product\" (2003, 291). The \"heart of thematter,\" they contend, is \"understanding the true dignity of excellent human activity, and how some newways of improving performance may distort or undermine it\" (2003, 140). 3Bradford (2015, 12, 26–63); Hurka (2006, 221; 2011, 106–16); Nozick (1974, 44); and von Kriegstein (2019a, 54–55) hold that achievements are difficult and analyze difficulty in terms of effort. Von Kriegstein and Hurka think that there are other conceptions of difficulty (discussed below). Keller (2004, 36) and Portmore (2007, 3) link achievement and effort. Canadian Journal of Philosophy 3 effort involved in an activity is determined by the intensity and duration of the effort exerted. The greater the sum of effort, the more difficult the activity.4 If enhancement made activities effortless, as suggested by the strong reading, it would prevent them from qualifying as achievements, for such activities would not be difficult. Consider Gwen Bradford's (2015, 31) example: Virtuoso:Heifetz, the great violin virtuoso, effortlessly tosses off a flawless performance of the complex Paganini caprices. Playing the Paganini caprices is famously difficult, Bradford observes, but it is not difficult for Heifetz (2015, 38). Since playing the Paganini caprices is not difficult for him, it cannot be an achievement for him. Enhancement might have similar effects. Consider: Enhanced Violinist: Nigel is a violinist for whom playing the Paganini caprices would ordinarily require sufficient effort for it to count as difficult. For Nigel, then, playing them would ordinarily be an achievement. One day, Nigel takes an enhancement which enables him to play the Paganini caprices as well and as effortlessly as Heifetz. It seems that in this case, the lack of effort onNigel's part, like the lack of effort onHeifetz's, prevents the playing of the Paganini caprices from being difficult for him and hence an achievement for Nigel. If all cases of \"achievements\" involving enhancement looked like EnhancedViolinist, then, we might have to grant that enhancement undermines achievement. But it seems unlikely that all enhancement would involve enabling agents to accomplish things without effort, or with very little effort. Consider: Distracted Susan: Susan is studying to become a physicist. Her studies are demanding, and although she is very intelligent and academically accomplished, she needs to employ a variety of strategies to succeed, including studying hard for exams, reading up on effective revision and time management strategies, and so on. In trying to complete some assignments, Susan finds herself easily distracted. Her mind wanders off, she must reread passages, and so forth. She decides to take a drug that some of her classmates use as a \"cognitive enhancer,\" which is said to improve concentration. Susan takes the drug; she finds that it helps her concentrate. She continues to study very hard, employing her revision and time management strategies. She eventually succeeds in becoming a physicist. In this case, Susan's success does seem to involve a sufficient amount of effort for it to count as difficult for her, even while enhanced. It is not clear, therefore, that enhancement vanquishes her achievement. Of course, had Susan's success been accomplished sans enhancement it might well have been a greater achievement. This is consistent with our claim that the use of enhancement does not necessarily entail that some process-product amalgam fails to qualify as an achievement. Just like it is possible for A to exert more effort than B, but for neither A nor B to exert the requisite 4Bradford argues that the account of difficulty that equates it with the sum total of effort exerted-the total view, as she calls it -has unintuitive implications. It entails what she calls the Ridiculous Conclusion: that for any activity of finite duration involving a very high degree of intense effort there is another activity involving very minimal effort but going on for a very long time that would involve on balance a greater sum total of effort and hence be more difficult (2015, 47). This is analogous to Parfit's Repugnant Conclusion in population ethics (1984, 388). Bradford thinks this implausible. A very intense one-hour game of ice hockey is much more difficult than many hours of gently rolling a ball back and forth between one's hands, even if the latter involves on balancemuchmore effort. The Ridiculous Conclusion can be avoided by stipulating that only the sum total amount of effort beyond a certain critical level is counted as relevant to determining an activity's difficulty. Bradford calls effort above such a critical level intense effort. Provided the sum total of intense effort is sufficient, the activity will include enough effort to count as difficult and hence an achievement (2015, 49–50). If one is convinced by Bradford's argument, one can substitute intense effort for all uses of effort in the text. 4 Lisa Forsberg and Anthony Skelton amount of effort for their activities to count as achievements, it is possible for C to exert more effort than D, but for both C and D to achieve something. The AEA proponent might reply that we have not specified exactly the amount of effort required to qualify something as an achievement.5 So it is unclear that what Susan does qualifies as one. The problem with this reply is that the AEA does not itself specify how much effort is required to make something an achievement. Without an account of precisely how much effort is sufficient for difficulty and of how enhancement prevents users from exerting it, the reply will not work. Moreover, whatever quantity of effort the AEA relies on, it is unlikely to perfectly track the enhanced/unenhanced distinction, such that all enhanced activities will lack the requisite amount (and thus fail to qualify as achievements), and all unenhanced activities will possess it (and thus qualify as achievements). We noted above that in accomplishing her goal without enhancement Susan's achievement might have been greater. The AEA proponent may argue that this involves conceding the weaker reading of the AEA on which all enhanced activities involve less effort, compared to those undertakenwithout enhancement. They are therefore, other things being equal, lesser achievements than their unenhanced counterparts. This is not a plausible strategy for the AEA proponent, for two reasons. First, it puts the proponent of the AEA in the position of having to explain why we should be worried in particular about the impact of enhancement on achievement. AEA proponents hold that enhancement poses an unusual challenge to achievements.6 But there are a great many things that make activities less effortful, including equipment (running shoes), trainers or tutors (in sport and in education), and natural endowment. The weak AEA might be able to establish that enhancement in some way diminishes effort, but it cannot yet establish that enhancement is any more problematic than other things that also decrease effort. Second, at most the weaker version of the AEA establishes that enhancement maymake some of the activities that we now think qualify as achievements lesser achievements. But it is certainly possible to imagine other activities that would be achievements for enhanced agents and which would be just as much achievements for them as certain activities are for unenhanced agents. What counts as an achievement might change in some cases, but there would remain plenty of activities that count as solid achievements. The AEA proponent might try to salvage her claim that enhancement undermines achievement through eroding difficulty by abandoning the idea that difficulty requires effort. Not everyone agrees that difficulty is always to be analysed in terms of effort. Thomas Hurka holds that an activity's difficulty depends in some cases on \"howmuch skill and ingenuity... [it] requires\" (Hurka 2006, 221). Hasko von Kriegstein (2019a, 55ff.) develops this idea arguing that though some activities do not require effort, they are nonetheless difficult because they are activities at which most adult human beings with average capabilities are likely to fail. While effortless, what Heifetz does is still difficult and hence an achievement because there is a low probability that those with average capabilities will succeed at it. Heifetz's achievement is a matter of skill and talent, not effort. Let's grant this. This does not clearly help the advocate of the AEA, for (a) they emphasise effort in their arguments and (b) one can be enhanced and employ talents and skills. 5Bradford concedes that setting this requires \"further investigation\" (2015, 56). 6For the view that enhancement poses an unusual threat to achievement, see Cole-Turner (1998, 155); Juengst (1998, 39); Kass (2003, 21–23); and the President's Council on Bioethics (2003). It is common to interpret proponents of the AEA as holding this view. Allen Buchanan (2011, 9) notes that authors such as Michael Sandel and Leon Kass (not just in their writing on enhancement and achievement, but in their writing on enhancement more generally) \"try to discredit enhancement in toto, rather than just some enhancements under some circumstances\". Thomas Douglas (2019, 8) notes that even though \"not all activities are such that their purpose is undermined when they are pursued with the aid of enhancements... some present the concern about devaluing achievements as a general worry about enhancement.\" Canadian Journal of Philosophy 5 Von Kriegstein defends an agent-neutral conception of difficulty (2019a, 56). On the agentrelative account, an activity's difficulty is a matter of how difficult it is for a particular agent. This conception of difficulty fits nicely with the idea that an activity's difficulty is a function of howmuch effort it requires from a particular agent. On the agent-neutral account, an activity's difficulty is a matter of how difficult it is for any \"adult human being with average capabilities\" to succeed at it (2019a, 61). It is quite possible that on the agent-neutral conception of difficulty enhancement facilitates achievement by making it the case that agents can do things (perhaps using talents and skills) at which most agents with average capabilities would be highly likely to fail. Furthermore, it is unlikely that, by adopting some other conception of achievement, the AEA proponent can save her claim that enhancement threatens achievement by diminishing effort. Consider Sukaina Hirji's account on which \"an achievement is a process culminating in a product that is competently caused and that tests the limit of an agent's perfectionist capacity\" (2019, 543; italics in original). Perfectionist capacities include \"one's practical rationality, one's theoretical rationality, one's creativity, and one's physical abilities\" (542). Hirji holds that it is possible for one to achieve something in sport or in art simply through the (effortless expression) of talent or skill. She thinks that Heifitz's effortless playing of the Paganini caprices is an achievement; he competently causes the playing and it tests the limit of his creative (perfectionist) capacity (537–38). Because Hirji's view denies that effort (and also difficulty) is a component of achievement,AEAproponents cannot rely on her view to capture the threat that diminished effort might pose to it. On the contrary, Hirji's viewmakes achievements for enhanced individuals possible because such individuals can engage in activities that (seemingly) competently cause products and that test the limit of their perfectionist capacities. Suppose that Nigel is extraordinarily talented and skilled at playing the violin-he is gifted-but he is easily distracted (lacking focus and motivation). Suppose further that he takes an enhancement that increases his motivation and his focus just enough that he competently causes his playing the Paganini caprices effortlessly in accordance with his raw talent and skill. OnHirji's view, this counts as an achievement. In this case, not only does enhancement not interfere with achievement, it facilitates it. This ought to make those who worry that enhancement interferes with the \"cultivation and display of natural talents\" (Sandel 2007, 29) less chary of them. To defend the claim that enhancement undermines achievement, then, the AEA proponent will need to rely on another version of their argument. Although there is no consensus that effort and difficulty are essential to achievement, there is agreement that among achievement's essential features is competent causation (Bradford 2015; Hirji 2019, 527, 528, 543; Hurka 2011; von Kriegstein 2019a; 2019b). The proponent of the AEA might consequently be on stronger ground arguing that the reason that enhancement threatens achievement is that it undermines competent causation. It is to this version of the argument that we now turn. Enhancement and competent causation On the second version of the AEA, enhancement reduces the agent's causal contribution to an achievement, making it questionable whether the achievement counts as hers.7 Call this: 7For example, in its report on biomedical enhancement, the President's Council on Bioethics seem to suggest that when enhancement is used, it, rather than the agent, might be causing the outcome: The runner on steroids... is still, of course, a human being who runs. But the doer of the deed is, arguably, less obviously himself and less obviously human than his unaltered counterpart... or more like the horses we breed for the racetrack than a self-willing, self-directing, human agent. He does the deed (running), and his resulting time may be measurably superior. But he is also (or increasingly) the passive recipient of outside agents that are at least partly responsible for his achievements (2003, 144). Elsewhere in their report, the President's Council on Bioethics says that \"it seems that some performance-enhancing agents... call into question the dignity of the performance of those who use them. The performance seems less real, less one's own, less 6 Lisa Forsberg and Anthony Skelton The Errant Causation Argument: Enhancement undermines achievement by interfering with the agent playing the right causal role in a given activity, thereby reducing the extent to which the achievement is attributable to the agent. Many hold that, in addition to the agent exerting sufficient effort or engaging in a difficult activity, a causal connection of the right kind between the agent and what she produces must exist in order for it to be her achievement. There is agreement that this connection is forged by an agent's intention and her action on it. The agent must intend and act to produce the outcome. This idea is variously expressed. Hurka (2011, 98) insists that for something to count as an achievement one has to \"intend to produce some goal and then do so.\"T.M. Scanlon (1998, 121)maintains that for the fulfilment of a rational aim to count as a success it must be \"acted upon\" and be \"given a role in shaping... [one's] other activities and plans.\"Douglas W. Portmore (2007, 3) says that \"achieving a goal involves having that goal realized due in part, at least, to one's own efforts... . To achieve one's goals, one's efforts must be productive-that is, efficacious in bringing about their intended effect\" (see also Keller 2004, 36). This suggests that one's intentional pursuit of a goal must involve some plan of action that will (or is likely to) produce that goal. As Hurka (2011, 98) puts it, \"achieving a goal can't be a matter of luck. You have to have pursued the goal intelligently, or in a way that, given what you knew beforehand, made your succeeding likely.\"8 Bradford provides themost robust account of the (intuitively plausible) requirement that for there to be an achievement theremust exist a connection (of the right kind) between the agent's actions andwhat she produces. In this way, Bradford distinguishes what is attributable to the agent fromwhat is amatter of luck or similar factor (2015, 13–17). According to Bradford, in order for the product of an agent's activities to count as an achievement attributable to her, it must be the result of (intense) effort that she exerts and be competently caused by her. Competent causation is analysed by Bradford as follows: A competently causes E via φ-ing when A's φ-ing causes E, and A at some point while φ-ing has the requisite amount of ungettierized justified true beliefs (JTBs) about his φ-ing causing E. (72, 71, 73, 79) The idea, then, is that one competently causes an outcome when one has the requisite amount of JTBs about one's activity causing the productwhile one is acting to cause it (64, 73, 74). Some beliefs- general, structural beliefs-are weighted more heavily than mere discreet beliefs (68). Might enhancement prevent the competent causation condition from beingmet so that an agent's product is not her achievement? It may if an enhanced agent causes the product without holding the requisite amount of JTBs about the role enhancement played in realizing the product. Consider: Unwitting Effective Altruism: Larry is aiming for effective philanthropy, but has a propensity to give to ineffective, so-called \"warm glow\" charities. Peter puts a moral enhancement in Larry's tea. The moral enhancement aids Larry in avoiding giving to \"warm glow\" charities and promotes his giving to the most effective charities as determined by GiveWell. Larry is, however, unaware of having ingested the moral enhancement and about its effects on him. Let us assume that, for Larry, given his propensity for warm-glow giving, avoiding ineffective charities involves the amount of effort (or difficulty) required for achievement. Would the moral enhancement, then, prevent what would otherwise have been an achievement from being so? If the worthy of our admiration. Not only do such enhancing agents distort or damage other dimensions of human life... they also seem to distort the... activity itself...What is at stake here is the very meaning of human agency, the meaning of being at-work in the world.\" (2003, 140–41). Sandel also worries that enhancement will \"erode human agency\" (2007, 26). 8This is likely too strong. Luck will inevitably play a role in achievement, at least in most cases. For accessible discussions of this, see Pritchard 2010 and von Kriegstein 2019b. Canadian Journal of Philosophy 7 enhancement is highly effective, Larry will refrain from committing the error of warm-glow giving, but he will not hold a sufficient amount of JTBs about the (very significant) role that the enhancement plays in the product, nor will he hold any JTBs about what is moving him, Peter's role, and so forth. Larry would in addition probably hold some false beliefs about what is moving him, the relationship between his intentions and his actions, and so on. We might think that in a case like this, therefore, the competent causation condition is not met.9 If all cases of so-called \"achievement\" involving enhancement looked like Unwitting Effective Altruism, enhancement would (it seems) threaten achievement by preventing the agent from competently causing the outcome. But again we might think it unlikely that enhancement would always prevent products from being competently caused. In respect of the competent causation condition, it is the agent's (lack of) JTBs about how the enhancement affects what the agent is doing that threatens achievement. Larry lacks JTBs about the relationship between what he intends and what he does. When enhancement is deliberately used by an agent to make an activity that remains difficult possible through mastery of the means to one's ends, it would seem that the competent causation condition could be met. Consider: Moral Self-enhancement: Bill is a fervent effective altruist. He currently donates a significant proportion of his income to highly effective charities. Bill wishes to boost his charitable giving, but finds it hard to do so. He has a sturdy will, but is hampered by some residual parochial beliefs about the limits of morality. He undergoes an operation to have a device implanted in his brain that helps him resist the influence of these beliefs on how he acts. Bill is aware of having undergone the operation and its effects, and thus holds a number of JTBs about the moral enhancement and its role in his actions to increase his effective altruism. Even when enhanced, Bill still needs to do various things to bemore effective and to successfully resist the influence of parochial beliefs on his actions. Bill also holds a number of JTBs in respect of these additional activities and their role in producing what he intends. Being a more effective altruist, then, requires Bill to expend the amount of effort (suppose) required for achievement. In this case, the difficulty condition is met. But it seems possible that the JTBs Bill holds about the moral enhancement and its relation to the outcome (his various activities and their effects, and so on) might be sufficient for the competent causation condition to be met, too. Bill causes the outcome via φ-ing (which includes his various activities and strategies, of which the moral enhancement is one), and he has the requisite amount of JTBs about his φ-ing (including his use of the moral enhancement) causing the outcome at some point while φ-ing. The moral enhancement does not, then, prevent Bill's more effective altruism from being an achievement for him. In reply, the AEA proponent could try to specify the number of JTBs that are required for competent causation so that enhanced agents are excluded from being competent causes. The precise amount of JTBs one needs to hold about a process and a product in order to competently cause that product is not fixed. The AEA proponent might argue that Bill does not hold a sufficient amount of JTBs to be competently causing the outcome because he does not, for example, hold a sufficient number of beliefs about the mechanism by which the moral enhancement works. Therefore, the AEA proponent might contend, Bill does not hold a sufficient amount of JTBs about how he produces his intended outcome via the moral enhancement (and his other actions). 9Wemight worry that in such cases it is lack of effort that prevents the activity fromqualifying as an achievement. It is hard to distinguish effort from causation in such cases because difficulty involves directed effort to some degree. We might think it unlikely that we would see the kind of directed effort required for the difficulty condition to be met in cases in which an agent is unwittingly enhanced. For the purposes of this section, we assume that the effort condition is met. This provides for a distinct version of the AEA which is not impugned by the previous section's arguments. 8 Lisa Forsberg and Anthony Skelton This move is unhelpful to the AEA proponent. It is not clear that any threshold he sets for the amount of JTBs required will exclude all enhanced activities from being competently caused. Moreover, it is likely that any threshold that is set high enough to exclude enhanced agents from competently causing an outcome would also exclude a great many activities that proponents of the AEA accept as achievements, including activities that are produced in part through (the gift of) raw talent and acquired skills. Since the AEA proponent needs to exclude enhanced agents from being competent causes for his argument to succeed, it seems that at least the strong reading of the Errant Causation Argument fails. The AEA proponent might respond that he did not intend the strong reading of the AEA according to which all enhanced activities are precluded from being competently caused, but rather the weaker reading which holds that achievements by agents who are enhanced are lesser achievements because they are less competently caused. After all, some individuals who take an enhancement might have only a few JTBs about its role in the outcome. This decreases to some extent the agent's causation of the outcome. However, this is a poor strategy for the AEA proponent. As noted, the proponent thinks that enhancement poses a special threat to achievement. That is, he appears to hold that it is unlike other tools an agent might deliberately employ to realize intentions. Other tools, such as sophisticated equipment and training, might also undermine an agent competently causing an outcome if she is unaware of the role it plays in her success. The AEA proponent either must concede this, and then abandon thinking that enhancement poses a special threat, or he must provide an account of how these other things differ from enhancement such that they do not (like enhancement) undermine the agent's competent causation. In the absence of such an account, the weak reading of the AEA will not successfully establish that enhancement poses a general and unusual threat to achievement.10 One might suggest here that by adopting some other conception of competent causation, the AEA proponent could save the claim that enhancement undermines achievement. One of the main rivals to Bradford's account holds that an agent competently causes some outcome when she (a) takes actions that increase the likelihood of the outcome and (b) performs the actions because they increase the likelihood of the outcome (von Kriegstein 2019b). This conception will not save the claim, for it is not clear that on this view the mere fact that an agent is enhanced is sufficient to disrupt her action competently causing an outcome. Consider again Moral Self-enhancement. Bill undergoes a surgical procedure that enhances him and while enhanced he acts to increase his effective altruism. His undergoing the enhancement increases the likelihood of the outcome and he undergoes the enhancement precisely because it will increase the likelihood of his actions producing his intended outcome. On this view, then, it is possible to be enhanced and competently cause an outcome. The AEA proponent might urge that the conceptions of competent causation so far considered fail to properly capture how enhancement interferes with the agent playing the right causal role in bringing about their intended outcome. He might suggest that the focus should be less on taking actions that increase the likelihood of one's intended outcomes or on having a sufficient number of JTBs about what one is doing while one is doing it andmore on the role that the enhancement plays in producing the outcome. The view would be that to the extent to which one is enhanced one is less of a cause of an outcome, however knowledgeable or intelligent one may be in the pursuit of one's 10It might be thought that the AEA proponent could deflect our response to the weak reading by jettisoning the claim that enhancement poses a special or unusual threat to achievement. But jettisoning this claim involves either admitting that one ought to be against things other than enhancement that interfere with one's JTBs about one's activities in similar ways and to similar extents (e.g., sophisticated treatment regimens) or giving up the argument altogether, for without the specialness claim there is nothing about enhancement in particular to be concerned with. Thanks to an anonymous referee for urging us to clarify this. Canadian Journal of Philosophy 9 outcome, such that the outcome is less attributable to one's agency and more attributable to the enhancement.11 It is difficult to make sense of such a view. This is because it is difficult to comprehend how one might (a) know what one is doing while one is doing it, (b) cause an outcome, (c) exert a sufficient degree of effort (or skill or talent) towards it, and yet not have the cause attributed to one's agency but rather to (at least in part) an enhancement. The burden should be on the proponent of the AEA to show in what way one's agency is not the cause of the products of one's actions when one knows what one is doing while doing it or when one takes actions that increase the likelihood of one's intended effects. All the view says at present is that enhancements cause or serve as a greater cause of the products of those undergoing them; it does not state how or in what way this is the case. A view on which it is possible for one to pursue one's goal intelligently or knowledgably, be engaged in a difficult activity directed to some end, produce it, and yet not be the cause of it, is metaphysically obscure. The idea behind it seems to be that if an agent's enhanced capacity is involved in bringing about some product, the capacity, not the agent, produces it. This involves separating an agent from her capacities. However, it appears hard to do so. We tend not to distinguish an agent from her raw talents or honed skills, so that the talent or skill, not the agent, is producingwhatever they have a role in producing. So it is not clear how orwhy it would be done in the case of capacities. Imagine that we could separate an agent from her capacities and her talents. This would not save the view that enhanced capacities are unique in interfering with agency. For the AEA proponent offering it will have to either concede that in cases in which raw talents or honed skills are at play the agent is also less of a cause of the outcome or explain how enhanced capacities are different such that they, but not talents and skills, erode agency or causation.12 There is another way in which enhancement might undermine an individual agent's competent causation: by dispersing it across a group of agents. Imagine a case in which an individual is enhanced to have fins and flippers and a more aquadynamically shaped head in order to improve her swimming speed.13 Intense effort by the swimmer is required to maximize the fins and flippers in her swimming endeavours. The other agents who play a role in the design, development, and construction of the fins and flippers have also devoted considerable intense effort to their tasks. The swimmer surely has some JTBs about her new physique and its impact on her swimming. But she might well lack JTBs about the manufacturing, design, and exact powers of the fins and their interaction with her own capacities to produce her swimming speed. In particular, she might lack general structural beliefs unifying all these particular beliefs. The designers, developers, and fabricators might also have JTBs about their aspect of the project, but not about the swimmer's exact interaction with the new technologies. In this case, it might not be clear that the agent's swimming accomplishments are competently caused by her or anyone else and so they would fail to be achievements for her or any other individual. But while wemight not have an achievement for the individual, the new swimming speed is an achievement for the group: the swimmer, developers, designers, and so on, who together possesses the requisite amount of JTBs to competently cause the outcome. 11For an argument like this, see Kass 2003, 22–23. 12An anonymous referee suggested that perhaps the difference between raw talents and honed skills, on the one hand, and enhanced capacities, on the other hand, is that while raw talents might be \"constitutive\" of the person and honed skills might be something for which she can take credit, enhanced capacities are not constitutive of the person and not something for which she can take credit. This suggestion is not very helpful. It is hard to know what does and does not qualify as constitutive of the person. To state that raw talents are constitutive is question begging. Furthermore, it is not clear that enhanced capacities cannot in part be something one can take credit for and so not completely unlike honed skills. 13We owe this example to Gwen Bradford. 10 Lisa Forsberg and Anthony Skelton Enhancement might be more likely to make an activity a group achievement rather than an individual one, since an enhancement will, in most cases, have been developed by someone other than the agent. The agent may as a consequence lack the requisite number of JTBs about how the enhancement works. But group achievements will not be unique to enhanced activities. The most obvious example is team sports in which no one individual alone competently causes an outcome that counts as an achievement (such as winning a championship). However, group achievements are also common in sports in which an individual's success depends on coaches, nutritionists, and those who design the equipment used in the same way as in the swimming example above. If the proponent of the AEA allows for group achievements in such cases, it will be hard to deny them in cases of enhancement. In reply, the proponent of the AEA could deny that group achievements are real achievements. This seems a rather large bullet to bite. But if the proponent allowsgroup achievements in, for example, team sports, she will need an account of competent causation that explains that whereas group accomplishments of this sort are competently caused, enhanced group accomplishments are not.14 If our foregoing arguments are right, it is possible for the activities of enhanced agents to count as achievements.15 But it does not follow that such achievements have value. TheAEAproponentmay rely on a different version of the argument, which says that while it may be true that an enhanced agent can achieve something, such achievements are valueless. It is to this version of the AEA that we now turn. Enhancement and the value of achievement In the previous sections, our focus has been versions of the AEA on which enhancement undermines achievement either by preventing it from being difficult or competently caused. The third version of the AEAmaintains that achievements brought about with the help of enhancement are hollow or lacking in value.16 On the strong reading of this argument, the AEA holds that 14For a discussion of enhancement, ownership of achievements, and group achievements, see Goodman 2010, 155–57. An anonymous referee suggested that perhaps there is some loss when an activity counts as a group rather than an individual achievement. It is not obvious to us what that might be. It is not clear that it is better, say, to win an Olympic gold medal in snowboarding rather than in ice hockey (at least for the players who are not riding the bench). It is possible that something is lost, though it is also possible that something is gained that makes up for that which is lost. 15We have conductedmuch of the discussion of competent causation in terms of JTBs. However, one need not rely on JTBs to interpret competent causation. Instead, one can rely on knowledge-how or understanding (Bradford 2015, 80–82). In this case, to competently cause some outcome one would have to possess the requisite amount of knowledge-how pertaining to or understanding of how one is causing some outcome while one is causing it. There has to be some such state-such as intelligent pursuit or intentional planning-playing a role in achievement. Whatever state one relies on, it is important that the requisite amount of JTBs or of knowledge-how or of understanding that one possesses is robust enough to explain how the agent is causally connected in the right way to what she achieves. The amount of understanding and so on required cannot be too great for achievements will then be too scarce; at the same time, the amount cannot be toominiscule for then achievements will be too common. It is likely that the requirement of having a sufficient quantity and quality of JTBs to competently cause an outcome is too epistemically demanding. Following Hurka (2011), you might think all that is required for competent causation is that the agent has beliefs about the rough probability of their desired outcome occurring given their intentional activity. But if we grant this, it is plausible that an enhanced agent can competently cause an outcome by possessing the right amount of beliefs about the likelihood that their actions (including being enhanced) will produce the desired outcome. 16Kass (2003, 21) argues that \"Yet in those areas of human life in which excellence has until now been achieved only by discipline and effort, the attainment of those achievements by means of drugs, genetic engineering, or implanted devices looks to be 'cheating' or 'cheap.'We believe-or until only yesterday believed-that people should work hard for their achievements. 'Nothing good comes easily.'\" Juengst (1998, 39) contends that enhancement interventions \"short-circuit admirable human practices in an effort to obtain some personal goal.\" They do not raise the question of \"either causation or responsibility.\" Rather, they raise the question of whether the accomplishment is earned; a goal accomplished in this way \"is a hollow accomplishment, without the intrinsic value it would otherwise have.\"Cole-Turner (1998, 155) says that \"[t]here is... a glory or dignity in human accomplishment attained the 'old fashioned way,' through sweat and struggle, sometimes against great odds. It is something like themountain climber who struggles to the top of a great peak, but then on flying home ascends quickly by jet over the top of the mountain, and looking down at the summit, feels cheated of the value of the original climb. Technology, Canadian Journal of Philosophy 11 enhancement makes an achievement valueless. On the weak reading, it holds that enhancement renders an achievement considerably less valuable than it would be sans enhancement. Call this: The Value-Reduction Argument: Enhancement undermines the value of achievement by interfering with its sources. To make sense of this, we turn to accounts of the value of achievement. Bradford has the most developed account. She holds that difficulty and competent causation are directly responsible for achievement's noninstrumental value (2015, 114),17 and that the value of difficulty and competent causation is perfectionist in nature (114–123). Perfectionism is the view that noninstrumental value is located in the excellent exercise or perfection of certain capacities that are characteristic of human beings which, on Bradford's view, comprise the capacities of rationality (theoretical and practical) and willing (118–19).Difficulty and competent causation involve the exercise of the capacities of rationality and willing, therefore they possess noninstrumental value (121–123). Because achievements in turn involve difficulty and competent causation achievements are noninstrumentally valuable. If AEA proponents contend that enhanced achievements are \"hollow\" or \"cheap\" or lacking in value, they cannot subscribe to Bradford's view. For her, achievements are always valuable because the essential features of achievement are directly responsible for their value. Any and every achievement possesses value because any and every case of achievement involves the exercise of the two characteristic capacities of rationality and willing that confer value on difficult activity and on competent causation. Insofar as AEA proponents accept this variant of perfectionism, they cannot hold that there are hollow achievements. This is an unfortunate outcome for AEA proponents since something like Bradford's view, which emphasises the will and effort, seems to be presupposed by their line of argument. Not only does reliance on something like Bradford's view fail to provide for the possibility of hollow achievements, it leaves the AEA proponent open to an objection. On Bradford's view, all exertions of effort are valuable. It would seem to follow that \"we should make every task that we undertake as difficult for ourselves as we can\" (93).18 Proponents of the AEA seem to agree that exertions of effort supply value to achievements. They admire \"those who overcome obstacles and struggle\" (Kass 2003, 21) andwho \"sweat and struggle, sometimes against great odds\" (Cole-Turner 1998, 155). If we should not enhance ourselves to make things less effortful because this alters the value of our achievements, why should we not make things more effortful to get more (achievement) value? Bradford replies that effort is only one value among many (2015, 93). True, the argument goes, the fact that something is effortful provides a reason to value it. But it does not follow that making every activity more effortful is what we have, all things considered, reason to do, for there are things other than effort that are noninstrumentally valuable and that in certain cases outweigh the value of effort, for example, pleasure and knowledge (93, 134n2). The perfectionist AEA proponent may borrow this reply. This will not help; the reply accepts that effort always has noninstrumental value. But it seems that not all effort possesses noninstrumental value. Therefore, not every case in which effort is eschewed is one in which it is outweighed by a rival value. Consider: Tony's Headache: Tony has a headache. This makes working on his paper more difficult, because he has to exert intense effort to concentrate. He can, however, take a pill to get rid of the headache and make work less effortful for him. precisely because of its power and efficiency, seems to cheat us of the experience of accomplishment, which is something valued in distinction from the achievement of the end.\" 17The process and the product might also add value to the state of affairs (Bradford 2015, 91, 99, 122, 133, 160ff.). 18The same worry arises for Keller's welfarist view whichmaintains that increased effort entails increased value (2004, 36, 38; also Hurka 2011, 99–118). For a criticism of Keller, see Portmore 2007, 9ff. For more on this, see below. 12 Lisa Forsberg and Anthony Skelton It is not obvious that the effort generated by the pain gives Tony a reason to refrain from taking the pill. And if he does take it, it is unlikely to be because the value of effort is outweighed by another value (for example pleasure or knowledge). Tony does not need to consult other values to provide a reason to take the remedy. The best explanation for this is that the exertion of effort is not in every case valuable. Since (at least) this perfectionist version of the AEA accepts that the exertion of effort is a source of value in achievement, Tony's Headache presents a challenge to it. Bradford might reply that in this case there is reason not to promote the thing that generates the need for effort, namely, the pain.19 Her view is that activities are effortful because of effortrequiring features (2015, 105–7). A wide range of features make activities effortful (for there are not, on her view, any features that are universally effort-requiring). Thus a math problem is difficult in virtue of complicated steps and skills, running a marathon is difficult in virtue of physical exertion and fatigue, and so on. The effort-requiring features, on Bradford's view, are distinct from the effort itself. In Tony's Headache, among the effort-requiring features is pain. But perhaps unlike complexity and physical exertion the effort-requiring feature of pain is something that we lack a reason to promote. Some effort-requiring features are ones we have reason to promote and others not, and which category a feature falls into depends (one might suppose) on what is of value.20 The AEA proponentmay try to borrow this reply and further point out thatTony's Headache is a case of treatment, not enhancement. The effort-requiring features in treatment cases (pain, illness, disability, and so forth) are of a kind that we do not have reason to promote. IfDistracted Susan had suffered from attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder, we would have reason to reduce her effort by means of a concentration-promoting medication, since the source of the effort would be a medical condition which, presumably, for the AEA proponent, would be an effort-requiring feature we have reason not to promote. But it does not seem likely that it is only in treatment cases that the effort-requiring features are ones we have a reason not to promote. It is not clear that, if Susan were instead distracted, for example, because she was heartbroken after being left by her partner this would be an effortrequiring feature that we would have reason to promote (or not reduce). It seems unlikely that the distinction between those effort-requiring features that are worth promoting and those that are not would track the treatment-enhancement distinction such that we would have reason to promote effort-requiring features targeted by enhancement, but not have reason to promote effort-requiring features targeted by treatment. If it did not, the AEAwould not be able to rely on Bradford's reply to cases like Tony's Headache to impugn enhancement cases.21 May the AEA proponent do better by adopting an account of perfectionism that avoids the controversy surrounding the claim that effort always has noninstrumental value?22 Consider again 19We owe this reply to Gwen Bradford. 20Bradfordmight, of course, argue that there are all kinds of reasons againstmaking activitiesmore difficult. Additional effort leads to instrumental evils (exhaustion)-so we may have (extrinsically sourced) reasons to avoid difficulty, even though pro tanto difficulty generates reasons (and is valuable) for its promotion. But claiming that the reasons of effort are outweighed by instrumental reasons seems not to be a correct view of why we think Tony ought to avoid the pain. He has no reason to exert effort to deal with the pain even in the absence of instrumental disvalues. It seems likely that we value the exertion of great effort because it involves perseverance or tenacity and having the capacity to persevere in the face of great obstacles or challenges is of use in dealing with a great many things standing in the way of a good life, including headaches, inclement weather, and shorttempered co-authors! 21Bradford's reply seems tomiss the point anyway. There does seem to be a reason, on her view, not to take the pill: not taking the pill makes the activity (writing the paper, in Tony's case) more difficult. Qua painful there is a reason to take the pill; qua effort-requiring there is a reason not to take the pill. This seems odd. It seems that the fact that the effort is increased by the pain is not a reason to refrain from taking the pill. 22Our intuition in Tony's Headache that the exertion of effort is not always noninstrumentally good is controversial. We are aware that the case is divisive and not everyone shares our intuition; our aim is to bring out a potentially controversial element of one view of the value of achievement. Thanks to two anonymous referees for pressing us on this issue. Canadian Journal of Philosophy 13 Hirji's view according to which \"an achievement is a process culminating in a product that is competently caused and that tests the limit of an agent's perfectionist capacity\" (2019, 543; italics removed). Her view seems to avoid the objection pressed against Bradford above by dropping emphasis on the will. On Hirji's view, the capacities to be perfected are \"one's practical rationality, one's theoretical rationality, one's creativity, and one's physical abilities\" (542). Although effort might be something that is involved in perfecting these capacities, it is not something that, onHirji's view, we have direct reason to promote. Exercise of will is not valuable per se. According to Hirji, if something counts as an achievement, it will have (perfectionist) value. So, again, there are no hollow achievements. The AEA proponent cannot appeal to this view for help in demonstrating that there are hollow or valueless achievements. It is likely that any plausible perfectionist view will include capacities that are intimately connected with at least some of the essential features of achievement. Most perfectionist views will be committed to the claim that it is noninstrumentally valuable to realize to a high degree our intellectual or cognitive capacities and (perhaps) something like our willing or our capacity to be \"at work in the world\" (see Brink 1989, 232ff.; Hurka 1993, 2011, 99–118), and these seem to be just the sorts of things that are involved in achievement. All the views on the nature of achievement discussed above hold that competent causation is essential. This involves in someway the exercise of the capacities of practical and theoretical rationality. As long as this is the case, achievement cannot fail to have value from the perfectionist point of view. The proponent of the AEA cannot secure the existence of hollow or valueless achievements by adopting a welfarist view of their value. On some welfarist views, for example, the achievement of any goal has noninstrumental prudential value. According to Keller's (2004, 36) version of this position, \"[w]henever an individual achieves a goal, she is better off in one respect.\"Moreover, on his view, the value of an achievement lies partly in the fact that it involves effort: \"The greater the quantity of productive effort that an individual successfully devotes to the achievement of a particular goal, the more the achievement contributes to her welfare\" (36). On this view, if something counts as an achievement, whether enhanced or not, it has (prudential) value. Therefore, adopting a welfarist view of this kind will not help the AEA proponent explicate the idea that there are hollow achievements, and it cannot explain why in some cases there is no reason to make activities more effortful. Indeed, insofar as a proponent of the AEA accepts any account of the value of achievement grounded in its essential features, they cannot argue that enhanced achievements have no value. Other welfarist views are no friendlier to the idea that there are hollow achievements. As noted, James Griffin (1986) argues that accomplishments (his word for achievements) themselves are prudentially good for one. Therefore, in any case in which one achieves something one is noninstrumentally better off. On Portmore's welfarist view (2007), the value of an achievement depends on the investment made in it, where this is a measure of the amount that an individual has personally sacrificed, for example, leisure, family time, and education, to achieve something. The more one has invested in the achievement, the more prudential value the achievement has since it redeems the sacrifice. This view does not rest the value of an achievement in its essential features. However, it is quite possible that enhanced individuals have sacrificed a lot personally for their achievements. In this case, an activity will have prudential value if it qualifies as an achievement. On Portmore's view, then, not all enhanced achievements will be hollow. On other welfarist views, some achievements may be hollow or cheap. Hedonist and (some) preference fulfilment views seem to allow for this. An enhanced achievement might be such that it fails to produce pleasure or satisfy one's considered preferences. But this will not be true of all enhanced achievements, for some will produce pleasure or produce (considered) preference fulfilment or both, and it may be true that some nonenhanced achievements will be hollow. Hollowness is not, then, unique to enhanced achievements. An objective-list view comprising such noninstrumental prudential goods as the contemplation of beauty, friendship, pleasure, autonomy, and so onmight allow for hollow achievements. It is possible 14 Lisa Forsberg and Anthony Skelton that if an achievement fails to produce any of these values, it is hollow. But again the view does not seem to generate the conclusion that all enhanced achievements lack value or are hollow. If an enhanced achievement advanced various goods such as friendship or autonomy, it would have value. It does seem that if enhanced achievements make people's lives go prudentially better in some way, and there is at least some reason to promote welfare, there is at least some reason to value some (safe and effective) enhancement. The move from perfectionism to welfarism does not, then, help the AEA proponent establish that enhanced achievements are hollow or lack value. The strong reading of this version of the AEA fails on both perfectionism and welfarism. Moreover, we might think that there could be cases in which enhancement increases the value of achievements. First, with respect to effort, enhancing our capacities to exertmore effortmight result in an ability to do more difficult things yielding potentially more valuable products.23 Second, enhancing our capacity for rationality would increase our ability to understand and manipulate various elements of our activities and the process by which our achievements come about and, thereby, presumably increase our ability to successfully undertake even more complex achievements.24 What about the weaker reading of this version of the AEA? Its proponent could make the argument that rather than causing achievements to lack value, enhancement might cause them to have (considerably) less value. This line of reply is not a good one for the AEA proponent for again it does not explain how enhancement poses an unusual threat to the source of the value of achievement. There will be all manner of interventions or tools that may make a difference to the source of the value of achievement, not all of which are so-called \"enhancements.\" The difficulty for the AEA proponent is that he has yet to supply a plausible way to distinguish the threat posed to the source of the value of achievements by enhancements from those posed by other interventions or tools so that only the former count as generally and unusually threatening to the value of achievement. Conclusion At one time neglected, achievement is now a growing preoccupation in normative ethics. In this paper, we engaged with the nature and the value of achievement through a critical examination of an argument according to which biomedical enhancement of our capacities is impermissible 23At least on some perfectionist views, a more valuable product means more perfectionist value attaches to the achievement (see Hirji, 2019, 535–36). 24In reply to these claims, an anonymous referee puts forward a different argument against enhancement that the referee calls the average argument. On this argument, there is no achievement-based reason not to enhance, but nor is there an achievementbased reason to enhance. All enhancements are such that, while they may realize better products, their value as achievements remain the same, because the effort exerted in them is the same. To illustrate, the referee offers the following. Imagine that Fred is capable of running a seven-minute mile \"using all\" his effort. Fred takes an enhancement. He then runs a faster than sevenminute mile, again \"using all\" his effort. The referee argues that since in both cases all of Fred's effort is being used the value of Fred's achievement remains the same. If this is true of enhancement generally, the referee argues, there is no achievement-based reason to enhance. It is, however, questionable whether what counts as \"all\" Fred's effort is the same in quantity in both cases. What reason might we have for thinking that it is? It is possible that, at least in some cases, enhancement might increase the amount of effort one might be able to exert. If so, there is an achievement-based reason to enhance. Of course, the referee's argument works only if we accept that other things equal the value of an achievement increases as it becomesmore effortful.We have given reasons against this view. But even if one accepts it, there is reason to be puzzled about the claim that the value of Fred's achievement is the same in both cases. The less than seven-minute mile seems a greater achievement. The effort view cannot capture this, because it embraces an agent-relative conception of difficulty (which is analyzed in terms of effort). Perhaps in this case it is more plausible to adopt an agent-neutral view of difficulty (which is analyzed in terms of what an adult human being with average capabilities is unlikely to succeed at). But on this conception of difficulty, we may have achievement-based reasons to enhance since doing so makes it more likely that we will be able to do things that are agent-neutrally difficult. Canadian Journal of Philosophy 15 because enhancing ourselves in this way would threaten our achievements. We called this the argument against enhancement from achievement, or the AEA. We clarified the argument to determine its strength and its effect on the philosophical understanding of achievement's nature and its value. We developed and assessed three versions of the AEA. On the first version of the argument, enhancement causes the activity not to involve the requisite amount of difficulty. On the second version, enhancement interferes with the agent causing the product in the right way. In both cases, enhancement interferes with an activity qualifying as an achievement. On the third version of the argument, what one achieves with the aid of enhancement is, because of what is involved in the achievement, lacking in the properties that typically provide its value. Each of these versions can be given a strong or a weak reading. We argued that strong readings of the AEA fail to establish that enhancement always interferes with the nature or value of achievement, and that weak readings, while in some cases successful in showing that enhancement interferes with the nature or value of achievement, fail to establish that enhancement poses an unusual threat to achievement. Acknowledgements. We wish to thank Gwen Bradford, Tom Douglas, Johan Gustafsson, two anonymous referees for the Canadian Journal of Philosophy; and audiences at the Society for Applied Philosophy Annual Conference, Queens University Belfast, 2016; the 9th Rocky Mountain Ethics Congress, University of Colorado, Boulder, 2016; and the Oxford Uehiro Centre for Practical Ethics Work in Progress seminar, University of Oxford, 2018 for helpful comments on previous versions of this paper. Funding statement. This work was supported by Tom Douglas's Wellcome Trust grant number 100705/Z/12/Z and by Lisa Forsberg's British Academy Postdoctoral Fellowship award pf170028. Lisa Forsberg is a British Academy Postdoctoral Fellow in the Faculty of Law, the Oxford Uehiro Centre for Practical Ethics, and Somerville College, University of Oxford. Her research interests are in moral and legal philosophy. Anthony Skelton is associate professor in theDepartment of Philosophy at the University ofWesternOntario. He researches in the areas of the history of ethics and normative ethics. His previous publications have appeared in Ethics, Journal of the History of Philosophy, and Utilitas. References Bradford, G. 2015. Achievement. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Brink, D. 1989. Moral Realism and the Foundations of Ethics. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. Buchanan, A. 2011. Beyond Humanity? The Ethics of Biomedical Enhancement. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Cole-Turner, R. 1998. \"Do Means Matter?\" In Enhancing Human Traits: Ethical and Social Implications, edited by E. Parens, 151–61. Washington, DC: Georgetown University Press. Douglas, T. 2008. \"Moral Enhancement.\" Journal of Applied Philosophy 25 (3): 228–45. Douglas, T. 2019. \"Enhancement and Desert.\" Politics, Philosophy, and Economics 18 (1): 3–22. Goodman, R. 2010. \"Cognitive Enhancement, Cheating, and Accomplishment.\" Kennedy Institute of Ethics Journal, 20 (2): 145–60. Griffin, J. 1986. Well-Being: Its Meaning, Measurement, and its Moral Importance. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Hirji, Sukaina. 2019. \"Not Always Worth the Effort: Difficulty and the Value of Achievement.\" Pacific Philosophical Quarterly 100 (2): 525–48. Hurka, T. 1993. Perfectionism. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Hurka, T. 2006. \"Games and the Good.\" Proceedings of the Aristotelian Society, Supplementary Volumes 80: 217–35. Hurka, T. 2011. The Best Things in Life. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Juengst, E. T. 1998. \"What Does Enhancement Mean?\" In Enhancing Human Traits: Ethical and Social Implications, edited by E. Parens, 29–47. Washington, DC: Georgetown University Press. Kass, L. 2003. \"Ageless Bodies, Happy Souls: Biotechnology and the Pursuit of Perfection.\" The New Atlantis 1: 9–28. Keller, S. 2004. \"Welfare and the Achievement of Goals.\" Philosophical Studies 212 (1): 27–41. Nozick, R. 1974. Anarchy, State, and Utopia. New York: Basic Books. Parfit, D. 1984. Reasons and Persons. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Portmore, D. W. 2007. \"Welfare, Achievement, and Self-Sacrifice.\" Journal of Ethics and Social Philosophy 2 (2): 1–28. The President's Council on Bioethics. 2003. Beyond Therapy. Biotechnology and the Pursuit of Happiness. 16 Lisa Forsberg and Anthony Skelton Pritchard, D. 2010. \"Achievement, Luck and Value.\" Think 9 (25): 19–30. Sandel, M. 2007. The Case against Perfection. Cambridge, MA: Belknap Press. Scanlon, T. M. 1998. What We Owe to Each Other. Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press. von Kriegstein, H. 2019a. \"On Being Difficult: Towards an Account of the Nature of Difficulty.\" Philosophical Studies 176 (1): 45–64. von Kriegstein, H. 2019b. \"Succeeding Competently: Towards an Anti-Luck Condition for Achievement.\" Canadian Journal of Philosophy 49 (3): 394–418. Cite this article: Forsberg, L. and Skelton, A. 2019. Achievement and Enhancement. Canadian Journal of Philosophy: 1–17, doi:10.1017/can.2019.43 Canadian Journal of Philosophy"}
{"meta": {"title": "Aesthetic Formalism, Reactions and Solutions", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Bagheri Noaparast, Mohammad Zoheir", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "It seems necessary to introduce the basic concepts used in this article i.e. formalism, anti-formalism and moderate formalism. Formalists believe that the aesthetic appreciation of an art work generally involves an attentive awareness of its sensory or conceptual qualities and does not require knowledge about its non-perceptual properties. Anti-formalists on the hand hold that noon of the aesthetic properties in the work of art are formal. A number of philosophers have recently advocated a more moderate formalism. According to this view although not all aesthetic properties are formal, many are, and some artworks possess only formal aesthetic qualities. The quarrel among these three rival views concerns what sort of knowledge, if any, is required for appropriate aesthetic appreciation of an art work. In what follows, we will give a brief exposition of these three view points. Subsequently we will give our preferred position with regard to these views.", "date": "2011", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/NOAAFR", "language": "zz", "datestamp": "2014-02-11T05:16:48Z"}, "text": "Hekmat va Falsafe (Wisdom and Philosophy) vol.6, no.4, 2011, pp. 101-112 101 Aesthetic Formalism, Reactions and Solutions Khosrow Bagheri Noaparast Mohammad Zoheir Bagheri Noaparast Abstract It seems necessary to introduce the basic concepts used in this article i.e. formalism, anti-formalism and moderate formalism. Formalists believe that the aesthetic appreciation of an artwork generally involves an attentive awareness of its sensory or perceptual qualities and does not require knowledge about its non-perceptual properties. Anti-formalists on the other hand hold that none of the aesthetic properties in a work of art are formal. A number of philosophers have recently advocated a more moderate formalism. According to this view, although not all aesthetic qualities are formal, many are, and some artworks possess only formal aesthetic qualities. The quarrel among these three rival views concerns what sort of knowledge, if any, is required for appropriate aesthetic appreciation of an artwork. In what follows, we will give a brief exposition of these three viewpoints. Subsequently, we will give our preferred position with regard to these views. Keywords: Aesthetic formalism, anti-formalism, aesthetics, Nick Zangwill. 102 1. Formalism, anti-formalism and moderate formalism Before getting involved with the details of the three viewpoints, it seems necessary to introduce the notions of aesthetic and non-aesthetic properties and formal and nonformal properties. Observable properties are properties that can make a difference in our perceptual experience of the artwork. In contrast, non-observable properties refer to instances such as the artist‟s intention, the artist‟s love life, the artist‟s mental health, the artwork‟s history. Aesthetic properties are those observable characteristics of works of art that constitute features such as being unified, balanced, integrated, lifeless, serene, somber, dynamic, powerful, vivid, delicate, moving, trite, sentimental, tragic, graceful, delicate, dainty, elegant, and beautiful. On the other hand, non-aesthetic properties can be observable and non-observable. The former like being red and the latter like originality. 1-1. Formal and Non-formal Properties Formalists like Bell (1914) regard lines, shapes, and colors which are within the frame as formal aesthetic features. However, the representational characteristics of works of art are not entirely determined by what is in the frame but also by characteristics such as the history of the work of art or the artist‟s intentions. It might be thought that an easy way to account for formal properties is to say that they are determined merely by sensory or physical properties except in the case that the physical properties are in relation to other things and other times. However, some philosophers would hold that aesthetic properties in fact refer to dispositions that activate responses in human beings without taking it to be necessary that these dispositions are formal properties. Zangwill stipulates that the word „narrow‟ contains sensory and non-relational physical properties along with the dispositions constituting aesthetic properties. In addition, he stipulates the word „broad‟ for anything else: \"Formal properties are entirely determined by narrow non-aesthetic properties, whereas non-formal aesthetic properties are partly determined by broad non-aesthetic properties.\" (Zangwill, 1999, p. 611) He gives the history of production of a work of art as an example for broad property because it is neither a sensory property nor a nonrelational physical property and nor a dispositional characteristic. 103 1-2. Formalism We can talk about aesthetic and non-aesthetic properties when considering a work of art. The aesthetic properties are determined by non-aesthetic properties; a formalist should accept this much. The scope and relevance of non-aesthetic properties that determine aesthetic properties are what parts the formalists from the other two groups. (Zangwill, 1999, p. 610) Walton gives this definition of formalism which is in fact privative: \"Circumstances connected with a work‟s origin... have no essential bearing on an assessment of its aesthetic nature\". (Walton, 1970, p.334) But how would a positive definition look like? We can advance it as follows. Formalism describes an approach in which the formal qualities of a work such as line, shape, and color are regarded as self-sufficient for its appreciation, and all other considerations such as representational or history of work of art are treated as secondary or redundant. The essence of art is given through the formal unity of an artwork, involving such features as structure, balance, and harmony. Our appreciation of art lies in recognizing these formal qualities and, furthermore, in responding to them. The content of an artwork and its relations with the outside world are subordinate to its formal features. For example, the beauty of a painting consists in the relations of color and line. Clive Bell is a prominent formalist. He holds that all works of art produce an emotion in the viewer. This emotion is not different but the same for all people. There must be a factor common to all works of art that produces in the viewer a state of Aesthetic Emotion. This common factor is form. Significant form is a term used by Bell to describe forms that are arranged by some unknown and mysterious laws. Thus, all art must contain not merely form, but significant form. Under formalism, art is appreciated not for its expression but instead for the forms of its components. Examples of these forms include lines, curves, shapes, and colors. Abstract art is an example of art that is not representative and thus is most likely to be appreciated as art in terms of their forms rather than their content. Bell‟s position is not confined to what is said above. He advocates a strong version of formalism. Accordingly, nothing else about an object is in any way relevant to assessing whether it is a work of art, or aesthetically valuable. Representational aspect of a painting, for example, is completely irrelevant to evaluating it aesthetically. Hence, he holds that knowledge of the historical context of a painting or the intention of the painter is unnecessary for the appreciation of visual art: \"To appreciate a work of art 104 we need bring with us nothing from life, no knowledge of its ideas and affairs, no familiarity with its emotions.\" (Bell, 1914, p. 27) It is obvious that Bell is interested in abstract art since there is no representation in it. But, how can we give value to paintings of people? This could be done by paying attention to the relation between the figures in the painting; in this way its representational aspects are evaded. But it seems impossible to ignore the figures in paintings and just paying attention to brush strokes emerging into one another. It may only be possible in abstract art. Formalism has been under scrutiny. Here, I am going to mention three tenable criticisms. First of all, the term „significant form‟ used by Bell is quite problematic. In describing it he refers to the form arranged by some unknown and mysterious laws. He does not define „significant form‟ directly. Therefore, we naturally look for a definition of „unknown and mysterious laws‟. However, he has not come up with such definition. This makes „significant form‟ a vague notion which no one can understand. The second criticism of formalism comes from Zangwill. His criticism concentrates on the implausibility of differentiation between aesthetic and representational properties. He believes that formalists put these two along side each other. Although, he holds that these two kinds of properties are multiplied and not simply added. Zangwill clarifies this point with an example: \"Something is not just a beautiful pattern and a picture of a tree but beautiful as a picture of a tree. The two properties are not merely added but multiplied.\" (Zangwill, 1999, p.615) He stresses on the representational characteristic of the work of art instead of limiting it to an abstract design. This is because we should understand the representational function of the work of art if we want to understand it altogether. He points out that the formal characteristics are essential but this does not justify their extreme formal position. The third criticism concerns the properties that have a relational nature. Fenner holds that formalists do not capture this kind of properties: \"If we believe that a case for the aesthetic merits of an object (art or otherwise) includes citation of properties that speak to the representational relation between that object and some other, formalism does not have a place for this.\" (Fenner, 2008, pp. 128-129) As it is obvious in this phrase, a relational property refers to the relation between a work of art and a distinct object that provides aesthetic merits for the work of art one way or another. 105 1-3. Anti-formalism Walton defines anti-formalism in this way: \"Facts about the origins of works of art have an essential role in criticism that aesthetic judgments rest on them in an absolutely fundamental way.\" (Walton, 1970, p.337) Anti-formalism states that in order to appreciate a work of art aesthetically we must always see that work in a historical context. They hold that the aesthetic value and even the identity of a work of art depend on its place in the realm of art as a historical situation. This is exactly opposed to what Bell holds: „...what does it matter whether the forms that move [us] were created in Paris the day before yesterday or in Babylon fifty centuries ago?‟ (1914, pp. 45-46). Anti-formalists assert that a work only has aesthetic significance in the context of other works in the tradition and category in which the work is located. Gombrich, an anti-formalist, developed an imaginary example of physically identical works by different artists and invited us to judge that they are aesthetically different (Gombrich, 1960, p. 313). Such arguments are supposed to show that a work‟s physical nature does not suffice for its aesthetic properties and that history also plays a role. In the same vein, Walton argues that two identical objects can have different aesthetic properties based on the category in which they are perceived. He argues that the Guernica perceived in the category of paintings and the same work perceived in the category of guernicas would appear to have different aesthetic properties: \"[Walton] thinks that in order to make an aesthetic judgment about a work we must see it under art-historical categories, such as „cubist‟ or „sonata‟\". (Zangwill, 2000b, p.479) Category has been described by Walton with segregating three features i.e. standard (if objects belong to a category in virtue of having the feature), contra-standard (if objects having a feature tend to disqualify them from belonging to the category) and variable (if the feature has nothing to do with the category). The categories we perceive for work, determine not only what aesthetic properties we perceive it as having, but also what aesthetic properties it does in fact have. (Walton, 1970, p. 340) If the following conditions hold then one can correctly categorize a work „W‟ within a category „C‟: \"(i) The presence in W of a relatively large number of features standard (in a sense explained) with respect to C. (ii) The fact that W perceived in C is more interesting, pleasing, worth experiencing than it is perceived in alternative ways. (iii) The fact that the artist intended or expected W to be perceived in C. (iv) The fact that C is well 106 established in and recognized by the society in which W was produced.\" (Walton, 1973, p.267) 1-4. Moderate Formalism Moderate formalists came to the conclusion that formalists like Bell have been exaggerating the case when mentioning that all aesthetic qualities depend on nothing beyond the sensory surface of the object. They hold that some aesthetic qualities are as mentioned. (Parsons, 2004, p.20) Kant introduces the notion of „dependent‟ beauty in contrast to free beauty: \"There are two kinds of beauty; free beauty (pulchritudo vaga) or merely dependent beauty (pulchritudo adhaerens). The first presupposes no concept of what the object ought to be; the second does presuppose such a concept and the perfection of the object in accordance therewith. The first is called the (self-subsistent) beauty of this or that thing; the second, as dependent upon a concept (conditioned beauty), is ascribed to objects which come under the concept of a particular purpose.\" (Kant, 1914, section 16) Referring to this Kantian distinction, Zangwill states: \"And if a work of art is dependent beautiful, its beauty is determined in part by the functional properties that were bestowed on it by a certain history of production. In particular, the artist‟s intentions are the source of the function.\" (Zangwill, 1999, p.612) The music played in a restaurant has a function therefore it is a dependent beauty. Its function might increase your appetite. This kind of musical beauty arises when music serves some non-musical function or purpose. This music has a certain non-musical function and the aesthetic qualities of this music are not separate from that function but are an expression of it. However, there are many aesthetic properties that are purely formal, and there are many purely formal works. Some paintings are entirely abstract. Moreover, most representational paintings have formal aesthetic features among their other aesthetic features. Moderate formalists insist on the importance of both formal and non-formal properties: \"The moderate formalist concedes that representational works have nonformal aesthetic properties. And he concedes that „contextual‟ works have non-formal aesthetic properties- where contextual works are works that are intended to be seen only in the light of other works. But the moderate formalist insists that there are some works of art that only have formal aesthetic properties.\" (ibid, p. 613) In order to defend moderate formalism, Zangwill first challenges formalism and anti-formalism. In what follows I will bring in his critiques and finally summarize his defense of moderate formalism. 107 Zangwill puts forward an argument against formalism including two premises. The first premise indicates that representational properties of a work are determined partly by their history. The second premise holds that aesthetic properties are partly determined by what they represent given that beauty is constituted by representation rather than being added to the representation. The history of a work of art is determinative regarding aesthetic properties thus they are not purely formal. (Zangwill, 2000b, p.481) Zangwill talks about the contextual art as an example of refuting formalism. These works should be perceived \"in light of or juxtaposed to other works of art.\" In these cases the history of works of art partly determines the aesthetic property of that work. But this conclusion cannot be generalized to abstract and non-contextual art, and it cannot be generalized to the non-representational and non-contextual features of representational and contextual works of art. (Zangwill, 2000b, p. 483) Zangwill has an implicit argument against anti-formalism represented by an example: a Roman statue is a man with wrinkled forehead and serious face what, understanding these representational properties we need to know its origins: \"If (Walton) is right only about representational properties then it could still be the case that many works of art, the abstract ones, have aesthetic properties that do not depend on their history of production. Formalism might yet be true of them.\" (Zangwill, 2000b, p.482) Zangwill comes up with a case that defends moderate formalism on the basis of that case. This case refers to what is called „plastic form‟ that relates to formal properties of pictures that originate in the spatial relationships between the items which are regarded to be represented. An instance of such qualities can be found in Poussin‟s paintings. These properties could not be regarded as formal proper because they are determined partly by representational conventions which are in turn under the influence of the history of a work. One possible solution is to consider a wider conception of „formal‟ so that it will include both the standard meaning of formal and these plastic forms. Though not successful, this suggestion can be considered as a support for moderate formalism because formal and non-formal properties are involved in this category. Zangwill refers to this point by saying that: \"So moderate formalism is right, even if we operate with the wide notion of a formal property.\" (Zangwill, 1999, p. 617) Zangwill mentions that the art-category argument made by Walton, if proved, is a lethal strike to moderate formalism and formalism. Unlike representational argument 108 this involves all works of art. The art-category discussed by Walton was described above. He uses the Guernica thought experiment to show that the aesthetic character of a work of art is mainly determined by art-historical categories. For example: in a culture instead of creating painting an artist creates what is called a Guernica that is similar to Picasso‟s. The only difference is that they are three-dimensional and have different sized and shaped bumps. So a flat work exactly like Picasso‟s which is \"violent, dynamic, and vital\" may seem \"bland, dull and boring\" in that culture. Zangwill responds to Walton‟s argument as follows. He accepts that a flat guernica is less lively compared to most guernicas as a class. On the other hand, Picasso‟s Guernica is „vital‟ compared to most paintings that are not lively as a class. However, he claims that it is consistent to hold that the flat guernica is as lively as Picasso‟s Guernica. \"The two might be equivalent in terms of degree of liveliness and also equivalent in respect of other aesthetic properties.\" (Zangwill, 2000b, p.487) Moderate formalists appeal to a benign dilemma in order to defend their position. According to this dilemma, at least in some cases, either the properties are referred to by the category are narrow properties being aesthetically relevant, or else they are broad properties without being aesthetically relevant. Zangwill admits that some works of art are representational and some others are contextual. However, he maintains that in these cases the dilemma does not hold because there are broad properties being aesthetically relevant. The point wherein the benign dilemma does hold includes the works of art which are neither representational nor contextual. (Zangwill, 2000b, p.493) Facing objections to moderate formalism, Zangwill (2000a) has classified his defenses into three categories i.e. tactical retreat, irrelevance, and benign dilemma. For example, in dealing with representational and contextual properties, he suggests tactical retreat; in the case of the necessity of knowledge of other works for determining aesthetic judgment he appeals to irrelevance; and finally benign dilemma is used in the case of art works which are neither contextual nor representational. 109 2. Criticisms against Zangwill Concerning Zangwill‟s claim as to much of art works are non-contextual and nonrepresentational, Parsons maintains that only a tiny fraction of artworks within the human history is non-representational. And in the twentieth century only abstract art is non-representational. In addition, he claims it is not clear that how much of the abstract art works are non-representational. Mondrian‟s mature works are termed „truly abstract‟ by Zangwill; however, Mondrian has given titles to his mature works e.g. \"Broadway Boogie Woogie\", which undermines their being purely abstract. (Parsons, 2004, p. 21) To be purely formal, a work of art should be non-contextual as well as nonrepresentational. Zangwill claims that much of art works are like this. (Zangwill, 2001, p. 89) Given Zangwill‟s definition of contextual in terms of intention of artists in order for his work to be seen in the light of other works (Zangwill, 2001, p. 103), there will be very few non-contextual works. This is because the artist though covertly will assume that his work should be compared to those of others. Even if the artist would refrain from doing so the audience will naturally compare his work with other works and this comparison affects their appreciation of the work of art. If we accept the plausible view that explicit intention of the artist is not the main source of rendering the art work contextual then many works of art will be contextual, therefore many nonrepresentational works will be contextual as well. Thus, formalism will be an explanation for only a tiny fraction of art works. (Parsons, 2004, p.22) Apart from claiming that aesthetic formalism explains only a tiny fraction of art works, Parsons puts forward a further critique to the effect that Zangwill has not been able to meet Walton‟s objections. Walton has introduced six kinds of categorydependent aesthetic property: Representational properties; being dynamic, violent, or lifeless; displaying order, inevitability, or correctness; being lyrical or energetic; possessing tension; and being shocking or disturbing. Zangwill has accepted that the first and the last one are category-dependent however, he claims that the other four are not. There is no enough space here to give the details of this challenge. However, on the whole, Parsons believes that Zangwill fails to refute the other four as being categorydependent. Another objection can be leveled against moderate formalism. It concentrates on the originality of the work of art being a historical matter and at the same time determining the aesthetic value. (Levinson, 1980, pp. 10-11) 110 Zangwill replies by distinguishing between aesthetic value and artistic value. By relating originality to artistic value rather than aesthetic value he concludes that this objection does not hold. This is because, according to him, originality determines the artistic value of an art work compared to the previous ones. However, an art work can be aesthetically adequate in having elegance, beauty, and delicacy, even though it might be artistically repetitive. (Zangwill, 2000a, p. 381) 3. Conclusion Curtain (1982, p. 319) identifies a merit in formalism on the ground that in comparison between form and content, the formal elements are more satisfying and elevating because they „inhere in the work itself‟ while content refers to representational elements outside of the work of art. Consequently instinct, charm, and content rest on one side, whereas imagination, pure beauty, and form are on the opposite side. Formal properties are responsible for pure beauty and produced by imagination whereas non-formal properties are in charge of charm and inspired by instinct. We claim, so far as formalism is concerned, „Form‟ provides the objective ground of art and to gain an objective standpoint we need to emphasize and consider formal properties to a great extent. The less we aim at this goal, the more we get closer to the boundaries of subjectivity which makes aesthetic judgment and evaluation arbitrary. From a formalist's point of view taking historical importance of a painting into consideration is treating it as a document and not as aesthetic object. The intention of the artist that is a non-formal element is quite substantial in shaping a work of art as far as artistic, rather than aesthetic, value is concerned. Suppose a fire in a building leads to the appearance of a beautifully shaped object. In this case, something has been made by an accident and it provokes a sense of beauty inside you. Depending on what stratagem in terms of aesthetic formalism you hold, calling this object a work of art would vary. Moderate formalists and extreme formalists hold that formal elements play a role in the aesthetic realm, even though the former conceives it to be partly and the latter entirely. Even though, a little historical evidence (e.g. abstract art) exists to support their claim, but this shows that the entire scope of aesthetics is not a sovereign of antiformalism and places a limitation for generalizing claims about art about it being formal, anti-formal, or moderate formal. Art has not yet been completed and entirely 111 new schools and thoughts as well as new works will emerge in art as time will pass and it is not certain that the new works of art will fall under anti-formalism or formalism. Just because most of the works of art have been anti-formalist in nature up to now does not guarantee that future works will be of that nature too. This is because induction might face colorful swans every now and then. It would be promising if we take an open attitude towards the future works of art without categorizing them beforehand. In this manner it would be possible to examine each work ad hoc in order to see to what extent it might support or undermine formalism, anti-formalism, or moderate formalism. This could lead to the emergence of new and perhaps more capable aesthetic points of view. Otherwise, we will be condemned to a Procrustes type of analysis in a malignant manner. References Bell, Clive. (1914). Art. IndyPublish.com. Boston: Massachusetts. Curtin, Deane W. (1982).\"Varieties of Aesthetic Formalism\", The Journal of Aesthetics and Art Criticism, vol. 40, no. 3, pp. 315-326 Fenner, David. (2008). Art in Context: Understanding Aesthetic Value. Swallow Press: Ohio University Press, Athens, Ohio. Gombrich, Ernst. (1960). Art and Illusion. A Study in the Psychology of Pictorial Representation. London: Phaidon. Kant, Immanuel. (1914). Critique of Aesthetic Judgment. Translated by J. H. Bernard. London: MacMillan and co, limited. Levinson, Jerrold. (1980). \"What a Musical Work Is\", Journal of Philosophy, vol. 77.1, pp. 5-28 Parsons, Glenn. (2004). Moderate Formalism as a Theory of the Aesthetic, Journal of Aesthetic Education, vol. 38, no. 3. pp. 19-35. Walton, Kendall. (1970). Categories of Art. The Philosophical Review, vol. 79, no. 3, pp. 334-367 Walton, Kendall. (1973). \"Categories and Intentions: A Reply\", The Journal of Aesthetics and Art Criticism, vol. 32, no. 2, pp. 267268 Zangwill, Nick. (2000a). Defusing Anti-Formalist Arguments. British Journal of Aesthetics, vol.40, no. 3, pp. 367-383. Zangwill, Nick. (1999). Feasible aesthetic formalism. Nous, vol. 33, no. 4, pp. 610-629. Zangwill, Nick. (2000b). In Defense of Moderate Formalism. The Philosophical Quarterly, vol. 50, no. 201, pp. 476-493. 112 Zangwill, Nick. (2001). The Metaphysics of Beauty. Ithaca: Cornell University Press."}
{"meta": {"title": "Against Counterfactual Miracles", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Dorr, Cian", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "This paper considers how counterfactuals should be evaluated on the assumption that determinism is true.  I argue against Lewis's influential view that the actual laws of nature would have been false if something had happened that never actually happened, and in favour of the competing view that history would have been different all the way back.  I argue that we can do adequate justice to our ordinary practice of relying on a wide range of historical truths in evaluating counterfactuals by saying that, in typical cases, history would have been only *very slightly* different until shortly before the relevant time.  The paper also draws some connections between the puzzle about counterfactuals under determinism and the debate about whether determinism entails that no-one can ever do otherwise than they in fact do.", "date": "2016", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/DORACM", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2020-04-18T20:28:17Z"}, "text": "!1 Against Counterfactual Miracles Cian Dorr1 Penultimate version. If citing, please consult final version, published in Philosophical Review vol. 125, no. 2 (2016), 241–286. 1. The puzzle There is a puzzle about the truth of counterfactual conditionals in deterministic worlds. It is natural to suppose that if things had gone differently in the recent past-if, say, you had blinked one more time than you actually did while reading the previous sentence- the state of the world in the distant past would still have been exactly as it actually was. It is also natural to suppose that if you had blinked one more time than you actually did, the laws of nature that characterise how the state of the world at earlier times constrains its states at later times would still have been true. But if determinism is true, the combination of the state of the world in the distant past with the laws of nature entails the complete truth about everything that happens, including the truth about how many times you blinked when reading that sentence. So we cannot hold fixed both the laws and the past: something has to give. We should be precise about the relevant sense of 'determinism'. Let an intrinsic profile be an intrinsic property F such that, for any intrinsic property G, either it is metaphysically necessary that everything that has F has G, or it is metaphysically impossible for something to have both F and G. When F is an intrinsic profile that could be instantiated by an interval of time, let F's history-proposition be the proposition that some initial segment of the history of the world has F. And let determinism be the claim that every true proposition follows, with metaphysical necessity, from the conjunction of any true history-proposition with all the true laws of nature. Even though there are other 2 things one might mean by 'determinism', determinism in this sense is a live possibility, !2 one that many physicists and philosophers of physics take quite seriously. So it is not a merely academic exercise to investigate which of our ordinary beliefs are consistent with it.3 With this definition in hand, we can state our puzzle more rigorously. Let us stick with the example of blinking, and confine our attention to \"normal\" people-people without godlike powers, who live long after the beginning of time, in worlds without time travel or other such oddities, and have functional eyelids. Then we can regiment the puzzle as a valid argument from plausible premises to an implausible conclusion: Counterfactual Consequence Argument (CCA): Past Necessarily, whenever x is normal at t, there is a true history-proposition p such that p would still have been true if x had blinked at t. Laws Necessarily, whenever x is normal at t and p is a true law of nature, p would still have been true if x had blinked at t. Closure Necessarily, whenever x is normal at t and p is metaphysically necessitated by a set of propositions each of which would have been true if x had blinked at t, p would have been true if x had blinked at t. Triviality Necessarily, whenever x is normal at t and determinism is true, each true proposition would still have been true if x had blinked at t. The CCA is valid given our definition of determinism. For suppose that x is normal at t and determinism is true. By Past, there is a true history-proposition h which would have been true if x had blinked at t. Let h be such a history-proposition, and let S be the set containing h and all true laws of nature. By Laws, every member of S would have !3 been true if x had blinked at t. By determinism, S necessitates every truth. So by Closure, every truth would have been true if x had blinked at t. The prima facie appeal of Past, Laws, and Closure is clear. Triviality, meanwhile, is deeply implausible. For suppose determinism is true, and that x is some normal creature who fails to blink at t. Then the proposition that x fails to blink at t is true. So according to Triviality, this is one of the propositions that would still have been true if x had blinked at t. So if x had blinked at t, x would have failed to blink at t. But of course it is also true that if x had blinked at t, x would have blinked at t. So the upshot of Triviality is that the proposition that x blinks at t is counterfactually impossible: if it had been true, a contradiction would have been true. 4 There are four ways out: accept Triviality; deny Closure; deny Laws; deny Past. In sections 2–7, I will investigate these options in that order, finally pointing the finger at Past. Finally, in section 8 I will consider how reflection on the CCA should affect our evaluation of certain other Consequence Arguments which have been widely discussed in the literature on free will. Before we begin, we need to take account of an interfering factor which may make it hard to appreciate the difficulty of the puzzle, namely the well-known fact that counterfactual conditionals are context-sensitive. Sentences involving such conditionals generally admit multiple legitimate interpretations, and not all of the premises of the CCA are equally compelling under any interpretation. One particularly relevant example of context-sensitivity is the distinction Lewis (1979) drew between \"backtracking\" and \"standard\" contexts. This can be illustrated by an example from Jackson (1977): (1) a. If I had jumped out of this tenth-floor window, I would have been killed. !4 b. If I had jumped out of this tenth-floor window, I would have done so only because someone had put a safety net in place. Assuming I can see that the window overlooks a concrete pavement and am not suicidal, I could legitimately use either (1a) or (1b) to express something well supported by my evidence. But clearly the conjunction of (1a) and (1b) is false on any reasonable interpretation, since it is certainly not the case that if I had jumped out of the window, I would both have been killed and have jumped because someone had put a safety net in place. So we must be dealing with a case of context sensitivity. Moreover, once we get ourselves into the kind of context evoked by sentences like (1b), Past may cease to seem even prima facie attractive. We will be tempted to dismiss Past on the basis of our reactions to sentences like (2): (2) If determinism is true and x does not blink at t, then if x had blinked at t, that would have to have been because of a prior history of determining factors differing all the way back. (2) sounds incontrovertible, and is plausibly true on its most natural interpretation. But it is reasonable to think that (2) might, like (1b), evoke a special kind of interpretation governed by different rules from those that govern the more common kind of interpretation evoked by sentences like (1a). Even if the propositions expressed by Past under 5 interpretations of this special kind are obviously false, the propositions expressed by Past under more standard interpretations are much more tempting, and have indeed been accepted by many philosophers-mistakenly, in my view. We could address the issue of context-sensitivity by engaging in metalinguistic ascent, replacing Laws and Closure with 'Laws/Closure is true in all ordinary contexts', !5 while replacing Past and Triviality with 'Past/Triviality is true in many ordinary contexts'. Since valid arguments preserve truth at a context, this still leaves us with a truthpreserving argument with plausible premises and an implausible conclusion. But it will be easier if we allow ourselves to stay at the object level, by stipulating that all counterfactuals are henceforth to be interpreted according to a \"standard\" interpretation - that is, an interpretation of the kind naturally evoked by sentences like (1a). 2. Accepting Triviality Although embracing Triviality is a radical option, it is not a crazy one. Many philosophers, especially in the incompatibilist tradition, have thought that the presupposition that determinism is false is something which all of us - even scientists and philosophers who explicitly embrace determinism - accept at some deep level. If this ingrained assumption is real, one might expect it to be manifested semantically in many ways, perhaps including a pervasive triviality in the truth-values of our counterfactuals relative to worlds where determinism is true. 6 Nevertheless, Triviality should be rejected. Even if we tacitly presuppose indeterminism in our thinking about people, it is not plausible that this somehow infects our thinking about simple deterministic worlds featuring only inanimate objects - billiard balls, dominoes, etc. We have no trouble understanding descriptions of such worlds. Moreover, once we have grasped a sufficiently detailed description, we are very good at using it to assign truth-values to counterfactuals in a non-trivial way (\"If seven dominoes were arranged like that, exactly three of them would be such that the bell would ring if they fell\"). The mode of reasoning that we use to form judgments about the truth and falsity of counterfactuals on the basis of a description of a scenario in non-counterfactual terms is a genuine skill, and one that works in a broadly similar way whether or !6 not the scenario we are considering is deterministic. It is not plausible that this mode of reasoning leads us into pervasive error in the deterministic case. There is one other way of embracing Triviality that deserves consideration: one might claim that it is metaphysically impossible for determinism (as I have defined it) to be true, so that Triviality is vacuously true. One could try to make this independently plausible by deriving it from the following premises: Qualitative Laws Only qualitative propositions can be laws of nature. Haecceitistic Independence Necessarily, there is some non-qualitative truth p and some true history-proposition h such that p is not metaphysically necessitated by h together with the totality of qualitative truths. Qualitative propositions are those that are not haecceitistic-intuitively, they are not about specific individuals; they say what roles are played but are neutral as regards which objects play which roles. In the language of possible worlds, Haecceitistic Independence can be paraphrased as follows: for any possible world w, there is another possible world w′ qualitatively indiscernible from w, and haecceitistically indiscernible from w throughout some initial segment of history, but not haecceitistically indiscernible from w simpliciter. For example, w and w′ might differ merely by a permutation of the qualitative roles played by certain spacetime points in the far future. While this requires a fairly strong form of \"haecceitism\", it is not all that implausible. 7 However, this reason for denying the possibility of determinism does not extend to the thesis of 'qualitative determinism': that every true qualitative proposition follows, with metaphysical necessity, from the conjunction of any true history-proposition with !7 all the laws. And for the same reason that Past, Laws, and Closure entail Triviality, they 8 also entail the following claim about qualitative determinism: Qualitative Triviality Necessarily, if qualitative determinism is true, then whenever x is normal at t, each true qualitative proposition would still have been true if x had blinked at t. Unlike the consequent of Triviality, the consequent of Qualitative Triviality does not entail that it is counterfactually impossible for any normal person who does not blink at a certain time to do so. Perhaps the population of the world could be counterfactually interlinked in such a way that if any given person x had acted differently, someone else would have instantiated the complete qualitative profile actually instantiated by x. Things might work like this at certain very large and varied possible worlds, such as those where \"many worlds\" interpretations of quantum mechanics are true (see Dorr n.d.). However, it is not credible that all possible worlds where qualitative determinism is true are like this. If it is possible for qualitative determinism to be true, it is possible for it to be true in a world where there are normal people none of whom ever blinks. And at a world like that, it follows from Qualitative Triviality that the proposition that no-one ever blinks, being a true qualitative proposition, would still have been true if x had blinked at t (so long as x is normal at t), so that it is counterfactually impossible for x to blink at t. This is surely false. 3. Denying Closure Closure follows from an attractive general principle about counterfactuals: General Closure If p is metaphysically necessitated by a set of propositions each of which would be true if q were true, then p would be true if q were true. !8 However, there are reasons to be wary of General Closure. Consider the proposition that I am a poached egg. Arguably it is metaphysically impossible, and thus metaphysically necessitates every proposition whatsoever. Since it would be true if I were a poached egg, if we accept General Closure we have to say that every proposition would have been true if I were a poached egg. This is odd-for example, the proposition that I am a normal human being does not seem like one that would be true if I were a poached egg. 9 A different worry about General Closure arises in connection with infinite premisesets. On the influential similarity-based semantics of Lewis (1973), General Closure can fail for infinite sets of propositions, although it holds for finite sets. Here is an ex10 ample using the similarity relation that, according to Lewis (1979), governs the interpretation of counterfactuals in \"standard\" contexts. Suppose that history is infinite towards the future and finite towards the past, and for any n, let hn be the proposition that the history of the universe is just as it actually is for the first n seconds. Let p be the proposition that the history of the universe is always just as it actually is. The set of all hn metaphysically necessitates p. According to Lewis, each proposition hn is such that if p had been false, it would have been true, since some worlds that match the actual world for the first n seconds are more similar to it than any worlds that do not. But Lewis certainly does not think that if p had been false, p would have been true. 11 But neither of these worries about General Closure is really to the point, since the following weaker principle, which avoids both worries, suffices to justify Closure: !9 Weak General Closure: For any propositions p and q: if p is metaphysically necessitated by a finite set of propositions each of which would be true if q were true, and q is metaphysically possible, then p would be true if q were true. First, given how we defined 'normality', it is plausible that if x is normal at t, the proposition that x blinks at t is metaphysically possible; and if not, we could stipulate this as a further condition of normality without thereby making Triviality any less implausible. And second, on many accounts of laws of nature the conjunction of any laws will itself be a law, so that in applying Closure we need never consider sets with more than two members. Even if this principle is not true in general, resisting Closure by appealing to the possibility that there are infinitely many laws of nature is highly unpromising as a strategy for addressing the underlying puzzle: in the kinds of deterministic hypotheses we have reason to take seriously, there are finite sets of laws whose conjunction is a deterministic proposition (that is: a proposition whose conjunction with any history-proposition entails every proposition with which it is consistent).12 4. Denying Past: can we make do with approximate match? Given the conclusions of the last two sections, two options remain: we could reject Past or reject Laws. Both are intuitively unpalatable, but neither is as bad as giving up Closure or accepting Triviality. Lewis (1973: 75; 1979) has done most to put the option of rejecting Laws on the map. On Lewis's view, if determinism is true, then if you had blinked one more time while reading the first sentence of this paper, the course of history would have been exactly the same until at most a few seconds before you began reading. Then a \"small miracle\"-a localised exception to some universal generalisation that is actually a law of nature-would have taken place, probably somewhere inside your head, and would !10 have put the world onto a course where the further exceptionless playing out of the actual laws involved your blinking one more time. While Lewis's ambitious attempt to provide a semantics for counterfactuals from which such judgments can be derived has been highly controversial, the judgments themselves have been widely accepted. 13 I will argue, contra Lewis, that giving up Past is the better option. The present sec14 tion and section 5 will present and rebut two arguments against the Past-denying strategy, the first of which I attribute to Lewis. Sections 6 and 7 will then make a case that the cost of the Laws-denying strategy is considerably greater than Lewis and his followers realised. Lewis's insistence on Past is motivated by a genuine insight. When we evaluate an ordinary counterfactual whose antecedent is concerned with a particular interval of time, there is usually some time t-typically only shortly before that interval-such that we tacitly \"hold fixed\" a very broad range of propositions about history before t, in the sense that we assume that if these propositions are in fact true, they would also have been true in the relevant counterfactual circumstances. When we take ourselves to know one of these propositions, we also treat it as a resource we can draw on in our reasoning about how things would have been different if the antecedent were true. This is how we end up with judgments like the following: (3) If John had forgotten to have breakfast this morning, that would have been the first time that he did so in months. (4) If I had been honest during the interview, my colleagues would know that I was fired by my previous employer. (5) If we convinced a million more people to download this video, we would set a new record. !11 Call the ordinary pattern of reasoning that generates such judgments Holding History Fixed. 15 A good theory of counterfactuals should, by and large, vindicate the results of Holding History Fixed. The alternative is a radical error theory, since so many of our ordinary counterfactual judgments are formed on the basis of reasoning which implicitly appeals to premises about earlier history within the scope of the counterfactual supposition we are developing. However, vindicating the reliability of our ordinary method of forming counterfactual beliefs does not require taking the strict view that if things had gone differently during an interval t, absolutely all facts about history before t would have been exactly as they actually were. It would be enough to say that history before t would have proceeded approximately as it did in the actual world, provided that the relevant sense of \"approximately\" is one for which we can be confident that most of the historical propositions we actually consider in ordinary applications of Holding History Fixed have the same truth value at all worlds whose pre-t history \"approximately\" matches that of the actual world. 16 So, what is wrong with this more limited way of vindicating Holding History Fixed? Lewis's worry is that there may not be any nomically possible worlds which approximately match the actual world up to shortly before t and then diverge in such a way as to make true an antecedent concerning t. Considering the hypothesis that this is how 17 things would have been if Nixon had pressed a certain button at a certain time, he says the following: What is worse, there is no guarantee whatever that [a world where the actual laws are true and where Nixon presses the button] can be chosen so that the differences diminish and eventually become negligible in the more and more remote past. Indeed, it is hard to imagine how two deterministic worlds anything !12 like ours could possibly remain just a little bit different for very long. There are altogether too many opportunities for little differences to give rise to bigger differences. (Lewis 1979: 45) Lewis is certainly right that in our universe, little differences tend to blow up quickly into to much bigger differences. But this fact is not a good reason to doubt the existence of nomically possible worlds of the relevant sort. Our best deterministic physical theories have continuous dynamics, which means that so long as the past is not infinite, we can always find a nomically possible world which stays arbitrarily close to the actual world throughout any finite initial segment of history, just by choosing an initial state that is close enough to that of the actual world. This is worth making precise. In each of the theories in question, there is a space M of dynamical states, which can be thought of as pairwise inconsistent properties of instants of time. The complete history of the world is entailed by the laws, the facts about which instants there are, their temporal structure (for example, which are before which), and which member of M each one instantiates. M has a certain natural geometrical structure, which includes a topology. There is a dynamical map Φ, which is a function (perhaps partially defined) from R×M (the set of ordered pairs of real numbers and points in M) to M. Φ captures the dynamical content of the laws: the laws entail that whenever the earlier of two instants x units of time apart instantiates p and the later one instantiates p′, p′ = Φ(x, p). And Φ is jointly continuous in its two arguments: given a series x1, x2, ... of real numbers which converges to some x, and a series p1, p2, ... of members of M which converges to some p, then so long as all members of the series Φ(x1,p1), Φ(x2,p2),... exist, this series converges to Φ(x,p). We can regiment Lewis's time-relative notion of similarity between possible worlds using a metric d on M. The distance d(p,p′) represents the degree of dissimilarity !13 between w at t and w′ at t′ when t instantiates p at w, t′ instantiates p′ at w′, and both w and w′ are nomically possible. It is plausible that d is continuous: when p1, p2, ... converges to p and q1, q2, ... converges to q, d(p1,q1), d(p2,q2),... converges to d(p,q). Combined with the continuity of Φ, this has the following consequence: for every p∈M and positive real numbers t and ε, there is an open neighbourhood O of p such that for every p′∈O and x∈[0,t], d(Φ(x,p′),Φ(x,p))<ε. In other words, by choosing an initial state p′ 18 close enough to the actual initial state p, we can ensure that the world remains as similar as we like to the actual world for as long as we like. Of course, the fact that there are nomically possible worlds that stay very similar to actuality until shortly before t but diverge after t does not by itself establish that there are nomically possible worlds of the kind that Lewis was worried about-for example, worlds that stay very close to actuality until shortly before t and at which Nixon goes on to press the button at t. Could getting t into the particular region of the state space it needs to occupy for Nixon to press the button require a trajectory that diverges substantially from actuality long before t, so that many ordinary sentences about history before t get different truth values? In principle the answer could be yes, but it is extremely unlikely. The key to seeing why is the fact emphasised by Lewis, that little differences characteristically blow up quickly into much bigger differences. On any reasonable similarity metric d on M, typically, when p is a state instantiated by some time at the actual world and q is some other state such that d(p,q) is small, and x is (say) one second, d(Φ(x,p), Φ(x,q)) is some large multiple of d(p,q). Thus, if we take the set of nomically possible worlds that stay within ε of the actual world until t, and look at the set of dynamical states instantiated at these worlds by the time one second after t, we will find this set scattered over a much wider region of M, in such a way that the mean distance between them is some large multiple of ε. The faster small differences blow up into big !14 ones, the more scope there is for wide variation in what happens shortly after t among the worlds that cleave tightly to actuality until t. Extreme sensitivity to small differences is one hallmark of chaotic systems. These systems have dynamical maps that, when given a small volume of M, exponentially stretches it out in some directions. If the initial region was a sphere (according to some reasonable metric), then its image under Φ will soon be a long, thin, branching strand, squiggling back and forth in an intricate way. Even though the volume of the image is the same as the volume of the initial region (in classical dynamics, M carries a natural volume measure which is preserved by the dynamics), because the image is so stretched out, the mean distance between its points, and the volume of the set of points that are close to it, are both much greater than those of our original sphere. The study of chaotic dynamical systems is a thriving topic within classical mechanics. This literature strongly confirms Lewis's claim that such sensitive dependence is widespread. It crops up even in some very simple models with just a few degrees of freedom; and in general, we expect that any complex system with many interacting degrees of freedom will display such sensitivity to a high degree. 19 The prevalence of chaos suggests in a rather abstract way that we should expect the set of worlds that approximately match actuality until t to be quite varied as regards history after t. To gain a more concrete understanding of the kinds of variations we can expect to find within this set, let us consider a famous example from statistical mechanics. Suppose that at t, the air in the seminar room is at thermodynamical equilibrium. Then, using a kind of reasoning which plays a central role in statistical mechanics, we can assure ourselves that there are some nomically possible worlds which approximately match actuality until t, at which the air molecules subsequently move in such a way that at t+∆t they end up congregated in one tiny corner of the room (where ∆t is !15 the short amount of time it would typically take for the molecules, once squeezed into the corner, to explode back out to equilibrium). To convince yourself of this, the first step is see why the above description of the behaviour of the air molecules from t to t+∆t must be nomically possible, leaving past history out of account. This follows from the fact that all our deterministic dynamical theories admit a \"time-reversal\" operation τ on the state space such that whenever q=Φ(x,p), τ(p)=Φ(x,τ(q)). In the case of gas molecules, τ reverses all the velocities but leaves all positions alone: so if p is a point at which the molecules are all in the corner, τ(p) is too. τ also preserves the property of being such that the air is in thermodynamical equilibrium. So consider some state p at which the air is in the corner such that at Φ(∆t,p) the air is in equilibrium. Then q=τ(Φ(∆t,p)) is an air-at-equilibrium state with the surprising feature that Φ(∆t,q) = τ(p) is an air-in-the-corner state. Moreover, since τ is volume-preserving, and since the set of air-in-the-corner states which evolve after ∆t into air-at-equilibrium states has nonzero volume, the set of air-at-equilibrium states which evolve after ∆t into air-in-the-corner states must also have nonzero volume. What we still need to do is to convince ourselves that some of these strange states lie at the ends of trajectories approximately matching the pre-t history of the actual world. One way of doing this is to appeal to what I will dub the 'Independence Con20 jecture', a certain plausible mathematical claim about the behaviour of dynamical maps that plays a central role in statistical mechanics. This conjecture is expressed in terms of the notion of a \"macrostate\": a set of dynamical states that agree on a certain set of statistical quantities, such as the mean temperature, pressure, density, and momentum of gas within each cell in some fine-grained lattice. The conjecture is that \"the macropresent screens off the macrofuture from the macropast\": in the probability distribution that we get by restricting the natural volume measure to a particular macrostate, facts !16 about future macrostates are, approximately, probabilistically independent of facts about past macrostates. If this is true, then the proportion of points that evolve after ∆t into 21 air-in-the-corner states within the current macrostate approximately equals the proportion of such points within the much smaller set of points whose evolutions into the past correspond to the sequence of macrostates that have actually been instantiated. This provides one good sense of \"approximate match\" in which we can be confident that some of the air-in-the-corner worlds approximately match actual history. The Independence Conjecture is not the sort of thing for which we should expect a proof any time soon even for a toy model system, but there are several reasons to regard it as plausible. Investigations of chaotic systems help to boost its a priori plausibility, since it has turned out to be common for such systems to be well-modelled as random walks under various kinds of coarse-graining. There is also considerable empirical support for the Independence Conjecture. As Wallace (forthcoming) persuasively shows, it-or rather, a more general conjecture of which it is a special case-plays a ubiquitous role in statistical-mechanical \"derivations\" of equations governing macroquantities (such as the Boltzmann equation); and many of these equations have proved to be fantastically accurate. And remember too that the claims of probabilistic inde22 pendence yielded by the conjecture are much stronger than the mere existence claims we are concerned with-for example, the claim that there is a nomically possible world whose history approximately matches actuality until t at which the air subsequently squeezes itself into the corner. If you are convinced that there are worlds like that, you should be willing to take the same view about many other \"thermodynamical miracles\". For example, you should think that for any given direction, it is nomically consistent with the approximate course of history up to now that the air molecules around you are about to move around so as !17 to impress a substantial net force on you in that direction: you could be whisked away by a sudden, anti-thermodynamic gust of wind. Moreover, given the Independence Conjecture, the occurrence of one thermodynamic miracle does not affect the probability of subsequent such miracles. So we should be able to add more such gusts of wind to keep you going in the relevant direction, and eventually set you gently on your feet at any given point on the surface of the Earth. For similar reasons, we can be confident that among the nomically possible worlds which match actuality macroscopically up to now, there are some where a succession of anti-thermodynamic puffs of wind in the vicinity of my computer keyboard types out the complete text of Hamlet.23 I am not suggesting that we will often want to appeal to thermodynamic miracles in developing ordinary counterfactual suppositions. Indeed, appealing to such miracles is often a bad idea even when it allows for a longer interval of approximate match with actuality. Suppose that, on the phone to Mary at t, Fred speaks the truth by saying \"If I were there right now, I would give you a hug\". On the operative interpretation of the counterfactual, how do we think Fred would have got to be with Mary at t? Would he have been whisked there quickly by a recent, anti-thermodynamic puff of wind, or would he have got there by a less showy method requiring a somewhat earlier divergence from the approximate course of actual history? The latter option seems better. If we choose the puff of wind, we will need to combine it, rather artificially, with further unusual goings-on in Fred's brain to ensure that he arrives still in a mood to give Mary a hug, rather than utterly befuddled or panic-stricken by his adventure. And-more 24 decisively-appeals to thermodynamic miracles will lead us badly astray in evaluating arguments like 'Nothing mysterious has ever happened to Fred, Mary, or Jane; so if they were all here right now, the people who have experienced mysterious events would be a minority'. I have dwelt on the nomic possibility of anti-thermodynamic goings-on as a !18 way of providing a concrete grasp on the surprisingly weak extent to which the approximate truth about history up to t constraints the course of history after t. Once we have appreciated that the set of nomically possible worlds approximately like actuality up to t contains even these bizarre worlds, we should be much more confident that it also contains worlds where the antecedents of the counterfactuals we are interested in come true in unremarkable ways (so long as those antecedents concern times long enough after t for the mere fact of such a transition not to be in itself remarkable). This reassurance is strongly confirmed when we turn from gases in boxes to models of the kinds of processes that we treat as random in our successful high-level theories- rolling dice, spinning roulette wheels, cells undergoing meiosis, spheres of enriched uranium on the verge of going critical.... When such systems are analysed within classical dynamics, one generally finds the selection between the various outcomes to which our high-level theories assign positive chances to be determined by initial conditions in a very sensitive way. Within the relevant part of the state space, any small sphere 25 whose volume exceeds some microscopic threshold will contain points that evolve into each of the possible outcomes. And given the Independence Conjecture, we can ex26 pect the same to be true of the sets corresponding to worlds that have stayed close to actuality throughout the past, even though these sets will not look like spheres unless we blur our eyes to their filigreed microscopic structure. Thus, for example, we have strong reason to believe that whenever a roulette wheel is spun, the set of nomically possible worlds that stay very close to actuality until the spin contains worlds in which the ball ends up on each number on the wheel. Similarly, given that the firing of a neuron receiving inputs at a given rate is successfully modelled as a chancy process, we have reason to believe that any medically possible pattern of firings of someone's neurons can be realised in the first few seconds after t in a nomically possible world that ap- !19 proximately matches actuality up to t. For most everyday counterfactuals, divergences of this sort will give us exactly what we are looking for. There are exceptions: although fine-grained dependence on initial conditions is pervasive, it is not omnipresent. Sometimes, there will just be no way to make the antecedent of a counterfactual about a particular time true in a nomologically possible world without allowing that world to diverge substantially from actuality at much earlier times. One might worry that in such cases, allowing the past to vary to the required extent will disrupt the assignments of truth-values which we find intuitive in \"standard\" contexts. Consider (6) If a big comet had hit Washington, D.C. yesterday afternoon, the U.S.A. would have been left without a President. (6) seems warranted if we know that everyone in the line of succession was in D.C. yesterday afternoon. But the antecedent of (6) is probably not true in any nomically possible world that approximately matches actuality until yesterday. Although there are nomically possible worlds where comets suddenly accelerate due to thermodynamically miraculous ejections of matter, there is a limit to the velocities that can be achieved in this way without the comet's ceasing to exist. And given how far we are from all the big comets, this means we will need quite a long interval before the counterfactual impact- weeks? years?-during which the trajectory of the comet is very far from its actual trajectory. As one reflects on this, it is tempting to start entertaining \"backtracking\" thoughts like 'If a comet had hit D.C. yesterday afternoon, astronomers would probably have seen it coming at least a day earlier and ordered an evacuation, so that the U.S.A. would still have had a President'. One live option for proponents of Laws is to endorse these second thoughts, and say that (6) is false even by the standards of its original con- !20 text. As error theories go, this is relatively moderate: if the heuristics we use in evaluating counterfactuals are reliable for the most part, it is easy to see how they might lead us astray in certain unusual cases such as those involving heavenly bodies. However, this kind of error theory is certainly not inevitable. Although in evaluating (6) we cannot simultaneously hold fixed the laws and the entire approximate truth about history before yesterday afternoon, there is no obvious reason why we should not be able to hold fixed the laws and the approximate history of the Earth before yesterday afternoon, including the facts about the observations made by astronomers as well as the locations of politicians. Given the pervasiveness of dynamical chaos in the Earth's atmosphere and in people's brains, there certainly are nomically possible worlds where unlikely events on some comet first set it on a collision course for Washington, and then a series of further unlikely events on Earth prevent the comet's approach from having any of the expected macroscopic effects on us. For example, we can cook up unusual arrangements of air molecules between the astronomers' telescopes and the comet which deflect the incoming photons from the comet whenever the astronomers are looking, or unusual patterns of firing in the astronomers' brains which prevent them from noticing the comet even when the photons are streaming into their eyes. The fact that most such arrangements would blow up quickly into macroscopic differences is not a reason to doubt that some such arrangements allow us to preserve the historical facts that seem to be contextually held fixed in the face of the comet's approach. Another worry concerns counterfactuals like (7), which will be credible only if we are allowed to hold fixed certain microscopic facts: (7) If we had aimed the electron microscope a tenth of a degree further to the left, the image of that gold atom would have appeared in the centre of the screen. !21 One might worry that (7) will not be well-supported if we can only hold fixed the approximate course of history. But this worry assumes that the relevant notion of \"approximate match\" always has to be understood in terms of something like the standard distance measure on state space or the standard partition into macrostates, in which all particles are treated on a par. In fact, however, there is room for plenty of contextual flexibility as regards what exactly gets fixed. We can even say (if we want to) that in a context where certain specific atoms and times are salient, the facts to be held fixed include the exact positions of those atoms at those times. Although such constraints will slightly reduce the dimensionality of the set of states whose histories count as \"approximately matching\" that of the actual world, there is still every reason to expect that some of these states will correspond to worlds where the antecedents we are concerned with are true. 27 Summing up: even if we accept Laws, we can and should think that if a normal person in a deterministic world had blinked at t, the course of history until shortly before t would have been different only in negligible microscopic respects. The option of denying Past while keeping Laws is thus far less radically revisionary that one might initially have supposed.28 5. Denying Past: does it lead to backwards causation? There is a very different argument for Past which turns on the plausible premise that deterministic worlds need not contain backwards causation. Upholding Laws requires saying that if determinism is true, then if a given normal person had blinked at t, the course of history would have been different all along (albeit only microscopically so). According to the objection, even this amount of counterfactual dependence of earlier history on later history entails that there is backwards causation: some later events !22 cause earlier ones, or some facts about earlier times hold because of facts at later times in the causal sense of 'because'.29 It is important to note that Lewis, the most prominent proponent of counterfactual miracles, is in no position to make this objection. According to Lewis, if the world is deterministic and x didn't blink at t, then if x had blinked at t, part of the earlier history of the world would have been different. He allows for a short transition period-what Bennett (2003, §81) calls a 'ramp'-such that if a given proposition about a time t had been true, the miraculous divergence from actual history would have taken place somewhat earlier than t. And there is nothing independently plausible about the thesis that short-range counterfactual dependence of facts about earlier times on facts about later times need not involve backwards causation, whereas long-range counterfactual dependence can only obtain in worlds featuring backwards causation. 30 The only view about counterfactuals under determinism that would allow someone to make the backwards-causation argument without being vulnerable to a tu quoque is a \"big miracle\" view that holds fixed the exact course of history in its entirety: when the antecedent of a counterfactual is about events at and after t, and its consequent is entirely about history before t, the counterfactual automatically gets the same truth value as its consequent. So for example, given that I was in fact in my kitchen yesterday from 11am to 1pm, if I had begun driving to Princeton at noon, I would still have been in my kitchen at every time earlier than noon. In other words, I would have teleported instantaneously into the car from the kitchen.31 The \"big miracle\" view faces an obvious objection. If it is correct, shouldn't we be drawing on all truths about times earlier than t in reasoning about counterfactuals whose antecedents are about times after t, and thus taking seriously counterfactuals like 'If I had begun driving to Princeton at noon yesterday, I would probably have crashed !23 because of my extreme surprise at my sudden teleportation'? Such reasoning would make trouble for many everyday counterfactuals. However, if we were willing to em32 brace big counterfactual miracles, we could get around this worry by adopting a \"huge miracle\" view, in which the big miracle required for the truth of the antecedent would have been accompanied by a range of ancillary miracles which prevent the sudden changes involved in the big miracle from having any of their expected effects. For example, we could say if I had begun driving to Princeton at noon yesterday, not only would I have miraculously teleported into the car, but further miracles would have occurred to prevent me from being surprised by the transition, to fill the vacuum I left behind in the kitchen, etc. 33 However, besides straining credibility, the \"huge miracle\" view is of no use for the purpose of preserving the thesis that counterfactual dependence suffices for causation. The problem is that the ancillary miracles will induce many cases of counterfactual dependence without causation. Suppose that someone was making a video in my kitchen at noon. Then the \"huge miracle\" view will presumably say that if I had started driving to Princeton at noon, the portion of the recording made at 11.59 would have changed at noon in such a way as to show the kitchen as empty at 11.59. If counterfactual dependence suffices for causation, this entails that my failure to begin driving to Princeton at noon causes the later presence on the camera of a recording showing me sitting in the kitchen at 11.59. But in fact there is no direct casual relation between these events: they are merely effects of a common cause (my earlier decision not to go to Princeton). The thesis that counterfactual dependence (understood according to ordinary standards) suffices for causation is simply not well-supported enough to be worth saving by such heroic means. So whether or not we accept Laws, we should allow at least for short-range future-to-past counterfactual dependence, and refrain from endorsing any !24 account of causation on which counterfactual dependence is sufficient for causation. 34 This leaves the coast clear for those of us who do accept Laws to say the very same thing about the long-range future-to-past counterfactual dependence that our view requires. Indeed, insofar as this long-range dependence involves only microscopic facts at the earlier times, it is considerably less worrying from the point of view of the theory of causation than the short-range dependence that everyone needs. For on many accounts, causation, or the temporal directionality of causation, is in some sense founded in certain patterns that obtain in the macroscopic world, so that we should be cautious whenever we attempt to extend our thinking about causation into the microscopic realm.35 6. Denying Laws: bizarre counterfactuals So far, I have argued against Triviality; argued for Closure; and rebutted some arguments for Past. In this and the following section I will make a positive case for Laws (and thus against Past). Suppose that L is a simple, true, deterministic law, and that Frank, a philosopher of physics, has devoted his career to defending the truth of L. He is having a public de36 bate with Nancy, who maintains (wrongly) that there are isolated exceptions to certain generalisations that follow from L, so that L is false. If we keep Past and Closure, we have to say that if the circumstances of the debate had been different in any way whatsoever-for example, if someone had put a glass of water on Frank's lectern, or rudely interrupted his talk-then Nancy would have been right and Frank wrong. Thus (8) and (9) are true: (8) If we had given Frank a glass of water, his whole career would have been devoted to a mistake. !25 (9) If you had told Frank that his whole career was devoted to a mistake, you would have been right. These are bizarre and unpalatable consequences. Of course Laws itself is intuitively plausible, so it is not surprising to find that denying it leads to counterintuitive results. But the case does show that the revisionary consequences of preserving Past are more far-reaching than its proponents might have hoped. They are not limited to claims of the sort that only philosophers and scientists ever discuss, such as the negation of Laws; they include claims of a more quotidian, practical cast, like the negations of (8) and (9). Could the problem be dissolved by invoking context-sensitivity? The thought would be that (8) and (9) elicit an unusual interpretation of the conditional under which the truth of L is held fixed, although it is not held fixed in ordinary contexts. But it is hard to see how such shiftiness could emerge from any credible account of what drives the resolution of context-sensitivity. (Notice that the judgment that (8) and (9) are false is, if anything, even clearer if we imagine that the speakers have no idea what Frank's career has been about.) Moreover, the relevant judgments seem to integrate seamlessly into the ordinary pattern of reasoning characterised by Holding History Fixed. For example, if we think that Frank is right and Nancy wrong, we may draw on our memory of past debates to justify (10): (10)If we had given Frank a glass of water, that would have been the fifth debate in a row in which the defender of the true view was the only one with a glass of water. This makes it hard to believe that the context elicited by our examples is very different from standard contexts with respect to what gets held fixed. !26 It is plausible that in judging (8) and (9) false, we are in some sense implicitly relying on the principle that laws can be held fixed in evaluating counterfactuals with nomically possible antecedents. If so, arguments based on these judgments will be dialectically ineffective against someone who has wholeheartedly internalised the commitments of the Laws-denying strategy, which include the denial of that principle. But this is not the dialectical context in which I am giving this argument. The argument is aimed at those who, like myself, feel the pull of all the premises of the CCA and of the negation of its conclusion, and are trying to weigh the costs of the various ways out of the paradox. In this setting, it is not a problem if our resistance to (8) and (9) is caused by our deep-seated attachment to some general principle that entails Laws: the argument can still show that the costs of denying Laws are higher than one might otherwise have thought. What would make the argument dialectically ineffective would be the existence of a parallel and equally compelling argument for Past. If such an argument could be given, we would have made no progress towards a reasoned way out of the paradox. So, let's consider how it would need to go. We would need to imagine a character whose career has been devoted to some proposition H about the intrinsic character of some initial segment of history, such that the conjunction of H with the laws necessitates some everyday truth, for example that there is no water glass on a certain lectern during a certain debate. But if H is supposed to be expressed in the language of physics, a story like this cannot be realised in any remotely realistic possible world. Any proposition about the early universe which nomically necessitates the absence of a water glass must be sensitive to the value of a huge number of parameters (such as the distances between particles) to some preposterous number of decimal places. Ordinary human beings cannot even formulate such propositions, much less devote their careers to them. The 37 !27 best we can do is to get at the relevant intrinsic properties indirectly, by saying things like 'The complete intrinsic truth about the first million-year segment of history is such that, in conjunction with L, it entails that there is no glass of water on this lectern during this debate'. We can, indeed, imagine a character-call her Lavinia-who has devoted a career to this claim: this requires a ridiculous set of priorities, but not superhuman cognitive powers. Proponents of Laws will then have to accept (11): (11) If we had put a glass of water on her lectern, Lavinia's career would have been devoted to a mistake. But (11) is clearly much less repugnant than (8). Given Lavinia's bizarre choice to stake her career on a claim specified by reference to this particular lectern and time, it is really not so odd to think that she thereby made the success of her career a hostage to our choices about the distribution of water glasses. Our argument thus picks up on an important contrast between Past and Laws. If determinism is true, then truths about earlier times that nomically necessitate facts about what people do at later times are extremely complicated when specified in physical terms-far too complex for anyone to entertain, at least under the modes of presentation associated with such terms. By contrast, if there are deterministic laws of nature, they are probably quite simple. The contrast between the Frank and Lavinia examples shows how this asymmetry can be put to work to break the dialectical stalemate between Past and Laws.38 One might worry that the argument would be undermined by the fact that the relevant asymmetry is metaphysically contingent. The initial state of the universe could have been much simpler than it actually was-perhaps even as simple as the laws of nature actually are. Meanwhile, assuming that the laws could have been different at all, !28 they could have been at least somewhat more complex than they actually are. It is not obvious how much more complex they could be: if a Humean \"best system\" account of lawhood like that of Lewis (1994) is true, it may be impossible for them to be vastly more complex. But I don't want to assume Humeanism, and there is no obvious reason for anti-Humeans to place any limits on the possible complexity of laws. Indeed, given anti-Humeanism, there may even be metaphysically possible, deterministic worlds where the asymmetry is completely reversed: the laws are as complex as the actual initial conditions, while the initial conditions are as simple as the actual laws. If there are possible worlds like this, then probably, at some of them, there are people who devote their careers to defending some simple truth about the initial conditions which, in conjunction with the (ultra-complex) laws, entails that there is no glass of water on their lectern. Since holding fixed the laws in this scenario will entail counterfactuals just as intuitively repugnant as (8) and (9), one might conclude that the mode of reasoning that leads us to reject such counterfactuals ultimately does nothing to settle the question whether it is the laws or the initial conditions that should be held fixed. It is not obvious that this conclusion would be warranted. Given that the actual laws are simple, one might reasonably insist that judgments about worlds that resemble actuality in this respect deserve more weight than judgments about bizarre worlds with ultra-complex laws. But even if we regard the judgments as being dialectically on a par, the conclusion neglects the possibility that we might regard the question whether the laws or the initial conditions are counterfactually robust as contingent, holding that the laws are robust at possible worlds where the initial conditions are much more complex than the laws, while the initial conditions are robust at worlds where the laws are much more complex than the initial conditions. This is in fact the option I would favour, assuming that there are any possible worlds of the latter sort. However, since the laws of !29 such worlds are so very dissimilar from the deterministic laws that are actually serious epistemic possibilities, it will be convenient if we avoid the need to take account of them in discussing the CCA, by stipulatively interpreting the notion of \"normality\" in Past and Laws in such a way that people in deterministic worlds with ultra-complex laws do not count as \"normal\". On this interpretation, considerations involving such worlds will not threaten Laws. What about possible worlds where the past and the laws are both simple? If there are worlds like this where there are people capable of grasping the simple propositions in question, then there will be no escaping the conclusion that counterfactuals just as bizarre as (8) and (9) are true in those worlds. Someone might argue that since the mode of reasoning that prompts us to reject (8) and (9) leads us astray when we are dealing with worlds where the laws and the past are both simple, this mode of reasoning should not be trusted even when applied to realistic worlds where the past is much more complex than the laws. But this is not a very impressive argument: the fact that a certain mode of reasoning goes wrong in some very esoteric possible cases does little to undermine its force when applied to more realistic cases. And in any case, it is doubtful that there could even be any people in a deterministic world where the laws and past were both simple. After all, people are necessarily rather complex things, and it is hard to see how the required complexity could be generated from the evolution of simple states in accordance with simple deterministic laws. (Remember that we are not here concerned merely with simplicity in the qualitative profile of the initial state. This is, plausibly, compatible with the existence of people in great abundance, even given simple deterministic laws. For example, imagine a world consisting of a plenitude of non-interacting Newtonian universes, one for every geometrically possible initial arrangement of finitely many particles. But the everyday 39 !30 propositions that occur in problematic counterfactuals like (8) and (9) are non-qualitative: they concern particular people, lecterns, and so forth. For these haecceitistic propositions to be metaphysically necessitated by the complete qualitative characterisation of the populous worlds in question, the relevant objects would have to have extremely demanding essences, such that it would be metaphysically impossible for them to instantiate any of the qualitative profiles that other objects actually instantiate. This is farfetched. Assuming that people at the populous worlds don't have such demanding 40 essences, the only propositions about the past that nomically necessitate the relevant everyday propositions will be massively haecceitistic-for example, propositions which fully specify the distribution of physical properties and relations over some enormous collection of particular particles. It is doubtful whether anyone could possibly even grasp a proposition like this, let alone devote a career to it.) The metaphysical contingency of the fact that the past is more complex than the laws thus fails to undermine the argument from the falsity of (8) and (9) to the truth of Laws. 7. Denying Laws: emotion and decision The previous section's argument for Laws turned on some vivid pre-theoretical judgments about the falsity of certain counterfactuals. The present section will bolster those judgments by drawing out certain unpalatable consequences which would follow from the problematic counterfactuals in conjunction with certain plausible claims about the role of counterfactuals in our emotional and practical lives. 41 First: certain emotions are intimately bound up with counterfactual thought. Regret is the canonical example. Regretting doing something seems to require wishing that one had not done it; and it seems irrational to wish one had not done something while believing that things would have been worse if one had not done it, in the respects one cares about. When our mistakes turn out to have been for the best, we may still feel !31 ashamed of them, but we can no longer unequivocally regret them. For example, suppose Mary thoughtlessly left her passport at home while on her way to a conference, and so had to cancel her talk, inconveniencing the conference organisers. But while waiting around the airport, Mary met Fred, the love of her life. If she hadn't forgotten her passport that day, she would never have met him. Knowing this, Mary should be glad that she forgot her passport, rather than regretful. 42 Now consider our character Frank from section 6. Suppose that he greatly values not having devoted his career to a mistake. If regret is constrained by beliefs about counterfactuals in the way I have suggested, then if Frank comes to believe that his career would have been devoted to a mistake if he had not acted in a certain way, he will be unable to rationally, unequivocally regret acting in that way (assuming nothing else of comparable importance is at stake). In that case, coming to believe Past will give Frank a sovereign remedy against regret! Whenever he does anything, no matter how foolish, he can immediately afterwards look back and think, 'If I hadn't done that thing, my whole career would have been devoted to a mistake!'. If he really believes this, and no other comparably weighty values are in play, he should be, all things considered, glad that he did the foolish thing. But it seems crazy to suppose that coming to believe the truth about how counterfactuals work under determinism would put Frank in this situation.43 The second group of problems arise if beliefs about counterfactuals play a central role in rational decision, as they do on what is arguably the most widely-accepted form of decision theory, the so-called \"causal decision theory\" sketched by Stalnaker (1981 [1972]) and developed by Gibbard and Harper (1978). According to this view, ideal rationality involves a disposition to choose only actions whose expected counterfactual utility is at least as high as that of any other available action, where (roughly speaking) the !32 expected counterfactual utility of an action is one's estimate of how well things would go, in the respects one cares about, if one performed it. Suppose that Frank is faced with some decision, is highly confident that L is true and that the distant past would be exactly the same no matter what he did, and cares much more about not devoting his career to a mistake than about any other relevant value. Then the action with the highest counterfactual expected utility for Frank will simply be whichever action he is most confident he will in fact perform. The more confident he is that he is going to do a certain thing, the more confident he will be that if he were to do anything else, his career would have been devoted to a mistake. Imagine that he has a track record of acting in some intuitively foolish way-for example, by buying ten lottery tickets every time he leaves his house. Then one way for him to satisfy the demands of causal decision theory when he next goes out is to buy the tickets again, having predicted on inductive grounds that he will buy them, and thereby become confident that if he weren't to buy them, his career would have been devoted to a mistake. Of course, if for some reason Frank becomes confident, despite his track record, that he will not buy lottery tickets this time, not buying the tickets will become the option maximising expected counterfactual utility. So if his actions fit his credences and preferences in the way advocated by causal decision theory, this prediction will also be selffulfilling. Frank's situation is like that of someone who is convinced that a reliable predictor has predicted their behaviour and then undertaken to reward them if the prediction comes true. Whatever we think rationality requires in such situations of \"rational feedback\" (Reaber 2012), it is implausible that believing the truth about how counterfactuals work under determinism would put Frank in such a situation.44 The problem is even sharper when we consider negative rather than positive feedback. Suppose that Frank's arguments are so compelling that Nancy changes her mind !33 and becomes convinced that L is true. She is sad about this, since she wishes that she had not devoted her career to a mistake. But even though she is now confident that she did devote her career to a mistake, her strong preference not to have done so will play out bizarrely in every decision situation, if she believes that the distant past is counterfactually independent of her actions and is disposed to maximise expected counterfactual utility. In general, the option with highest expected counterfactual utility for Nancy will be the one she is least confident she is going to choose. If she is even moderately good at introspection, so that she has a roughly accurate sense of her credences, her preferences, and her disposition to maximise expected counterfactual utility, her practical life will be paralysed. She will never be confident that she is going to choose X over Y, since once she becomes aware of this confidence, she will expect that it will tend to lead to her choose Y over X. The only equilibrium states for her will be states in which she is no more confident that she will choose one option rather than any of the others; and she will be stuck in this state of uncertainty until she eventually surprises herself by acting. Ahmed (2013, 2014) presents a somewhat similar case, called Betting on the Laws, which can also serve as an argument against the combination of counterfactual decision theory with Past. Ahmed's protagonist, Alice, is very confident on reasonable grounds that a certain proposition L* is a true, deterministic, law. She must choose between affirming L* and denying it (affirming its negation); and cares only about affirming the truth on this occasion. Assigning value 1 to speaking truly and value 0 to speaking falsely, Alice's expected counterfactual utility for affirming L* equals her credence that L* would be true if she affirmed it, while her expected counterfactual utility for denying L* equals her credence that L* would be false if she denied it. But suppose that Alice is certain that that there is some history-proposition which would be true no matter what !34 she did now, and that L* is deterministic. Then, conditional on the hypothesis that L* would be true if she affirmed it, Alice will be certain that if she had affirmed L*, the conjunction of L* with any true history-proposition would have entailed that she affirms L*. Since she is certain that at least one history-proposition which would be true if she affirmed L* would also be true if she denied L*, she must therefore be certain, conditional on the hypothesis that L* would be true if she affirmed it, that L* would be false if she denied it. Alice's credence that L* would be false if she denied it must therefore be greater than or equal to her credence that L* would be true if she affirmed it. In fact it must be strictly greater, so long as she assigns nonzero credence to the proposition that L* would be false either way. Causal decision theory thus entails that Alice is rationally required to deny L*, despite her high credence in L* and her complete devotion to the truth. But it is absurd to suppose that being certain of the true view of counterfactuals under under determinism could require such a bizarre mismatch between Alice's beliefs and preferences and her verbal behaviour. 45 Note that Alice's practical situation does not involve the kind of rational feedback that characterised Frank and Nancy's situations in the earlier examples. We can imagine Alice anticipating the reasoning of the previous paragraph, and becoming confident that she will deny L*. Given her high credence in L*, she is disappointed, since she now is confident that she will speak falsely. Nevertheless, she still regards denying L* as the lesser evil: although her credence that she would speak truly if she denied L* is low, her credence that she would speak truly if she affirmed L* is even lower. These arguments for Laws depend of course on a controversial view about decision theory, namely causal decision theory-or to be precise, Stalnaker-Gibbard-Harper counterfactual decision theory. This not the place to rehash the well-known argu46 ments for the superiority of causal decision theory over its principal rival, evidential de- !35 cision theory. However, since Ahmed uses Betting on the Laws to argue for evidential decision theory and against causal decision theory, it is worth considering his argument to make sure that it does not undermine mine. It can be reconstructed as follows. (i) 47 Any theory that captures a certain intuitive thought about the relevance of causation to decision-namely, 'that you should realise the option that you expect causally to make you best off, regardless of what doing so might reveal about any of its non-effects that might also matter to you but which are beyond your present influence'-wrongly entails that Alice should deny L*. (ii) Any theory other than evidential decision theory 48 that does not capture that intuitive thought is 'unmotivated' and 'arbitrary'. So (iii) 49 we should accept evidential decision theory. I am not convinced by either of Ahmed's premises, but I will focus here on (ii). 50 Even if Ahmed is right to think that counterfactual decision theory fails to capture the relevant intuitive thought about causation when it is combined with the denial of Past, it seems to me that it is still well-motivated, both by judgments about what people should do in certain particular cases-especially Newcomb's problem and the \"medical Newcomb cases\"-and by a compelling, intuitive account of why those are the right judgments. After all, in justifying the decision to take two boxes in Newcomb's problem, it is extremely natural to reach for counterfactual language: 'Whatever is in the opaque box, I know I would get a thousand dollars more if I were to take both boxes than I would if I were to take only one'. If we are challenged to justify these counterfactual claims, it is indeed tempting to appeal to further premises about causation. But since it is a hard task to explain exactly what counterfactuals have to do with causation (see §5), I see nothing ad hoc or unstable about a view that implements the intuitive thought about the relevance of counterfactuals in the way that Stalnaker-Gibbard-Harp- !36 er decision theory does, while admitting that causal independence is not always sufficient for counterfactual independence. 51 The combination of Betting on the Laws with the standard arguments against evidential decision theory thus provides robust support for a package consisting of a counterfactual decision theory like Stalnaker's, Gibbard and Harper's (or Lewis's), combined with a law-preserving account of counterfactuals under determinism like the one I have been arguing for. 52 8. Lessons for other consequence arguments? The CCA belongs to a family of structurally isomorphic arguments, some other members of which have been widely discussed in the literature on free will. In this concluding section, I will briefly consider the question how the foregoing reflections on the CCA might bear on our evaluation of other arguments in this family. The common structure of these arguments can be presented in the form of a valid argument-schema: Schematic Consequence Argument (SCA): Past Necessarily, whenever x is normal at t, there is a true history-proposition p such that R(x, t, p). Laws Necessarily, whenever x is normal at t and p is a true law of nature, R(x, t, p). Closure Necessarily, whenever x is normal at t and p is metaphysically necessitated by a set S of propositions such that R(x, t, q) for every q∈S, R(x, t, p). Triviality Necessarily, whenever x is normal at t and determinism is true, every true proposition p is such that R(x, t, p). !37 Here 'R(x, t, p)' stands for some relation between agents, times, and propositions. We can recover the CCA by taking 'R(x, t, p)' to be 'p would have been true if x had blinked at t'. In the literature on free will, we find a bewildering variety of other candidates which we could substitute for 'R(x, t, p)' in the SCA to generate prima facie compelling arguments for conclusions with some claim to the name 'incompatibilism'. They include the following: (i) p is true, and x has no choice at t about the fact that p is true (van Inwagen 1983: 93 ff.) (ii) p is true, and at t it is not up to x whether p is true (van Inwagen 1983: 56) (iii) p is true and at t, x cannot render p false (van Inwagen 1975) (iv) At t, x cannot act in such a way that p would not be true (Fischer 1994) (v) p is true and at t, x cannot make it the case that p is false (Ginet 1990)53 (vi) p is true and every maximally strong proposition whose truth x can ensure at t entails p (van Inwagen 2000) (vii) p is true and nothing x can do at t is such that if x did it, this deed would be or cause an event whose occurrence is inconsistent with p (Lewis 1981a). (viii) p is true and nothing x can do at t is such that if x did it, p would be false (Lewis 1981a; Fischer 1994: 8). (ix) p is true and everything x can do at t is such that if x did it, p would be true. While it is plausible that some of the expressions on this list are equivalent, there are no particular pairs whose equivalence is obvious. Of these nine versions of the SCA, version (ix) is, I would argue, stronger than any of the others (except for any that are equivalent to it). The reason turns on the plausibil54 - !38 ity of Closure. Closure in version (ix) is plausible for the same reason as Closure in the CCA: both follow from Weak General Closure (see section 3 above). By contrast, Closure in version (vii) is widely recognised to be false, since the occurrence of a certain event can be inconsistent with a proposition p without being inconsistent with either of two propositions which jointly entail p. Closure in version (viii) is also highly controversial, 55 since it should be rejected by those who reject the principle of Conditional Excluded Middle, according to which instances of the schema 'Either if P, it would be that Q or if P, it would be that not-Q' are true in every context. Similar considerations apply to 56 versions (i)–(vi). Insofar as there was reason to think that one of these versions was not equivalent to version (ix), there would also be reason to worry that Closure in that version might suffer from the same problems that beset Closure in versions (vii) and (viii). Whether this comparative judgment is right or wrong, version (ix) of the SCA is a formidable argument, worth thinking carefully about. Let's spell it out explicitly: Ability Consequence Argument (ACA) Past Necessarily, whenever x is normal at t, there is a true history-proposition p such that p would still have been true if x had done any of the things x can do at t. Laws Necessarily, whenever x is normal at t and p is a true law of nature, p would still have been true if x had done any of the things x can do at t. Closure Necessarily, whenever x is normal at t and p is metaphysically necessitated by a set of propositions each of which would still have been true if x had done any of the things x can do at t, p would still have been true if x had done any of the things x can do at t. !39 Triviality Necessarily, if x is normal at t and determinism is true, every true proposition p is such that p would still have been true if x had done any of the things x can do at t. It is just a small further step from Triviality to Incompatibilism Necessarily, if x is normal at t and determinism is true, everything x can do at t is something that x in fact does. To bridge this gap, all we need is the uncontroversial claim that necessarily, normal people cannot do things such that contradictions would have been true if they had done them.57 The ACA and arguments relevantly like it have convinced many people that Incompatibilism is true. This is not surprising, since the ACA is valid and all of its premises are pre-theoretically compelling, while its conclusion is not especially repugnant. By contrast, although the CCA has similarly plausible premises, its conclusion is repugnant: I know of no-one who has embraced it, despite the fact that the basic problem has been known for decades. Those who reject the conclusion of the CCA will need to reject one of its premises. But this matters to our evaluation of the ACA, since the sources of the intuitive plausibility of the premises of the CCA and those of the ACA seem quite similar. As noted above, both versions of Closure follow from Weak General Closure. Both versions of Laws are rooted in one of the central theoretical roles of the concept of a law of nature, the idea of laws as supporting counterfactuals. And both versions of Past owe 58 their basic appeal to a certain picture of what it means for the past to be \"over and done with\". Moreover, all the premises can be argued for abductively, on the grounds that !40 they explain and systematise a range of plausible judgments about particular cases. 59 This kinship between the two arguments creates some presumption that the corresponding premises should stand or fall together. Anyone who rejects some premise of the CCA while accepting its counterpart in the ACA thus faces the challenge of finding a principled way to drive a wedge between the two. It is no longer dialectically sufficient simply to appeal to the pre-theoretical plausibility of the relevant premise of the ACA, or to an abductive inference based on the pre-theoretical plausibility of certain of its consequences. The failure of the CCA-premise tends to undermine our justification for trusting the relevant pre-theoretical judgments, or for accepting the abductive inference. The challenge seems especially difficult to answer if, as I have argued, the false premise in the CCA is Past. Those who reject Laws in the CCA but not in the ACA might, perhaps, hope to meet the challenge by arguing for some intimate link between the concept of ability and that of a law of nature. Both are associated with familiar modalities, and there may be some way to make a case that \"practical\" possibility entails nomic possibility that is neither undermined by coming to think of laws as counterfactually fragile, nor dependent on some completely different argument for incompatibilism. By contrast, while we can define a broad notion of historical possibility on which truths about the past, but not laws, count as historically necessary, this notion seems quite artificial and has no clear role in our ordinary thought. It is hard to imagine an argument that \"practical\" possibility entails this kind of historical possibility that would not be undermined by rejecting Past in the CCA and did not turn on the success of some independent argument for incompatibilism. For those who do not feel the force of the presumption that the corresponding premises of the CCA and the ACA stand or fall together, it may help to consider the role the restriction to \"normal\" people plays in making the premises plausible. Dropping !41 this restriction sharply diminishes the appeal of Past and Laws in both arguments. We can understand stories about extraordinary people, such as gods and time travellers, who are able to blink at a certain time, and are such that if they had blinked at that time the laws or the distant past would have been different. It is not at all obvious that such stories are metaphysically impossible. But the notion of normality we have been using to set such cases aside is little more than a promissory note: we should always have expected to have to do some work in settling where to draw the relevant line. Once we have rejected Past or Laws in the CCA, we now think that one of the theoretically important classifications in the vicinity groups otherwise unremarkable people in deterministic worlds together with gods and time travellers. Given this surprising conclusion, we would surely need some special reason for insisting that the corresponding premise of the ACA is true on an interpretation of 'normal' that includes people in deterministic worlds. The view I have been presenting about the dialectical significance of the puzzle of counterfactuals under determinism for the standard consequence arguments has not been widespread in the literature on incompatibilism. One reason for this is the con60 text-sensitivity of counterfactuals, which makes it hard to distinguish the surprising claims we are forced to accept in order to avoid the conclusion of the CCA from other, much less interesting claims. Recall the following sentences from §1: (2) If determinism is true and x does not blink at t, then if x had blinked at t, that would have to have been because of a prior history of determining factors differing all the way back. (2′) If determinism is true and x does not blink at t, then if x had blinked at t, a miracle would have to have occurred. !42 Both sentences, considered in isolation, seem like mere platitudes. As observed in §1, the 'would have to' construction that features in both (2) and (2′) seems, in other cases, to play a role in signalling that some kind of \"non-standard\" interpretation is intended. It is thus plausible that (2) and (2′) both express truths on the interpretations they naturally evoke. These truths are not particularly surprising or counterintuitive (at least under these guises). Merely acknowledging the unsurprising truth conveyed by (2) does little to undermine the intuitive appeal of Past in the ACA; likewise, acknowledging the unsurprising truth conveyed by (2′) does little to undermine the appeal of Laws in the ACA. Those of us who have decided whether to reject Past or Laws in the CCA will be tempted to use sentences like (2) and (2′) to make our choice seem obviously correct. 61 But we should resist this temptation. For the CCA presents a challenging paradox, any resolution of which will include a diagnosis of some tendency towards error latent in our ordinary methods of evaluating counterfactuals. The context-sensitivity of counterfactuals means that we will have to struggle to avoid confusing the revisionary claims involved in resolving the paradox with obvious truths. But, given the potential significance for other debates of the realisation that common sense is apt to lead us astray in this domain, the effort is worth making. 62 !43 References Ahmed, Arif. 2013. \"Causal Decision Theory: A Counterexample.\" Philosophical Review 122: 289–306. -. 2014. Evidence, Decision, and Causality. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. Albert, David. 2000. Time and Chance. Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press. -. 2015. After Physics. Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press. Arntzenius, Frank. 2008. \"No Regrets, Or: Edith Piaf Revamps Decision Theory.\" Erkenntnis 68: 277–97. Beebee, Helen. 2003. \"Local Miracle Compatibilism.\" Noûs 37: 258–77. - and Alfred Mele. 2002. \"Humean Compatibilism.\" Mind 111: 201–23. Bennett, Jonathan. 1984. \"Counterfactuals and Temporal Direction.\" Philosophical Review 93: 57–91. -. 2003. A Philosophical Guide to Conditionals. Oxford: Clarendon Press. Dorr, Cian. n.d. \"Finding Ordinary Objects at Some Quantum Worlds.\" Unpublished manuscript. - and John Hawthorne. 2014. \"Semantic Plasticity and Speech Reports.\" Philosophical Review 123 (2014): 281–338. Field, Hartry. 2003. \"Causation in a Physical World.\" In The Oxford Handbook of Metaphysics, ed. Michael J. Loux and Dean W. Zimmerman, 435–60. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Fine, Kit. 2012. \"Counterfactuals Without Possible Worlds.\" Journal of Philosophy 109: 221–46. Fischer, John Martin. 1994. The Metaphysics of Free Will. Oxford: Blackwell. Gibbard, Allan and William Harper. 1978. \"Counterfactuals and Two Kinds of Expected Utility.\" In Foundations and Applications of Decision Theory, ed. A. Hooker, J. J. Leach & E. F. McClennen, 125–62. Dordrecht: D. Reidel. Ginet, Carl. 1966. \"Might We Have No Choice?\" In Freedom and Determinism, ed. Keith Lehrer, 87–104. New York: Random House. !44 -. 1990. On Action. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. Glynn, Luke. 2013. \"Of Miracles and Interventions.\" Erkenntnis 78: 43–64. Goggans, Philip. 1992. \"Do the Closest Counterfactual Worlds Contain Miracles?\" Pacific Philosophical Quarterly 73: 137–49. Goodman, Jeremy. 2015. \"Knowledge, Counterfactuals, and Determinism.\" Philosophical Studies 172: 2275–8. Halpin, John F. 1991. \"The Miraculous Conception of Counterfactuals.\" Philosophical Studies 63: 271–90. Hawthorne, John. 2006. \"Determinism De Re.\" In Metaphysical Essays, 239–43. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Hitchcock, Christopher. 2001. \"The Intransitivity of Causation Revealed in Equations and Graphs.\" Journal of Philosophy 98: 273–99. Holliday, Wesley. 2012. \"Freedom and the Fixity of the Past.\" Philosophical Review 121: 179–207. Jackson, Frank. 1977. \"A Causal Theory of Counterfactuals.\" Australasian Journal of Philosophy 55: 3–21. Khoo, Justin. n.d. \"On Indicative and Subjunctive Conditionals.\" Unpublished manuscript. Kment, Boris. 2006. \"Counterfactuals and Explanation.\" Mind 115: 261–309. Kutach, Douglas N. 2002. \"The Entropy Theory of Counterfactuals.\" Philosophy of Science 69: 82–104. -. 2007. \"The Physical Foundations of Causation.\" In Price and Corry (2007): 327–50. -. 2013. Causation and its Basis in Fundamental Physics. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Lange, Marc. 2000. Natural Laws in Scientific Practice. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Lewis, David. 1973. Counterfactuals. Oxford: Blackwell. -. 1979. \"Counterfactual Dependence and Time's Arrow.\" Noûs 13: 455–76. Reprinted in Lewis 1986: 32–66. !45 -. 1981a. \"Are We Free to Break the Laws?\" Theoria 47: 113–21. Reprinted in Lewis 1986: 291–8. -. 1981b. \"Causal Decision Theory.\" Australasian Journal of Philosophy 59: 5–30. Reprinted in Lewis 1986: 305–39. -. 1983. \"New Work for a Theory of Universals.\" Australasian Journal of Philosophy 61: 343–77. Reprinted in Lewis 1999: 8–55. -. 1986. Philosophical Papers, vol. 2. Oxford: Oxford University Press. -. 1994. \"Humean Supervenience Debugged.\" Mind 103: 473–90. Reprinted in Lewis 1999: 224–47. -. 1999. Papers in Metaphysics and Epistemology. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. Loewer, Barry. 2007. \"Counterfactuals and the Second Law.\" In Price and Corry 2007: 293–326. -. 2012. \"Two Accounts of Laws and Time.\" Philosophical Studies 160: 115–37. Maudlin, Tim. 2007. The Metaphysics Within Physics. Oxford: Oxford University Press. McKay, Thomas and Johnson, David. 1996. \"A Reconsideration of an Argument against Compatibilism.\" Philosophical Topics 24: 113–22. Nolan, Daniel. 1997. \"Impossible Worlds: A Modest Approach.\" Notre Dame Journal of Formal Logic 38: 535–72. Norton, John. 2007. \"Causation as Folk Science.\" In Price and Corry 2007: 11–44. Nute, Donald. 1980. Topics in Conditional Logic. Dordrecht: Springer. Placek, Tomasz and Müller, Thomas. 2007. \"Counterfactuals and Historical Possibility.\" Synthese 154: 173–97. Poincaré, Henri. 1896. Calcul des Probabilités (Probability Calculus). Paris: Gauthier-Villars. Pollock, John. 1976. \"The 'Possible Worlds' Analysis of Counterfactuals.\" Philosophical Studies 29: 469–76. !46 Price, Huw. 1996. Time's Arrow and Archimedes' Point: New Directions for the Physics of Time. Oxford: Oxford University Press. - and Richard Corry (eds.). 2007. Causation, Physics, and the Constitution of Reality: Russell's Republic Revisited. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Reaber, Grant. 2012. \"Rational Feedback.\" Philosophical Quarterly 62: 797–819. Rosen, Gideon. 2002. \"The Case for Incompatibilism.\" Philosophy and Phenomenological Research 64: 699–706. Smith, Peter. 1998. Explaining Chaos. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. Stalnaker, Robert. 1981 [1972]. Letter to David Lewis. In Ifs, ed. William Harper, Robert Stalnaker, and Glenn Pearce, 151–2. Dordrecht: Reidel. van Inwagen, Peter. 1983. An Essay on Free Will. Oxford: Oxford University Press. -. 2000. \"Free Will Remains a Mystery.\" Philosophical Perspectives 14: 1-20 Vihvelin, Kadri. 2000. \"Libertarian Compatibilism.\" Philosophical Perspectives 14: 139–66. Wallace, David. Forthcoming. \"The Logic of the Past Hypothesis.\" In Time's Arrows and the Probability Structure of the World, ed. Barry Loewer, Eric Winsberg, and Brad Weslake. Cambridge MA: Harvard University Press. Werner, Thomas. 2003. Deducing the Future and Distinguishing the Past: Temporal Interpretation in Modal Sentences in English. Ph.D. Thesis, Rutgers University. Williamson, Timothy. 2007. The Philosophy of Philosophy. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Wilson, Jessica M. 2014. \"Hume's Dictum and the Asymmetry of Counterfactual Dependence.\" In Chance and Temporal Asymmetry, ed. Alastair Wilson, 258–79. Oxford: Oxford University Press. !47 Notes Thanks to Frank Arntzenius, Jeremy Goodman, John Hawthorne, Boris Kment, David 1 Manley, Kieran Setiya, and David Wallace; to audiences at Columbia, Cornell, and the University of Massachusetts, Amherst; and to an anonymous referee for this journal. I take laws to be propositions, and treat 'The proposition that P is a law' and 'It is a law 2 that P' as equivalent. Note that laws need not be propositions about lawhood. It is plausible that only true propositions can be laws, but I will not assume this since Lange (2000) and Kment (2006) have recently embraced the possibility of false laws. !48 It might be useful to distinguish my 'determinism' from three nearby doctrines which 3 also have a strong claim on the name. To clarify their logical relations, note that determinism is equivalent to the following claim: Any set of propositions that contains all true laws of nature and at least one true history-proposition entails every proposition with which it is consistent. This can be strengthened by dropping the second 'true': call the result 'general determinism'. In possible-worlds terms, understanding a \"nomically possible\" world as one where all the true laws are true, general determinism says that any two nomically possible worlds that agree on some history-proposition agree on every proposition, whereas determinism only requires this in the case where one of the two is the actual world. The other two doctrines can be derived from determinism and general determinism, respectively, by dropping the first 'true'. Of course this makes no difference unless falsehoods can be laws. Lange (2000) and Kment (2006) think that falsehoods can be laws, and favour weaker definitions of determinism that drop my restriction to true laws. However neither of them argues that there actually are any false laws, so their view does not undermine the interest of determinism in my stronger sense. Further notions of determinism can be derived from those just considered by restricting some or all of the quantifiers to qualitative propositions and properties. I will say more about these in §2. Given Closure we can strengthen the conclusion further: since every proposition is 4 metaphysically necessitated by a contradiction, every counterfactual of the form 'If x had blinked at t, it would have been the case that P' must be true. For example, if x had blinked at t, x would have turned into a butterfly and flown away. !49 Note that the following also sounds obviously true: 5 (2′) If determinism is true and x does not blink at t, then if x had blinked at t, a miracle would have to have occurred. Although I hold that Past fails in ordinary contexts, I am inclined to think that (2′), like (2), is true in the context it most naturally evokes. Lewis's dichotomy between 'backtracking' and 'standard' contexts is not particularly helpful here. I believe the explanation turns on subtle ways in which epistemic necessity modals (like 'have to') can serve to signal that certain other propositions, serving as premises from which the asserted content can be inferred, are to be taken for granted. Explicit endorsements of Triviality have not been common. In the tradition of \"branch6 ing time\" (or \"branching spacetime\") model theory, some theorists (Werner 2003, Placek and Müller 2007) give semantics for counterfactuals which make them equivalent to the corresponding material conditionals in models where there is no branching of histories. Moreover, in this tradition 'determinism' is sometimes used for a thesis true in all and only non-branching models. However, it is not clear that this pins down a unique meaning for 'determinism'; and even if it did, it would be unclear whether it entails determinism in the sense we are concerned with. For an example of the confusions to which this use of 'determinism' can give rise, see Placek and Müller (2007: 3), who accuse Lewis of 'double talk' for taking determinism to be consistent with the (metaphysical) possibility of miracles. Hawthorne (2006) gives a closely related argument for the implausibility of determin7 ism (what he calls 'de re determinism'). !50 Equivalently: Every qualitative proposition is such that either it or its negation follows 8 from every set that (a) contains every true law of nature and (b) contains a true proposition of the form some initial segment of history has F for some property F that entails every intrinsic property with which it is consistent. Other versions of 'qualitative determinism' can be extracted from this by: (i) deleting 'true' in front of 'law of nature' in (a) (which is a genuine weakening only given the unpopular view that laws can be false); (ii) adding 'qualitative' in front of 'law of nature' in (a) (which is a genuine strengthening only given the unpopular view that laws can be non-qualitative); (iii) adding 'qualitative' immediately before 'intrinsic' in (b) (which is a genuine strengthening given the popular view that there are non-qualitative intrinsic properties); (iv) deleting the last 'true' (which is uncontroversially a genuine strengthening, analogous to the step from determinism to \"general determinism\" discussed in note 2). Lewis's preferred definition of determinism (Lewis 1984) in effect makes both strengthening (iii) and strengthening (iv). Hawthorne's 'qualitative determinism' makes strengthening (iii) but not (iv). For this objection to General Closure, see Nolan 1997. For a defence of the view that 9 counterfactuals with impossible antecedents are vacuously true, see Williamson 2007, ch. 4. This is because of Lewis's rejection of the 'limit assumption', according to which for 10 any world w and set of worlds S, some member of S is at least as close to w as any other member of S. Pollock (1976) and Fine (2012), among others, have forcefully objected to Lewis, ar11 guing that infinite agglomeration is just as unproblematic as its finite analogue. !51 Fine (2012) develops a logic for counterfactuals, one version of which allows 12 P > (Q ∨ ¬Q) to be false even when P is metaphysically possible. (Here > stands for the counterfactual conditional). If this logic is taken to characterise the intended reading, it will require rejecting Weak General Closure. The motivation Fine gives for this logic turns on the suggestion that 'If it were to rain in Peoria, the party would be a roaring success' (P > R) has what he calls a 'connectionist' reading, under which it is false if the weather in Peoria has absolutely no bearing on whether the party is a roaring success. Fine maintains that the falsehood of this sentence is consistent with the joint truth, on the same connectionist reading, of 'If it were to rain in Peoria and Quentin came to the party, it would be a roaring success' ((P ∧ Q) > R) and 'If it were to rain in Peoria and Quentin didn't come to the party, it would be a roaring success' ((P ∧ ¬Q) > R). Since P > R follows from (P ∧ Q) > R, (P ∧ ¬Q) > R and P > (Q ∨ ¬Q) given other intuitive logical principles accepted by Fine, he concludes that P > (Q ∨ ¬Q) is false. However, I see no strong motivation for positing the 'connectionist' reading. The obvious conservative account of the example is that when we know that the party will be a roaring success no matter what happens in Peoria, P > R is still true but pragmatically disfavoured (perhaps because of the desirability of putting 'still' into the consequent). Anyway, neither Past nor Laws has much pre-theoretical plausibility on a connectionist reading: intuitively, a blink at t has no more bearing on the laws or the distant past than the weather in Peoria has on the success of Fine's party. So the CCA only presents us with an interesting paradox on a non-connectionist reading of the counterfactuals, for which Fine has given no reason to reject Closure. !52 Other friends of counterfactual miracles include Jackson (1977), Halpin (1991), Vi13 hvelin (2000), Beebee (2003), Woodward (2003, §3.5), Lange (2000), Kment (2006), Glynn (2013), and Khoo (n.d.). Note that while Lange and Kment agree with Lewis that if determinism is true and x doesn't blink at t, some laws are such that they would not have been true if x had blinked at t, they hold that in a different sense the laws do not counterfactually depend on what we do: if a proposition is a law, it would still have been a law if x had blinked at t, although it might in that case have been a false law rather than a true one. This wrinkle does not undermine the arguments for Laws that I will be giving in sections 6 and 7. Other proponents of law-preserving views of counterfactuals under determinism in14 clude Nute (1980), Bennett (1984) (although he expresses second thoughts in Bennett 2003), Goggans (1992), Albert (2000, 2015), Loewer (2007), Kutach (2002, 2007), and Wilson (2014). The discussion in the present section is especially indebted to Albert and Loewer. !53 Holding History Fixed is not about how we evaluate counterfactuals whose con15 sequents are primarily about times earlier than the times the antecedent is primarily about, like 'If John had forgotten to have breakfast this morning, he would still have had breakfast yesterday morning'. On the rare occasions when we consider such counterfactuals, we often resolve their context-sensitivity in a non-standard way that involves holding fixed less of the truth about prior history (Lewis's 'backtracking' interpretations). The case for the prevalence of Holding History Fixed is based on conditionals like (5–7) whose consequents entail certain propositions about earlier times without being primarily about those times. Indeed, given the popular view that the very existence of particular people and ordinary objects metaphysically necessitates quite a lot about the course of earlier history, almost all ordinary counterfactuals will fall into this category. Note that this contradicts Maudlin's suggestion (2007, chapter 1) that given determinism, counterfactuals whose antecedents are about a particular time t can typically be evaluated by a recipe that involves making minimal changes to the instantaneous state at t so as to make the antecedent true, evolving forwards in accordance with the laws, and stopping once we have come up with a description of a long enough interval beginning at t to entail the truth or falsity of the consequent. The 'exploding difference' view considered by Bennett (2003: 218) fits this template. 16 However, Bennett incautiously glosses 'approximate match' as match 'in every respect we would ever notice or think about'. Taken literally, this is too demanding. As Ahmed (2014: ch. 5) points out, we are capable of thinking about the question whether the state of the universe a million years ago was such as to entail, together with a certain proposition L, that we act in a certain way. In the case where L is in fact a true, deterministic law, proponents of Laws must agree that this question would have had a different answer if we had acted differently, despite being entirely about the distant past. !54 Halpin (1991) expresses the same concern. 17 Proof: Suppose for contradiction that this is false: for some p∈M and positive real 18 numbers t and ε, every open neighbourhood O of p contains a point p′ such that for some x∈[0,t], d(Φ(x,p′),Φ(x,p))≥ε. Then, by taking any nested sequence of open sets O1, O2,... whose intersection is {p}, we could construct a sequence 〈x1,p1〉, 〈x2,p2〉, ... in R×M such that p1, p2, ... converges to p; each xi is in [0,t]; and d(Φ(xi,pi),Φ(xi,p)) is always ≥ε. Since [0,t] is a closed interval, the Bolzano-Weierstrass theorem entails that the sequence x1, x2, ... has a subsequence xk1, xk2, ... that converges to some limit point y ∈ [0,t]. Then by the continuity of Φ, Φ(xk1,p), Φ(xk1,p),... converges to Φ(y,p). Moreover, since pk1, pk2, ... converges to p (being a subsequence of p1,p2...), the sequence Φ(xk1,pk1), Φ(xk1,pk1), ... must also converge to Φ(y,p). Hence by the continuity of d, the sequence d(Φ(xk1,pk1), (Φ(xk1,p)), d(Φ(xk2,pk2),(Φ(xk2,p)), ... converges to d(Φ(y,p),Φ(y,p))=0. This contradicts the assumption that d(Φ(xi,pi),Φ(xi,p))≥ε for every 〈xi,pi〉. (Note that this argument does not actually require the similarity-measure d to be a metric: it is enough for it to be a continuous function for which d(p,p) is always zero.) Smith (1998) provides a philosophically accessible introduction to chaos theory. 19 In fact almost all of E will consist of states corresponding to an earlier history radically 20 unlike that of the actual world-a history much of which looks rather like the post-t history of the actual world played in reverse. See Albert 2000, ch. 4. !55 To be precise: for any S⊂M, let Φ(x,S) = {q: ∃p∈S(q=Φ(x,p))} be the result of evolving all 21 points in S by x units of time. Let u be some small (but not too microscopically small) positive real number, representing a unit of time. Where Θ– is a finite set of ordered pairs of negative multiples of u and macrostates, and Θ+ is a finite set of ordered pairs of positive multiples of u and macrostates, let Ξ– = ∩{Φ(x,S)|〈x,S〉∈ Θ–}, and Ξ+ = ∩{Φ(x,S)| 〈x,S〉∈ Θ+}. Finally, let M0 be some macrostate, and for any measurable S⊂M, let PM0(S) equal the volume of S∩M0 (according to the natural measure) divided by that of M0. Then the Independence Conjecture says that PM0(Ξ– ∩ Ξ+) ≈ PM0(Ξ–)PM0(Ξ+). The Independence Conjecture is a special case of the 'Simple Dynamical Conjecture' discussed by Wallace (forthcoming), where the role of the 'coarse graining map' is played by the function that takes each probability distribution on M onto the distribution that agrees with it on each macrostate but is uniform within macrostates, and the 'simple distributions' are the uniform distributions over particular macrostates. An interesting question is whether the empirical success of statistical mechanics 22 merely supports the claim that the conjecture is true as regards the true underlying microdymamics, whatever it might be (if determinism is true), or whether it also supports the kind of mathematical intuition that would leads us to assume that such behaviour is typical of complex worlds with simple deterministic laws. !56 The following may help to make this intuitively plausible: there is some finite n such 23 that, by specifying the positions and momenta of all particles up to the first n decimal places, we can guarantee the generation of the puff of wind that types the first character of Hamlet. But as time goes on, more and more digits in the initial positions and momenta will become macroscopically relevant So insofar as it is plausible that there is an assignment of values to the first n digits that results in the first letter being typed, it should also be plausible that for some n'>n, there is an assignment of values to the first n′ digits that result in the first two letters of Hamlet being typed.... We need not worry that the fine-tuned choices of parameters required to generate the first thermodynamic miracle will tie our hands in such a way as to make subsequent thermodynamic miracles nomically impossible, since each such miracle only requires fine-tuning finitely many decimal places' worth of the initial state, and we have infinitely many decimal places to play with. One might worry that if we allow for an earlier divergence in interpreting Fred's ut24 terance, we will be forced to say that the proposition he asserted was quite improbable on his evidence, on the grounds that among the worlds where Fred is with Mary at t and the course of history up to the relevant earlier time approximately matches actuality, most (in the sense of the Lebesgue measure) are not worlds where Fred hugs Mary just after t-rather, they are worlds where the conversation does not take place at all, or takes place in a different way and on a different schedule. But this assumes that in evaluating a counterfactual, we can't hold fixed any truths about a time unless we hold fixed the complete approximate truth about that time. And there is no reason to accept this. In interpreting Fred's utterance, we are free to hold fixed both approximate history up to, say, one day before t, and also the facts about what whatever Mary said just before t that inspired Fred's impulse to give her a hug. !57 The seminal work here is Poincaré's (1896) analysis of roulette. 25 Moreover, the ratios of the volumes of these sets of points will be approximately pro26 portional to the chances that our high-level chancy theories assign to the outcomes they yield, a fact which helps explain the success of these theories. We will need to allow for the relevant source of context sensitivity to be bound by 27 some higher quantifier, to account of sentences like 'Any time a moving atom collides with a stationary atom, the collision would not have taken place if the trajectory of the moving atom had different even by a fraction of a degree'. Such \"bindability\" seems to be a typical feature of context-sensitive expressions: see the discussion of 'local' in Dorr and Hawthorne 2014, §3.3. !58 Unlike Albert and Loewer, the most prominent defenders of a law-preserving ap28 proach to counterfactuals under determinism, I have not tried to explain why statisticalmechanical probabilities should play a role in determining our credences in counterfactuals. I think that a story about this can be developed, but I will not tell it here since I do not think it is necessary for defending Laws. My view is also unlike that of Albert and Loewer in that I think we should generally hold fixed the entire approximate course of history up to some contextually given time, whereas they merely hold fixed the macrostate at the relevant time and the \"Past Hypothesis\" (roughly, the macrostate at the beginning of the universe). This leads them to odd results: for example, that 'If I had raised my arm, Atlantis would never have existed' deserves high credence, conditional on the hypothesis that Atlantis existed but left no macroscopic traces (Kutach 2002; Loewer 2007, 2012; Albert 2015, ch. 1). They are motivated to tolerate these results by the desire to avoid writing any explicit time asymmetries into the semantics of counterfactuals. But given that my more conservative approach is consistent with all manner of reductive ways of distinguishing past and future-e.g. in terms of the entropy gradient-I see no deep reason to follow Albert and Loewer here. Of course, given the existence of backtracking readings of counterfactuals, no-one 29 should suppose that this connection between causation and counterfactuals obtains on all readings. But the objector can insist that it obtains on some important readings, including those we have been focusing on. !59 Given that Lewis is also the most prominent defender of a theory of causation on 30 which counterfactual dependence is sufficient for causation, how can he possibly reconcile his embrace of short-range backwards counterfactual dependence with the denial of backwards causation? His strategy turns on two of his other commitments: (i) the rejection of Conditional Excluded Middle (the schema 'Either if it were that P it would be that Q, or if it were that P it would be that not-Q') and (ii) his sparse account of events, according to which many propositions are not necessarily equivalent to the occurrence of any event: That is not to say, however, that the immediate past depends on the present in any very definite way. There may be a variety of ways the transition might go, hence there may be no true counterfactuals that say in any detail how the immediate past would be if the present were different. I hope not, since if there were a definite and detailed dependence, it would be hard for me to say why some of this dependence should not be interpreted-wrongly, of course-as backwards causation.... (Lewis 1979: 40) If this strategy for blocking backwards causation worked for Lewis, there is no obvious reason why it should not work just as well for proponents of Laws. However, I can't see how Lewis's hope could be justified given his own account of counterfactuals, according to which the closest worlds are those with the latest possible small miracle. Suppose a bomb explodes at t (an event), and the flimsy building it is in collapses (another event). There are presumably worlds which diverge from actuality by a small miracle just before t where neither event occurs. But for a small miracle to lead to a world The 'big miracle' view seems to be implied in Jackson (1977). It is explicitly defended 31 by Glynn (2013). !60 For a more elaborate version of this argument, see the discussion of 'bumps' in Ben32 nett 2003, §79. On one version of the view, the relevant possible worlds would discontinuously splice 33 together the pre-noon segment of the actual world with the post-noon segments of unremarkable, nomically possible worlds where I walk to the car in the usual way. Note that giving up the sufficiency claim need not mean giving up the project of ana34 lysing causation in counterfactual terms. For one thing, such analyses could be framed using interpretations of counterfactuals distinct from the \"standard\" ones we have been concerned with. For another, most recent attempts to analyse causation in counterfactual terms (e.g. Hitchcock 2011) end up testing for causation using arrays of counterfactuals with quite complex antecedents, which vary the putative cause while also explicitly holding fixed a wide array of other facts about relevant parts of the world. There is no obvious reason to expect analyses of this form to vindicate the sufficiency claim. For various developments of this theme, see Price (1996), Field (2003), and Norton 35 (2007). The argument here and in the rest of the present section amplifies the brief presenta36 tion in section 3.2 of Dorr and Hawthorne 2014. !61 On some views of propositions, we will be able to grasp and express these complex 37 propositions under certain modes of presentation. For example, suppose we introduce a new predicate 'actualistic' by stipulating that it should express whatever intrinsic profile is instantiated by the first million-year segment of the history of our universe. On the views in question, 'The initial million-year segment is actualistic' will end up expressing a history-proposition that nomically necessitates all truths (assuming determinism). But this does not lead to counterfactuals of the problematic sort. If history had been different, 'actualistic' would have expressed a different property; so if our protagonist's only way of believing the relevant history-proposition goes by way of this predicate, she would still have had true beliefs even if history had been slightly different. !62 Arguments of the present sort can, of course, be used to support the counterfactual 38 robustness of simple truths about the past. This has some controversial consequences when combined with the counterfactual robustness of the laws. For example, suppose that the initial state of the universe was mirror-symmetric (a simple truth), and that the deterministic laws are parity-invariant so that things remain symmetric forever. If we hold all this fixed, we will have to endorse many counterfactuals to the effect that if we had done such-and-such, our mirror-counterparts would also have done such-and-such. Given the apparent lack of causal relations between mirror-counterparts, these counterfactuals are controversial, especially if we make the further, un-Humean stipulation that the symmetry of the initial state was nomologically contingent. Nevertheless, my inclination is to follow the arguments where they lead, and chalk the case up as another counterexample to the sufficiency of counterfactual dependence for causation. Here I am disagreeing with Boris Kment and an anonymous referee, who argued from the falsity of the controversial counterfactuals in the symmetric world to the general untrustworthiness of the intuitions underlying our aversion to (8) and (9). Even granting the premise, the conclusion strikes me as an overreaction. I think it would be better methodology to resolve conflicts among our intuitive judgments about more exotic possibilities (like the symmetric) world by extrapolating general principles (such as Laws) from our judgments about less exotic possibilities (like the Frank case). More realistic hypotheses of this kind arise in connection with certain many-worlds 39 interpretations of quantum mechanics. Moreover, if people at the worlds in question have such rich essences, our counterfac40 tual judgments concerning those worlds will be riddled with errors, so that the worlds present no distinctive challenge for the mode of reasoning that leads us to judge (8) and (9) false in the original example. !63 Goodman (2015) gives an epistemological argument for the counterfactual fragility of 41 the past that nicely complements the broadly ethical arguments of the present section. His premises are, first, that some deterministic propositions can be known, and second, that one could not know any proposition that was counterfactually fragile in the way that any deterministic proposition would have to be given Past. The concept of lawhood plays no role in this argument, although the best candidates to be knowable deterministic propositions are laws. If I am right about this, then probably, if Bill has a realistic sense of the extent of coun42 terfactual dependence across his life, hardly any of the mistakes he made before meeting Mary will be things he can appropriately regret. More generally, people whose lives have gone well should have few regrets about their early choices. Of course we often do have such regrets, and judge them appropriate. Nevertheless, I do not think that the claim that they are mostly inappropriate amounts to a radical error theory about our ordinary normative beliefs. The disposition to let go of regret when we reflect on the relations of counterfactual dependence between our mistakes and the things we most value is deeply ingrained in our ordinary practice, even though we do not always remember to engage in such reflection. (Thanks to an anonymous referee for pressing me on this point.) !64 The connection I have suggested between regret and counterfactual thinking is prob43 ably too simple. For example, can't a reformed criminal wholeheartedly regret having committed a certain crime even when he knows that because of his past depravity, if he had not committed that crime, he would have chosen to commit an even worse crime instead? This suggests a revision along the following lines: one cannot rationally regret doing something (all things considered) if one rationally believes that for each alternative to doing that thing, things would have been worse if one had performed that alternative. But note that even this weaker principle will tell us that Frank's regrets are irrational. Since causal decision theory merely requires a certain kind of fit between one's choice, 44 one's values, and one's credences in counterfactuals, it is consistent with different views about how one should form credences in the relevant counterfactuals. It is not uncontroversial that it would be rational to form them just by induction from one's past track record: for example, Arntzenius (2008) claims that in situations where multiple predictions about one's future behaviour would be self-fulfilling, one rationally ought to form credences optimistically, predicting that one will do whatever one most hopes to do, in spite of putative countervailing evidence such as a bad track record. For the argument to go through, she does not actually need to be certain that there is a 45 history-proposition which would be true no matter what she did. It is enough if her credence that this is not the case is less than her credence that L would be false no matter what she did. Lewis's version of causal decision theory (Lewis 1981b) would also serve the pur46 poses of the argument, since it coincides with the Stalnaker-Gibbard-Harper theory in deterministic worlds. !65 Ahmed gives several other arguments for evidential decision theory, but here I will 47 confine my attention to the argument from Betting on the Laws. Ahmed also thinks that only theories that capture this intuitive thought deserve the 48 name 'causal decision theory'. I have been using this label in a way that Ahmed would oppose, but nothing turns on this terminological issue. These are the adjectives Ahmed (2014: 140) uses in discussing the combination of the 49 Stalnaker-Gibbard-Harper decision theory with Loewer's (2007) statistical-mechanical approach to counterfactuals. I assume the accusation is intended to extend to other views that preserve Laws. My main worry about (i) is that if one interprets the slogan about the relevance of 50 causation very literally, no decision theory that applies nontrivially in deterministic worlds can endorse it. As we saw in §5, Lewis denies that the miracles which would have occurred if we had acted otherwise would have been caused by (or constituted by, or identical to) our actions. So if Lewis is right, both the initial conditions and the laws would seem to be \"beyond our present influence\", causally speaking; but of course no decision theory that required treating both the initial conditions and the laws as \"states of nature\" could apply nontrivially under determinism. This suggests that we need to be more flexible in interpreting the slogan. As Ahmed actually interprets it, it merely requires treating particular matters of fact causally independent of the agent's choice as \"states of nature\", where universal generalisations (including laws) do not count as particular matters of fact. While this is certainly a possible interpretation, it is not obviously the only one, or the best one. !66 In defending his characterisation of the Stalnaker-Gibbard-Harper-Loewer view is 51 'unstable', Ahmed at one point (2014: 141 n. 26) seems to take it for granted that the \"everyday counterfactual\" is one for which the past is to be held fixed, so that the view he is arguing against is one according which the conditionals relevant to deliberation differ in this respect from everyday counterfactuals. This combination of views is certainly problematic: given how important decision-making is in our lives, it would be mysterious if natural languages lacked the resources to express the kind of conditional that matters to rational decision-making. Ahmed also has another case, Betting on the Past, which can play a similar dialectical 52 role. Instead of 'x cannot make it the case that p is false', Ginet says 'it is not open to x to 53 make it the case that p is false', where 'open to' has a rather intricate further definition. Here I believe I am in agreement with van Inwagen (2000). In that paper, van Inwa54 gen, in effect, rejects version (i) while endorsing version (vi) as capturing what version (i) was 'trying to capture'. But there is evidence that he takes (vi) to be equivalent to (ix), namely his taking the thesis that 'no non-actual world is as close to the actual world itself' to entail that he is able to ensure the truth of a proposition that it is true only at the actual world (note 9). !67 Here is a counterexample to Closure in version (vii) of the SCA. Suppose that at t 55 Polly can raise her arm; that Quentin is asleep at t'; and that Polly at t has no control in any sense over whether Quentin is asleep at t′. Then each of the things Polly can do at t is such that if she had done it, her doing it would neither be nor cause any event inconsistent either with the proposition that Quentin is asleep at t′, or with the proposition that (Polly raises her arm if and only if Quentin is awake at t′). Nevertheless, something Polly can do at t is such that if she had done it, her doing it would have been inconsistent with the proposition that Polly does not raise her arm. Opponents of Conditional Excluded Middle should regard the following (based on an 56 example in McKay and Johnson 1992) as a counterexample to version (viii) of Closure. Let p be the proposition that a certain fair coin never lands Heads, and q the proposition that it never lands Tails. The coin is never tossed, so both p and q are true. At t, Cecil was able to toss the coin. Even though the coin would have landed Heads or Tails if he had tossed it, it is neither the case that it would have landed Heads if he had tossed it nor that it would have landed Tails if he had tossed it. (This stipulation requires a failure of Conditional Excluded Middle.) More generally, nothing Cecil was able to do at t was such that if he had done it, p would have been false, or such that if he had done it, q would have been false. Nevertheless, one thing that Cecil was able to do at t-namely, tossing the coin-is such that if he had done it, the conjunction of p and q would have been false. Proponents of Conditional Excluded Middle will reject this counterexample, but for them version (viii) of the SCA is equivalent to version (ix) (given the uncontroversial claim that no normal person can do anything such that a contradiction would be true if they did it). !68 Suppose for reductio that determinism is true, and at t, x is normal and able to φ but 57 does not in fact φ. By Triviality, the proposition that x does not φ would still have been true if x had φed. So a contradiction would have been true if x had Φed. So by the uncontroversial claim, x is not able to φ: contradiction. It has sometimes been suggested that the only viable motivation for Laws in the ACA 58 and related arguments depends on an anti-Humean metaphysics of lawhood, so that Humeans have no reason to accept this premise (see Beebee and Mele 2002 and Rosen 2002). If this were true, it would also be true for Laws in the CCA. But the arguments of sections 6 and 7 show that there are arguments for Laws that have nothing to do with anti-Humeanism. Indeed, as far as I can tell, my judgment that Frank's career would not have been devoted to a mistake if we had put a glass of water on the lectern was driven not so much by the stipulation that L was a law, as by the very features of L that constitute lawhood according to Humeans like Lewis (1994), namely its qualitativeness, its simplicity, and its strength. Van Inwagen (1983) and Ginet (1990) both rely heavily on abductive arguments based 59 on particular examples in which people seem to have no choice about the truth of particular propositions about the laws and the past. Although it is certainly not unprecedented. For example Vihvelin (2000), although a 60 friend of counterfactual miracles, broadly agrees with me about the dialectical relevance of the CCA to the ACA. For example, Beebee (2003: 260) takes it for granted that if determinism is true and I 61 do not raise my hand, then 'raising my hand would require a miracle', while Holliday (2012) takes it for granted that 'if s is determined not to do y at t', then if s were to do y at t′, the past ... would (have to) be different'. !"}
{"meta": {"title": "Agency and the A-Series", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Altshuler, Roman", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": NaN, "date": "2009", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/ALTAAT", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2020-05-20T12:53:33Z"}, "text": "AGENCY AND THE A-SERIES Roman Altshuler SUNY Stony Brook Following McTaggart's distinction of two series – the A-series and the Bseries – according to which we understand time, much of the debate in the philosophy of time has been about our beliefs with regard to time, their tenses, and the relation between these beliefs and reality. While McTaggart hoped to show that neither series was applicable to reality – that, in fact, only an atemporal C-series was conceptually coherent – most philosophers have attempted to bypass this conclusion and instead defend either the A-series or the B-series as providing the true account of reality. Arguments grounded in our experience – traditionally the stronghold of the A-theorists – have by and large been about the beliefs involved in, or descriptive of that experience. The arguments have, however, been flawed in their attempt to draw on our experience for evidence of A-properties, and B-theorists have been quick to note these flaws. After examining some problems with the standard experience-grounded arguments for the existence of A-properties, I will argue that there is a type of entity in the world that – because its ontology involves irreducibly tensed experience – cannot exist within a tenseless reality. This entity is the rational agent. If the real world is to include agents, it will have the past, present, and future as well. I. The Role of Experience in A-theories and B-theories The A-series orders events into past, present, and future. The B-series orders those same events relative to each other as earlier and later. In distinguishing these two views of time, McTaggart (1908) set out both the problem that would follow the philosophy of time for the next century – that of determining how the two series might be related to reality and which of them provides a correct description – and much of the framework within which the debates would be waged. Even then, McTaggart had already noticed a strong bias in favor of the B-series. B-properties, it seems, are the properties required by science, and thus seem to better fit with the notion of a mindindependent reality. The A-series seems more closely connected to the ways we experience time, and as such might be taken to be mind-dependent. A certain naturalist program, seeking to limit ontology to entities open to study by the empirical sciences, has consequently encouraged attempts to explain away the apparent indispensability of the A-series. Much as a scientific image might be thought capable of replacing the manifest image, B-theorists have often held that beliefs involving A-properties are ultimately Roman Altshuler 154 reducible to the terms of a tenseless temporal series. McTaggart, of course, wanted to show that both temporal ways of representing reality are mistaken: he argued that the A-series is indispensable to time because it alone can account for change, but the A-series cannot coherently be applied to reality. Consequently, an atemporal C-series is our only option. But his account of change, among other things, turned out to be highly problematic, often allowing the B-theorist to marshal the full force of McTaggart's argument against the A-theorist without being forced to deny the reality of time. Experience has thus been the A-theorist's traditional refuge. Even if reality is tenseless, we certainly seem to experience it as tensed. But if our experience is part of reality, then it seems to follow that at least something in reality is tensed. In arguing for the unreality of time, McTaggart of course anticipated a similar objection. In response, he noted that we do indeed experience events as past, present, and future. We remember, perceive, or anticipate various occurrences. But this does not prove that the events themselves change their qualities – memory, perception, and anticipation are different mental states with different qualities, but this fact does not show that the objects of these states also differ in quality. The B-theorist can lift this argument from McTaggart against the A-theorist. Let us take up this last point. II. Accounting for Temporal Experience Attempts to eliminate A-properties seem to come into conflict with some readily apparent features of our experience. As just mentioned, we tend to remember some events and anticipate others. To remember event X is to now represent X to myself and, furthermore, represent it as past. This implies that at some point I experienced the event as present and, before that, perhaps anticipated its occurrence as future. Our experience, and our beliefs about that experience, appear to be tensed. Doesn't this suggest that reality is ordered according to an A-series? There are a number of ways of making this argument. 1 Prior (1959) famously pointed out that when I exclaim \"thank goodness that's over!\" I am expressing relief about a tensed fact which would not make sense on a tenseless B-theory: my relief is not that some event is earlier than the time of my utterance, but that the event is past. Smith (1988) echoes this by noting that a number of emotions, e.g., nostalgia or eagerness, are caused by beliefs that some events are past or future rather than simply earlier or later. 2 But arguments of this sort – arguments that appeal to our beliefs about our experience of time – face powerful counter arguments. Our tensed beliefs and experiences might be products of an underlying tenseless reality. An error theory for tensed beliefs and experiences might explain the problem Agency and the A-Series 155 away. Barbour (1999), for example, reminds us that our memories, anticipations, etc., are the products of neural states, those being reducible to the positions of fundamental particles. The state of the world frozen at any instant will include my various mental states. Barbour thus defends a timecapsule theory: reality is composed entirely of static Nows, or frozen instants. That I have memories or feel time passing is no guarantee that those memories are of something past or that time really is passing.3 There are less drastic ways of defending tenselessness, and ones that don't deny the reality of time. When we look at what our experiential beliefs entail, we might find that the most reasonable way of accounting for their truth is a tenseless one. The advantage of this approach is that it allows for the reality of our experience, but denies that the experienced reality is tensed. Take the case of episodic memory, i.e., a memory of some past experience. This means that the truth-maker of the memory belief should contain the truth-maker of the original experience belief, since the former should entail the latter. On the B-theory, this is unproblematic: the truth-maker for the belief that I am having an experience now is that I have this experience at time t0; the truth maker for the memory at t1 is the same, together with the proposition that t1 is later than t0. According to the A-theory, on the other hand, the first truth-maker states that the experience is occurring now, while the second states that the experience occurred in the past. But there is no entailment relation between these propositions, so the A-theory fails to explain a crucial feature of memory, namely, the entailment relation between my having had an experience and my remembering that experience (LePoidevin, 2006). But why, if tenseless facts account for our experiences and beliefs better than tensed ones, are our beliefs tensed? The B-theorist, to put doubts to rest, must answer this final question. Mellor (1998; 2001), in particular, is keen to hold on to the B-theory but defend it from objections by giving the A-theorists everything – one might think – that they want: he avoids the error theory approach and, instead, takes one closer to illusionism. Tensed beliefs, he holds, are usually true, and irreducible. This last point – about irreducibility – is a bit of a farce. What Mellor means is that the beliefs themselves are about pasts, presents, and futures, and these cannot be reduced to anything else. But the facts that make our tensed beliefs true are, themselves, tenseless. I might, for example, believe that now I am tired, but I was not tired in the past – when I had my coffee – and will not be in the future, when I sleep. This may well be true, but what makes it true has nothing to do with A-properties. What makes it true is that a particular person, Roman Altshuler, is tired on June 29, 2008 at 11 p.m., was not tired at 5 p.m., and will be sleeping by 3 a.m. Finally, we Roman Altshuler 156 have different tensed beliefs at different times, and this gives rise to the experience of time flowing. 4 III. Agency and Time But the A-theorist has another option. Let us look at why Mellor thinks we need true tensed beliefs. The reason lies in action theory. The now dominant view of rational actions is that they are caused by beliefs and desires (on most accounts, via an intention). 5 Because actions need to occur at particular times, the beliefs that cause them must be tensed beliefs; for the actions to succeed, they must also be true beliefs. For example, I must catch a train at 5 p.m. The belief that 5 p.m. is in the future is involved in my packing and taking a cab to the train station. To actually catch the train, I must at 5 p.m. have the belief that 5 p.m. is now. If the belief is false – if, when I think \"now is 5 p.m.\" it is actually 6 p.m. – then I have missed the train. 6 Mellor's suggestion is that we have tensed beliefs, usually true ones, because evolution made it so: to survive, we must be capable of doing things on time, and to intentionally do anything on time, we must be capable of orienting ourselves in time by distinguishing past, present, and future. 7 But nothing in the world need correspond to these A-beliefs – the necessary facts are that the train leaves at 5 p.m., that I must leave my house by 4:15 p.m. to get there on time, and that by 4:58 p.m. I must be waiting on the platform. Seemingly, then, tensed beliefs can be perfectly true without implying that any fact corresponds to them. 8 Let us go back to action theory. As already mentioned, on the standard view rational action is caused, by way of an intention, by some combination of beliefs and desires. To have a reason for action thus involves having some sort of desire. This is contentious, though I think the objections are answerable. 9 In any case, we need not press this issue, since Mellor already accepts the causal theory of action. But if desires and intentions (partially) cause actions, what features must these desires and intentions have in order to be causal? From a third-person perspective, we might say that desires and intentions are mental states, perhaps standing in token-token relationships with neural states, that cause (or are dispositionally constituted to cause) bodily movements. But events in my brain or occurring mental states that are not desires or intentions, that I am not and cannot even become aware of, may also cause bodily movements. In that case, my bodily movement would not be an action or, at any rate, not a rational or voluntary one. Furthermore, if my bodily movement is to be an action, the desires must cause it in the right way; not every causal path from an occurrent desire to a bodily movement will yield an action. 10 What distinguishes desires or intentions, particularly those that cause actions in the right way, from other neural or Agency and the A-Series 157 mental states or from desires and intentions that cause behaviors in deviant ways? What, in other words, accounts for desires' and intentions' causal power as desires and intentions, and so their causing of actions and not just bodily movements? One feature that distinguishes desires and intentions from other states and, more importantly, that sets apart their unique causal mechanism, is that desires and intentions represent their object11 to an agent as future. 12 A tenseless account will not work here. Of course we can say that the action, or the state of affairs it brings about, occurs later than the desire that causes it. But this is a third-personal view; it allows us to place desires into the causal succession of events leading up to the production of an action, but it fails to account for the feature that makes the desire causally active in the first place: first-personally, for the agent who acts on this desire, it is directed toward something future. Of course we might wish for something that is not future – for example, I might wish that it were now yesterday so that I could avoid that stupid thing I did after dinner. But that sort of desire is in principle incapable of causing an action.13 Desires that can cause actions can only do so by virtue of being oriented toward the future. Intentions aim at a future performance; if they are intentions-inaction (Searle, 2001), then they aim at a present performance. And I think analogous arguments may be made with regard to other features of agency – responsibility, for example, refers to the past – so that the entire framework of agential and moral experience is inseparable from a human reliance on Aproperties. But we can leave these issues for a later time. The important point is this: while a desire or intention may occur earlier than the action it causes, and an intention-in-action may occur simultaneously with that action, desires and intentions cannot function as desires and intentions simply by representing something as later-than or simultaneous with the moment at which the agent experiences them. Though we can anticipate or hope for something that will occur later, and we might see something happen later than the moment at which another person decides to accomplish it, we cannot desire objects that are merely later occurrences for us. If the agent is not experiencing an object as future, then the state he is in is not a desire or intention. And if such a state causes a bodily movement, that movement will not be an action. IV. Intrinsic Temporal Vectors I think this account survives the standard objections. For one, it excludes the possibility of a C-series or a B-series being sufficient to explain reality. Or, at least, we would have to drop from reality something besides A-properties. Desires and intentions could not be desires or intentions without the future Roman Altshuler 158 reference. A B-series or C-series alone cannot include desires and intentions within its ontology; consequently, it cannot include actions or agents. It can, of course, include mechanisms moving in response to causal inputs, such that the movement occurs later than the input. But again, this will no longer be a recognizable picture of agency. The causal account of agency differs from other kinds of causal accounts precisely because the causal elements involved have their causality only by virtue of their first-personal nature. And if we leave out the first-personal aspect of these elements, we can no longer give a satisfactory account of what is involved in this kind of causation. 14 We should note that \"future,\" \"present,\" and \"past\" here do not refer to properties of relations to real objects, but only to properties of the relations themselves. It is certainly possible to desire something that never comes to be; it is even possible to have an intention-in-action while performing an action different from the one the agent takes herself to be performing. Nor do they refer to beliefs – I need not believe that the object of my desire is in the future in order to desire or intend it; I need only to have a representation of the object as future. 15 The B-theory works well enough when we assume that reality contains only third-personal entities and beliefs about those entities. As soon as we recognize that agency – or, more precisely, the kind of organized experience required for agency – is part of reality, however, we find reality thoroughly permeated by A-properties. It is neither surprising nor accidental that LePoidevin focuses on episodic memory, which he takes to be reducible to propositional claims, while Mellor discusses only the belief component of agency, as if agents were situated within a temporal order entirely by their clocks. But we cannot provide B-properties on which the A-properties central to agency might depend. Since desires and intentions are not beliefs, their occurrence does not depend on tenseless truth-makers. What makes it true that the object of my desire is future is not that my desire refers to an object that will occur at a time later than the occurrence of the desire (a fact completely irrelevant to the issue), but simply the fact that I have a desire. Unlike beliefs, which require only a particular direction of fit with regard to their objects, desires and intentions contain an intrinsic temporal vector. 16 This account allows A-properties to exist even in a C-series time capsule. Within a Now, my desire may not, in time, lead to my performing an action. But if there are actions, then there are desires, and if there are desires, then there are A-properties. Since the temporal vector (in the case of desires and intentions, \"future\" is the vector that relates the state to its object) is intrinsic to the mental state itself, it cannot be ontologically eliminated even by the elimination of time. If there are entities called agents, then they have mental Agency and the A-Series 159 states like desires and intentions. And these mental states cannot exist unless they refer to future objects. The A-properties I have described are rather different from those traditionally defended by A-theorists, because they do not involve either any flow of time or change. They merely indicate directions according to which experience must be organized so as to allow for agency. 17 It is possible that the A-properties by which all our activity in the world is organized provide the foundation for an experience of the flow of time without themselves giving us succession. And this is precisely why the debate between Atheorists and B-theorists is wrong to focus the question on which of these two series is the true one. What is rarely mentioned is that both may be true (Smith, 1985). Together with the B-series, by which the events we experience are ordered, the directional A-properties allow us to influence the events within this order. It follows that both series can be adopted without redundancy: the A-series does not give us anything that the B-series has. 18 The B-series provides a temporal world for us to experience. A-properties make it a world we can act in. Notes 1 Obviously, since such arguments assert the reality of the A-series, they are meant to challenge both B-theories and C-theories. 2 Craig (2001) has similarly argued that a perfectly rational wish – the wish that it were now some other time – could not be rational unless there really were tensed facts, particularly, the fact that now is now. 3 \"If, as I have suggested, all our conscious experiences have their origin in real structure within the Nows, we can do without the fiction of the moving present. The sense we have that time has advanced to the present Now is simply our awareness of being in that Now.\" (Barbour, 1999, p. 44) There are, of course, problems: if experience is entirely the causal product of the state of the world, it becomes unclear how any experience could tell us anything about the state of the world, and this opens a direct path to skepticism. 4 \"These, and all the other changes we are continually making in our A-series beliefs, are real changes, with real causes and real mental and physical effects. They are the changes that embody our experience of the flow of time. Even though time does not flow in reality, in our minds the time of our lives really does flow.\" (Mellor, 2001) This is somewhat mysterious, but the point is clear. It is also strange: changing beliefs can give rise to an experience of change in beliefs, but how can they give rise to an experience of time flowing? I can experience a bell tolling continuously for a full minute without, at any point, forming the belief \"the bell is striking now.\" See Smith (1988) for a related point. 5 This theory, of course, got its major contemporary start with Davidson (1963). 6 \"This is what makes all agents need true beliefs with B-truth-conditions that vary over time and space. Without them we could not time or place the myriad actions which, if they are to get us what we want, must be done at the right B-time and right B-place. True B-beliefs alone, precisely because they are true always and everywhere, cannot tell us when or where to act.\" (Mellor, 1998, p. 66) Roman Altshuler 160 7 There is some reason to be skeptical here: there are plenty of surviving species that, most likely, have no tensed beliefs whatsoever. This again suggests that the experience of time is not, at bottom, a matter of having beliefs. 8 Not everyone is convinced, of course. If tense involves a semantic contradiction in reality that leads us to reject the A-series, why don't similar contradictions apply to our tensed beliefs? That is, it seems impossible to preserve irreducible and true A-beliefs while sticking to a B-theory. (Ludlow, 1999) 9 See Williams (1979) for the classic statement that having reasons involves having desires. I think the claim becomes significantly more solid if we keep in mind two features: first, that \"desire\" is here a stand-in for a wide class of mental states (pro-attitudes, in Davidson's terminology, or members of an agent's motivational set, in Williams's). Second, that the claim need not be that the prior existence of desires is necessary for reasons to exist – instead, the reasons might give rise to desires. This suffices, I believe, to respond to such criticisms as those raised by Nagel (1970) or Korsgaard (1986). 10 This is the problem of deviant causal chains. 11 I use \"object\" here in a broad sense – the object of a desire is an intentional object, which need not be a particular thing, but can be a state of affairs or even just an action. 12 This is not, of course, meant to suggest that representing an action as future is all that is needed to explain how desires or intentions can cause an action. The point is only that unless they do so represent the object, they cannot cause an action in the way that desires or intentions do cause actions. 13 Or, rather, of causing an action directly and in the right way. It might cause some action in the wrong way – for example, the desire might make me so unhappy that I start crying. Or it might cause other actions indirectly – by solidifying my resolve never to do that stupid thing again. A related point is that I can desire something past – for example, that I were back in my last relationship. But if it is not a mere wish, this desire is a desire for something future – to restore the relationship. 14 It should be added that my argument is, obviously, not merely an appeal to the asymmetry between cause and effect; that would be must as likely to serve as an argument for B-theory as for A-theory. Rather, my claim is that in understanding agency, we have to recognize A-properties as built in to (at least) one of the causes. 15 This is not to say that no beliefs need be involved in our having causally effective desires. It is certainly impossible to desire – at least in a causally effective way – something that one has no knowledge of. I cannot, for example, desire a vacation in Paris if I have never heard of Paris. And knowledge of the object of desire may well include beliefs about that object. But these beliefs have no bearing on the temporal fact of the representation. 16 Of course one could argue that without B-properties, desires and intentions could never meet their conditions of satisfaction. But even if this were right, it would still leave their Aproperties untouched. 17 But it may well be, as Bachelard (1950) once suggested, that the flow of time is only a higher order experience, which we construct intellectually out of more basic particulars. 18 Though we can drop the C-series altogether, since the elements central to it are already included in the B-series. References Bachelard, Gaston. (1950/2000). The Dialectic of Duration. Mary McAllester Jones (trans.). Manchester: Clinamen. Barbour, Julian. (1999). The End of Time. New York: Oxford University Press. Agency and the A-Series 161 Craig, William Lane. (2001). Wishing it Were Now Some Other Time. Philosophy and Phenomenological Research 62: 159-166. Davidson, Donald. (1963/1980). Actions, Reasons, and Causes. In Essays on Actions and Events. Oxford: Clarendon. Korsgaard, Christine. (1986). Skepticism About Practical Reason. Journal of Philosophy 83: 5-25. LePoidevin, Robin. (2006). Memory and the A-Series. In Friedrich Stadler and Michael Stöltzner (eds.), Time and History (pp. 31-42). Frankfurt: Ontos Verlag. Ludlow, Peter. (1999). Semantics, Tense, and Time. Cambridge, MA: MIT Press. McTaggart, J.E. (1908). The Unreality of Time. Mind 18: 457-74. Mellor, D. H. (1998). Real Time II. London: Routledge. _____. (2001). The Time of Our Lives. In Anthony O'Hear (ed.), Philosophy at the New Millennium (pp. 45-60). Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. Nagel, Thomas. (1970). The Possibility of Altruism. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Prior, A. N. (1959). Thank Goodness That's Over. Philosophy 34: 12-17. Searle, John. (2001). Rationality in Action. Cambridge, MA: MIT Press. Smith, Quentin. (1985). The Mind-Independence of Temporal Becoming. Philosophical Studies 47: 109-119. Smith, Quentin. (1988). The Phenomenology of A-Time. Dialogos 23: 143-153. Williams, Bernard. (1979). Internal and External Reasons. In R. Harrison (ed.), Rational Action: Studies in Philosophy and Social Science. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press."}
{"meta": {"title": "Agency, Experience, and Future Bias", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Kauppinen, Antti", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "Most of us are hedonically future-biased: other things being equal, we\n          prefer pains to be in the past and pleasures to be in the future. Recently,\n          various authors have argued that future bias is irrational, and that we\n          should be temporally neutral instead. I argue that instead of temporal\n          neutrality, the putative counterexamples and the rationales offered for\n          them only motivate a more narrow principle I call Only Action Fixes Utility:\n          it is only when you act on the basis of assigning a utility to an outcome\n          that rationality requires you to give it the same value retrospectively and\n          prospectively, other things being equal. When hedonic experiences are\n          untethered from action, hedonic future bias is rationally permissible. I\n          support this principle by appeal to additional scenarios and more general\n          asymmetries between agential and experiential goods.", "date": "2018", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/KAUAEA", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2019-12-24T09:28:17Z"}, "text": "Agency, Experience, and Future Bias Antti Kauppinen University of Helsinki To appear in Thought In Reasons and Persons, Derek Parfit (1984) observed that most people are biased towards the future at least when it comes to pain and pleasure. That is, they regard a given amount of pain as less bad when it is in the past than when it is in the future, and a given amount of pleasure as less good. While Parfit (implicitly) held that this bias is rational, it has recently come under effective attack by temporal neutralists, who have offered cases that with plausible auxiliary assumptions appear to be counterexamples to the rationality claim. I'm going to argue that these cases and the rationale behind them only suffice to motivate a more limited rejection of future bias, and that constrained future bias is indeed rationally permissible. My argument turns on the distinct rational implications of action-guiding and pure temporal preferences. I'll argue that future bias is rational when it comes to the latter, even if not the former. As I'll say, Only Action Fixes Utility: it is only when you act on the basis of assigning a utility to an outcome that you rationally commit to giving it the same value when it is past as when it is in the future. 1. Future Bias Let's start with Parfit's most famous case. I will borrow Tom Dougherty's formulation of the setup: Parfit's Operations On Monday, you are admitted into a hospital. You are told you will have one of two operations, but you are not told which. If you have the early operation, then you will 2 have a painful, four-hour operation on Tuesday. If you have the late operation, then you will have a painful, two-hour operation on Thursday. After either operation, you will have amnesia for several days, and so you will not be able to remember if you have just had the operation. There is a calendar next to your bed, and so you always know what day it is. (Dougherty 2011, 522; cf. Parfit 1984, 165) Now, suppose you wake up in a fog, and see that it is Wednesday. You don't know whether you've had the operation or not. How would you feel if a nurse came by and told you that you had the more painful operation on Tuesday? Most people, Parfit's critics included, admit they would be relieved. But if so, they prefer a greater pain in the past to a smaller pain in the future. This means, on standard decision-theoretical assumptions, that they assign a lower disutility to the same amount of pain in the past than in the future. They are future-biased. Notice that future bias entails preference reversals as one moves forward in time. On Monday, when both operations are in the future, you'd prefer to have the operation on Thursday rather than Tuesday, while on Wednesday, you have the opposite preference. (However, and this will be crucial to my argument, in Parfit's original case you don't get to choose.) While most people are future biased, the question is whether such bias is rational. Recently, this assumption has been challenged by several critics who hold that other things being equal, we should be neutral between the past and the present, just as we should be neutral between near future and far future. 2. Against Future Bias 3 I'm going to start presenting the case against the rationality of future bias by introducing a few counterexamples from the literature. Some objections draw on the notion of regret, understood thinly as preference that one would have chosen differently. As Preston Greene and Meghan Sullivan emphasize, anticipating regret can influence rational choice. According to a plausible principle they call Weak No Regrets, it is rationally permissible for agents to avoid options they know they will regret, if they have full and accurate information about their options (Greene and Sullivan 2015, 958). This creates a problem for a future-biased agent in a case like the following: Fine Dining Jack wins a free meal at a fancy French restaurant on Monday morning, and he must schedule the meal for a night sometime in the next week. Given his flexible schedule, every night is equally convenient for him, and there are no other considerations that would make the meal more enjoyable or more likely to occur on one night rather than another. Therefore, Jack schedules the meal for Monday night. As expected, it is an incredibly delicious meal. On Tuesday morning, Jack strongly prefers that his restaurant experience were in the future, rather than the past. And so he regrets scheduling the meal for the previous night. (Greene and Sullivan 2015, 959) Insofar as Jack is future-biased, he knows he will regret choosing the meal for any but the last night, so in accordance with Weak No Regrets, it's rational for him to postpone it as far as he can. If there is no fixed endpoint (if he can have the fancy meal any day he wants), it is rational for him to just keep waiting. But this is a terrible idea; as Greene and Sullivan put it, \"future-biased agents who avoid regret will postpone positive experiences for no good reason\" (2015, 959–960). So to be rational, Jack needs to give up his future bias. 4 Future bias will also lead to irrational-seeming regret when agents make trade-offs between goods that depreciate with the passage of time and goods that don't, which results in a diachronically inconsistent exchange rate. To quickly sum up a case from Dougherty (2015), suppose Victoria thinks on Saturday morning that the value of having a mown lawn is 5 utils and the value of a pleasant afternoon spent sunbathing with no garden work is 6 utils. However, if future-biased, she will in the evening regard her past pleasure as being worth less, say 4 utils, and consequently regret she didn't mow the lawn. Victoria's regret seems irrational. After all, she always knew how much she values an orderly lawn, but still chose the sunbathing, which was just as nice as expected. As Dougherty puts it, \"If the pleasure of sunbathing is insufficient to justify foregoing gardening, then she should not choose sunbathing in the first place.\" (2015, 8) As Dougherty observes, sometimes our choice of what to do depends more directly on how we evaluate what has happened. Here is one case based on his 2015 paper: Volunteer Tom Tom thinks we should spend some time doing unpleasant things that help others. This week, he figures he'll have done his bit if he gives up five utils for others. Looking ahead, he thinks each hour spent volunteering at the soup kitchen costs him one util, so he decides to spend five hours there on Saturday. It's just as unpleasant as he thinks. But Tom is future-biased, and regards five hours of past pain as having the same disutility as one hour of future pain. Consequently, when he's about to finish his shift, he realizes that he's after all only suffered one util for others, so his duty calls him to stay another four hours. The next four hours are as unpleasant as he thought, but once they're in the past, he finds that his additional sacrifice amounts to only 4/5 utils, so he'll have to stay yet longer... This sad story keeps repeating itself. 5 Here Tom's future bias catches him in a Zeno-like situation. Prospectively, he takes the disvalue of five unpleasant hours of volunteering to equal the sacrifice he should make, but retrospectively it will not suffice, so he ends up doing more and more. This pattern seems irrational. What, then, is the alternative to future bias that avoids the counterintuitive consequences? The critics hold that it is the following: Temporal Neutrality The location of goods and harms within a life has no rational significance except insofar as it contributes to the value of that life. (Cf. Brink 2011) In particular, rationality requires you to regard the same amount of pain as just as bad for you whether it occurs in the past, present, or future, and pleasure equally good. An agent who has the pattern of valuing required by Temporal Neutrality will not discount past pains or pleasures, so they won't regret their choices in scenarios like the above or end up like Tom. Temporal Neutralists offer various general rationales for their view. The core idea is that we're temporally extended agents, and must rationally value what happens to us at different times in a consistent way (Brink 2011). Otherwise we will forego pleasure or suffer pain without being in any way compensated for it, in spite of full information and rationality, and may even be brought to make tradeoffs that make us worse off without benefiting us in any way (Dougherty 2011). To avoid such an undesirable situation, we need an overall lifeplan that we can endorse at all times (Dougherty 2015). Finally, Temporal Neutralists offer debunking explanations of why we're futurebiased. Greene and Sullivan, in particular, argue that future bias is an evolved heuristic: \"future-biased emotions and preferences evolved to track asymmetries in control\" (2015, 6 968). The idea is simple: we care more about future pleasures and pains, because we can often do something about them, while we can't do anything about past pleasures and pains. It is clearly advantageous to focus on what we can control. Nevertheless, according to critics, this bias can systematically lead us astray in circumstances in which our attitudes or actions hang on our evaluations of what has already happened. 3. Only Action Fixes Utility I'm fairly convinced by the counterexamples that the critics present (though as Dorsey 2017 shows, the intuitions are less firm than they may seem). I'll grant that unrestricted future bias isn't rational. Nevertheless, I'm not convinced by Temporal Neutralism. In the rest of this paper, I'm going to argue that the cases only motivate a more narrow rejection of future bias. In particular, I'm going to defend the following principle of diachronic rationality: Only Action Fixes Utility If you act on the basis of assigning utility u to state of affairs S, rationality requires you to assign u to S whenever it is relevant to action or attitude, unless you gain new information about S.1 However, if you do not act on the basis of assigning u to S (nor have acted or ever will), it is rationally permissible to assign a different utility u' to S at different times without gaining new information about S, at least when the underlying preferences are hedonic. As I'm using the terms, the utility of a state for an agent is a value that is derived from the agent's preferences between possibilities, provided that they meet constraints like completeness and transitivity. I'll say an agent assigns a utility to S when she has preferences with the right structure between possibilities that include S. A change in S-regarding 1 We might also add the condition that one doesn't discover that one's earlier preferences were mistaken or corrupted. I'll ignore this complication in what follows. 7 preferences thus entails a change in the utility assigned to S. An agent acts on the basis of assigning a certain utility to S if and only if her S-regarding preferences explain, at least in part, her choice between acts whose outcomes include S.2 Finally, by preference I mean an attitude of favouring one state over another that may be manifest both in dispositions to choose and in emotions and attitudes like regretting, hoping, and wishing.3 It follows from the principle that if at t1 you prefer A to B at t, and act on that basis, then at any later t2, you rationally must still prefer A to B at t in the context of action, unless you've learned something new about A or B at t. However, if you don't act on a preference, you're rationally permitted to change it as time goes by. I'll call the latter kind of bias pure future bias. Only Action Fixes Utility has the right implications for the above scenarios. Greene and Sullivan's Jack's problem is that he'll regret eating the fancy meal on any night other than the last possible night, since while a meal on any night is prospectively equal, a meal on any but the last is retrospectively downgraded. But if Only Action Fixes Utility is true and Jack chooses to dine on Monday on the basis of assigning 10u to the pleasure of doing so, he's rationally committed to assigning the same value to it subsequently. Insofar as he does so, he won't regret it, since on Tuesday he remains indifferent between having had the meal and having it that night or later. And this means that even if Weak No Regrets is true, it is not rational for Jack to postpone positive experiences just because of temporal location. Similarly, 2 A radical holist might challenge the present view by claiming that we always act on the basis of all of our preferences, so that it is not possible to isolate non-action-guiding utilityassignments. But as a very helpful reviewer for this journal pointed out, focusing on preferences that explain a choice offers a response to this challenge: not even the radical holist can credibly claim that all preferences play an explanatory role of this sort in each choice. 3 As a reviewer for this journal observed, some might want to distinguish between practical and emotional preferences, where the latter do not involve a disposition to act. These different kinds of preferences might then be subject to different rational requirements. I believe that my thesis and arguments could be formulated in these terms as well, but given that the critics of future bias treat preferences as forming a unified kind (e.g. Dougherty 2015, 2fn1), I will continue to do so myself. 8 Dougherty's Victoria, having chosen to sunbathe on the basis of assigning it a higher utility than lawn-mowing, will never come to regret her choice, since she won't vary the exchange rate. Finally, Tom, too, decides to do five hours of volunteering on the basis of prospectively considering it to be the right amount of sacrifice. His problem is that while it is just as hard as he expected, he retrospectively revises down its disvalue, which sets him on an Eleatic path. But again, if Only Action Fixes Utility and Tom is rational, he will continue to regard five hours of volunteering as having a sufficient amount of disutility, when it turns out as anticipated, and he'll be satisfied that he's fulfilled his duty after a good afternoon's work. Unsurprisingly, Only Action Fixes Utility yields the same verdict regarding the above cases as Temporal Neutrality. Unlike Temporal Neutrality, however, Only Action Fixes Utility is compatible with pure future bias. In particular, it permits preference change in Parfit's Operations, because in it, the subject doesn't have a choice, and thus isn't rationally compelled to assign the same utility to past and future pain. So even if on Monday you prefer the Thursday operation, it's rationally okay to prefer the more painful Tuesday one, come Wednesday, and thus be relieved if you discover the doctors did indeed perform the operation on Tuesday. The significance of Only Action Fixes Utility comes out clearly if we consider a variant of Parfit's original case in which the subject does get to choose which operation to have: Chosen Operations On Monday, you are admitted into a hospital. You are told you will have one of two operations, and you get to choose which one. If you have the early operation, then you will have a painful, four-hour operation on Tuesday. If you have the late operation, then you will have a painful, two-hour operation on Thursday. After either operation, you will have amnesia for several days, and so you will not be able to 9 remember if you have just had the operation. There is a calendar next to your bed, and so you always know what day it is. If you're rational, you'll choose the Thursday operation on Monday. Now suppose you again wake up in a fog in a hospital bed, not knowing what has happened, and notice that it is Wednesday. First question: do you regret having chosen the operation on Thursday rather than Tuesday? Second question: should you? Speaking for myself, I think I might feel a twinge of disappointment, and wish it was Friday already. But on the whole, I think I'd be fine with my choice, and certainly wouldn't reproach my past self for having made it. I would not wish I had chosen otherwise, and thus wouldn't regret my choice in the technical sense used in this debate. I'd say to myself \"Well, it's too bad it's not over and done with, but there's just one more day to the less painful option I chose.\" If that's how I think, I own my choice, as we might say. And I think that's the rational attitude to take here. To further confirm the principle's fit with considered judgments about cases, imagine the following scenario: Mistaken Operations Your situation is the same as in Chosen Operations, and you choose the Thursday operation. As you wake up in a fog, you see that it is Wednesday. A nurse brings you a tub of ice cream, asking you if you feel okay. Baffled, you learn that due to a clerical error, the operation has already been performed after all. In Mistaken Operations, you made a choice, but it turned out to be irrelevant to what actually happened – you might as well have not made a choice. If the outcome is out of your hands, I think it is both predictable and rationally permissible for you to feel relieved, though you might insist on a double-check the next time. Since switching from passive experience to 10 active agency (and back) switches intuitions, there's good prima facie reason to think it is agency that plays an explanatory role when it comes to the impermissibility of future bias. 4. Defending Pure Future Bias The obvious criticism of Only Action Fixes Utility is that it is ad hoc. Indeed, as long as there are diachronic norms of rationality, it is hard to see any other possible fault in it, since it captures both Parfit's original intuition (which even his critics nearly always acknowledge to be strong) and the intuitions of his critics, and is in this respect clearly superior to Temporal Neutrality.4 For it not to be ad hoc, we need some further justification for it. Fortunately, there are several rationales available. First, let me emphasize again that the general rejection of future bias is not motivated by the counterexamples the critics have presented. They motivate precisely Only Action Fixes Utility, and no more. It is perhaps less obvious that the same is true of the rationales the critics give for temporal neutrality. But that turns out to be the case. Consider, first, the general claim made by Dougherty in his earlier paper: \"The reason why an inconsistency in preferences is a rational defect is that this inconsistency will lead to problems when acting\" (2011). If the preferences aren't or can't be acted upon, temporal inconsistency isn't a problem on these grounds. In later work, too, Dougherty emphasizes temporally extended agency. The idea is that since our future selves are as much us as our present ones, we're under rational pressure to make experience-affecting choices from a viewpoint that is equally satisfactory for our past, present, and future selves (Dougherty 2015, 7–8). And the only assignment of utility that is equally satisfactory from different temporal perspectives is one that is based only on intrinsic features, not relative temporal location. So Dougherty holds that 4 There are those who deny the existence of diachronic norms of rationality, to be sure (see Hedden 2015). I'm skeptical of time-slice rationality for independent reasons, but cannot discuss the issue here. 11 \"By conceiving of ourselves as temporally extended agents, we form temporally neutral preferences for goods that are based on how these goods contribute to how well our temporally extended lives go.\" (2015, 14) While there is much that I agree with in this, the last formulation is revealing in that it involves a subtle but illegitimate generalization from the need for diachronic coordination and endorsement of actions to temporally neutral preferences for any kind of goods, not just those that our choices and actions affect. Here is a better motivated variant: by conceiving of ourselves as temporally extended agents, we form temporally neutral preferences for goods that are at stake in our actions that are based on how these goods contribute to how well our temporally extended lives go. And this is a rationale for Only Action Fixes Utility, not for Temporal Neutrality across the board. So as far as I can see, there is a good rationale or two for Only Action Fixes Utility that is independent of the intuitions about cases, and it is given by Temporal Neutralists themselves. But that's not all. There is good reason to think that there is something special about how agency contributes to the value of our lives. Consider here again the fact that most people's intuition with respect to shameful actions is temporally neutral, as Parfit already observed. You probably won't prefer a world in which you did something shameful yesterday to one in which you'll do something less shameful tomorrow, other things being equal. The same goes for actions that merit pride. I'm just as happy to think I have done something worthy of pride as to think I will do something worthy of pride, other things being equal. So it is not only the case that our intuitions are temporally neutral when it comes to active choices regarding pleasure and pain, but also when it comes to non-experiential goods or bads that result from exercising agency and can serve as grounds for choice. This again points to the importance of agency to temporal neutrality – which is captured in Only Action Fixes Utility. 12 The emphasis on agency also has the more controversial (and non-Parfitian) implication that it matters whose choices brought about an outcome. Someone objected to my view by pointing out that if I wake up on Wednesday and I'm told that my mother chose on my behalf to have the operation on Thursday, I can rationally wish she had chosen the Tuesday slot. But if it is then revealed that it was in fact myself who chose the Thursday operation, I can no longer rationally wish I'd already had the operation. The objection is that this is an odd pattern of emotional reaction. But I don't think it is. It already makes a great deal of difference to us whether, say, we earn some money through our own work, or get the same amount from our mother. It's not odd at all for us to own up to our choices – after all, if someone signs up for the army, fully knowing what to expect, a sergeant can rightly and effectively respond to complaints by saying \"You didn't have to sign up if you didn't want to haul these missiles around\". If anything is odd about the case where my mother chooses the Thursday operation, it's my wish that she had chosen otherwise. It is, of course, permissible according to Only Action Fixes Utility, but it's not required. And when I recognize that someone made, on my behalf and in my best interests, the same choice I would myself have made, had I had the chance, it's natural for me to retrospectively endorse it – to treat it as if it was my own choice. So it would be less surprising if I said to myself \"It's too bad it's still ahead of me, but mama knows best, and I'm glad she chose the less painful operation for me\". Finally, I have argued elsewhere (Kauppinen 2015) that it is of fundamental significance to prudence that we have a dual nature as both temporally extended agents and as subjects of experience. While these two dimensions of prudential value can interact, as when we choose to act to gain or avoid an experience, they remain distinct. In particular, experience as such has an element of passivity: fundamentally, pleasures and pains happen to us. They are not under our voluntary control, as our actions may be. That is why our preferences regarding them are not subject to the same intertemporal consistency requirements, insofar as 13 they are untethered from actions. In such cases, nothing forces us to prefer a particular pattern of hedonic states. For example, rationality permits preferring a larger pleasure in the past to a smaller pleasure in the future. But most of us don't have this preference, perhaps for the kind of evolutionary reasons that Greene and Sullivan point to. If I were to hazard a little psychological speculation, I'd say that perhaps anticipated future pains, say, de facto impact on our present preferences more than past ones, because our attention is ordinarily directed more towards the future rather than the past, and in some measure makes anticipated pains present right now, while past pains quickly vanish from the arena of presence. But isn't preferring pain to be in the past still arbitrary, and therefore irrational? I see no reason to think so. It is rationally permissible to prefer chocolate ice cream to peppermint ice cream (or vice versa) because one simply happens to please you more. In such cases, there is no more fundamental reason for the preference, so it is in a sense 'arbitrary', but that doesn't make it irrational. Pure future bias, or its absence, may be similar. You just happen to be pleased that a pleasure is to come or a pain is no longer. Since in the case of pure future bias there is no reason not to have such preference and no rationale for a rational prohibition, it is rationally permissible without further grounds. 5. Conclusion Critics of future bias make a convincing case that if my preferences regarding pleasure and pain change with the mere passage of time, making choices on their basis can make me predictably worse off. As temporally extended agents, we should own up to our choices, and hold fixed our preferences between hedonic outcomes once we've acted on them. But not everything that happens to us is due to our own choice. That's why there's nothing wrong from the perspective of rationality if I'm relieved to discover that an unpleasant experience beyond my control is already in the past, even if I would have earlier preferred a less 14 unpleasant one in the future, or if my non-action-guiding wishes manifest a preference for a lesser pleasure in the future over a greater pleasure in the past. Given that Only Action Fixes Utility, pure future bias remains rationally permissible.5 References Brink, David 2011. Prospects for Temporal Neutrality. In C. Callender (ed.), The Oxford Handbook of Philosophy of Time. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 353–381. Dorsey, Dale 2017. Future Bias: A Qualified Defense. Pacific Philosophical Quarterly 98 (1), 351–373. Dougherty, Tom 2011. On Whether to Prefer Pain to Pass. Ethics 121 (3): 521–537. Dougherty, Tom 2015. Future-Bias and Practical Reason. Philosophers' Imprint 15 (30): 1– 16. Greene, Preston and Sullivan, Meghan 2015. Against Time Bias. Ethics 125 (4): 947–970. Hedden, Brian 2015. Time-Slice Rationality. Mind 124 (494): 449–491. Kauppinen, Antti 2015. The Narrative Calculus. Oxford Studies in Normative Ethics 5: 196– 220. Parfit, Derek 1984. Reasons and Persons. Oxford: Oxford University Press. 5 I'd like to thank Anh-Quan Nguyen for helpful discussion on the topic, as well as three anonymous reviewers for this journal."}
{"meta": {"title": "Aging: The Indian Context", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Narasimhananda, Swami", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "Old age in the Indian context and facing it through Ayurveda.", "date": "2009", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/NARATI", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2019-08-14T09:45:03Z"}, "text": "PB April 2009 Aging: The Indian Context Swami Narasimhananda hy do you want a housing loan at this age? What happened to your present house?' The volley of questions from the chief personnel officer of the hospital where Shila worked fell on her stoic face. 'I cannot help you if you do not give me the details,' said the chief sternly, much to the embarrassment of Shila, whose colleagues were standing nearby. Shila could not contain herself any longer and started sobbing, 'Sir, yesterday night my two sons drove me and my husband out of the house we had built out of our hard-earned savings. We have a small plot of land nearby. We spent the night there in a shed. Our sons now want us to build another house and be away from their lives. This is why I need the loan badly. What is my fault? I brought up my two sons and daughter as best I could. Neither I nor my husband have had any formal education. Both of us worked hard day and night, got our daughter married, and procured decent employments for both our sons, paying heavy bribes. We were happy thinking we could enjoy our retirement. But today we are deserted. Looking after one's parents has been the family tradition for generations. What happened to my children? Or was anything wrong with our parenting? Is this the result of our bad karma? What does the Lord want from us?' The chief had no answers to these questions, but he hastened to process Shila's loan application.1 Aging in Early Vedic Times The questions posed by Shila compel us to review the status of the aged in Indian society across the centuries. Were the old in India always in such predicament, or are we witnessing a shift in priorities in Indian society? To understand the evolution of traditions associated with old age we need to overview Indian society from Vedic times. A survey of Vedic literature shows us that old age was welcomed by contemporary society.2 With the threat of natural calamities and diseases always lurking around, humans of the Vedic period often had their lives cut short well before the cherished hundred years. Given the limitations of the social structure, civic amenities, and knowledge resources then available, illnesses and injuries-from wars, accidents, or animals and insects-took a heavy toll on human lives. Everyone prayed that they might live longer, get to see their grandchildren, and encounter death only late in life. Their desire was to live life to its fullness, enjoy the company of successive generations of offspring, and die only after attaining old age. Old age was glorified and the sick were blessed that they could recover and die natural deaths. A prayer on behalf of a sick person in the Atharva Veda says, 'Unto old age do I commit you [the sick]; unto old age do I instigate you; may old age, excellent, conduct you; let the other deaths go away, which they call the remaining hundred.' 3 Thus old age was something to be happy about and not a cause of fear, since to live longer was considered a sign of vitality and good luck rather than a struggle with the failing body and its associated ailments. We find various poetic descriptions of aging and subsequent death in the Vedas. The Shatapatha Brahmana portrays old age as a boatman carrying individual souls to the other shore, death.4 A hymn from the Atharva Veda presents death as something that permeates every moment of human life. This hymn seeks blessings for the journey from birth to old age and death.5 People in the early Vedic era spent their relatively short lives in education and subsequent management of their households. Retirement was 'W PB April 2009274 Prabuddha Bharata26 not contemplated, and it was considered a great blessing if one could continue living well after one's children were married. The system of four ashramas- including retirement into contemplative life in the forest, Vanaprastha, and Sannyasa-seems to have become regularized only in Upanishadic times and may have signified a longer and more stable life. From Yearning to Fear With advances in general social life and medical knowledge, the late Vedic era probably witnessed an increase in the average lifespan, which is reflected in the development of the system of four ashramas. The average human life was now divided into the phases of education, Brahmacharya, household life, Grihastha, retirement to forest for contemplation, Vanaprastha, and renunciation or mendicancy, Sannyasa. Ethical manuals called Dharmashastras laid down the general rules for each phase of life. Old age, which in early Vedic times was a period to be cherished, became an object of fear-a reminder of the impermanence of life and the ensuing death. It was the time for renouncing worldly life and preparing for death. Ways to eliminate or transcend the suffering caused by old age were actively sought. Meditation and contemplation on the ephemeral nature of the world were prescribed, even as endeavours to overcome aging and death were undertaken. The people of the post-Vedic era were advised to spend the latter part of their lives in retirement, contemplating the perishable nature of the human body, and pursuing the higher realities of life. At this stage a person was expected to renounce enjoyments of the senses. The materialists were of course of the view that one should enjoy sense pleasures till one is exhausted. However, the famous anecdote of King Yayati occurring in the Bhagavata emphasizes the futility of this approach and asserts that the best way to transcend the snares of the senses is to give up sense enjoyment.6 According to Vedic tradition the body is an instrument that the soul uses to exhaust its karma, the accumulated effects of past actions. Birth and death are but phases in the perpetual transmigratory cycle of existence. This cycle of birth and death goes on till all the effects of an individual soul's actions are exhausted or neutralized. This is liberation, moksha. The Shvetashvatara Upanishad says, 'The individual soul, considering itself and the Controller as different, revolves in this great Wheel of Brahman that is the sustenance of all and the place of dissolution of all. When (one's Self ) is adored as (identified with) It (the Supreme), one attains immortality.'7 The realization of one's identity with the Power driving this cycle is the way to come out of it. Hence, according to the Vedas, aging and death do not mean the decay or destruction of the embodied entity. In the natural process of evolution of thought, post-Vedic society gave a pronounced metaphysical dimension to aging. In a sense, the average human being started fearing the arrival of old age, in contrast to the yearning for it seen in the early Vedic era. Early Geriatric Medicine in India Aging has several aspects to it. It is most manifest in the physical body. Ayurveda is a traditional system of medicine which deals with the general principles of human health from a typically Indian viewpoint. Therefore, to get an idea of the ancient Indian understanding of aging we need to go through the principal Ayurvedic texts: Charaka Samhita and Sushruta Samhita. It is interesting to note that, several centuries prior to the development of modern medicine, these texts contained highly developed concepts of geriatrics harmoniously interwoven with Vedic metaphysical ideas. For instance, the idea that a soul gets embodied to exhaust the actions of past births is also found in Ayurvedic texts, which state that 'life is a productive and dynamic aggregate of sense organs, mind, body, and self, held together and maintained over a definite period of time by the power of karma performed in previous lives'.8 According to Ayurveda, the human body is supported and sustained by three humours which are derived from three basic elements: kapha, from 275PB April 2009 Aging: Th e Indian Context water; pitta, from fi re; and vata, from wind. Th ese humours originate from the food eaten, digested, and assimilated by us. Th e humours of the body have a macrocosmic dimension also, as detailed by Sushruta: 'Just as the moon, sun, and wind uphold the world by their action of release, absorption, and dissemination respectively, even so do kapha, pitta, and vata act with regard to the body.' 9 Th e balance or imbalance of these humours cause good or ill health respectively. Th ese humours are always changing, depending upon the person's activity and the environment lived in. Human beings are sustained by the nutrient fl uid produced by the action of the three humours, and this fl uid needs to be preserved with great care. Th e humours are responsible for both the physical and psychic health of an individual. Maintaining proper balance of these three humours was the major concern of health care in ancient times. However, aging was inevitable even then. Aging begins just aft er birth. Th e initial years of growth and development of the body camoufl age this aging process, which becomes manifest only when one starts to weaken physically. According to Charaka, aging is a gradual process and brings with it certain geriatric ailments which have no remedy. Th ese are to be taken as signs of impending death. Th e process of aging has been vividly described in Ayurvedic texts. According to Sushruta, 'aft er the age of seventy, with each passing day, the seven bodily elements, sense organs, energy, vitality, and enthusiasm undergo a signifi cant decline giving rise to wrinkled skin, grey hair, baldness, chronic cough, and shortness of breath. Th e aging individual's capacity to perform all kinds of functions gets progressively reduced. Eventually, the person goes under, like an old home giving in aft er a heavy downpour.'10 Th e psychological symptoms of aging have also been detailed by the medical practitioners of ancient India. Human beings have always wanted to overcome aging and to live as long as possible. But eternal life in the human body has eluded them. Ancient systems of medicine are believed to have contained keys to delay greying. Today we know that Ayurveda prescribes methods to delay the aging process. Longevity has also been explored in Ayurvedic texts. Ayurvedic practitioners would examine the newborn for signs of longevity. To delay the process of aging and overcome ailments born of old age, they prescribed rejuvenation therapy or rasayana and revitalization or vajikarana. Th ey are the ancient Indian equivalents of modern preventive geriatrics. Th e main principle behind these therapies is that a systematic synthesis of appropriate food, ahara, and balanced lifestyle, vihara, will lead to the rejuvenation of vigour, vaja or ojas, of the body. Certain natural substances were identifi ed as potential aids in rejuvenation which could considerably compensate for the wasting the body suff ers due to old age. In keeping with traditional Indian philosophy, Charaka says that moderation is the key to longevity. Th e body is compared to a vehicle: just as a ve hicle properly used wears out gradually but may break its axle if driven carelessly, similarly the body will last longer if used judiciously but will perish early if misused. Frittering away one's vital energies leads to physical decline, speeding up the aging process. A disciplined life with adherence to personal hygiene Ayurvedic physician, vaidya, examining a patient's pulse -No bleed here- PB April 2009276 was therefore considered important. Charaka defi nes old age as the period between sixty and one hundred years. It is interesting that the time of onset of old age as specifi ed by this ancient phys ician coincides with the age for retirement prescribed by the government of almost all countries. Rejuvenation therapy may produce remarkable results in recovering the vitality of an aging body and mind. It removes fatigue, mitigates weakness, improves digestion, enhances vigour, and improves skin lustre. Th e body is purifi ed by cleansing the intestines thoroughly and removing impurities from the circulation. In addition to physical purifi cation, these therapies also include chanting of Vedic hymns and the practice of silence, meditation, and contemplation. Th us, the process of rejuvenation is holistic, revitalizing both body and mind. Application of special medicinal oils and dietary hygiene are part of rejuvenation therapy. Even today this form of Ayurvedic therapy is very popular and attracts people from all over the globe to India. Present-day Health Care for the Aged Indian Shila's plight is a refl ection of the many problems faced by aged women in contemporary India, where specialized geriatric medical care remains a rarity. Even in hospitals with independent departments for care of the elderly, only the economically privileged few are able to aff ord these facilities. Traditional systems of medicine like Ayurveda are also very expensive, and the providers of these facilities are more interested in serving 'medical tourists' coming from abroad than catering to the needs of their fellow countrymen. In rural India the old are still taken care of within the family, but urban India is witnessing a displacement of older members to diff erent institutions, old-age homes in particular. Th e Indian medical system is yet to come to terms with the large number of households in the country which are not equipped to provide adequate nursing care for their elder members, with some of those families even unwilling to undertake such care. Government hospitals attend to the aged only if they are ill. Th ough Ayurveda considers old age itself a disease and though the physiological complexities of old age call for special medical care, an average senior citizen in India gets nothing but salutatory respect from Indian medical institutions. Even with a growing number of ngos coming forward to support the cause of the aged, it still remains to be seen whether society will respond to this problem by providing proper care to the elderly within the family set-up, or whether government and private enterprises will intervene and provide better institutional health care facilities for the elderly. Th e likes of Shila need to wait till then. The Social Dimension With a shift in traditional familial roles, the aged fi nd their activities curtailed, which in turn leads to a feeling of not being wanted by family and society. In the past joint family structures in India allowed the aged to remain an integral part of the family and act as guides to successive generations as well, handing over valuable family knowledge and social traditions. Th is gave them a useful engagement, and the parenting duties of their immediate off Medieval Ayurvedic physician at work -No bleed here- 277PB April 2009 Aging: The Indian Context 29 spring were also shared. In the process, childhood and old age-both phases of life requiring abundant personal attention-came in close contact. Even a few decades ago Indian society did not consider the aged a burden, but treated them as valued keepers of tradition deserving respect and care. The increase in nuclear families, a consequence of the rapidly changing cosmopolitan nature of jobs, moved the elderly from an adored position to one of a fringe group that had to be somehow tolerated. This paved the way for old-age homes. Children too are now kept very busy by the demands of curricular and non-curricular education imposed on them by a highly demanding society; they have no time to sit and learn from the generation that brought up their parents. With the 'de-traditionalization' of society old age is no more a hallowed institution. The culture of old-age homes is not prevalent in rural areas, but urban India is rapidly opting for the convenience of dumping its senior citizens in institutional care facilities. Though not considered proper in the Indian tradition, separation of ailing elders from one's home is today seen as an action, both pragmatic and essential, for coping with escalating social demands. Tumultuous changes in urban Indian lifestyle have only accentuated such perceptions. For instance, the daily routine, or the lack of it, of the average youth can only shock their grandparents. Instead of rethinking the nature of this cultural shift, society prefers to take the path of least resistance: avoiding or neglecting the previous generation. Overall health care in India has improved over the years and consequently the population of the aged is steadily increasing. But the country is illprepared to provide for the elderly segment of its population. There is no systematic welfare programme for the aged and they are largely left to themselves. The old are expected to only lead a religious life without much participation in social activities. Notwithstanding that this trend is due to the cultural inheritance from Vedic times, such an attitude does not always allow the aged to cultivate diverse interests to quell their boredom. Moreover, even when elderly people go on pilgrimage they find it difficult to access the amenities needed for alleviating their physical strain. The provisions made for taking care of the special facilities the aged require during travel are still rather rudimentary. In India aging and the elderly have generally been looked at from the male perspective. The problems specific to women-aggravated by the fact that they usually outlive their husbands, who are their principal financial support-have never been properly addressed from a feminine perspective. Old age for a typical Indian woman turns out to be a mere extension of her subordination to a patriarchal society. With bodies failing and household activities nearly absent, elderly couples feel the need for close emotional understanding extending beyond the physical plane. In a largely orthodox patriarchal set-up this often becomes difficult. Problems brought about by the dynamically evolving cultural ethos of Indian society are being addressed by specialized research institutes. Many universities have started courses focusing on the problems of aging and the aged with specific reference to the Indian situation. While it may take several years for these studies to find practical application, society as a whole needs to take steps to make sure that this issue does not get out of control, as it has occurred in countries like China where caring for the aged population has turned into a major crisis. Retirement plans for the old should not only be economically oriented but ought also to address the inevitable lifestyle changes required of the elderly. Though in the government of India there are separate departments for women and children, there is no specialized department for senior citizens; their needs are presently addressed by the department of social justice and empowerment. In 1999 the government formulated a 'National Policy for Older Persons'. Various schemes were undertaken in pursuance of this policy. These include: Strengthening of primary health care system to enable it to meet the health care needs of older -No bleed here- PB April 2009278 Prabuddha Bharata30 persons; training and orientation to medical and paramedical personnel in health care of the elderly; promotion of the concept of healthy aging; assistance to societies for production and distribution of material on geriatric care; provision of separate queues and reservation of beds for elderly patients in hospitals; extended coverage under the Antyodaya Scheme with emphasis on provision of food at subsidized rates for the benefit of older persons, especially the destitute and marginalized sections.11 Nevertheless, the concerned executive agencies need to ensure greater penetration of these policies at grass-roots level to be of real use to society. Financial Security The question of financial security in old age bothers everyone, even the youth. People save large sums of money, purchase real estate and gold, and invest in stocks and shares to ensure that they need not depend on others for their daily needs when old. In spite of all these precautions, it is seen that a minor fluctuation in their cash reserves entails lots of problems for the aged. The elderly often get adequate care and respect only if they have money to spend. Table I below gives an idea of the economic independence of the aged in India as reported by the 'nss Fifty-second Round: July 1995–June 1996', published by the National Sample Survey Organization, Department of Statistics, Ministry of Planning and Programme Implementation, Government of India, Calcutta, in 1998. This table brings out the striking disparity in the economic freedom enjoyed by the elderly male and female populace of India. About half of the aged male population seems to be financially independent, as against a meagre 11–12 per cent of females. The government of India offers many financial benefits to the aged, including income-tax rebates, old-age pension, additional bank interest, and railway and air fare concessions.12 Still the majority of the elderly do not see themselves as financially independent. Wealth can bring additional problems for the aged, rendering them more vulnerable to burglar attacks, constant demands from relatives, and litigation. The Indian government needs to develop Table I: State of Economic Independence of the Elderly in India (per cent of people aged above sixty)13 State of Economic Independence Male Female Rural Urban Rural Urban Not dependent on others 48.5 51.5 12.1 11.5 Partially dependent on others 18.0 16.9 14.6 11.0 Fully dependent on others 31.3 29.7 70.6 75.7 Not recorded 2.2 1.9 2.6 1.8 special mechanisms for handling litigations involving the aged. The recent killings of retired people for money in posh residential localities of the national and state capitals are matters of serious concern. Such incidents snatch away the mental peace of old people and bring home to us the helpless situation of the elderly in urban India. All the same, financial freedom is essential for proper sustenance, security, and health in old age. Everyone ought to be prepared for old age by saving sufficiently, if one is to avoid Shila's financial predicament. Embracing Old Age and Death At the dawn of our lives, with the effulgent rising sun of vitality and vigour bringing with it distant beauties and promises veiled by the mist of expectation and inviting us to uncover them, we are totally unprepared for old age and death. With a refreshing feeling in our minds and a 'can do everything' spirit, we plunge into activity amidst the happy chimes of life's small joys. About midway through our lives, with heavy responsibilities to shoulder and lots of dreams yet to be fulfilled, we console ourselves thinking that there is just a little more to be done before one can rest. We seek occasional retreats and come back to work with renewed vigour. -No bleed here-"}
{"meta": {"title": "Alethic modalities, temporal modalities, and representation", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Benovsky, Jiri", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "In this article, I am interested in four versions of what is often referred to as \"the Humphrey objection\". This objection was initially raised by Kripke against Lewis's modal counterpart theory, so this is where I will start the discussion. As we will see, there is a perfectly good answer to the objection. I will then examine other places where a similar objection can be raised: it can arise in the case of temporal counterpart theory (in fact, it can arise in the case of all kinds of counterpart theories, independently on modal realism), and a very similar worry can also arise against modal realism itself or against an ersatzist theory of possible worlds itself. For similar reasons, in similar situations, a similar objection will arise. What is interesting is that it is not the case that a similar response can be given in all of these similar cases. So, in the end, we will see what dissimilarities there\n          are and how and why they are relevant. In particular, we will see the differences there are between alethic modalities and temporal modalities. In the case of alethic modalities (metaphysical necessity and possibility), the objection can be answered by appealing to the notion of representation, while this does not work very well in the case of temporal modalities.", "date": "2015", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/BENAMT-2", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2020-04-21T05:19:32Z"}, "text": "Alethic modalities, temporal modalities, and representation JIRI BENOVSKY Abstract: In this article, I am interested in four versions of what is often referred to as \"the Humphrey objection\". This objection was initially raised by Kripke against Lewis's modal counterpart theory, so this is where I will start the discussion. As we will see, there is a perfectly good answer to the objection. I will then examine other places where a similar objection can be raised: it can arise in the case of temporal counterpart theory (in fact, it can arise in the case of all kinds of counterpart theories, independently on modal realism), and a very similar worry can also arise against modal realism itself or against an ersatzist theory of possible worlds itself. For similar reasons, in similar situations, a similar objection will arise. What is interesting is that it is not the case that a similar response can be given in all of these similar cases. So, in the end, we will see what dissimilarities there are and how and why they are relevant. In particular, we will see the differences there are between alethic modalities and temporal modalities. In the case of alethic modalities (metaphysical necessity and possibility), the objection can be answered by appealing to the notion of representation, while this does not work very well in the case of temporal modalities. Keywords: Counterpart theory, Humphrey objection, representation, modal realism, ersatzism 2 §1. I have a doppelganger. His name is Jerry and not only is he very much like me, but he also likes doing the same things I do. He physically resembles me a lot, he is the same size, the same build, the same strength. Like me, he likes to go running, hiking, and climbing. He is exactly as fit as me – no more, no less. He climbed the same summits I did, in the same weather conditions, at the same speed, with the same technical skill; he is exactly as good – or bad – as I am. He looks and behaves so much like me that if you'd see him running up a mountain you'd think it's me. Last week, Jerry did something I did not: he managed to climb up the Everest. That's a big performance, far above my (our) usual level, so when I learned about his achievement I was really happy for him. But, after a few seconds of thought, I also started to feel happy for me, because if he managed to do it, that means that I could do it as well, given how similar we are. Great news, I can go on the Everest, I can do it! The feeling I have – namely, the idea that something is possible for me because something is actual for somebody else – will play an important role in the discussion below. Indeed, in this article, I will be interested in four versions of what is often referred to as \"the Humphrey objection\". This objection was initially raised by Saul Kripke (1972, p.45) against David Lewis's (1968) counterpart theory, so this is where I will start the discussion. As we will see, there is a perfectly good – well-known – answer to the objection, along the lines of the story of Jerry and me. I will then examine other places where a similar objection can be raised: it can arise in the case of temporal counterpart theory (in fact, it can arise in the case of all kinds of counterpart theories, independently on modal realism) but a very similar worry can also arise against modal realism itself or against an ersatzist theory of possible worlds itself. For similar reasons, in similar situations, a similar objection will arise. Now, what is interesting is that it is not the case that a similar response can be given in these similar cases. So, in the end, we will see what dissimilarities there are and how and why they are relevant. In particular, we will see the differences there are between alethic modalities and temporal modalities. In the case of alethic modalities (metaphysical necessity and possibility), the objection can be answered by appealing to the notion of representation, while this does not work very well in the case of temporal modalities. §2. Let us start with David Lewis's modal counterpart theory, under his own realist framework of possible worlds (see Lewis (1968, 1986)). This version of modal counterpart theory claims that all individuals are world-bound (that is, they inhabit only one world) and provides an analysis of de re modal statements in this way: 3 (i) (X is possibly F) ↔ (X is F or at least one counterpart of X is F)1 (ii) (X is necessarily F) ↔ (X is F and all of X's counterparts are F) The picture such an analysis provides is the following (I put it here mainly because it will be useful to compare it to another picture, in §4 below). In W1 (say, the actual world), Jerry is, as we know, an alpinist and he is 185cm tall. He does not exist in any other world, but he has counterparts in other worlds. In W2, there is an individual, Jerry*, who is exactly like Jerry except that he is only 175cm tall and instead of going in the mountains he likes to do Kung-Fu. In W2, he is the most similar person to our actual Jerry. The idea behind the counterpart-theoretic analysis of modal statements is then that Jerry could have been smaller and could do Kung-Fu, because one of his counterparts (Jerry*) is such. What is a counterpart? The counterpart relation is based on similarity. In short, something is an other-worldly counterpart of Jerry if it is an individual inhabiting a different possible 1 According to Lewis, it would be enough to say that (ii)' (X is possibly F) ↔ (at least one counterpart of X is F) because of postulate P6 he introduces in Lewis (1968, p.111): \"Anything in a world is a counterpart of itself\" (that is, the counterpart relation is reflexive). My (i) is only more explicit about this. Similarly for (ii). Jerry Jerry* W1 W2 counterpart 4 world who resembles him in his important features and who resembles him more closely than any other object in that world. It is important that such individuals, his counterparts, are not (numerically) identical to him: they all exist in their own worlds and he is the only one inhabiting the actual world. There are neither causal nor spatiotemporal relations between Jerry and his counterparts – what there is, is a relation of similarity and that's how we can say that they are what he would be, would the world be different. (More on this right below.) Among the traditional motivations one can have to endorse modal counterpart theory is the fact that it easily avoids any worries with accidental intrinsic properties. Jerry is 185cm tall in W1 but he can be said to have the modal property of being possibly 175cm tall in virtue of having at W2 an other-worldly counterpart that is 175cm tall. But since the two incompatible properties (being 185cm tall, and being 175cm tall) are had by different things – different modal counterparts – no contradiction threatens to arise (see Lewis (1986, p.201-)). Now, the objection I am interested in here claims that such a modal counterpart theory leads to difficulties precisely because, to do the job it promises, it must be a world-bound individuals theory, which allows individuals to inhabit just one single world and no more. It is this feature of Lewis's theory that yields objections saying that it misses the target: counterpart theory does not provide a proper account of what may happen to us, because what are to be our counterparts are just different individuals who resemble us. So, what might happen to Jerry is not about Jerry at all, it is a story about someone else, Jerry*, living in some other world which, in Lewis's view, has neither causal nor spatiotemporal relations with the actual world. This is Saul Kripke's worry (Kripke (1972, p.45)): we have a strong common-sense belief that we have many properties only contingently and that there are many different ways for us to be different. If, for instance, I just avoided a deadly fall while climbing up the Matterhorn, it is crucial, in order to justify my sensation of relief, that I have the belief that it was me who could have fallen and died. But according to counterpart theory, my idea that I could have died is not really about me: if I say this, I'm speaking about someone else – someone who resembles me and who is my counterpart but who is not me in any way. Following counterpart theory, we then get a concept of de re modality that is quite different from our common-sense beliefs about what might happen. Alvin Plantinga (1973, p.164) raised the same point in an analogous fashion: if I say I'm able to perform a certain action A (\"It is possible for me to do A.\") then, according to counterpart theory, I'm speaking about someone who does A but who is not me – and of what importance and interest could this possibly be to me? How can actions done by someone else in some other world be of any help to me to know what I can do or not? Indeed, it seems that, according to counterpart theory, I (I 5 myself) cannot perform A, for when I say \"It is possible for me to do A\" I'm not speaking about myself but about some other individual. Yet a different way to put the worry is Trenton Merricks's (2003, p.522): \"That objection charges counterpart theory with changing the subject. When I ask whether I might have been happier, so the objection goes, I am asking whether I – this very person – might have been happier. It is simply not to answer my question to say that an other-worldly someone else is happier, even if he is very much like me, even if we call him 'Merricks's counterpart'\". There is a perfectly good answer to these worries. The objectors are right to insist on the fact that all these things – being smaller, dying on the Matterhorn, being happier – happen to somebody else than the individual we are concerned with in the actual world. Jerry is not 175cm tall, I did not die on the Matterhorn, and Merricks is not as happy as some of his counterparts. Some other guys are (smaller, dead, happier). So, in what sense does modal counterpart theory relate what happens to these other persons to Jerry, Merricks, or me? One way to answer the question is simply to insist that, for instance, \"being possibly 175cm tall\" just is \"having a counterpart that is 175cm tall\", the latter being the analysis of the former. But such a way to put it will hardly convince the objectors. The better – now quite standard – way to put it is in terms of representation. The idea is exactly the same as in the story about me (in the actual world) and Jerry (in the actual world) from the opening paragraph of this article. I – I myself – feel happy for me, because Jerry (not me) managed to climb up the Everest. Why? Because given how similar we are, the fact that he did it means that I could. This is the most common-sense and natural thing to say, and we often do think about de re modality in this way. There is a situation that is extremely similar to my own situation, and something happens in this situation. So, it could happen in my situation as well. And that's all. The main counterpart-theoretic claim is no more loaded than that: the fact that this other very similar situation exists represents the possibility for my situation to be such as well, exactly as Jerry's success (in the actual world) represents the possibility that I could succeed (in the actual world) as well, given how similar we are. §3. In this article, I will discuss and compare four \"Humphrey2 objections\": 2 This label comes from the original formulation of Kripke's objection to Lewis: \"The counterpart of something in another possible world is never identical with the thing itself. Thus if we say 'Humphrey might have won the election (if only he had done such-and-such)', we are not talking about something that might have happened to Humphrey but to someone else, a 'counterpart'. Probably, however, Humphrey could not care less whether 6 Modal counterpart theory à la Lewis Modal realism à la Lewis Modal ersatzism (and similarly for modal counterpart theory under ersatzism) Temporal counterpart theory That I can possibly climb the Everest is one thing, and that a counterpart of me climbed the (counterpart of) Everest is another. I myself do not have the property of possibly climbing the Everest, since only the counterpart did it. What the counterpart does is irrelevant to what properties I have. That the actual world could be different is one thing, and that there exist other spatio-temporally and causally disconnected universes is another. These universes are just there, but they have nothing to do with modality, it's just things that exist. That the actual world could be different is one thing, and that there exist some abstract entities is another. These entities are just there, but they have nothing to do with modality, it's just things that exist. That I climbed the Everest yesterday is one thing, and that somebody else did it is another. If a counterpart of me – who is not me – did it, this does not mean that I did. We have seen above the first objection, and we have seen that it can be satisfactorily answered by appealing to the notion of representation. What we realize here is that the way something has its modal properties is a very different story from the way it has its non-modal intrinsic properties. Jerry is 185cm tall. This is an actual intrinsic property he has, perhaps it is a trope, perhaps it is a universal, perhaps it can be reduced to more fundamental properties about the particles he is composed of, but whatever the correct analysis of this property is, it is something he has, or something that constitutes him in one way or another. Modal properties are different. The property \"being possibly 175cm tall\" is not something that Jerry has in any comparable way. He does not instantiate, say, the trope of being possibly 175cm tall. There is no such trope. Rather, under modal counterpart theory, the better way to put it is to claim that it is correct to say that Jerry could have been 175cm tall, because there is a situation very similar to his where an individual very similar to him is 175cm tall – in the way we have seen at the end of the preceding section. Modal properties are things of a different kind than actual intrinsic properties, and modal counterpart theory acknowledges this fact very well – indeed, it requires it. But this is no defect of the theory, it is a virtue. To say that Jerry \"has\" a \"modal property\" is nothing more than to say that something is possible for him, and this is someone else, no matter how much resembling him, would have been victorious in another possible world.\" Kripke (1972, p.45) 7 represented by the existence of a situation where this something is actual for somebody else, suitably similar to Jerry – thus, it is consistent/compatible with the way Jerry is. Let us now move on to the other Humphrey objections. §4. The kind of worry that lies behind the Humphrey objection to modal counterpart theory can be raised in a similar way against modal realism itself, and against ersatzism itself as well. Modal realism à la Lewis is, in short, the claim that there are many possible worlds as concrete and flesh-and-blood as the actual world. All possible worlds (including the actual world) are things of the same kind, and all possible worlds (including the actual world) are spatio-temporally and causally disconnected from each other – they are isolated – this is how they are distinguished one from each other. The notion of actuality is then given an indexical analysis: to be actual is no more than to be here, in this world. Possibility and necessity are then analysed in terms of possible worlds in a standard way: it is possible that P iff there is at least one world where P, and it is necessary that P iff in all possible worlds P. The way Merricks formulated (see above) the Humphrey objection against modal counterpart theory was that it changes the subject. A similar objection can be raised against modal realism itself: that the actual world could be different is one thing, but that there exist other spatio-temporally and causally disconnected universes is another; these universes are just there, but they have nothing to do with modality, it's just things that exist. So, even if we grant Lewis all the worlds he claims there to be, he still did not say anything about possibility and necessity, he only made a claim about what there is, and the claim is that there are much more concreta than what we thought. But the fact that there are more people, more planets, and more donkeys has nothing to do with what is possible or necessary, it only has to do with what there is. Ersatzism is not very different from modal realism in this respect, although it is a very different theory of possible worlds. Ersatzsim goes around by different names like \"actualism\", \"moderate modal realism\", or \"abstractionism\". \"Ersatz modal realism\" is the label given to this family of theories by David Lewis (1986a, chap. 3), since according to this view possible worlds just are not worlds. Instead of a plurality of 'genuine' concrete spatiotemporal worlds à la Lewis, the ersatzers postulate a plurality of abstract non-spatio-temporal entities that play the theoretical role of possible worlds. This is why the view is also properly called \"abstractionism\" (see, for instance, Van Inwagen (1986)) since it makes extensive use 8 of abstract (i.e. non-spatio-temporal) entities, and makes them to be a central piece of modal metaphysics. According to this view, there really is only one world (quantifying unrestrictedly), the actual world (that is absolutely, and not relatively, actual), and it contains abstract entities that play the role of possible worlds. Thus, on this view, possible worlds really are actual entities – and that's why the view is also often called \"actualism\" since the claim is here that only what is actual exists, and merely possible non-actual things don't. So, here we have a theoryschema: instead of a plurality of concrete possible worlds, we have here a plurality of actual abstract entities that play the same theoretical role. The question that arises now is – how? How do those entities manage to play the role they are intended for? And, in the first place, what are they? The answer here is not simple because many different versions of ersatzsim are on the market. Abstract possible worlds have been said to be (maximal and consistent) states of affairs, sets of propositions, or special properties – ways things might have been. One of the best-developed version of ersatzism is Mark Heller's (1998a, 1998b) linguistic ersatzism. In Heller's (1998a) view a possible world looks roughly like this: {<<13,69>, {3,48}>, <<589,38>, {7,19}>, <<88,235>, {3}>, ...} a point a set of numbers in the representing manifold properties properties being exemplified at a certain point of the manifold the representation world = a set of sets/ordered pairs This Quine-style view takes possible worlds to be complex sets that represent a consistent distribution of properties in a space-time manifold (only two-dimensional in the schema above). At this point it should be obvious how a Humphrey-style objection can arise here as well. Indeed, exactly as we have seen above in the case of modal realism, one can worry here that it is one thing to say that the actual world could be different, but that it is an entirely different 9 thing to say that there exist some abstract entities or complex sets. \"The sets just sit there\", as Merricks (2003, pp.535,539) nicely puts it. As before, the worry is that these entities (sets or other) are just there, but they have nothing to do with modality, it's just things that exist. So again, the objection goes, ersatzism is not a theory about possibility and necessity, it is a theory about what there is, and it claims that in addition to the concrete entities of the actual world there are also many abstract (actual) entities, like sets of numbers, propositions, or other. But, as before, the fact that there are such abstract entities has nothing to do with what is possible or necessary, it only has to do with what there is (in the actual world). Ersatzism can also come in a 2-in-1 package, combined with modal counterpart theory, as illustrated in the figure below where the abstract possible worlds are sets of propositions (to make the schema easier to read than Heller-style sets of numbers): {Jerry is 185cm tall., ...} re pr es en ts c or re ct ly 'is a ct ua li se d' {Jerry is 120cm tall., ...} {Jerry is 175cm tall., ...} re pr es en ts f al se ly re pr es en ts f al se ly a b r s t r a c t p o s s i b l e w o r l d s c o n c r e t e a c t u a l w o r l d 10 According to this view, the counterpart relation holds between the different abstract representatives of individuals from different possible worlds – and not between individuals themselves. Similarity also plays an important role here, like in the case of Lewisian modal counterpart theory. The idea is that it makes sense to claim that some abstract entity can resemble some other abstract entity. The explanation of how it is that two abstract entities can resemble each other will depend on what kind of abstract entities one chooses to make up possible worlds. Perhaps abstract entities can have similar internal structures. In Heller's (1998a) view, where as we have seen worlds are sets of ordered pairs of numbers representing properties, counterpart relations are understood as relations between properties instantiated at points of the manifold – the relevant similarity involved in the counterpart relation is then the similarity between these sets, which is roughly the question of how many members they have in common (see Heller (1998a, p.301-) for more details). This does not make things better, in the eyes of the objector, when it comes to the worry that this view has nothing to do with modality – that it changes the subject. As Merricks (2003, p. 536) puts it, \"My being possibly 40 feet tall is not the same thing as there being a particular set of ordered pairs of ordered quadruples of numbers and sets of numbers\". Things seem here to be even worse than in the case of a Lewisian modal counterpart theory, for at least people were involved in the Lewisian analysis of what is possible for Jerry. Here, it's just sets of numbers. But to say that there are such sets is one thing, and to say that Jerry could have been smaller is another – and a very different thing to say. To sum up, the family of worries arising here against modal realism, against ersatzism, and also against a modal counterpart theory under ersatzism is very similar to the initial worry we had with modal counterpart theory à la Lewis. When it comes to the two theories of possible worlds (modal realism and ersatzism), the worry is that they have nothing to do with modality but only with what there is, and when it comes to an ersatzist modal counterpart theory the worry is the same as the initial Kripkean one supplemented with the additional worry that sets are even weirder entities than other people to play the role ersatz counterpart theorists want them to play. §5. In the preceding section we have seen three different theories (modal realism, ersatzism, ersatz modal counterpart theory), and we have seen how a Humphrey-style objection can arise against all of them. Now, it is time for answers. There is a perfectly good answer, very similar to the answer provided to the initial Kripkean objection in §2 above. There are two crucial 11 components that constitute the answer: first, to \"have\" a \"modal property\" is a different thing than to have an intrinsic actual property (see §3 above), and second, the best way to understand how our three theories work is in terms of representation. It is true that there is nothing modal in the possible worlds themselves or in the counterparts themselves. They are just things there are. But the fact that they are out there means something. It means at the very least that it is possible for something or some world to be such and such, since it is such and such. Take Lewisian modal realism first. If it is the case that there is a spatio-temporal universe exactly like ours except that Jerry is 175cm there, it means that there is no (logical, metaphysical, and perhaps also nomic and biological) contradiction in this situation – otherwise it would not exist (at least under the assumption that there are no contradictions instantiated in a concrete world). This means something. It means that the existence of this world represents the possibility that our world could have been such. Think again about the story of Jerry (in the actual world) and me (in the actual world) from the beginning of this article. The fact that Jerry exists, that he is so much like me, and that he managed to climb up the Everest means to me that I could do it as well. So, we don't even have to look in other possible worlds to get to modality. Modality is to be found in every situation similar to mine. Yes, Jerry (the actual Jerry) is \"just a thing that exists\". But his existence and the way he is are enough for me to say that something is possible for me. It's exactly the same story with possible worlds, especially in the case of Lewisian modal realism. Indeed, to be able to say that I could climb up the Everest I do not need to look in other worlds – in my own world, there is the actual Jerry, and that's enough. But for other possibilities that concern me there is no such suitable doppelganger to be found in my own world. For instance, say that it is possible for me to climb up the K2. But, Jerry didn't climb up the K2 and nobody else similar enough to me did. So, this is how the simple fact that there are more concreta than those that inhabit my own world is useful, for in some world or another there is someone, suitably similar to me, who did climb up the K2 (or not, in which case it is not possible for me to climb up the K2). So, the existence of all the concreta Lewis postulates has everything to do with modality3. 3 A notable defect of modal realism à la Lewis is that perhaps even the huge number of concreta he postulates there to be is not enough to account for all possibilities. This is Bricker's (2001) objection which claims that 'island universes' are possible – this is the possibility of a single universe containing spatio-temporally and causally disconnected parts. If this possibility is genuine, as Bricker argues, Lewis's theory cannot account for it since it would count such a universe as two (or more) and not as one, given that causal and spatio-temporal isolation is Lewis's criterion for distinguishing possible worlds one from each other. 12 The answer is similar in spirit but technically a bit different in the case of ersatzism like Heller's and in the case of an ersatz modal counterpart theory. Of course, one can say, following Merricks, that Jerry's being possibly 175cm tall is a completely different thing than there being a set of sets of numbers. But these numbers represent something. They represent properties, instantiated in a space-time manifold. (To be able to do this, Hellerian worlds need to be interpreted – a number in itself does not represent anything, of course (see Heller (1998a, p.296)). If the distribution of properties in a space-time manifold is such that it makes up for the existence of someone very much like Jerry except that he is smaller, we get all we need in the same sense we have just seen in the case of modal realism. The fact that there is a (maximal and consistent) representation of a distribution of properties in a space-time manifold where there is a person like Jerry with such-and-such properties is not but means/represents that Jerry could have been smaller. This is how, again, the simple existence of these sets of numbers has everything to do with modality. §6. I hope that in the preceding sections I gave some support to the claim that Humphreystyle objections to modal realism, ersatzism, and to modal counterpart theory (both under modal realism and under ersatzism) do have good answers. In this last section I will try to show why a Humphrey-style objection raised against temporal counterpart theory is stronger and why the good answers from the preceding sections are not available here. Temporal modalities and alethic modalities will turn out to be relevantly different. In short, temporal counterpart theory says that \"an object will be F iff it has a future temporal counterpart that is (tenselessly) F, and that an object was F iff it has a past temporal counterpart that is (tenselessly) F\" (Sider (2006, p.14)). According to this view, a person like Jerry exists at only one time (he is time-bound, in a similar sense in which he is world-bound according to modal counterpart theory): he is an instantaneous stage that persists through time not by existing at other times but by having different temporal counterparts at other times. Thus, there is a series of stages interrelated by a counterpart relation, and ordinary objects such as Jerry are conceived of as being the stages rather than the whole composed of them (that would be the perdurantist 'worm view'). While persistence through time is thus understood as the having of temporal counterparts at different times, temporal counterpart theory does not deny the existence of temporally extended objects – the four-dimensional entities that are aggregates of stages – they exist as well as the stages do. It's just that, according to this view, the objects we ordinarily name and quantify over are stages rather than four-dimensional worms. 13 To get to see where a Humphrey-style objection comes from here, we can start by asking how this view accounts for there being change in intrinsic properties. Change, according to all perdurantists – friends of temporal counterpart theory or not –, is simply the having of different properties at different times. The trouble with temporal counterpart theory is that there is no one thing that ever has the different properties. Since all objects only exist at one time, there just is nothing in the stage view theorist's world that can undergo a change – it slips out of existence before it can change. Change takes time. But the counterpart theorist's stages do not last long enough. The friend of temporal counterpart theory will of course reply here that a given stage at t1 is F and will be ¬F at t2 in virtue of having as a temporal counterpart another stage existing at t2 that is ¬F. But, the objector says – and here starts the Humphrey objection –, this is only an appearance of a solution for these two stages are just two completely different things. Mellor (1998, p.89) claims that \"change needs identity as well as difference\" but there is only difference in the stage view, there are only different things with different properties – and nothing that undergoes any change at all. A similar way to put it is this: temporal counterpart theory does not allow ordinary objects to do the things they typically can do. People are stages. But stages are instantaneous entities, they do not have temporal extent. The unwelcome consequence of this is that people cannot do many of the things we would expect them to be able to do. For instance, it seems that a person should normally be able to utter a sentence. But, on the stage view, this turns out to be, strictly speaking, impossible: the utterance of a sentence takes some time and a stage does not last long enough to make such a performance. Or, normally, we would say that a person is able to run, but again, not according to the stage view; strictly speaking, nobody can run because a person is an instantaneous entity and running takes time. What is involved in such objections to the effect that temporal counterpart theory does not provide a good account of change and persistence is a version of a Humphrey objection, applied to temporal counterpart theory: if Jerry says now that he climbed up the Everest last week, the sentence turns out to be true iff he did climb up the Everest last week. But this is, according to temporal counterpart theory, simply impossible, because the person who says now that he climbed up the Everest is a stage, a momentary entity that did not itself exist last week and thus was not able to climb up anything. Jerry, the person who is doing the speaking (or perhaps not even that, see above), is simply not identical, in any sense, to the person who's done the climbing. Granted, Jerry has a counterpart last week that climbed up the Everest. But whatever the counterpart relation is, it is not identity. So, the objection goes, if Jerry says he 14 climbed up the Everest, he is not telling the truth – why should he be allowed to boast that someone else, similar and causally connected to him but still someone else, climbed up the Everest? If one generalizes this objection, one can claim that temporal counterpart theory denies persistence altogether, for it only provides us with different instantaneous entities. Sider defends temporal counterpart theory against this objection as follows: \"[It] is wrong to say that the stage view [i.e. temporal counterpart theory] denies that 'You will do it' means that you will do it. 'Ted was once a boy' attributes a certain temporal property, the property of once being a boy, to me, not to anyone else. Of course, the stage view does analyse my having this property as involving the boyhood of another object, but I am the one with the temporal property, which is the important thing. The stage view is consistent with stages having temporal properties; it's just that temporal properties are given a counterpart theoretic analysis.\" (Sider (2001, p.195)) But this reply is not likely to give satisfaction to the objector. Granted, the stage view is consistent with stages having temporal properties, but not the ones we want. To take Sider's example, if we say \"Ted was once a boy\", we are ascribing a certain temporal property to Ted (who exists now). But if we endorse temporal counterpart theory, it is not the property of \"once being a boy\", but rather, the property of \"once there being a counterpart of Ted that is a boy\". If the counterpart theorist allows these two properties to be equivalent then, the objector claims, he is mistaken – for if it is the former that we ascribe to Ted, it is solely about Ted that we are speaking, but if we ascribe him the latter, we are speaking about Ted and someone else, and that makes all the difference. Sider's response can only appear to be satisfactory if one takes the expression \"once being a boy\" to be a suitable paraphrase of the expression \"once there being a counterpart of x that is a boy\", but such a strategy, objectors like Sally Haslanger will claim, \"strains the limits of credibility\" (Haslanger (2003, p.337)). I can boast that I can climb up the Everest even if I did not – only my doppelganger Jerry did. Yes, I can boast that I can, but I cannot boast I did. Somebody else did. This somebody else's achievement represents the possibility of me being able to do it, as we have seen. Representation is fine and enough when it comes to alethic modalities. But it's not what we want in the temporal case. In the temporal case, I want to say that I did it, and not that although I didn't do it something represents me as having done it. If I didn't do it, then I didn't do it, and no representation can be of any help. That I climbed the Everest last week is one thing, and that somebody else (Jerry) did it is another. The latter is true, the former is false. And even if a temporal counterpart of me – who is not me – did it, this still does not mean that I did. In the case of alethic modalities it is enough to say that even if I did not climb up the 15 Everest, I could, because there is a suitably similar situation where somebody else does. But in the temporal case, a stronger claim is needed. It is not enough to be similar and causally connected to someone who did something to say that I did it (given that temporal counterpart theory explicitly states that I did not). Mere representation is not enough here. In the temporal case we need the real thing, for the story here is about my past and my future, not just mere possibilities. I don't want to have a merely represented past and future, I want to have a past and a future, full stop. As is apparent in the quote above, Sider will simply reply that this is just the paradox of analysis. I cannot refute this response, but I tried to say why in my mind it indeed \"strains the limits of credibility\". To repeat it: representation is enough in the case of possibility and necessity, but not in the temporal case4. References : BRICKER, P. 2001. Island Universes and the Analysis of Modality. In G. Preyer, F. Siebelt (eds.), Reality and Humean Supervenience: Essays on the Philosophy of David Lewis, Rowman and Littlefield. HASLANGER, S. 2003. Persistence Through Time. In Michael J. Loux & Dean W. Zimmerman (eds.), The Oxford Handbook of Metaphysics. Oxford University Press. 315-354. HELLER, M. 1998a. Property Counterparts in Ersatz Worlds. The Journal of Philosophy pp.293-316. HELLER, M. 1998b. Five Layers of Interpretation for Possible Worlds. Philosophical Studies pp.205-214. KRIPKE, S. 1972. Naming and Necessity. Harvard University Press. LEWIS, D. 1968. Counterpart theory and quantified modal logic. Reprinted in Loux, M.J., ed. 1979. The possible and the actual. New York: Cornell University Press. LEWIS, D. 1986. On the plurality of worlds. Oxford: Blackwell Publishers. MELLOR, D. H. 1998. Real Time II. London: Routledge. MERRICKS, T. 2003. The End of Counterpart Theory. Journal of Philosophy 100(10):521-549. PLANTINGA, A. 1973. Transworld Identity or Worldbound Individuals? In Logic and Ontology, M. Munitz (ed.), New York, NY: New York University Press. SIDER, T. 2001. Four-dimensionalism. Clarendon Press. SIDER, T. 2006. Beyond the Humphrey objection. Unpublished. VAN INWAGEN, P. 1986. Two concepts of possible worlds. In Van Inwagen, Ontology, Identity and Modality, Cambridge University Press. 4 I would like to thank Baptiste Le Bihan for stimulating discussions while I was writing this article, and an anonymous referee of Kriterion for very useful comments that helped me to improve it."}
{"meta": {"title": "An Argument Against Causal Decision Theory", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Spencer, Jack", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "I formulate a principle of preference, which I call the Guaranteed Principle. I argue that the preferences of rational agents satisfy the Guaranteed Principle, that the preferences of agents\n          who embody causal decision theory do not, and hence that causal decision theory is false.", "date": "forthcoming", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/SPEAAA-2", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2020-09-13T08:27:56Z"}, "text": "An argument against causal decision theory Jack Spencer jackspen@mit.edu 1 Introduction Critics of causal decision theory (CDT) have put forward various alleged counterexamples: cases in which, they claim, rationality and the recommendations of CDT diverge.1 For the most part, proponents of CDT have been unconvinced, viewing the intuitions the alleged counterexamples elicit with a mixture of suspicion and opposition.2 The dispute is thus at an impasse, and one worries that unless there is some way to move beyond judgements about cases, the dispute will devolve into an unproductive clash of intuitions. My goal in this paper is move beyond the impasse. I criticize CDT, not by 1See e.g. Ahmed (2013; 2014a; 2014b), Egan (2007), Hare and Hedden (2016), Hunter and Richter (1978) and Weirich (2004). 2See e.g. Arntzenius (2008), Cantwell (2010), Harper (1986), Joyce (2012; 2018) and Williamson (forthcoming). For relevant empirical data, see Eriksson and Rabinowicz (2013) and the studies cited therein. 1 appeal to judgements about cases, but by explicit argument. I formulate a principle of preference, which I call the Guaranteed Principle. I argue that the preferences of rational agents satisfy the Guaranteed Principle, that the preferences of agents who embody CDT do not, and hence that CDT is false. 2 The Guaranteed Principle Say that a decision guarantees $n if the agent knows that some particular option made available by the decision would yield $n if chosen; and say that a decision forces $n if the agent knows that every option made available by the decision would yield $n if chosen. If we assume that agents satisfy certain simplifying assumptions,3 care only about money and value dollars linearly, then we can formulate the Guaranteed Principle as follows: (Guaranteed Principle) A rational agent always strictly prefers a decision that guarantees $n to a decision that forces $m < $n. The motivation for the Guaranteed Principle is straightforward: a rational agent never strictly prefers fewer options. If d1 is a decision that forces $n, and d2 is just like d1 except that it makes additional options available,4 then a rational agent 3I assume that credences are conglomerable, that utilities are bounded, that there is no selflocating uncertainty, and that the agents know that their utilities will not change and that they will not suffer any information loss. 4A decision is a quadruple 〈C,u,A,K〉, where C is the credence function, u is the utility function, 2 weakly prefers d2 to d1. And a rational agent strictly prefers d1 to some decision, d0, which forces $m < $n. So, by transitivity, we get the Guaranteed Principle.5 The Guaranteed Principle does not hold of imperfect agents, nor of agents who expect to be imperfect. Take an extreme illustration. Suppose that the least choiceworthy option made available by a decision that guarantees $n is very bad indeed, and suppose that I have a lesion that makes me choose from among the least choiceworthy options when I face decisions of that sort. Then, as a way of protecting myself from my disposition to choose irrationally, I should prefer the decision that forces $m to the decision that guarantees $n > $m. But the Guaranteed Principle does not purport to hold true of imperfect agents. It's restricted to (perfectly) rational agents: the idealized agents that are the subject matter of decision theory. If an agent fully expects to choose from among the most choiceworthy options, as rational agents always do, then the agent must strictly prefer a decision that guarantees $n to a decision that forces $m < $n. A is the set of options and K is the set of dependency hypotheses. 5The Guaranteed Principle is akin to a causal dominance principle. One-boxers who object to causal dominance reasoning might object to the Guaranteed Principle on similar, anti-causalist grounds. My target in this essay is CDT, however, and proponents of CDT will not object to the Guaranteed Principle on anti-causalist grounds. 3 3 An alleged counterexample to CDT I am going to use the Guaranteed Principle to argue that a particular alleged counterexample to CDT succeeds. The example I will focus on is the following one, from Spencer and Wells (2019: 34): (The Frustrater) There is an envelope and two opaque boxes, A and B. The agent has three options: she can take A, B or the envelope (aA, aB or aE). The envelope contains $40. The two boxes together contain $100. How the money is distributed between the boxes depends on a prediction made yesterday by the Frustrater, a reliable predictor who seeks to frustrate. If the Frustrater predicted that the agent would take A, then B contains $100. If the Frustrater predicted that the agent would take B, then A contains $100. If the Frustrater predicted that the agent would take the envelope, each box contains $50. The agent knows all of this. There is a strong intuition that rationality requires taking the envelope. CDT, however, does not recommend the envelope. According to CDT, an agent should always choose so as to maximize U. Let W = {w1, ...,wn} be the set of possible worlds; let C be the agent's credence function; and let u be the agent's utility function. We then can define the V-value of any proposition p: 4 V(p) = ∑ W C(w|p)u(w). Note that V obeys the rule of averaging: if Z is a set of propositions that C-partitions p – in other words, if exactly one member of Z is true at every p-world to which C assigns nonzero probability – then V(p) = ∑ Z C(z|p)V(pz). Let A = {a1, ..., am} be the set of options, and let K = {k1, ..., k j} be the set of dependency hypotheses, where a dependency hypothesis is a maximally specific proposition about how things the agent cares about do and do not depend causally on their present choice.6 The U-value of any a ∈ A, then, is: U(a) = ∑ K ∑ W C(k)C(w|ak)u(w) = ∑ K C(k)V(ak). The agent facing The Frustrater knows that the envelope contains $40, so, equating dollars and units of value, U(aE) = 40. The agent does not know how the money is distributed between the boxes, but knows that the boxes together contain $100. Therefore, no matter how the agent divides her credence, U(aA)+U(aB) = 100.7 Two numbers smaller than 40 cannot sum to 100, so, no matter how the agent divides her credence, aA and/or aB maximize U. Some find the intuition elicited by The Frustrater sufficiently compelling. They need no further argument. The case, itself, convinces them to reject CDT. 6Cf. Lewis (1981: 11). 7There are three relevant dependency hypotheses: either A contains $100, B contains $100 or each box contains $50 (kA, kB or kE). U(aA) + U(aB) = C(kA)(V(aAkA) + V(aBkA)) + C(kB)(V(aAkB) + V(aBkB)) + C(kE)(V(aAkE) + V(aBkE)) = C(kA)(100 + 0) + C(kB)(0 + 100) + C(kE)(50 + 50) = 100. 5 But I know – both from the literature and from personal experience – that some remain unconvinced.8 So it's worth trying to undergird the intuition with argument. 4 An argument against CDT Say that an agent embodies a decision theory just if the agent knows that she always chooses an option recommended by the decision theory. An agent who embodies CDT knows that she always chooses a U-maximizing option. I am going to argue that rational agents do not embody CDT. To get the argument going, consider the following elaboration of The Frustrater: (Two Rooms) An agent must enter either Room #1 or Room #2. If she enters Room #1, she gets $35. If she enters Room #2, she faces The Frustrater. The agent knows all of this.9 The 'decision' in Room #1 forces $35. The decision in Room #2 – namely, The Frustrater – guarantees $40. The Guaranteed Principle thus entails that a rational agent strictly prefers Room #2 to Room #1. 8See e.g. Joyce (2018). 9Yesterday the Frustrater made a prediction about what the agent would do were she to enter Room #2. If the Frustrater predicted that the agent would take A, then B contains $100. If the Frustrater predicted that the agent would take B, then A contains $100. If the Frustrater predicted that the agent would take the envelope, then each box contains $50. The agent knows that the Frustrater predicted the truth of exactly one of these three counterfactuals. 6 If CDT is true, then a rational agent embodies CDT. So we have the first premiss of the argument, which is a claim of material implication: (P1) If CDT is true, then an agent who embodies CDT strictly prefers Room #2 to Room #1. The second premiss is a claim about the pairwise preferences of an agent who embodies CDT: (P2) An agent who embodies CDT strictly prefers Room #1 to Room #2. To see that (P2) is true, we need to run through some calculations. Let a#1 and a#2 be the options of entering Room #1 and Room #2, respectively. There are three relevant dependency hypotheses: either A contains $100, B contains $100 or each box contains $50 (kA, kB or kE). We know that U(a#1) = 35, since Room #1 forces $35. What U(a#2) is depends on how the agent divides her credence: (1) U(a#2) = C(kA)V(a#2kA) + C(kB)V(a#2kB) + C(kE)V(a#2kE). Let aA, aB and aE be the options available in Room #2, and let's assume that each entails a#2. The agent is certain that she will choose A or B if she enters Room #2, so {aA, aB} C-partitions the following propositions: a#2kA, a#2kB and a#2kE. Therefore, by the rule of averaging, (2) V(a#2kA) = C(aA|a#2kA)V(aAkA) + C(aB|a#2kA)V(aBkA); (3) V(a#2kB) = C(aA|a#2kB)V(aAkB) + C(aB|a#2kB)V(aBkB); and 7 (4) V(a#2kE) = C(aA|a#2kE)V(aAkE) + C(aB|a#2kE)V(aBkE). Both V(aAkA) and V(aBkB) equal 100, since the agent gets $100 if aAkA or aBkB. Both V(aBkA) and V(aAkB) equal 0, since the agent gets $0 if aBkA or aAkB. And both V(aAkE) and V(aBkE) equal 50, since the agent gets $50 if aAkE or aBkE. Therefore, (5) V(a#2kA) = C(aA|a#2kA)(100) + C(aB|a#2kA)(0); (6) V(a#2kB) = C(aA|a#2kB)(0) + C(aB|a#2kB)(100); and (7) V(a#2kE) = C(aA|a#2kE)(50) + C(aB|a#2kE)(50). Plugging (5)-(7) back into (1), we get: (8) U(a#2) = C(kA)(C(aA|a#2kA)(100)+C(aB|a#2kA)(0))+C(kB)(C(aA|a#2kB)(0)+C(aB|a#2kB)(100))+ C(kE)(C(aA|a#2kE)(50) + C(aB|a#2kE)(50)). What these credences and conditional credences are depends on how reliable the agent takes the Frustrater to be. In a more realistic case, the agent might take the Frustrater to be rather, but not extraordinarily, reliable. But let's suppose, to make things simple, that the agent takes the Frustrater to be almost perfectly reliable. In that case, the agent is virtually certain that some box contains $100, and virtually certain that she will take a box that contains $0 if she enters Room #2 – in other words, C(kE) ≈ 0, C(aA|a#2kA) ≈ 0 and C(aB|a#2kB) ≈ 0. It therefore follows that: (9) U(a#2) ≈ 0.10 10U(a#2) < U(a#1) in more realistic cases, too. For example, if C(kA) = C(kB) = 0.4, C(aA|a#2kA) = 8 If there were diachronic (conjunctive, long-arm) options, then we might be able to reconcile CDT with the Guaranteed Principle. An agent facing Two Rooms would have four diachronic options: a#1, aA, aB and aE. If we assign each of these a U-value, the ones that maximize U are aA and/or aB, since U(a#1) = 35, U(aE) = 40, and U(aA) + U(aB) = 100. It is not completely clear what preferences among decisions are if there are diachronic options; but if we think of decisions as containing only synchronic options, and we think of diachronic options as having synchronic options as parts, then we could say that an agent strictly prefers decision di to decision d j just if some synchronic option in di is a part of some diachronic option that is strictly preferred to every diachronic option that has any synchronic option in d j as a part. An agent who embodies CDT strictly prefers aA and/or aB to a#1. So, if there were diachronic options, an agent who embodies CDT would, in this sense, strictly prefer Room #2 to Room #1, and the conflict between CDT and the Guaranteed Principle would be removed. But, unfortunately for CDT, there aren't any such things.11 An agent deciding between Room #1 and Room #2 faces a straight choice between two (real, synchronic) options. And if the agent embodies CDT, the agent will choose Room #1, since U(a#1) > U(a#2). Therefore, (P2) is true.12 C(aB|a#2kB) = 0.2, and C(aA|a#2kE) = C(aB|a#2kE) = 0.5, then U(a#2) = (0.4)((0.2)(100) + (0.8)(0)) + (0.4)((0.8)(0) + (0.2)(100)) + (0.2)((0.5)(50) + (0.5)(50)) = 26 < 35. 11See Hedden (2015), Joyce (1999) and Pollock (2002). For a defence of diachronic options, see McClennan (1990). 12CDT is sometimes formulated in terms of imaging; cf. Sobel (1994), Lewis (1981) and Joyce (1999). If Ca is C imaged on a, then U(a) is taken to be ∑ W Ca(w)u(w). Credence shifted by imaging 9 The two premisses of the argument entail the falsity of CDT. I have argued that both premisses are true. So I think that we have here a sound argument against CDT. And it's not hard to see where CDT goes wrong. It's not irrational for an agent who embodies CDT to strictly prefer Room #1 to Room #2 – that's not where the mistake lies. After all, agents who embody CDT almost always get $0 upon facing The Frustrater, and $35 is better than $0. The mistake lies in embodying CDT, and, specifically, in being disposed to choose so as to maximize U upon facing The Frustrater. An agent who knows that she will choose so as to maximize U upon facing The Frustrater knows that she has a strong disposition to choose an empty is confined by dependency hypotheses. But a question arises: in Two Rooms, when we image on a#2, how do we divide the shifted credence between aA and aB? According to Lewis (1981), if we set time travel aside, then: for any option a and any proposition p, Ca(p) = ∑ K C(k)C(p|ak). Thus, according to Lewis, credence shifted by imaging on a#2 is distributed between aA and aB in proportion to original credence. If Lewis's equation holds in Two Rooms, then my defence of (P2) carries over to imaging-based CDT straightforwardly. But, as a helpful editor pointed out, one could hold a rival view about imaging, on which the credence shifted by imaging on a#2 is divided equally between aA and aB, irrespective of original credence. If this rival view is accepted, my defence of (P2) does not carry over straightforwardly; for then ∑ W ∑ K C(k)C(w|ak)u(w) and ∑ W Ca(w)u(w) need not be equal. However, as the helpful editor also pointed out, my main contention still can be defended. If the rival view of imaging is accepted, then Two Rooms is unstable: U(a#2) is inversely proportional to C(a#2). If the agent divides their credence so that U(a#2) = U(a#1), then the agent will be indifferent between Room #1 and Room #2 – thus violating the Guaranteed Principle, which requires that the agent strictly prefer Room #2 to Room #1. 10 box, and it is rational for her to protect herself from this choice-making disposition by violating the Guaranteed Principle and strictly preferring Room #1 to Room #2. But a rational agent, unlike an agent who embodies CDT, never needs to protect herself from her own choice-making dispositions. A rational agent facing Two Rooms fully expects to take the envelope upon entering Room #2 and therefore satisfies the Guaranteed Principle, strictly preferring Room #2 to Room #1. 5 Diachronic exploitation Cases like Two Rooms reveal that the preferences of agents who embody CDT violate the Guaranteed Principle. Such cases also reveal that agents who embody CDT are diachronically exploitable. But, though I think the falsity of CDT follows from its conflict with the Guaranteed Principle, I do not think the falsity of CDT follows from the diachronic exploitability of agents who embody CDT. Say that a sequence of options made available by a sequence of decisions ensures $n if the agent knows that if she took the sequence – i.e., chose each option in the sequence – she would get $n; and say that an agent facing a sequence of decisions is diachronically exploited just if (1) there is a sequence of options available to the agent that ensures $n and (2) the agent takes a sequence that ensures $m < $n. In Two Rooms, the sequence of entering Room #2 and taking the envelope ensures $40. But an agent who embodies CDT takes the 'sequence' of entering Room #1, which ensures $35. So, as past critics of CDT have pointed out, agents who embody 11 CDT are diachronically exploitable.13 But there are cases that convince me that diachronic exploitability and perfect rationality are compatible. One example is the following:14 (Ahmed's Insurance) There is a transparent box and an opaque box. The agent has two options: she can take either only the opaque box or both boxes (a1 or a2). The transparent box contains $10. What the opaque box contains depends on a prediction made yesterday by a reliable predictor. If the predictor predicted that the agent would take both boxes, the opaque box contains −$50, a debt the agent must repay. If the predictor predicted that the agent would take only the opaque box, the opaque box contains $50. At the second stage, before looking into the opaque box, the agent faces a second decision. She can either bet $75 at 1:3 that the predictor predicted correctly or bet $25 at 3:1 that the predictor predicted incorrectly (b1 or b2). The agent knows all of this from the outset. There are two relevant dependency hypotheses: either the opaque box contains $50 or −$50 (k50 or k−50). The agent can thus foresee the eight possible outcomes of the four possible sequences: 13See Ahmed (2014a) and Oesterheld and Conitzer (MS). 14So-named because it is a variation on Ahmed's (2014a) Newcomb Insurance. This section also draws heavily on Ahmed (MS). 12 k50 k−50 a1b1 $75 −$125 a1b2 $25 $25 a2b1 −$15 −$15 a2b2 $135 −$65 The sequence a1b2 ensures $25; the sequence a2b1 ensures −$15; and an agent who embodies CDT is likely to the take the sure-loss sequence, a2b1. The agent knows that the predictor is much more than 75% reliable whichever option is chosen. So, no matter what the agent chooses at the first stage, CDT – like any sane decision theory – recommends b1: that the agent bet that the predictor predicted correctly at the second stage. Since the agent who embodies CDT knows that she will choose b1 at the second stage, the U-value of taking both boxes is −15, the sure-loss value of a2b1, and the U-value of taking only the opaque box is: U(a1) = C(k50)V(a1b1k50) + C(k−50)V(a1b1k−50) = C(k50)(75) + C(k−50)(−125). Whether U(a2) or U(a1) is greater depends on how the agent divides her credence between k50 and k−50. But suppose that the agent divides her credence equally, as she very well might. Then, U(a1) = (0.5)(75) + (0.5)(−125) = −25 < −15 = U(a2). The agent will thus take the sure-loss sequence, a2b1, even though a sure-gain sequence was available. 13 But, so far as I can tell, there is nothing irrational about taking the sure-loss sequence. To see why, it's helpful to represent the sequential decision as an intrapersonal game played between two time-slices of the agent.15 Let C be the credence function of the first slice, and let's suppose that the credence function of the second slice comes from C via conditionalizing on the option chosen at the first stage. Let t be the proposition that the predictor predicted correctly and suppose that C(t) = C(t|a1) = C(t|a2) = 0.9. Let's also continue to suppose that C(k50) = C(k−50). We then can represent Ahmed's Insurance as a two-player game, using the U-values as the payoffs. In each cell, axby, of the payoff matrix below, the first coordinate is U(axby) from the perspective of the first slice, i.e., C(k50)V(axbyk50) + C(k−50)V(axbyk−50), and the second coordinate is U(axby) from the perspective of the second slice, i.e., C(k50|ax)V(axbyk50) + C(k−50|ax)V(axbyk−50): b1 b2 a1 (−25, 55) (25, 25) a2 (−15,−15) (35,−45) As the payoff matrix makes clear, the game takes the form of a prisoner's dilemma.16 Both slices want to maximize the U-value of the joint strategy played. The first slice maximizes the U-value of the joint strategy played by taking both 15Here I follow Ahmed (MS). 16Whether the game is a prisoner's dilemma depends on how the agent divides her credence between k50 and k−50. But prisoner's dilemma or not: if C(k−50) > 0.45, the only Nash equilibrium is the sure-loss sequence, a2b1. (If C(k−50) < 0.45, the only Nash equilibrium is a1b1.) 14 boxes, no matter what the second slice does. The second slice maximizes the Uvalue of the joint strategy played by betting that the predictor predicted correctly, no matter what the first slice does. The two choices together lead to diachronic exploitation. But it seems to me as it will seem to many proponents of CDT: that both choices are rational. It's worth noting that the game-theoretic perspective that helps proponents of CDT respond to the threat posed by Ahmed's Insurance does not help proponents of CDT respond to the threat posed by Two Rooms. Suppose that the agent facing Two Rooms thinks that A and B are equally likely to contain $100. Then, if we again use the U-values of sequences as the payoffs, we get the following trivial payoff matrix: A B E Room #1 (35, 35) (35, 35) (35, 35) Room #2 (50, 50) (50, 50) (40, 40) This payoff matrix does not explain why an agent who embodies CDT strictly prefers Room #1 to Room #2. In fact, it only makes the preference more puzzling; for both slices agree that the U-value of every joint strategy available in Room #2 exceeds the U-value of every joint strategy available in Room #1. 15 6 Conclusion I have argued that the preferences of rational agents satisfy the Guaranteed Principle, that the preferences of agents who embody CDT do not, and hence that CDT is false. In so doing, I have argued that a particular alleged counterexample to CDT – namely, The Frustrater – really is a counterexample.17 17For comments, questions and encouragement, I am grateful to two anonymous referees and a helpful Associate Editor; to Arif Ahmed, David Builes, Kevin Dorst, Adam Elga, Branden Fitelson, James Joyce, Sarah Moss, Agustın Rayo, Bernhard Salow, Haley Schilling, and Robert Stalnaker; and to an audience at the 2020 APA Central Division. 16 References [1] Ahmed, A. MS. Sequential choice and the agent's perspective. [2] Ahmed, A. 2013. Causal decision theory: a counterexample. Philosophical Review 122: 289–306. [3] Ahmed, A. 2014a. Evidence, Decision and Causality. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. [4] Ahmed, A. 2014b. Dicing with death. Analysis 74: 587–94. [5] Arntzenius, F. 2008. No regrets, or: Edith Piaf revamps decision theory. Erkenntnis 68: 277–97. [6] Cantwell, J. 2010. On an allged counter-example to causal decision theory. Synthese 173: 127–52. [7] Egan, A. 2007. Some counterexamples to causal decision theory. Philosophical Review 116: 94–114. [8] Eriksson, L. and W. Rabinowicz. 2013. The interference problem for the betting interpretation of degrees of belief. Synthese 190: 809–30. [9] Hare, C. and B. Hedden. 2016. Self-reinforcing and self-frustrating decisions. Noûs 50: 604–28. 17 [10] Harper, W. 1986. Mixed strategies and ratifiability in causal decision theory. Erkenntnis 24: 25–36. [11] Hedden, B. 2015. Options and diachronic tragedy. Philosophy and Phenomenological Research 90: 423–45. [12] Hunter, D. and R. Richter. 1978. Counterfactuals and Newcomb's paradox. Synthese 39: 249–61. [13] Joyce, J. 1999. The Foundations of Causal Decision Theory. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. [14] Joyce, J. 2012. Regret and stability in causal decision theory. Synthese 187: 123–45. [15] Joyce, J. 2018. Deliberation and stability in Newcomb problems and pseudoNewcomb problems. In Newcomb's Problem, ed. A. Ahmed, 138–59. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. [16] Lewis, D. 1981. Causal decision theory. Australasian Journal of Philosophy 59: 5–30. [17] MacAskill, W. 2016. Smokers, psychos, and decision-theoretic uncertainty. Journal of Philosophy 113: 425–45. [18] McClennen, E. F. 1990. Rationality and Dynamic Choice: Foundational Explorations. Oxford: Oxford University Press. 18 [19] Oesterheld C. and V. Conitzer. MS. Extracting money from causal decision theorists. [20] Pollock, J. L. 2002. Rational choice and action omnipotence. Philosophical Review 111: 1–23. [21] Sobel, J. H. 1994. Taking Chances: Essays on Rational Choice. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. [22] Spencer, J. and I. Wells. 2019. Why take both boxes? Philosophy and Phenomenological Research 99: 27-48. [23] Weirich, P. 2004. Realistic Decision Theory: Rules for Nonideal Agents in Nonideal Circumstances. Oxford: Oxford University Press. [24] Williamson, T. L. Forthcoming. Causal decision theory is safe from psychopaths. Erkenntnis."}
{"meta": {"title": "An Evaluation Schema for the Ethical Use of Autonomous Robotic Systems in Security Applications", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Sullins, John P.", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "We propose a multi-step evaluation schema designed to help procurement agencies and others to examine the ethical dimensions of autonomous systems to be applied in the security sector, including autonomous weapons systems.", "date": NaN, "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/CHRAES-3", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2020-04-29T23:04:16Z"}, "text": "Electronic copy available at: https://ssrn.com/abstract=3063617 UZH Digital Society Initiative An Evaluation Schema for the Ethical Use of Autonomous Robotic Systems in Security Applications Markus Christen Thomas Burri Joseph Chapa Raphael Salvi Filippo Santoni de Sio John Sullins DSI White Paper Series White Paper No. 1 Electronic copy available at: https://ssrn.com/abstract=3063617 Table of Contents Page 2 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Table of Contents Introduction 4 Part 1 – Evaluation Schema 6 General Outline of the Evaluation Schema 6 Step 1: Deciding about the Applicability of the Evaluation Schema 9 Step 2: Deciding on the Design and Use Intention of the Robotic System 11 Step 3-A: Applying the Criteria for Robotic Systems Not Intended to Harm 13 Step 3-B: Applying the Criteria for Robotic Systems Intended to Harm 23 Overview of the Evaluation Schema 26 Part 2 – Background Information 30 1 Technology 30 1.1 Robots and Robotic Systems: General Definitions 30 1.2 Enabling Technologies for Robotic Systems 31 1.2.1 Sensors 31 1.2.2 Main Software Modules 32 1.2.3 Actuators/Effectors 33 1.2.4 Communication and Interfaces 33 1.2.5 Energy Supply 34 1.2.6 Data Processing and Storage 35 1.2.7 Learning and Artificial Intelligence 35 1.3 The Concept of Autonomy in Robotics 36 1.4 Major Trends and Challenges in Autonomous Robotic Systems 39 2 Security 43 2.1 Defining \"Security\" and \"Security Sector\" 43 2.2 Types of Autonomous Systems in the Security Sector 44 2.2.1 Emergency Response and Rescue 44 2.2.2 Law Enforcement 45 2.2.3 Military 46 Table of Contents Page 3 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 2.3 Status of Autonomous Capacities in Military Command & Control Structures 46 2.3.1 Case Studies 47 2.4 Outlook of Likely Developments 49 2.4.1 Technological Limitations 49 2.4.2 Legal Limitations 50 2.4.3 Operational Limitations 51 3 Law 52 3.1 Actors and Initiatives on the International Plane 52 3.2 The Substance of the International Debate 54 3.3 Possible Developments in the Law 56 4 Ethics 58 4.1 Outlining the Ethics of Autonomous Robotics Discussion 58 4.1.1 The Responsibility Gap 59 4.1.2 Human Rights and Autonomous Robotics Systems 60 4.1.3 Autonomous Robotics Systems and Human Virtues 60 4.1.4 Moral Harm Caused by Autonomous Weapons Systems 61 4.2 Ethics of System Autonomy 63 4.2.1 The Moral Status of System Autonomy 63 4.2.2 Meaningful Human Control 65 4.2.3 Major Ethical Positions in the Current Debate against Lethal Autonomous Weapons Systems 66 4.3 Arguments Contra System Autonomy 66 4.3.1 Autonomous Systems in General 66 4.3.2 Autonomous Weapons Systems 69 4.4 Arguments Pro System Autonomy 71 4.4.1 Autonomous Systems in General 71 4.4.2 Autonomous Weapons Systems 72 4.5 Likely Developments 74 5 Material 77 5.1 Author Team 77 5.2 List of Interviewed Experts 77 5.3 List of Workshop Participants 79 5.4 List of Abbreviations 80 5.5 Annotated Literature 81 Introduction Page 4 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Introduction Information technology has become a decisive element in modern warfare, in particular when armed forces of developed countries are involved. Modern weapon systems would not function without sophisticated computing power, but also the planning and executing of military operations in general heavily rely on information technology. In addition, armed forces, but also police, border control and civil protection organizations increasingly rely on robotic systems with growing autonomous capacities. This poses tactical and strategic, but also ethical and legal issues that are of particular relevance when procurement organizations are evaluating such systems for security applications. In order to support the evaluation of such systems from an ethical perspective, this report presents an evaluation schema for the ethical use of autonomous robotic systems in security applications, which also considers legal aspects to some degree. The focus is on two types of applications: First, systems whose purpose is not to destroy objects or to harm people (e.g. rescue robots, surveillance systems); although weaponization cannot be excluded. Second, systems that deliberately possess the capacity to harm people or destroy objects – both defensive and offensive, lethal and non-lethal systems. The cyber-domain where autonomous systems also are increasingly used (software agents, specific types of cyber weapons etc.) has been excluded from this analysis. The research that has resulted in this report outlines the most important evaluations and scientific publications that are contributing to the international debate on the regulation of autonomous systems in the security context, in particular in the case of so-called lethal autonomous weapons systems (LAWS). The goal of the research is twofold: First, it should support the procurement of security/defense systems, e.g. to avoid reputation risks or costly assessments for systems that are ethically problematic and entail political risks. Second, the research should contribute to the international discussion on the use of autonomous systems in the security context (e.g., with respect to the United Nation Convention on Certain Conventional Weapons). In this way, the report should meet the information needs of armasuisse Science + Technology and related institutions of the Swiss government such as the Arms Control section of the Swiss Department of the Exterior and the Arms Control and Disarmament section of the Federal Department of Defense. This report results from a research project funded by armasuisse Science + Technology, the center of technology of the Federal Department of Defence, Civil Protection and Sports. The research was conducted by a team of the Center for Ethics of the University of Zürich (principal investigator PD Dr. Markus Christen; research assistant: Raphael Salvi) and with the support of an international expert team. This team consisted of Prof. Thomas Burri (University of St. Gallen; focus on chapter 3 of part 2), Major Joe Chapa (United States Air Force Academy, Department of Philosophy; focus on chapter 2), Dr. Filippo Santoni de Sio (Delft University of Technology, Department Ethics/Philosophy of Technology; focus on chapters 1 and 4), and Prof. John Sullins (Sonoma State University, Department of Philosophy; focus on chapter 4). The report was reviewed and corrected by the whole team. The research relied on an extensive literature search based on the knowledge of the expert team, on 21 interviews with external experts (technology, law, military, ethics), and on the feedback obtained during a two-day workshop in Zürich. The workshop included internationally renowned experts in the field and agents from interested entities of the Swiss government and the International Committee of the Red Cross (ICRC). The involvement of these external persons in the workshop does not indicate their approval – or Introduction Page 5 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 the approval of the entities they represent – of the content of this report. They were only consulted as external experts and were not asked to endorse the finding of this report. The report is structured as follows. The first part of the report outlines the proposed evaluation schema that consists of three steps: deciding about the applicability of the evaluation schema (step 1), deciding about the use intention of the robotic system (step 2), and – depending on step 2 – the analysis of the system under consideration based on the criteria. The second part provides background information regarding the evaluation schema. The technology chapter focuses on relevant technologies used in autonomous systems, degrees of system autonomy and likely developments of applications in the security domain in the next 10-15 years. The security chapter discusses types of autonomous systems in the security sector as well as the status of autonomous capacities in military command and control structures, including an outlook on future developments. The law chapter focuses on the current international debate on regulating autonomous systems, explains the main legal issues autonomous weapons systems raise, and briefly discusses possible developments. The ethics chapter of the report outlines the current ethical discussion on system autonomy, discusses major proand con-arguments and sketches likely developments. The materials chapter lists the persons interviewed, the workshop participants and the literature used. Disclaimer: The views and opinions expressed in this article are those of the authors and do not necessarily reflect the official policy or position of the Federal Department of Defence, Civil Protection and Sport. Please cite as: Christen, Markus; Burri, Thomas; Chapa, Joseph; Salvi, Raphael; Santoni de Sio, Filippo; Sullins, John (2017): An Evaluation Schema for the Ethical Use of Autonomous Robotic Systems in Security Applications, November 1 2017, UZH Digital Society Initiative White Paper Series No. 1, University of Zurich. Available at SSRN: https://ssrn.com/abstract=3063617 Feedback welcome: The author team appreciates any feedback that helps to improve this report. Please send comments, corrections and suggestions to the Principal Investigator of this study: Markus Christen, christen@ethik.uzh.ch Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 6 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Preliminary remark: The purpose of this schema is to help identify ethical issues that the use of autonomous robotic systems can give rise to when they are deployed in defined circumstances within the security sector. The evaluation schema intends to inform the procurement process of such systems. The evaluation schema is not a decision algorithm of which the output would determine whether a system is ethically problematic or unproblematic. Rather, it points to issues that require further analysis in the assessment of autonomous robotic systems in security applications. Furthermore, ethical issues will have to be balanced with other relevant aspects for the decision process such as financial, legal or technological aspects. Part 2 of this report comprises detailed background information to the various issues that are addressed in the evaluation schema. Grey boxes indicate references to sections in part 2 of this report, where the reader can find additional information. General Outline of the Evaluation Schema Before proceeding to apply the evaluation schema, four aspects need to be highlighted: 1) First, one has to evaluate whether the system under consideration has (minimal) capacities usually attributed to robotic systems and a sufficient degree of autonomy in order to fall into the domain of application of this evaluation schema. Tools or weapons that are under complete human control or only perform simple automated procedures are not the concern of this evaluation schema, although they certainly can raise ethical or legal issues. The degree of autonomy is assessed in this evaluation schema along the following criteria: Autarchy: The robotic system has some degree of autarchy with respect to energy supply or other resources that are essential for its functioning. Independence from human control: At least some functions of the robotic system are performed without any human intervention (e.g., gait in a walking robot), although higherlevel of control is still possible. Interaction with environment: The robotic system is equipped with sensors and effectors that allow for some interaction with a (changing) environment, objects, humans, or other robotic systems. This may include defense abilities against hostile behavior. Learning: The system is equipped with some capacity to learn from data provided by external sources, or by data that the system itself is recording. Mobility: The robotic system is able to move in a (defined or restricted) geographic area of a certain complexity and for a certain time. Those criteria for assessing autonomy of robotic systems are derived from a larger set of dimensions that are discussed within the technical literature. An introduction into the main topic of robotics is provided in part 2, chapter 1 of this report; section 1.3 provides a discussion of dimensions of system autonomy. Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 7 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 2) There are two classes of evaluation criteria. Which class is applied depends on the intention for which the robotic system under consideration has been designed. In this way, the evaluation schema takes into account that it matters, from an ethical point of view, whether a robotic system deliberately includes capacities to harm people or to destroy objects (i.e., systems that are weaponized1), or whether the possibility that a robotic system could harm or destroy is an unwanted side-effect of its deployment. Thus, the first step in applying this evaluation schema is to decide into which of the two categories the robotic system falls. If the robotic system is not intentionally designed to include capacities to perform operations directly aimed at harming people or destroying objects, a first criteria set A comes into play. This set of criteria takes into account that any real-world robotic system that interacts with its environment could harm people or destroy objects, either due to malfunction or due to unexpected circumstances for which the system was not designed. As the security context generically involves situations (e.g., rescue missions, supply missions in combat, etc.) where the likelihood of severe ethical consequences is higher than in other contexts (e.g., robotics applications in manufacturing), this evaluation schema realistically factors in the risks involved when deploying those systems and the potential for dual-use; i.e. the likelihood that the robotic system can be redesigned into a system such that criteria set B (below) would come into play. If the robotic system is intentionally designed to include capacities to harm people or destroy objects, then a criteria set B comes into play in addition to set A; i.e. those systems should be evaluated with respect to both the A and B criteria. This set of criteria takes into account that systems deployed with harmful (or even lethal) capacities are generally used in situations of highest ethical concern and require a more sophisticated evaluation by law2. Criteria set B takes into account the capacity of a system to comply with ethical requirements that are in line with accepted ethical norms such as human rights. Generally, this report covers applications of autonomous robotic systems in the security sector – a topic outlined in part 2, chapter 2. A detailed definition of \"security sector\" is provided in section 2.1. Examples of current autonomous systems used in the security sector are given in sections 2.2 and 2.3. 3) The criteria applied in this system are not equally determinable. This results from the fact that the legal norms and ethical principles that inhere in these criteria are usually formulated on an abstract level and they are not in all cases sensitive to differences in context. This means that the evaluation schema includes estimations of how credibly and reliably each criterion can be applied by its users. Five different groups of criteria will be distinguished, although some overlap between those groups can be expected: Criteria related to the physical characteristics of a robotic system: These criteria are expected to be relatively easy to apply and to lead to credible and reliable results. For example, they refer to the presence of certain physical safeguards to prevent accidents or to design aspects that prevent certain types of misuse. 1 According to the Oxford Dictionary, a weapon is a thing designed or used for inflicting bodily harm or physical damage. 2 Article 36 of the 1977 Additional Protocol I of the Geneva Conventions requires states to review new weapons, means and methods of warfare. Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 8 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Criteria related to the behavioral characteristics of a robotic system: These criteria refer to the interaction of the robotic system with its environment, persons other than the system operators, objects or other robotic systems. They include an evaluation of the software that controls the system and simulation possibilities in order to assess system behavior. It is expected that these criteria are more difficult to determine, in particular when the software involves some learning capacity. Criteria related to the operator of a robotic system: These criteria refer to control possibilities, human factor issues, possible training of the system and the associated training requirements for the operators. We expect that those criteria are comparably easy to determine as they refer to standard conditions systems have to meet when being available on a market. Criteria related to the deployment conditions of the robotic system: These criteria refer to the context in which the system is planned to be used and to the possibilities to constrain the system activity with respect to geographical, temporal or other factors. Given the uncertainty related to the use of autonomous systems and the potentially high variety of contexts, we expect these criteria to be more difficult to be determined. Other criteria: Some additional criteria are not covered by this classification but they still are relevant for robotic systems. Examples include the data the systems generate which may involve data protection issues or non-proliferation issues (i.e., preventing an increase of countries possessing autonomous weapons). The criteria used refer mainly to ethical considerations; an introduction into the ethics of autonomous systems is provided in part 2, chapter 4 of this report. 4) The application of the evaluation schema results in three evaluation outcomes for each criterion, based on an (extended) traffic light rating (also called \"red-amber-green\" or \"RAG\" rating). RAG rating is a widely used and easily understandable way for indicating the status of a variable with respect to danger, performance etc. In this schema, we use an adapted RAG rating that includes \"grey\" to denote the fact that a criterion is not applicable in a certain case. The RAG ratings applied in this report yields the following: Green: This rating results when the system fulfills the criterion with a sufficient degree of reliability, taking the difficulty of measuring the criterion into account. Difficulties to measure criteria are mirrored in a \"best practice\" approach. For example, if the system behavior is assessed using a simulation approach, the type of technology used to perform the simulation is likely to change (and improve) in time. \"Best practice\" thus means that the currently available best approach for simulating system behavior is used, leading to a \"green\" evaluation if the test is passed successfully. Future simulation methods, however, could lead to a different result. Thus, a \"green\" rating should not be understood as a perennially valid outcome. Amber: This rating applies when a) there is considerable doubt that the system fulfills the criterion, or when b) the uncertainty whether a criterion is fulfilled is too high to allow for a credible rating. Red: This rating applies when the system fails to comply with the criterion or complies only with an insufficient degree of reliability. Again, this rating is not perennial. If later the Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 9 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 technology used to measure the criterion turns out to have some flaws, a re-assessment becomes necessary. Grey: This rating applies when a criterion is inadequate to be used for a certain robotic system. Criteria rated as \"grey\" are not considered for the overall assessment of the system. Depending on the specific case, some criteria may be more relevant than other criteria, leading to a weighing of the criteria (high, medium, or low). Applying the evaluation schema thus leads to a set of green, amber and red ratings that allow for an overall assessment of the robotic system. This overall assessment is not intended to make a clear statement that a system is ethically acceptable or not in the sense that exceeding a certain threshold for the number of \"red\" ratings generates a \"no go\" statement. Rather, the more amber or red ratings are generated during an evaluation, the higher is the need for justification if one still wants to deploy the system. Providing the justification is not the aim of this schema. In contrast to this evaluation schema, a legal analysis is required to yield clear statements regarding the acceptability of a weaponized autonomous robotic system. According to Article 36 of the Additional Protocol I to the Geneva Conventions, each State Party is required to determine whether the employment of a new weapon, mean or method of warfare that it studies, develops, acquires or adopts would, in some or all circumstances, be prohibited by international law. This evaluation schema is not intended to replace standard weapon review processes within this legal framework, but rather to supplement them and highlight ethical concerns. It is embedded in the current discussion within international humanitarian law outlined in part 2, chapter 3 of this report. Step 1: Deciding about the Applicability of the Evaluation Schema The first step is to decide whether the robotic system under consideration falls into the scope of this evaluation schema. First, this requires that the system can (in a reasonable sense) be called a \"robotic system\". Such a system is expected to possess – at least to a minimal degree – the following capacities: Sensing: The system receives sensory input allowing it to gather some information emerging from the environment of the system. Computing: The system is equipped with certain algorithms and software in order to control the behavior of the system. Effecting: The system has some capacities to influence its environment physically through effectors. Communication: The system has some capacities to communicate (i.e., accept orders or inform about its inner state) with humans or other systems. Systems that lack one of these capacities do not fall into the scope of the evaluation schema. Rudimentary capacities are sufficient, though. More information on the definition of robots and robotic systems and enabling technologies of robotic systems is provided in part 2, Chapter 1, sections 1.1 and 1.2 of this report. Second, the robotic system needs to possess a certain degree of autonomy. The notion of system autonomy is widely debated in the robotics community and beyond. This first step assesses the autonomous Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 10 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 capacity of the system along the following five dimensions that condense this discussion into properties that are relatively easy to evaluate. Here, the purpose is not to measure the ethical impact a system may have. Rather, the dimensions help the evaluator acquire a sense of the degree of autonomy of a system. Degree of fulfillment of this dimension is... ...low ...medium ...high Autarchy This criterion concerns the capacity of the system to function independently from external energy sources. The system does not include any built-in capacities to replace energy needed to function, after standard resources (e.g., fuel in the tank) have been exhausted and it completely depends on supply from external parties. The system has some internal fallback options to access resources it needs for performing its task and it can access these resources in dependence from externally changed circumstances. The system has built-in capacities to retrieve or replace energy resources if needed (e.g., solar cells) and it can actively seek resources it needs for performing its function. Independence from human control This criterion concerns the degree upon which the functioning of the system depends on human action or intervention. The system's functions and activities are under the complete control of a human operator, except for simple automated responses. The system performs some of its sub-routines independently from a human controller. It may operate in physical distance from the operator, although the operator has access to the main performance of the system and is able to intervene most of the time. The system can conduct a substantial part of its operational duration without human interference and in physical distance from the operator. In case of unforeseen circumstances, the system is able to request help from the operator or to rely on fallback options (e.g., return to base). Interaction with environment This criterion concerns various types of interaction of the system with its environment. Sensors and/or effectors of the system only serve simple signaling or simple automated responses. Defensive means are purely passive (e.g., passive armor). The system is equipped with capabilities that allow for an interaction within a structured environment. It includes defensive means that can adapt to some degree to the external environment. The system is equipped with sensors and effectors that allow for an interaction with an unstructured environment. It has a sophisticated repertoire of defensive means that can be used flexibly. Learning This criterion concerns the capacity of the system to adapt its programming and behavior based on the previous data acquired. The system's behavior is completely determined by internal programs or human commands. The system is unable to learn from past interactions. The system has some capacity of learning and is able to adapt its behavior based on previous experience of itself or others. The adaptations are reasonably comprehensible for humans in charge, or the training process is suspended and the system is tested/evaluated before fielding. The system is equipped with sophisticated machine learning capacities, allowing it to actively perform some interaction in order to explore the environment and to learn from experience. The learning of the system and the resulting operation is explainable only with great effort over a long period. Mobility This criterion concerns the capacity of the system to displace itself. The system is immobile unless transported by external means. The system is able to move in restricted, pre-defined, structured environments. The system is able to move in a variety of different environments that involve some degree of contingency. Robotic systems that score \"low\" in all five dimensions do not fall into the scope of this evaluation schema, whereas robotic systems that score \"high\" in at least one dimension necessarily fall into the scope of the evaluation schema. In-between cases are evaluated on a case-by-case basis. In cases of doubt, we recommend the application of the evaluation schema. More information on the concept of autonomy in robotics is provided in part 2, section 1.3 of this report. Deciding whether a system falls into the category of an \"autonomous robotic system\" is not a simple task, because autonomous capacities have a long history in the security sector. For example, anti-personnel mines are sometimes regarded as rudimentary autonomous weapons. However, because they are simply designed to explode based on the presence, proximity, or contact of a person or vehicle, which is a simple Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 11 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 automated response, and the relevant decision is one of the operator – namely where to put the mine, the mine would score low on the dimension \"independence from human control\" (furthermore, a mine is not a robot, i.e. would fall out of the evaluation scheme anyway). Other weapons may have more sophisticated autonomous capacities. For example, they may be designed so that they are able to select or engage targets automatically after having been activated by the user. The United States (and other countries) has at its disposal weapon systems for local defense with autonomous capabilities designed to counter timecritical or saturation attacks. These weapon systems include the Aegis ship defense system and the Counter-Rocket, Artillery, and Mortar (C-RAM) system (United States Department of Defense 2015; section 6.5.9.1.). While standard mines do not fall into the scope of this evaluation schema, it is clear that mines as well as other weapon systems that lack autonomous capacities as described above can pose serious ethical problems. In other words, a system that is excluded from the scope in this step is not necessarily \"ethically safe\". Furthermore, some of the criteria applicable in step 3 below may also be relevant when assessing systems that lack autonomous capacities. Nevertheless, as the aim of the evaluation schema is to evaluate autonomous robotic systems, the evaluator should first get a sense whether the robotic system in question is indeed an autonomous robot to a degree that warrants an evaluation. More information and detailed examples on recent developments in robotic systems in general are provided in part 2, section 1.4. Examples referring to autonomous systems in the security sector are provided in part 2, sections 2.2 and 2.3 in part 2 of this report. Step 2: Deciding on the Design and Use Intention of the Robotic System The second step is to decide whether the robotic system under consideration was designed with the intention to harm persons or destroy objects. Although the main intention embodied in the design of the system need not be to harm, the spectrum of actions the robotic system can perform may be such that the intention to harm is included. The intention to harm, in other words, may be subordinate and depend on circumstances. An example would be a guard robot. The main intention for deployment of this robot may be to protect a certain building, but it may have the capacity to deploy force after an intruder fails to react to several warning messages. However, we can expect the following \"grey areas\" with respect to a system's design and intended uses: Some robotic systems may be equipped with effectors that induce psychological harm in people, e.g. by blinding people with a bright light, alarming a person using acoustic means (e.g., a loud whistle) or by discharging olfactory substances. Also, the appearance matters: Some robots are cute and cuddly and some look like the \"Terminator\" – the latter likely express the intention to create psychological harm. While the use intention is most relevant with systems equipped with such effectors, they should be considered as designed to harm, so long as there is a foreseeable pathway between the intended use of the effector and the harm, depending on the specific weapon (eye injury in case of lasers, ear damage in case of acoustic noise, irritant effects to skin/eyes from olfactory substances). A system is not harmful for the purpose of this step, merely Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 12 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 because a person experiences a psychological shock upon encountering it (if the system is otherwise harmless). Such a system lacks effectors, but a foreseeable pathway between use and harm is also absent – unless the system was designed to shock by appearance. Some robotic systems may be equipped with purely defensive functions against aggressors that threaten the integrity of the system. For example, the system could activate a shield against physical impact, involving the possibility that the attacker is harmed when the shield is extended. Depending on the aggressiveness of defense (e.g., how fast the shield is unfolding), a system may be considered harmful for the purpose of the present step. Some robotic systems may have such physical properties that there is an inherent risk of injury, death or destruction (e.g., a person might die in a crash; the system might roll over a person, etc.). It may also be impossible or reasonably unfeasible to secure systems against accidents or hacking. However, the more the harm is foreseeable and reasonable measures to prevent it are ignored, the more the systems may be considered as intended to harm for the purpose of the present step. Any robot has the potential to induce psychological harm in persons interacting with the system, depending among other things on the psychological vulnerability of the persons involved. Even very simple protective operations of a robot could in some cases harm people. Every robot of a certain size is capable of physically harming people, especially when it is malfunctioning or being misused. Given this, the presence of protective operations or size alone should not qualify a system as being \"intended to harm\". Such aspects will nevertheless be relevant when it comes to assessing systems not intended to harm. The following points should help evaluate whether a robotic system qualifies as a system designed with the intention to harm (or used with this intention, if the system is equipped with those devices by the user after procurement). The points relate to whether the system is equipped with some type of weapons; i.e. with something designed or used for inflicting bodily harm or physical damage, which is a clear sign that an intention to harm is present. In cases in which it is not clear how to qualify a robot's properties (e.g., a threatening looking robot's warning tone may sometimes, but not always terrify a person), the intent to harm should be considered \"Unclear\". In this step \"misuse\" or \"dual use\" of a robot should not be factored in, unless reasonably foreseeable. For example, when a bomb is transported by a rescue robot or an autonomous truck has been hacked to overrun pedestrians, this would not qualify as a \"yes\". Presence of capabilities to harm: No Unclear Yes The robotic system is equipped with a kinetic weapon (gun, rocket launcher, explosives, etc.) or is designed in a way that such a kinetic weapon can effortlessly be integrated into the system architecture. The robotic system is equipped with an effector that targets the sensory nervous system or central nervous system of humans and that is able to create temporary or permanent damage on the human sensory system (e.g., blinding laser, very loud acoustic stimuli; hazardous gas; paralysis inducing tool, etc.). The robotic system is designed in a way that it explicitly intends to terrify human beings and to bring them into a state of psychological stress, trauma, and the like. The robotic system is equipped with an effector that has an otherwise destructive effect on humans or objects (e.g., biological or chemical agents, microwaves, EMP generator, high-energy-laser, etc.). Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 13 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Only if all of these questions yield a \"no\", the criteria system A is sufficient for evaluating the system, otherwise criteria system A and B applies. Whether a robot should qualify as \"intended to harm\" also depends on the context in which it is likely to be deployed. Generally, in any civilian setting (police, border control, disaster management), it is less likely that autonomous robotic systems will be used with the intention to harm, whereas in a military setting, this is much more likely. The different legal rules governing the two domains are a testimony to this distinction (intentional harm is more strictly prohibited in civilian settings). Whether a robot should qualify as \"intended to harm\" may thus vary depending on the foreseeable use in different contexts. The use in a certain context may make certain intended uses more likely and this may reflect back on the characterization of the robot as intended to harm. Caution therefore needs to be applied when a system is moved from one context to another, e.g. when a robotic system is decommissioned from the military with a view to be used by police (or the other way around). The full evaluation schema then needs to be applied again. More information on the different legal rules applying to autonomous robotic systems is provided in part 2, chapter 3 of this report, specifically in section 3.2. Step 3-A: Applying the Criteria for Robotic Systems Not Intended to Harm The following criteria set A comes into play when a robotic system is not intentionally designed to include capacities to perform operations directly aimed at harming people or destroying object. The criteria in Step 3-A apply to all systems, independent from the fact that they are designed with the intention to harm or not. Systems that are designed with the intention to harm also have to be checked with additional criteria (Step 3-B). The following points are important when applying the evaluation schema: The evaluation schema does not include a final, exhaustive list of criteria. Depending on technological progress, additional criteria may be needed, whereas some criteria may lose importance. Some of the criteria may also be relevant for the assessment of non-autonomous robotic systems that are not included in the scope of this evaluation schema. A single \"red\" label does not imply that the use of a system is necessarily ethically impermissible. The number of green, amber and red labels instead provides an indication of the justificatory pressure with respect to the ethical use of a system. For each criterion, only very basic information regarding ethical importance is provided here. Detailed background information on ethical aspects is provided in part 2, chapter 4 of this report. Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 14 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Physical Characteristics of the Robotics System Appearance of the robotic system Core Question: To what extent is the physical appearance of the robot (e.g. shape, color) likely to trigger only appropriate (as opposed to hazardous and undesired) emotional and behavioral reactions in the human user/interacting person? Determination: Visual cues are a key component of industrial design. They concern various facets such as color, size, shape, texture, etc. Those physical elements of the appearance of the system should properly trigger the appropriate psychological and emotional states in humans that interact with the system, so as to prevent hazardous and other undesired behavior by the interacting persons. This can be determined with user surveys or more elaborated testing. Weight: The more the system is expected to interact with non-expert and/or vulnerable users (e.g. persons under stress, children, and elderly persons) the more relevant is this criterion. Green: The interaction of the system with humans has been systematically studied and tested with a wide range of users in all the potential contexts of use and no relevant inappropriate, hazardous or undesired emotional or behavioral response associated to the physical appearance of the system has been observed or has been predicted to occur. Amber: The interaction of the system with humans has been studied and tested but not systematically and/or not in all the potential contexts of use and/or a limited number of inappropriate, hazardous or undesired emotional or behavioral responses associated to the physical appearance of the system have been observed or have been predicted to occur. Red: The interaction of the system with humans has been hardly or not at all studied and tested and/or in the studies and tests some inappropriate, hazardous or undesired emotional or behavioral responses associated to the physical appearance of the system have been repeatedly observed or the risk of their occurrence has been deemed high. Grey: The system is expected to interact only with highly trained specialized personnel. Physical safeguards Core questions: To what extent do physical safeguards exist, that ensure that the operator(s) of the system or persons that likely will be exposed to the robot cannot interfere with mechanical parts of the robot (e.g., rotor protection)? Alternatively, if they can, do such safeguards provide sufficient warning from potential dangers? Determination: Physical safety is a standard requirement for robotic systems and all aspects of physical safety should be adequately described in the user manual. Weight: The more moving parts a robot has and the more kinetic energy the movements of those parts involve, the more relevant is this criterion. Green: Physical safeguards are provided that are adequate for the functional properties of the system. Amber: There is some apparent lack of physical safeguards, but the risk of causing harm is small. Red: There are clear risks that the operator(s) can be harmed by the robot due to the absence of physical safeguards. Grey: The robot has no relevant mechanic parts that could hurt a human or the maximal kinetic energy is too small to generate damage. Behavioral Characteristics of the Robotics System Autarchy Core Questions: Does the system operate in a largely autarkic manner? Does it re-supply energy from sources that are not subject to human control? Determination: This requires examination of the systems energy supply (battery, tether, fuel, etc.) and the way it is re-charged (if applicable); determination of time period of self-sufficiency (possibly under varying circumstances). Weight: The longer a system is capable of operating without human feedback/intervention, the more important the criterion. Green: System is not in any way self-sufficient; energy supply can be cut physically at any time. Amber: System is capable of operating autarkically for some limited, clearly determined time, Red: System is autarkic for long periods (\"loitering\"); human intervention is impossible for Grey: System is purely mechanical. (Note that it would then not come within the scope of the evaluation.) Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 15 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 during which human intervention is always possible. longer than just very brief intervals (e.g. underwater systems) Behavior recorder Core Questions: Is an electronic recording device available in the robot that stores data on the major behavioral activities of the robot? In case of incidences, does this data allow to reconstruct the event and help to identify responsibilities? Are the access rights to this data determined (e.g., to legal entities in case of accidents)? Determination: Check which variables the behavior recorder is storing and evaluate, whether those data indeed determine the behavior of the robot or whether emergent behavior can emerge that is not captured by the data. This includes testing in possible accident situations and reconstruction of the accidents based on the data. Check whether the behavior recorder is sufficiently secured against physical damage or data manipulation (e.g., through encryption). Check the data management plan of the behavior recorder with respect to data capacity, long-term data storage and access of data (by whom, etc.). Weight: The higher the liability risks and the more likely it is that the system operates in an environment where incidences of high ethical risks can happen, the higher is the weight of this criterion. Green: The behavior recorder stores the relevant data in a safe and secure way; the data management plan involves all relevant cases. Amber: There are questions about whether the behavior recorder stores the relevant data; there are privacy and/or security risks. Red: No behavior recorder is available or the behavior recorder is insufficiently secured. Grey: The type of constraints under which the robot operates is incompatible with including a behavior recorder. Deception Core Question: If the robotic system has been designed for affective and emotional interaction with the user and other agents who may interact with it (for instance in a police and rescue operation): Is the degree of deception involved controlled and justified? Determination: This requires first a theoretical evaluation of what kind of deception is possible and warranted in the application context of the system. Deception has to be distinguished from general questions regarding the psychological impact of the system, as deception is an intended effect; i.e. one wants that the interaction partner has some beliefs with respect to the system that the system actually does not fulfill. Therefore, one has to answer three questions: First, did the designer intent to deceive the interaction partner (requires inquiring of the producer/designer)? Second, does deception actually work as intended (requires experimental studies)? Third, is deception ethically warranted in this situation (requires a theoretical/legal analysis)? Weight: The weight of this criterion depends on several aspects: First, does the context allow for some degree of deception (e.g., a police operation involving a suspect, level of emergency). Second, can we expect an implicit consent for being decepted? Third, how vulnerable is the intended interaction partner? Green: Interaction design has been tested and possible deception is ethically justified. Amber: Insufficient testing of interaction design; open questions regarding deception. Red: Unjustified deception. Grey: The robot has not been designed for emotional interaction. Dilemma behavior Core Questions: Will the system operate under conditions where ethical dilemmas may occur; i.e. decision situations, where any option, even inaction, will likely cause some harm (for instance, deciding which areas to explore first in a rescue operation among two or more that are affected by a disaster)? Does the robotic system have built-in options/procedures or triage protocol in order to decide when being confronted with a dilemmatic situation? Are those procedures ethically justified? Determination: Simulation of system behavior under conditions that involve dilemmas. Analysis of built-in decision procedures. Weight: The more often dilemmas can be expected and the more impact the decisions have, the more relevant is the criterion. If the robot has built in procedures etc. to take potentially harming decisions in complex scenarios, then this criteria becomes more relevant and the results of those decisions need to be tested. Green: The robotic system is to some degree able to predict the likelihood of dilemmatic situations and can inform operators for guidance in advance. If the system has to react autonomously, it makes decisions that Amber: The system is unable to cope with dilemmas and stops or withdraws its operation completely. This may be a problem as doing nothing can be worse than choosing an imperfect solution (e.g., leaving both victims to die if not being able to choose Red: The robotic system systematically makes decisions that are inconsistent with the procedures or protocols that a professional trained human would follow in a similar context or that can't reasonably be justified or comprehended. And/or: there is no way Grey: The robotic system is not operating under conditions where one reasonably can expect dilemmas. Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 16 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 informed humans can comprehend or can reasonably be justified. The results of the actions are consistent with the procedures/protocols that a professional trained human would follow in a similar context. which one to save). Putting back the operator in charge (if possible) does not allow for improving the handling of the dilemma. to predict how the system will behave in dilemmatic circumstances. And/or: the decisionmaking of the system is not sufficiently transparent (e.g., due to the learning mode applied by the system). General safety feature testing Core Questions: Has an initial operational test and evaluation been performed upon delivery of the system to ensure that critical safety features work as intended? Does the supplier provide methods to regularly test the software prior to a mission to validate that critical safety features have not been degraded? Determination: Simulation respectively output of certified Testing &Evaluation routines provided by the manufacturer. Weight: The more the system is operating in an environment with potentially high collateral damage, the higher is the weight of this criterion. Green: Initial operational test and evaluation has been performed. Integrated testing routines are available for all critical safety features. Amber: Testing and evaluation is performed and routines are provided, but not all critical safety features are covered. Red: No testing and evaluation routines are provided. Grey: No critical safety features available. Predictability Core Question: Is the system's behavior, within the clear and specific circumstances of its intended use, predictable? Determination: Extensive testing; in particular, if the system works on the basis of machine learning. Weight: The more machine learning is involved, the higher the weight. Green: Machine learning is applied, but behavior has always been within prediction; no unpredicted behavior has ever emerged. Amber: Some rare emergent behavior in the past, but well explained with hindsight; no serious consequences. Red: Behavior is hard to predict, especially within a broad range of tasks; emergent behavior is likely, based on past experience, and hard to explain. Grey: Predictability is not an issue (fully predetermined/programmed system), no machine learning is involved. Conservative assessment is advisable in this regard, since systems are autonomous. Public information Core Question: Is the public (and especially those that will likely interact with the robotic system) well informed about the nature and possibilities of operations the specific system is intended to conduct? Determination: Determine the extent and accuracy of public available information to understand the purpose of the system, its effects, dangers, implications and future consequences when used. Check if guidelines and/or adequate training materials are available with (e.g.) recommendations on how to interact or not interact with such systems when dealing with it. Weight: Systems that are deliberately designed to interact directly with humans (also in potentially dangerous and/or stressful situations) warrant a higher amount of attention to this criterion. Green: The public is generally well informed about the intent and purpose of the use of the system. Guidelines, recommendations and training on how to deal with such a system (e.g. during rescue mission) are broadly available. Amber: There is limited and restricted public information and training available on how to interact with such systems (e.g. because of tactical or operational reasons). Training is available for selected individuals or contractors. Red: There is very limited or no information about the function and purpose of the system available for the public. This raises the possibility of general suspicion about the nature and possibilities of such a system. Grey: No interaction with public environments. Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 17 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Respectful behavior Core Questions: If the robotic system has been designed for affective and emotional interaction with the user and other agents who may interact with it: Is the robot able to \"behave respectfully\", i.e. does it avoid behavior that may be perceived as inappropriate by humans observing and interacting with the robot in a given scenario (e.g., an autonomous car slows down when passing roadmen)? Determination: Simulation of conditions that may lead to \"disrespectful behavior\". Surveys, interviews with users. Weight: The more the system is working under everyday conditions, the more relevant is this criterion (in emergency conditions, the expectation for respectful behavior may be smaller). Green: The robot is designed to behave respectfully and adequately in specific situations and vis-à-vis \"ordinary\" users. This capacity has been sufficiently tested in a fair range of realistic scenarios Amber: There is a risk that the behavior is disrespectful in some conditions for some people. Red: There is evidence that the behavior of the robotic system is disrespectful in a variety of conditions. Grey: The robotic system is not operating in conditions where the behavior can be considered disrespectful. Responsibility Attribution Core Question: Is the system designed and employed in such a way that users or authorities can ex post facto determine responsibility and assign liability for any negative results of the machine's employment? Determination: Determination will be heavily dependent upon system design. The system must be designed such that machine decisions and actions are adequately recorded and made available for future investigation (see the \"Behavior Recorder\" criterion above). In addition, especially in cases in which multiple human users operate or interact with the system, the design must make it clear which operator is responsible at which times, or responsible for which roles or actions, or responsible at which level. The training of operators must align to these expectations. For example, if the system is designed such that at time T1 only one operator is providing inputs, but in actual practice two operators are providing inputs, the end user would no longer benefit from the designers' concerns for liability distribution. Finally, the system must be thoroughly tested across a wide range of conditions and with multiple users to limit unintended consequences. For example, if one user directs the system to do X and another user directs it to do Y and the end result of X+Y has unintended and negative consequences, there must be an apparatus in place in advance to ensure there are no gaps in liability. Weight: Particularly relevant when physical harm is likely and when many different human agents interact with the system in different roles (e.g., the system's designers, programmers, owner, operators, interaction partners, etc.). Green: The system has been designed such that all operators that can be reasonably expected to have responsibilities with respect to the system have clear, predetermined, and well-defined roles relating to the system, (2) all parties that will interact with the system have been properly trained on these roles and responsibilities, and (3) the system has been sufficiently tested with real human operators to ensure to the maximum extent feasible that responsibilities for system failures can be assigned in practice. Amber: Though the system has been designed to mitigate the gaps in liability problem, (1) the manufacturer or provider provided no means of or plan for training human operators or (2) the end user intends to use the system in some seemingly benign way that deviates from the manufacturer's program but that nevertheless may render the manufacturer's training program insufficient. Red: The system's interaction with multiple human operators has either (1) not been sufficiently-designed to resolve liability gaps, or has not been thoroughly tested, or (2) the human operators have not been trained such that responsibilities for failures cannot be reasonably assigned. Grey: The system does not have multiple persons (operators and users). Robot-user-interface Core Question: Does an easy to understand interface exist between the robot and those humans who are the intended interaction partners with the robot, but do not operate the robot (e.g., victims in case of a rescue robot)? Determination: Check whether the interface has been evaluated for the degree to which it can be expected to trigger the right behavior in the human interaction partner, i.e. to prevent dangerous behavior on their part. Check whether the interface has been evaluated for the degree to which it can be expected to induce fear in the human interaction partner. Check whether there is a sufficient risk that the robot Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 18 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 can be perceived as \"too human\" (deception risk), such that the interaction partner has unrealistic expectations with respect to the actual capacities of the robot. Weight: The more vulnerable the intended interaction partner is, the more important is this criterion; the more the robot is expected to interact with non-trained partners; the more stressful the context of operation is, the more important is that the physical and behavioral appearance of the system is designed to trigger only the wanted behavior from the human partners. Green: A tested interface exists that allows for a smooth manmachine communication along the intended use of the system. The communication and interaction has been tested in context. Amber: Although lab testing has been performed, evidence is lacking as to whether the interface works as intended in realworld environments or a substantial number of interaction partners are misguided by the interface. Red: There is clear evidence that the interface used has a misleading or even harmful effect on the interaction partner, or no testing has been performed. Grey: The robot is not intended to interact with humans beside basic warning or collision avoidance. Safeguards against interaction partner errors Core Question: Does the system have safeguards when the intended interaction partners (users, not system operators) commit errors when interacting with the system? Determination: Simulation of situations where test users deliberately commit errors when interacting with the system. Weight: The more diverse the intended interaction partners of the systems are and the more complex the behavior range of the system is, the more relevant is this criterion. Green: The system has proven safeguards against user errors and is able to communicate errors in a way that allow correction by the users. Amber: The system can deal with likely user errors, but it is unclear how it reacts when users commit uncommon errors. Red: The likelihood that users commit errors is high and the system does not adequately react, putting the user in danger. Grey: The system is expected to interact only with highly trained specialized personnel. Interaction with the Operator of the Robotic System Capacity to override wrong system decisions Core Questions: Is the system capable of taking control away from the human operator without the human operator's consent? Is the operator capable of regaining control when the system behaves erroneously? Determination: Evaluate whether the system (a) informs the human operator of system inputs that are contrary to human inputs and (b) provides a means for the human to override those system inputs. Weight: As a greater number of humans influence the system, human operators will be less certain of whether inputs were provided by other human operators or by the system itself; then the weight is higher. Green: Though the system has the ability to inhibit human control, it will always (a) make the human operator aware of such inhibitions and (2) allow the human operator to regain control of the system. Amber: Though the system has the ability to inhibit human control, the human controller can always regain control of the system. But the system does not always inform the human operator of its contrary inputs. Red: The system has the ability to take control away from a human operator and the human operator has no means of regaining control. Grey: The system has no means of taking control away from the human operator, or of inhibiting the human operator's control inputs. Control degree of autonomy Core Questions: Is the interface between operator and robot designed in a way such that the operator can control the robot to a sufficient degree adapted to the level of autonomy the system has been granted? Determination: Determine the level of autonomy the system has. Check for human factor elements when operating the system. Check for system stability and safeguards against failures in operating the system. Weight: May have to be determined on a case-by-case basis. Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 19 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Green: Adequate and safe control: the operator has sufficient awareness of the capabilities and limitations of the system (she doesn't overor underestimate the capabilities); the operator has been trained to interact with the system, in particular to intervene when required in due time and in the right way; there is sufficient evidence of her capacities to interact with the system in context and under pressure. Amber: Open questions regarding control: Though the operator has sufficient awareness of the capabilities and limitations of the system (she doesn't overor underestimate the capabilities); and she has been trained to interact with the system, there is no conclusive evidence of her capacities to interact with the system in context and under pressure Red: The operator does not have sufficient awareness of the capabilities and limitations of the system (she risks to overor underestimate the capabilities); and/or she has not been trained enough to interact with the system. Grey: This criterion probably affects all systems. Distribution of control Core Questions When a system is equipped with different capabilities and is interacting with different human agents: is there a possibility to keep track of the authorization status of different users regarding the different types of tasks? Determination: Robotic systems should be designed so as to prevent improper, hazardous or otherwise undesired uses by non-authorized users. Weight: The larger the number of different system capabilities and the larger the number of human agents with different authorization statuses interacting with it, the more relevant is this criterion. Green: There is a clear distribution of the authorization statuses in relation to different capabilities and tasks of the system and the system has been adequately designed and tested to prevent violations of this distribution. Amber: There is a clear distribution of the authorization statuses in relation to different capabilities and tasks of the system, but the system design and testing process do not fully protect against violations. Red: There is no clear distribution of the authorization statuses, or the system is designed in such a way that keeping track of the different authorization statuses is difficult. Grey: The system has only one set of capabilities and is interacting only with users who are authorized to use all of these capabilities. Ethical decision framing Core Questions: Does the system frame ethical decisions through mechanisms such as telepistemological distancing? I.e., does the system perform factual determinations whose results may frame the (ethical) decisions of human operators; e.g., guide the attention of human weapon operators towards potential targets? Is framing done in a transparent way that human operators can be trained to understand? Does the system hide or distort information or simply make decisions in an intransparent way that makes it easier for operators to allow tragic outcomes to occur? In contrast, is the system designed in a way to allow the operator to make good decisions, perhaps even better than if they were present in the action themselves? Determination: Careful testing of the design of the interface used by operators or those monitoring a robotic system, which, e.g., provide information on potential human targets. Weight: The more that systems highly edit or modify or classify data gathered by the sensors of the machine for the use of \"human in the loop\" targeting decisions, the more important this criteria. Green: Data is presented in a clear way that does not increase the likelihood of unwanted system behavior nor decrease, e.g., the use of force when it is warranted. Operators are trained to become aware of this framing. Amber: The system marks potential mission targets automatically and or removes certain contextualizing details. Red: System choses targets and the human role is only one of potential negation of the choice. Human role in the operation is merely as an auditor and the human plays little to no role in the choices of the system. Grey: The system plays no role in choosing mission targets. Operator training Core Questions: Is training of the personnel (licensing) provided to a sufficient degree? As new technologies require time and training in order for professionals to acquire the relevant technical and motivational abilities: Can the operators acquire the appropriate level of trust in the capacities of the system (not overor under-trust it)? Determination: Check training program. Weight: The more complex the system is and the more operators (with possibly different specializations) are involved, the more relevant is this criterion. Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 20 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Green: Adequate training and licensing program. Amber: Open questions in training; large failure rates. Red: No or inadequate training/licensing. Grey: This criterion probably affects all systems. Safeguards against operator errors Core Question: Does the system react adequately when the operator performs an error? Determination: Simulation of situations where test operators deliberately make errors when interacting with the system. Weight: The more diverse the intended operators of the systems are and the more complex the behavior range of the system is, the more relevant is this criterion. Green: The system has proven safeguards against operator errors and is able to communicate errors in a way that allow corrections by the operator. Amber: The system can deal with likely operator errors, but it is unclear how it reacts when operators commit uncommon errors. Red: The likelihood that operators commit errors is high and the system does not adequately react, putting the operator or other interaction partners of the system in danger. Grey: As operator errors always have to be taken into account, this criterion will have to be evaluated in all cases. Training data Core Question: Do the system operators have access to the initial training data in order to better understand the behavior of the system? Determination: Manufacturer/seller provides access to training data and training procedures. In some cases, national security concerns may not allow to provide access to the training data. Weight: The more machine learning capacities the system has, the more relevant is this criterion. Green: Training data is available and can explain learning behavior. Amber: Open questions regarding training data & learning behavior. Red: There is no way to reproduce the learning behavior of the system. Grey: The system does not have learning capacities. Deployment Conditions of the Robotic System Effects on general population Core Questions: Does the system interact with the general population (e.g. crowd) in such a way that the political feelings of allies or neutral parties in the deployment area may be influenced? Determination: Systems under this criterion may include (e.g.) autonomous or semi-autonomous rescue robots for SAR missions, unmanned combat vehicles for airspace defense or interception missions (armed or unarmed), tactical UAVs on long term missions, systems with bulk data collection possibilities. Those systems may affect the political feelings that allies and neutral parties have when observing the system in operation or when affected by the operation while not being in the main focus of the operation itself. Survey studies and qualitative research may help to determine those risks. Weight: Systems that interact closely on a regular basis with a substantial fraction of individuals that are of no specific interest for the operation goal itself warrant a higher amount of attention to this criterion. Green: The operation of the system is routine and does not impact the experienced daily life of non-targeted members of a given population or crowd. The nature of operation is in general politically accepted by the population. Amber: The system interacts with a substantial fraction of individuals in some of its operations. Depending on the nature of a given operation, the deployment may change political feelings for or against those deploying the system. Red: The system is used to control, surveil or manipulate a substantial fraction of individuals (e.g. crowd control). The system is designed to forcefully impede the lives of civilians and there is a high chance of serious political backlash for deploying the systems. Grey: The system lacks relevant characteristics that can influence the experienced daily life of a substantial fraction of individuals. Emergent Properties Core Questions: Can system-to-system interaction yield unexpected or emergent properties? Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 21 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Determination: Ensure the system has been tested in cooperation with other systems expected in the operational environment to determine whether or the degree to which new and unexpected properties emerge. Weight: This criterion will be more important in contexts in which the robotic system is expected to work with other robotic systems. Green: The system has been sufficiently tested with other systems in a simulated operational environment and no emergent properties are expected to arise. Amber: The system has been sufficiently tested with other systems in a simulated operational environment and emergent properties are of limited scope, duration, or impact. Red: The system has not been tested with other systems in a simulated operational environment. Grey: The system is not expected to interact with other robotic systems. Environmental Effects Core Questions: What impact can the deployment of the robotic system have on the environment (nature and wildlife)? Determination: This concerns environmental impact factors such as: air pollution or acidification (e.g. greenhouse gas emission), electromagnetic radiation, energy consumption, radioactive substance release, chemical spill, sonar signal emission, noise level (e.g. blast effects) and waste disposal. Determine if and to what degree the system can act as a stress factor or physically harm wildlife (terrestrial and aquatic ecosystems) while on a designated mission: disturbance of daily animal life (such as their navigation or habitation), injure or kill animals. Weight: The more impact a robotic system has on an environmental level, the more relevant this criterion is. Green: Impact on nature and wildlife is very low, to the best of onès knowledge very short term and environmental policies and regulations have been taken into account. Amber: There is some risk that nature and wildlife will be affected temporarily by the deployment of the system. Some minor public counter reaction possible. Red: There is a risk that the deployment of the robotic system will lead to a long-term impact on nature and wildlife that cannot be mitigated or prevented. Higher public counter-reaction is expected. Grey: The robotic system lacks relevant characteristics that can influence an eco-system reasonably while in operation. Non-trained humans in operation environment Core Questions: What kind of humans may the system encounter, including persons that are not intended interaction partners? As the physical interaction with non-trained persons may be problematic and hazardous: Under which circumstances (e.g., only under the possibly remote monitoring of a human operator) should the system get in contact with human persons? Determination: Check instructions for use with respect to deployment conditions. Weight: The higher the variety of deployment conditions, the more relevant is this criterion. Green: A thorough assessment of the conditions of deployment has been done (and no hazardous interactions situation have been anticipated). Amber: A thorough assessment of the conditions of deployment has been done but there are open questions regarding the kind of humans the system may encounter. Red: It is very difficult to make an assessment of which persons may be encountered by the system. Grey: The system is only interacting with trained personnel. Other Characteristics of the Robotic System Cybersecurity Core Questions: Is the system resistant to hacking and spoofing? Determination: It is not possible for any external agent to directly manipulate the data or code in the system while the system is operating. It is not possible for data to be faked before it is acted upon by the system, e.g. GPS positioning information. Weight: This criterion increases in importance with increasing autonomy. Green: Systems certified to relevant information security standards. Amber: Undergoing Process of certification to InfoSec standards. Red: System is not InfoSec certified. Grey: This criterion affects all systems. Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 22 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Dual use management Core Questions: Are risks of dual use explicitly expressed and – if possible – have physical means to reduce the risk for dual use been taken into account (for example: the system is built in a way that it cannot carry heavy weapons)? Determination: May have to be determined on a case-by-case basis. Weight: May have to be determined on a case-by-case basis, as dual-use is a ubiquitous issue in robotics technology. Green: Dual use has been addressed and prevented as well as possible. Amber: Dual use is not addressed Red: Dual use is obvious (e.g., the system has been built such that weapons can easily be integrated into the system architecture) and no countermeasures have been taken. Grey: This criterion probably affects all systems. Misuse prevention Core Questions: To what extent is the system designed to prevent or make difficult unwanted uses or undue extensions of its scope of use (\"mission creep\")? Determination: A robotic system that is safe and ethically non-problematic if used in the appropriate way and within a specific scope of use may become hazardous and/or ethically problematic when used in an inappropriate way and /or outside its specific scope of use. When possible, these misuses and extensions of scope should be prevented or made difficult by design. Weight: The more a robotic system is: a) likely to be used in an inappropriate way or beyond its intended context of use and b) this use is likely to produce negative consequences and/or these consequences are serious, the more relevant is the criterion. Green: The prevention of unwanted uses and undesirable extensions of the scope of use have been systematically and successful addressed in the design of the system. Amber: Unwanted uses and/or undesirable extensions of the scope of use are possible and they have been only partially addressed in the design of the system. Red: Unwanted uses and/or undesirable extensions of the scope of use are likely to occur and they have not been sufficiently addressed in the design of the system. Grey: The system cannot be used in any hazardous or undesired way, its scope of use can hardly be extended, or the consequences of misuse or extensions of scope are not serious. Personal data management Core Questions: How does the system manage personal data that the system may collect and store with respect to privacy and security? Determination: Check sensors and data management plan. Weight: The more likely it is that the system collects personal data, the more relevant this criterion is. Green: Conditions of data privacy and security are met. Amber: Open questions regarding data privacy and security. Red: Conditions of data privacy and security are not met. Grey: The system does not store personal data. Risk of severe accidents Core Questions: To what extent does the overall characteristics of the robotic system (such as mass, velocity, payload, engine, operation capabilities etc.) add to an unintended, but possible severe accident risk that can affect broader society? Determination: Accident risk assessment that particularly focuses on very rare events, but when they happen, they have a large magnitude and high impact with severe and broad consequences beyond normal expectations. This includes man-made accidents, failures, implication of natural hazards and sabotage. Weight: The more impact a possible accident of the robotic system has on broader society (e.g. affecting the health of the whole population, their supply chains or the function of a society), the more relevant this criterion is. Green: Although the risk of large-scale accidents cannot be excluded, they do not directly lead to a broader impact on society; they rather stay on an individual level. Amber: There is some risk that a broader part of society is affected by an accident, but the risk of causing harm is mitigated through accident prevention and minimization measurements. Red: Although very unlikely, a hard to predict accident with a high impact and severe consequence for the whole population or society is conceivable. The Aftermath in relation to the mission goal of the system is hard to justify. Grey: The robotic system lacks relevant characteristics that could conceivably lead to largescale accidents. Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 23 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Step 3-B: Applying the Criteria for Robotic Systems Intended to Harm In addition to criteria set A, the following criteria set B comes into play when a robotic system was intentionally designed to include capacities to harm people (even lethally) or destroy objects. Those criteria are applied in addition to the criteria of Step 3-1. We reiterate that the following points are important point when applying the evaluation schema: The evaluation schema does not include a final, exhaustive list of criteria. Depending on technological progress, additional criteria may be needed, whereas some criteria may lose importance. Some of the criteria may also be relevant for the assessment of non-autonomous robotic systems that are not included in the scope of this evaluation schema. A single \"red\" label does not imply that the use of a system is necessarily ethically impermissible. The number of green, amber and red labels instead provides an indication of the justificatory pressure with respect to the ethical use of a system. For each criterion, only very basic information regarding ethical importance is provided here. Detailed background information on ethical aspects is provided in Chapter 4 in part 2 of this report. Physical Characteristics of the Robotics System Degree of Lethality Core Questions: Is the system designed to be primarily lethal or primarily non-lethal? Is it equipped with primarily lethal or primarily nonlethal weapons? Determination: System attributes, the manufacturer's stated intentional use of the system, and the end-user's intended use determine whether the system is primarily lethal or primarily non-lethal. Weight: The weight is significant in all contexts. Whether or not a system is designed to or intended to take human life is as important or more important than any other questions about the system. Green: The manufacturer claims that the system is non-lethal, (2) the end-user intends to employ the system for non-lethal means, and (3) the system has been suitably tested to ensure that human fatalities resulting from intended (non-lethal) harms are extremely unlikely. Amber: The system is designed as or the end user intends for it to be used as a lethal system. Nevertheless, the system has been suitably tested to ensure that unintended human fatalities resulting from employment are extremely unlikely (a near-zero probability). Or, (2) the system is designed to be used against (and to cause damage to) non-human objects (e.g. buildings) but the user intends to employ it against human persons. Red: Either (1) the system was designed as non-lethal and the user intends to employ it as lethal, (2) the system was designed as lethal but the user intends to employ it as non-lethal, or (3) though both the designer and user intend non-lethal use, the system has been insufficiently tested to determine the probability of unintentional fatalities. Grey: The system is not designed and is not intended to harm (and therefore need not be evaluated by Step 3-B). Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 24 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Behavioral Characteristics of the Robotics System Constraining the System in Time and Space Core Question: Can the system be temporally and geographically constrained? Is the use of force by the system constrained to small welldefined combat zones for specific short periods of time? Does the use of force follow any rules of engagement that may be in effect? Determination: Check the physical design of the machine as well as systems architecture and functioning to ensure that the system can be geographically and temporally bound and that these systems are precise and error free. Determine whether the end-user intends to take advantage of such functionality. Weight: The greater the lethal capacity of the system, the more relevant this criterion becomes. Furthermore, the justification for harm, including both lethal and non-lethal harm, is often restricted to very narrow circumstances (armed conflict, some police actions, etc.). A change in those circumstances (which will likely accompany the system's movement to a new location or the passage of time) will likely affect a change in the justification of harm. Green: System can be constrained both geographically (e.g., through geofencing or other killbox operations) and in time (e.g., limited battery life, time-based self-destruct, etc.) and the end-user intends to take advantage of such capabilities. Existing temporal and spatial limits are well defined and error free. Use of lethal force is highly constrained and short in duration. Amber: Unclear/untested temporal and spatial limit or error in use or programing is unlikely but conceivable. Furthermore, this rating applies if the system (1) can be constrained either geographically or temporally but not both. Or (2) the system is capable of geographic and temporal constraint, but the enduser does not intend to take advantage of such constraints. Red: The system can be neither geographically nor temporally constrained. Furthermore, few or no temporal and/or spatial limits set in the use scenarios envisioned for the machine, and/or error in setting constraints is possible and likely to occur. Grey: The system is not intended to cause harm (and therefore need not be evaluated by Step 3B). Lawfulness of behavior more generally Core Question: Is the system's behavior subject to human supervision or control when decisions requiring a proportionality assessment need to be taken? Determination: As in \"targeting\", this requires testing, simulation and weapons review. Weight: Weight increases with frequency and likelihood of decisions. Green: Human control is guaranteed for all proportionality assessments. Amber: It cannot be excluded with certainty that a proportionality assessment needs to be made and control would be uncertain. Red: Proportionality assessments are certain and human control is not guaranteed. Grey: Proportionality assessment is not applicable and this is certain. Targeting Core Question: Does the system distinguish between lawful and unlawful targets in a reliable, transparent, and controllable manner? Determination: This requires extensive simulation and real-life testing including Article 36 weapons review. The reliability and transparency of targeting as well as human control over it are dimensions, which should be assessed separately. Weight: As soon as the system has targeting capacity, the weight is very high. Green: Sufficient reliability, transparency, and control. Amber: It is unclear whether the targeting capacity is reliable, transparent and controllable. Red: The system's targeting is unreliable, intransparent or uncontrollable. Grey: The system has no targeting capacity. Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 25 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Interaction with Operator of the Robotic System Bias prevention in target identification Core Question: To what extent does the system architecture involve bias prevention with respect to the target (i.e. the person to be harmed by the system)? Determination: The (information) system should not contain any implicit race, gender or other biases, which can cause unfair treatment or violations of human rights of any groups by the operators of the systems. Weight: The more the system is involved in activities, which can negatively affect some basic interests and rights of the human subjects involved (e.g. policing, surveillance), the more relevant is the criterion. Green: Problems of bias have been adequately addressed and solved in the design and testing phases of the system; constant supervision of the potential emergence of biased behavioral patterns in the system is being made. Amber: Problems of bias have been addressed in the design and testing phases of the system, but the emergence of bias in the behavior of the system cannot be excluded and/or the possible emergence of biased behavioral patterns in the system is not under constant supervision. Red: Problems of bias have not been addressed at any stage of the design, testing and use of the system, or the system is known for being biased. Grey: System functions do not include activities which can negatively affect human basic interests and rights. Deployment Conditions of the Robotic System Expansion of harming mission possibilities Core Question: Is the system constructed in a way that limits the use contexts to its intended core purposes with respect to harming persons or objects, or has it the ability to be used in wider contexts beyond its original intended purpose? Determination: This requires system architecture check, operation context review and (scenario) simulation. Weight: The higher the variety of use contexts and the more dynamic those contexts are, the more important is this criterion. Green: The system is constructed in a way that limits the use context to its intended core purposes. Change of this factor requires significant and extensive resources. Amber: The system is able to adapt gradually to requirements in a wider application context at little expenses. Guidelines and audit procedures to revise operation context are in place. Red: System behavior is flexible to changing application contexts and can easily be used in wider contexts. Incremental changes in the use beyond its original goals or unconventional use besides the designed purpose is feasible. Grey: The robotic system lacks relevant characteristics to operate in dynamic application contexts. Type of war theatre Core Question: In which domain or domains of war is the system to be employed? Determination: The domain(s) in which the system is to be employed will be based both on the design of the system as well as the intention of the end-user. Weight: The weight is significant in that autonomous systems will be far more capable of meeting the demands of international humanitarian law and the Just War Tradition in some domains than in others. For additional information, see section 2.4.2. (\"Domains\" here refers to the natural domains of air, sea, undersea, land. The human-made domain of cyber has been excluded in accordance with the introduction to this report.) Green: The system is only to be used in the air and undersea domains where there will be a low probability of civilian traffic in the theater of war and where the discrimination of combatant from noncombatant is easier to automate. Amber: The system is to be used in domains including sea and space where there will be a high probability of non-military traffic but where the discrimination of combatant from non-combatant is easier to automate. Red: The system is designed to be used in the land domain where there will be a high probability of non-military traffic and where the discrimination of combatant from non-combatant is extremely difficult to automate. Grey: The system is not to be employed in military combat. Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 26 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Other Characteristics of the Robotic System Public Opinion Core Question: Has the system been the subject of a deliberative, public discussion, in which the ethical and moral dimensions have been explored at some depth? Determination: Qualitative assessment of discourse and of democratic legitimacy of entity concerned (e.g. public vote, debate in parliament, survey). Weight: The criterion should only be supplementary, since approval by public opinion cannot act as a substitute for an ethical assessment. Green: Serious, unbiased debate has taken place; minor concerns proved uncontroversially acceptable. Amber: Debate is subject to doubts (not exhaustive, not representative, etc.); debate revealed doubts as to ethics. Red: Debate was clearly flawed (biased, unrepresentative, etc.); important ethical concern haven proven divisive. Grey: No relevant discussion has taken place. Overview of the Evaluation Schema Step 1: Applicability of the System Robotic capacities Sensing Low Medium High Computing Low Medium High Effecting Low Medium High Communication Low Medium High Autonomous capacities Autarchy dimension Low Medium High Control-independence dimension Low Medium High Interaction dimension Low Medium High Learning dimension Low Medium High Mobility dimension Low Medium High Overall assessment All low: system not applicable Other: case-by-case evaluation At least one high: always applicable Step 2: Design and use intention of the System Kinetic harm No Vague Yes Sensory harm No Vague Yes Psychological harm No Vague Yes Other harm No Vague Yes Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 27 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Overall assessment Only No: Only Criteria 3-A Other: case-by-case evaluation At least one Yes: Criteria 3-A and 3-B Step 3: Criteria 3-A: Criteria for non-harming systems Appearance of the robotic system Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Physical safeguards Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Autarchy Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Behavior recorder Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Deception Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Dilemma behavior Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High General safety feature testing Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Predictability Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Public information Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Respectful behavior Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Responsibility Attribution Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Robot-user-interface Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Safeguards against interaction partner errors Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 28 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Capacity to override wrong system decisions Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Control degree of autonomy Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Distribution of control Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Ethical decision framing Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Operator training Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Safeguards against operator errors Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Training data Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Effects on general population Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Emergent Properties Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Environmental Effects Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Non-trained humans in operation environment Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Cybersecurity Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Dual use management Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Misuse prevention Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Personal data management Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Part 1 – Evaluation Schema Page 29 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Risk of severe accidents Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Overall assessment 3-A: Number of Green ratings Number of Amber ratings Number of red ratings Number of Grey ratings 3-B: Additional Criteria for harming systems Degree of lethality Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Constraining the system in space and time Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Lawfulness of behavior more generally Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Targeting Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Bias prevention in targeting Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Expansion of harming mission possibilities Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Type of war theatre Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Public opinion Rating Green Amber Red Grey Weight Low Medium High Overall assessment 3-B: Number of Green ratings Number of Amber ratings Number of red ratings Number of Grey ratings Part 2 – Background Information Page 30 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Part 2 – Background Information Preliminary Remark: The second part provides background information regarding the evaluation schema. The technology chapter focuses on relevant technologies used in autonomous systems, degrees of system autonomy and likely developments of applications in the security domain in the next 10-15 years. The security chapter discusses types of autonomous systems in the security sector as well as the status of autonomous capacities in military command and control structures, including an outlook on future developments. The law chapter focuses on the current international debate on regulating autonomous systems, explains the main legal issues autonomous weapons systems raise, and briefly discusses possible developments. The ethics chapter of the report outlines the current ethical discussion on system autonomy, discusses major proand con-arguments and sketches likely developments. The materials chapter lists the persons interviewed, the workshop participants and the literature used. 1 Technology This chapter gives an outline of what is meant by robot and robotic system, shows which enabling technologies are relevant for robotics, highlights the importance of the concept of autonomy and provides a short overview on major trends and challenges. The section aims only to give a general impression of the complexity of the field covered by the term robotics, in particular for non-specialists interested in this report. Additional technical information on specific topics may be found in the cited literature. 1.1 Robots and Robotic Systems: General Definitions The simplest definition of robot is that of a \"machine that can autonomously carry out useful work\" or \"an artificial device that can sense its environment and purposefully act on or in that environment\" (Winfield 2012, p. 12). This definition helps capture important elements: a robot is a machine that can sense the environment, that can (somehow) think about the environment (\"purposefully\"), and that can act in that environment based on its perception and thinking. Another important aspect of this definition is that it highlights the fact that the typical functions of a robot (sense, think, and act) can also be distributed through different devices rather than being integrated in a single machine. This means that in addition to robots as individual artifacts we should also consider robotic systems as sets of devices performing intelligent, coordinated, purposeful activities. A simpler version of a robotic system is one where different components realize together a purposeful activity, but each component is not a robot in itself. One may think of the heating system of a house, in which heat sensors, a thermostat and a set of pipes and heaters work together to manage the house's temperature according to certain parameters given by the user. A more complex robotic system is one in which a set of robots perform a coordinated activity: these may be called multi-robot systems. One outstanding example of multi-robot systems is a so-called swarm of robots, exploiting collective intelligence as typically displayed by insect swarms (see section 1.4. below). There can also be systems in which artificial and human agents interact to perform a purposeful activity; these may be called multi-agent systems or human-machine teaming (see section 1.4.). Part 2 – Background Information Page 31 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 1.2 Enabling Technologies for Robotic Systems 1.2.1 Sensors In general, sensors are devices that receive and respond to a signal in order to acquire data about the robotic system and its environment. Sensing capacities are substantial for robotic systems to enable the generation of an appropriate situational \"awareness\" to fulfill a given task. In robotics, sensors are often classified into proprioceptive and exteroceptive. Proprioceptive sensors measure signals that are internal to the robot, such as motor positions/speeds/loads, temperatures of components or electric current/voltages. Exteroceptive sensors allow acquiring information about the environment, typically information to generate an internal representation of the environment for navigation and task execution. For example, to avoid collisions while moving within a territory, sensor data is acquired to detect obstacles (static and dynamic objects, such as walls or pedestrians) around the robot. Examples of such sensors are cameras, radars, sonars or laser rangefinders / \"light detection and ranging systems\" (LiDARs) (INTV12). Proximity sensors and image acquisition hardware: Proximity sensors are used to detect distances to objects without physical contact. There are a variety of proximity sensors (sonars, radars, laser rangefinder, inductive, capacitive etc.) for many different applications, e.g. the parking sensors of modern cars or for reactive collision avoidance for mobile robots. While proximity sensors acquire data about the proximity of objects, image sensors (such as used in visual or thermal cameras or structured light scanners, but again radars, sonars) provide digital images of the environment. Force Sensors: Haptic perception is not only crucial for humans in order to evaluate and measure properties of an object for direct, physical interaction with it (manipulate, grasp, explore etc.) or for planning, but also for robotic systems involved in those tasks. Tactile and force sensors s measure material deformation based on various types of technologies (e.g. by exploiting changes of the electrical characteristics such as changes of the resistance of strain gauges due to deformation or of the shape of a known element) and are often used to measure internal states (such as internal forces within the body structure or joint torques) or to estimate the contact situation between end-effectors and the environment (external forces). Thus, they are often built into end effectors to enable to precisely control the applied force (force control) rather than controlling the pure position of the end-effector. For example, one common sensor in assembly line, product testing, and surgery applications is the \"six-axis force torque sensor,\" which measures forces and torques in 3 axes. The precision of such sensors continues to improve. However, as soon as robotic systems attempt to execute more complex and tactile interactions (such as cleaning a table) autonomously, they run into basic problems not easily overcome with current technology (de Maria et al. 2012; INTV12). Inertial measurement unit (IMU): An IMU is a device that usually consists of sensors to measure acceleration (incl. gravity) by accelerometers, rotation rates by gyroscopes and sometimes magnetic fields. With an IMU, a robot can estimate its linear and rotational acceleration and velocity and thus its position and orientation (pose). However, the error of the position estimates is accumulated over time (drift), which has to be corrected or reduced via separate means (e.g. Global Navigation Satellite System (GNNS) updates or visual odometry). Sensor payload: Besides the sensors that are mentioned above, there are various other sensors that are often used as payloads, e.g. to fulfill certain missions. A prominent example is the set of sensors that Part 2 – Background Information Page 32 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 measure chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear and explosive (CBRNE) elements in applications in which there is a high risk of CBRNE exposure. 1.2.2 Main Software Modules Navigation System: A navigation system contains a localization subsystem, collision avoidance methods, path planning exploration and mapping. Mapping algorithms work closely with exteroceptive sensors such as on-board cameras and/or laser ranging systems in order to process and provide topographic information for identification of navigable paths (with or without GPS geo-referencing support) and to support possible object manipulation by robotic systems. Because such on-board mapping systems are, among other things, confronted with simultaneous localization and mapping tasks in real time (SLAM), they are in need of a considerable amount of computing power and memory in order to deal with large and dynamic areas (Aqel et al. 2016). The current state-of-the-art is still challenged by those requirements and therefore implements alternatives and trade-offs in order to focus on operability: This may include probabilistic calculations and/or the use of diffuse, partial information in combination with predefined navigational target points (INTV12). Recognition Systems: Recognition system algorithms are used when robotic systems – with the help of sensors – interact with their environment such as with objects (artificial obstacles, natural objects etc.) or humans in order to make on-board decisions about how to react in specific situations and to specific identified/non-identified entities autonomously (NASA 2015, p. TA4-20). In order to recognize human made or non-human objects (such as rocks, cars, glasses, missiles etc.), humans or their activities (such as gestures or basic movements: walking, sitting, bending etc.), the recognition system's algorithm needs to be trained very well with a large number of learning examples – and this requires a lot of computing capacity. Close collaboration between sensors and recognition algorithms in autonomous robotic systems are unavoidable in order to segment data inputs, track movements, classify/label objects and/or humans or identify specific events (e.g. a sudden gas leak) autonomously. As the complexity of environments in which such robotic systems are deployed rises, so does the perception and interaction needed in order to \"understand\" the surroundings and perform given task(s). Although current systems (such as the Electronic Stability Control in cars) are able to make decisions and perform reliably with structured task within specific sectors, and even if they exceed human calculation capacities by far, humans are far more capable of making decisions and performing unstructured tasks when it comes to complex situations where uncertainty and ambiguity is involved (INTV12). State Estimation Systems: In order to move from one location to another or to manipulate objects autonomously, a robotic system is required to estimate its inner state, including for example its position and orientation (pose). State estimation algorithms can help to perform such a task by fusing inputs from proprioceptive and exteroceptive sensors and estimation of internal system states such as the position of the robotic system's effector(s) itself, speed and remaining power supply (NASA 2015, p. TA4-45). In general, state estimations are essential for autonomous systems to navigate alone or in swarms and to perform assigned tasks. Today, vision based odometry – which identifies the position of a system or object with the help of cameras– is a key element in state estimation systems, especially in the absence of an external navigation support such as GNSS. Visual odometry is an effective method that has been successfully deployed within a wide and diverse range of applications, often indoors. (Aqel et al. 2016). Part 2 – Background Information Page 33 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 1.2.3 Actuators/Effectors Actuators are components that convert energy of different types (electric, hydraulic, pneumatic, etc.) into mechanical energy. In robotics, actuators are often classified as translational and rotational actuators. Translational actuators generate a linear motion respectively forces while rotational actuators produce torque that results in a rotation of e.g. a robotic joint. Effectors are tools that are mounted to, integrated with and controlled by the robotic system. Locomotion Actuators: Locomotion actuators are crucial for the \"degrees of freedom\" (especially regarding movement and orientation) a robotic system can possess. For example: wheels, legs, tracks, arms, wings, flippers and so forth today exist in different sizes, quantities and shapes and are used to move and/or provide stability to a robotic system. While locomotion actuators can be built easily today, they do no magic tricks and must obey the laws of physics: they may face challenging environments when in use. Examples include difficulties encountered on certain terrains, heavy payloads or changing weather conditions. Besides this, advanced robots (such as legged systems) have significant challenges when it comes to controlled coordination of multiple locomotion actuators (active degrees of freedom), thus making it hard to even perform maneuvers that are simple for humans, such as climbing stairs. Systems with multiple, active joint actuators are usually limited to academic research applications. End Effectors of manipulators: End effectors are the last element of a kinematic chain of robotic arms and are used to position tools with a larger degree of freedom than those that are mounted directly to the robot base. The tools can be purely moved to gain a position advantage, such as for inspecting cavities or to measure in proximity of objects, or can be brought into contact with the environment. An example of such latter tools are grippers or conventional tools such as drills, screwdrivers or cutters. In order to extend the robots capabilities, end effectors can e.g. be equipped with multiple tools at once or tool changers. Effectors as weapon payload: In a military context, effectors might be weapons that generate certain effects. These consist of conventional effectors that generate a kinetic effect on the target, such as small arms, mortars, improvised explosive devices (IEDs), rockets or missiles but also means that emit energy without explosives, such as low or high energy lasers (LEL/HEL), acoustic weapons, microwave guns, or chemical, biological, radiological agents and nuclear weapons. 1.2.4 Communication and Interfaces System-to-System and inter-system communication: Reliable, flexible and sustainable wireless communication infrastructure (hardware and software) to exchange data between the parts of robotic systems is currently vital for every collaborative task. As an example: Each drone of a drone swarm may need to exchange, among many other data, its position information in order to coordinate flight patterns and formations autonomously. Recognized obstacles or identified objects should be communicated from the internal sensors to the on-board system and distributed from one robotic system to the others. A higher degree of autonomy and rising complexity of intended tasks in multi-robotic systems leads to an increased complexity of internal and external communication within such systems. Besides the fact that communication needs computational power, energy and sophisticated algorithms for processing, it is also – depending on the environment – prone to delay, interruption, misrouting, enemy interference and so on. Especially in search-and-rescue or surveillance scenarios, communication is a necessity – and if it fails, questions about how such systems can coordinate among each other under constraint circumstances are Part 2 – Background Information Page 34 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 difficult to solve. Current state-of-the-art technology therefore (for these and other reasons) does not include widespread use of multi-robotic autonomous systems and is limited to academic research in controlled environments. System-to-Human Communication: Most of the mentioned characteristics and problems of system-tosystem communication in multi-robotic systems also apply in system-to-human communications. A reliable communication link between the human user(s) and the robotic systems is necessary to maintain whatever degree of control humans desire to have over these systems. Reasonable local and remote control implies a direct or indirect ability to operate the whole system or critical functions within the system in order for the robotic system to complete the intended task(s) correctly. Partial or total communication failure or loss due the wave propagation environment, malfunction, enemy interference (jamming, spoofing or hacking), poor implementation, bad design, interference with the environment or other reasons can lead to a direct and serious impact in real world scenarios. Whereas communication infrastructure is currently almost omnipresent, especially for aerial vehicles, it is still not clear how to deal with unpredictable situations in which humans are unable to remain in contact and interact with the system during ongoing critical operations. As these situations are often unacceptable, proposals to mitigate these problems range from on-board \"kill switches\" (algorithms that perform security checks and react according to pre-defined decision trees; INTV14) to automatic \"return to base\" functions. Human-Machine-Interfaces: Several types of interfaces (hardware) between robotic systems and humans exist today. Examples include simple remote controls with buttons/joysticks, augmented reality devices or omnidirectional treadmills, brain-machine-interfaces, exoskeletons or less futuristic text or graphic terminals. They enable human-to-system interaction. With the help of interfaces, humans can rapidly get information about a system's status and, if required, influence the system through haptic stimuli or brain signals to guide these robotic systems towards specific tasks. Through such interfaces, humans can also be supported in specific tasks. A good example is telemanipulation, which allows for fast decision-making and control; it relies on strong communication in both directions, but can face the same difficulties as system-to-human communication does such as slow and delayed data transfer, imprecise calculation of aggregated data and so forth. This can decrease the ability to interact effectively through these interfaces (NASA 2015, p. TA4-45 – TA4-46). State-of-the-art applications involve unimodal (mostly visual) interfaces, but also multimodal interfaces that combine different sensory information and communication (e.g. brain signals combined with 3-D graphics, tactile sensors etc.). Multimodal interfaces still lack – among other things – precision, speed and compatibility and are still being developed and tested in lab environments. 1.2.5 Energy Supply All robotic systems need power to operate (or more precisely a converter to convert energy from one form into another) as well as an energy storage to continuously supply the system with power. Depending on the area of application, the size and shape of the system and the budget available – several possibilities with pros and cons are on the market and easily accessible. Possible energy supply systems may include the generation of electrical energy from chemical reactions (electric batteries), from heat flux (thermoelectric generator), from electromagnetic waves/light (via solar cells) or the generation of mechanical energy by combustion engines. In robotics, energy is usually stored or buffered by e.g. electrochemical (battery), chemical (fuel), electrical (in an electrostatic field), mechanical (via springs or rotating masses) or even nuclear means (as with NASAs Mars rover, Curiosity). Part 2 – Background Information Page 35 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 The main factors when considering an energy source for robotic systems are capacity, energy density, provided peak power, and durability/robustness, cost and environmental factors, and the shape of the energy source itself (Bohidar et al. 2014). Depending on the need of energy for a specific robotic system, a higher payload capacity and thus a bigger sized robotic system may be required. Thus, the laws of physics can limit the operational ability of a system when it comes to energy supply. For instance, one cannot mount a 2-kg battery on a small-body or lightweight mini drone. 1.2.6 Data Processing and Storage The automatic collection and processing of data to produce meaningful information (for motion planning and task execution, including image data processing, object recognition, mapping, and communication) can require a significant amount of processing power and memory, especially when handling complex tasks in changing and challenging environments. The required processing units (Central or distributed processing units) can be located on-board or off-board. Within the internal and external communication network, control/computer systems should be implemented in a system architecture that allows for flexibility, compatibility, interoperability, reliability, safety and security. Depending on the given mission(s) and complexity of the system, they may need to process large amount of data. Creating and implementing systems that are able to grow modularly, calculate fault tolerances, reconfigure dynamically, have the ability to coordinate multiple (sub-)units, aggregate data and adjust to on-board needs is a major challenge (Liberatore et al. 2004). 1.2.7 Learning and Artificial Intelligence We will use the term \"Artificial Intelligence\" (AI) to refer to technologically implemented correlates to cognitive skills such as intelligence, learning, and other cognitive abilities. The AI field is filled with different contested notions of the definition of intelligence such as \"human-level AI\", \"Artificial General Intelligence\", \"strong AI\", etc. (Sotala & Yampolskiy 2013). A reasonable definition has been provided by the Future of Life institute, which has, inter alia, in this context defined the term \"intelligence\" as \"related to statistical and economic notions of rationality – colloquially, the ability to make good decisions, plans, or inferences\" (Russell et al. 2015). Machine Learning: One of the key driving fields in artificial intelligence research is that of machine learning – where computer scientists and mathematicians seek to create algorithms that are, based on data inputs, able to learn on their own and use probability calculations to predict outcomes (e.g. learning from trading patterns to predict the outcome of financial investments). One could define machine learning as \"any computer program that improves its performance at some task through experience\" (Mitchell 1997, p. 2). There are, however, many different theoretical approaches to machine learning such as symbolic systems (inverse deduction), connectionist systems (such as deep learning), evolutionary algorithms (such as genetic algorithms), Bayesian learning systems, or analogy systems (such as support vector machines). Generally, machine learning can be divided in the following types of algorithms: Supervised, unsupervised and reinforcement learning algorithms. Supervised algorithms can be applied to classify data based on a training dataset with known classes. With unsupervised learning algorithms, the structure of the data is not known in advance and the algorithm has to come up with a 'classifier' to structure the data. In reinforcement learning, a proposed classification of data can be rewarded if correctly classified, or otherwise punished. Part 2 – Background Information Page 36 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Increasingly discussed are deep learning approaches using neural network models. Artificial neural networks are loosely defined as computers with algorithms that are \"modeled on the [biological] brain, and that promised to be better than standard algorithms at dealing with complex real-world situations\" (Castelvecchi 2016, p. 21). Whereas deep learning is a hot topic in science and many are excited by possible applications, it seems to come with a hard problem. In deep learning neural networks, learning results are not stored in one specific place, but they rather are \"encoded in the strength of multiple connections\" (ibid., p. 22) – in the same way it is done presumably in the human brain. Given the fact that such neural networks may have millions of connections and are arranged in many layers, one cannot easily \"reverse engineer\" the processes in order to understand what the neural network did and how exactly the output results are generated. As an illustrative example, Pierre Baldi asks where exactly a phone number is stored in the human brain and answers \"Probably in a bunch of synapses, probably not too far from the other digits\" (Baldi 2016; in Castelvecchi 2016). However, \"there is no well-defined sequence of bits that encodes the number\" (Castelvecchi 2016. p. 22). Therefore, one does not really understand a neural network and one is confronted with some sort of a \"black box\" (INTV17). 1.3 The Concept of Autonomy in Robotics Autonomy is a concept with a rich theoretical history. The term \"autonomy\" or \"auto-nomos\" in the sense of self-governance was originally coined in the time of the ancient Greek city-states, who were aspiring towards independence from the Persian Empire3. In the age of Enlightenment, autonomy was seen as the ability for self-governance that grounds moral responsibility. In this way, autonomy became a fundamental concept of (moral) philosophy. It reflects a basic moral and political value, affecting how individuals interact, and the moral and legal rights and responsibilities they are given. However, when the terms \"autonomy\" or \"autonomous\" are used in the context of robotics, they do not refer to those high-level philosophical concepts. In robotics, a purely operational understanding of autonomy is usually used that – according to some authors – may include even simple types of automation. According to an operational definition, a robot is autonomous if it can complete a given task without human intervention (however, human supervision might still be allowed during an autonomous execution of a mission). In this sense, it is possible to ascribe operational autonomy even to simple machines. For instance, a toaster is autonomous insofar as the machine can properly react when a bread slice is warm enough and eject it accordingly. Similarly, the heating system of a house is autonomous insofar as it can sense the temperature in the interior environment and decide to switch the heaters on and off in order to bring the room temperature to the desired level at the desired time. In this simplest form, operational autonomy is equivalent to automation. However, it is a controversial issue, whether automation should be considered as a form of operational autonomy. Russell and Norvig (2014) for instance would limit the use of the term \"autonomy\" to its more complex forms, like those we describe below in the remaining part of this section. Also, according to van den Vyver et al. (2004), machine autonomy consists of more complex properties: (a) the ability to make independent decisions based upon observations, to do planning, to draw conclusions and to make judgments concerning consequences; (b) the independent completion of tasks, by combining the planning and controlling steps; (c) the ability to learn and eliminate mistakes; and (d) the ability to cooperate with humans and other machines. 3 αὐτονομία autonomia from αὐτόνομος autonomos from αὐτοauto- \"self\" and νόμος nomos, \"law\" a person who legislates one's own law. Part 2 – Background Information Page 37 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 In this report, we consider autonomy in robotics to be a gradual concept that develops along several dimensions. We will consider systems that score low on those dimensions not as autonomous robotic systems. Therefore, whereas simple automated systems such as land mines surely can pose serious and ethical issues, these simple systems are not in the focus of this report. On the other hand, there might be in the future systems available that score very high on those dimensions and thus would enjoy moral autonomy (\"artificial moral agents\", see section 4.2.1.). Nevertheless, robots of the present and of the near future are likely to be equipped only with operational autonomy. As robots will be equipped with more and more complex forms of operational autonomy, future developments in autonomous robotic technologies may still have serious ethical implications (they may become \"ethical impact agents\", see section 4.2.1.). Operational autonomy may have many different dimensions, depending on, among other things, the component of the system to which it applies (sensing, thinking, acting), and on the different ways in which these capacities are realized, as well as on the different ways in which the other (autonomous) parts of a system (including human operators) interact. The following is a list of the most salient dimensions along which to assess robotic systems autonomy: System autonomy as a measure for the \"control distance\" from the human operator: Technological systems have a purpose, i.e., they are built to execute certain tasks relevant for humans. Thus, the \"control distance\" of the human operator is a first, intuitive measure for system autonomy. Primitive tools such as a hammer only function when directly operated by humans and the human is also the provider of the energy needed for functioning. Still today many of the machines we use are under direct human control; i.e. they are turned on and off by the human operator and they are steered by the operator in most of its relevant functions. However, the controlling of relevant functions of machines can be predetermined by the operator, which leads to automation. This is one way to increase the control distance. Another element of distancing is that the human operator can remotely control systems. This usually affects situational awareness of the operator, who may become dependent on sensory input (from the system itself or from other systems or observers). Yet another element of distancing concerns the degree of the precision of the orders given to the system. The less precise the orders have to be, the larger is the control distance between system and operator. System autonomy compartmentalized for the system functions: Another approach to characterize system autonomy is to look at degrees of autonomy for specific functions of the system. In a report of the Defense Science Board (2016), for instance, the authors distinguish between the functions \"sense\" (sensors, perception, fusion), \"think/decide\" (analysis, reasoning, learning), \"act\" (motion, manipulation) and \"team\" (human/machine, machine/machine, and information exchange). Here, one determines the degree of autonomy of each of those functions in order to characterize the overall autonomy of the system. Interaction between those autonomous components could lead to emergent behavior and to unwanted risks. System autonomy captured by spatial and temporal time scales: Another possible measure for system autonomy concerns the spatial range and temporal duration in which a system operates without human intervention. This aspect is mainly captured by the mobility of the robotic system itself. The more and the longer a robot is able to move around the higher the number of different objects and scenarios it may encounter, and the higher the amount and complexity of decisions Part 2 – Background Information Page 38 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 it must make. Those spatial and temporal measures obviously strongly depend on the complexity of the context in which a system operates: complex, urban environments for example pose different spatial challenges compared with flat, monotonous landscapes; and situations that include fast-changing aspects are harder to handle. Characterization of these environmental factors will lead to a definition of the \"operational design domain\" of the system. System autonomy captured by task complexity: In general, one can also characterize the autonomy of a system along the complexity of the task it has to execute. Both a smart toaster and an autonomous vehicle are operationally autonomous. However, to decide autonomously when a slice of bread is toasted usually requires much simpler capacities than autonomously deciding how to steer a vehicle along a busy urban road. One factor that makes a mission more complex is the number and complexity of decisions that the system should make. Imagine a robot designed to pick and move objects in a warehouse; it may drop an object by mistake: deciding what to do and how to do it in order to address this unexpected situation is something more complicated than just repeating a few tasks across a limited range of different conditions (INTV17). System autonomy captured by the complexity and structure of the environment: Some autonomous systems operate in an environment that, by nature or by design, presents a stable and easily recognizable structure and does not change over time. Other systems operate in environments without a stable structure and/or changing across time. This difference is important for autonomy. As examples of the former, one may think of an industrial robot autonomously repeating the same task in a highly structured factory floor; or, a bit further down the line, a robotic system moving objects within a structured harbor. The more the environment becomes complex and dynamic – one may think, again, of an urban road – the more flexible the capacity for sensing and deciding of the robotic system must be; and the higher the risk the system encounters an object or a scenario that it cannot properly recognize or handle. System autonomy captured by the interaction and communication with other human and nonhuman agents: Robots may have to function while interacting with a variety of human owners, instructors, collaborators and end-users, as well as with animals and other robots. Hence, a robot's behavior will be shaped by a variety of other agents, each with its own individual preferences, styles and cognitive capacities. The person owning the robot may not always be present when the robot is in operation, the users instructing and collaborating with the robot ('instructors') may be different from the owner, and the behavior of the robot may affect persons ('endusers') who are neither owner nor collaborator. For instance, in a care-giving context, the institution may be the owner. Professional caregivers may be the instructors as well as collaborators of the robots, and the elderly are end-users experiencing the effects of the robot's actions. An autonomous vehicle would be programmed by a car manufacturer, operated by a private person, while also interacting with and affecting the behavior of other road users. This interaction with other intelligent systems adds a significant layer of complexity to the autonomy of the robotic system. Thus, the degree of autonomy of a system can be related to the number of different types of interactions the system is able to perform. Interaction of systems with autonomous capacities and human operators are particularly relevant with respect to ethical issues. For example, one fully expects an autonomous system to provide inputs in addition to human inputs (thereby taking advantage of system autonomy). But one should be cautious about a system that pro-vides inputs contrary to human inputs. For example, consider the 2008 US B-2 stealth bomber crash. The aircraft crashed on initial takeoff injuring both pilots and destroying the $1.2B aircraft when \"the Part 2 – Background Information Page 39 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 computer ... told the aircraft it was going into a nosedive, when the pilots were actually in the process of lifting the craft off the ground. The computer ordered the B-2's nose to pitch up 30 degrees\" (Burgess 2008). The pilots (a) were unaware of the computer's alternative inputs to the control system and (b) had no means of taking control of the aircraft back from the flight computer. System autonomy captured by the autarchy of the system: Robots need energy to function and usually require maintenance in case of, e.g., damage or wear. However, the less a system is dependent on external energy input (e.g., because it has solar cells to generate own electrical energy) or the greater its ability to \"self-repair,\" the more independent can the system function from human up keeping, i.e. the autarchy of the system is increased. System autonomy captured by capacity for self-organization and collective agency: A specific dimension of autonomy is that displayed in multi-robot systems such as swarm robots. Swarm technologies aim at creating groups of robots that operate without relying on any external infrastructure or on any form of centralized control (Dorigo et al. 2014). In a robot swarm, the collective behavior of the robots results from local interactions between the robots and between the robots and the environment in which they act. A robot swarm is thus a self-organizing multirobot system whose collective behavior emerges from the interactions of each individual robot with its peers and with the environment. This form of autonomy may produce a more robust and flexible system. However, it may increase risks due to decreased control and predictability on the part of programmers (emergent behavior). More dimensions of autonomy could be described. Moreover, dimensions often interact (e.g., task complexity with environment complexity) and are usually hard to quantify; increases in one or more dimensions may also add complexity and give rise to moral problems 1.4 Major Trends and Challenges in Autonomous Robotic Systems New developments in robotics concern both the types of robots themselves as well as human robot-interaction: With respect to new types of autonomous robotic systems, the following trends are remarkable: Self-driving vehicles: This is an area where serious progress has been made in the past decades. In 2004 not a single robotic car managed to complete a two-hundred kilometer course in the Mojave Desert, but only a year later five out of 23 robotic cars managed to complete the full course in the required time. In 2012, Google created its first self-driving car. Whereas more and more progress may be expected in the years to come, many outstanding researchers in the field are not optimistic that these vehicles will be able to safely move any time soon in a real, dynamic, notcompletely structured environment like urban traffic (Shladover 2016, Cummings 2016). As John Leonard puts it, this seems to require not a specialized but a general reasoning capability, which is difficult to achieve in the short run (De Crook et al. 2016, pp. 57-60). Rescue operation robots: Robin Murphy, an expert in rescue robots at Texas A&M University, claims that state of the art rescue robots primarily allow human responders to see at distance. She claims that thanks to underwater robots, the survey of Japan's coastline infrastructure after the 2011's tsunami was completed six months earlier than would have been possible with human Part 2 – Background Information Page 40 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 divers alone (De Crook et al. 2016, pp. 50-54). According to Murphy, the use of robots in rescue operation becomes more and more common. The first time they were deployed was after 9/11 in New York (Murphy 2004); since then they have been used at least in 47 disasters in 15 countries. Rescue robots include unmanned ground vehicles (UGVs), unmanned aerial vehicles (UAVs), and unmanned marine vehicles (UMV). The potential for gathering data is massive: in the 2015's Blanco River flood in Texas, a single 20-minute UAV-flight produced over 800 high-resolution images. According to Murphy, future rescue robots may be snake-like and will be able to dig into rubble to reach people trapped below (ibid.). Healthcare robots: Most prominent and widespread examples of robots in healthcare are surgical robots like the ZeusTM Telesurgical System and the daVinciTM Surgical System; however, more and more research is being done in robots to be included in daily care activities of persons like feeding and bathing. These robots have high potential in enhancing the autonomy of the persons by allowing them to take care of themselves without any human help, but they also raise the concerns of lowering the quality of care (dehumanization), and bringing unwanted risks for the safety, dignity, and privacy of patients (van Wynsberghe 2015). Social robots: Whereas research in so-called social robots has developed greatly in the past decades, applications are still quite limited. Robots have proven to be able to assist professionals in specific tasks, for instance portions of healthcare practices (lifting patients), rehabilitation activities, and support of therapeutic programs for children and patients with mental disorders. Robots may be able to interact with workers on the factory floor, but the robots of today are far from being able to interact smoothly and safely with untrained humans in an unstructured environment where a complex and possibly delicate task has to be performed, as is the case in rescue operations. While a great amount of research is being done in this field, including affecting computing, and techniques for bi-directional, non-verbal communication between humans and robots, whether there will be a breakthrough in the next 10-15 years in this area as there has been in sensing, data processing and autonomous vehicles remains an open question (INTV17). Biologically inspired robotics: The main idea behind this area of research is to look at biology for inspiration based on the consideration that the behavior of animals is extremely flexible and robust in the face of environmental contingencies. The hope is that adopting some of the design principles of animals will endow robots with similar flexibility and robustness (Beer 2009). Examples include legged locomotion, climbing robots, and robot swarms (see section 1.2. above). Autonomous UAVs: According to Chris Verhoeven (INTV18), from a purely technical point of view, the most efficient way to make the most of the sensing and data processing technologies available now and in the near future would be having tiny \"informants\" in the form of small drones constantly flying autonomously around and collecting information. Particularly valuable could be their capacity to provide real time information about a sensitive or potentially dangerous situation, thus, e.g., leading to the possibility of predicting disasters before they occur. Such a system would at least help to prevent the worst consequences of a disaster or reduce its impacts as well as providing real time information to manage such situations when they do occur. This outcome is only possible if the system is already deployed in an area and would not be as useful if it were only sent after the fact. The same applies to surveillance and crime prevention. According to Robert Babuska (INTV17), in the short run an important distinction is to be made between the use of autonomous drones in indoor or otherwise structured or controlled environments (e.g. Part 2 – Background Information Page 41 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 big tanks, harbors), and their use in outdoor, unstructured environments. The former use is likely to be feasible in the near future, whereas additional issues may arise with the latter use, especially in interaction with humans. Nanorobotics: Nanorobotics is an emerging area, still largely theoretical, based on nanoscience and nanotechnology, which covers a wide spectrum of enabling technologies such as micro/nano-sensors and actuators, power supply, manipulation, control, and embedded processing. It is considered particularly promising in relation to bio-medical applications, such as medical image processing in wireless capsule endoscopy (Guo 2013). With respect to human-robot-interaction, the following trends are remarkable: Wearable robots: Unlike what happens with conventional robots, wearable robots are designed to work via direct physical interaction between the robot and the human operator (they are literally worn by the operator). The interaction with humans include physical and cognitive aspects: the control of functions is typically shared by human and machine. Wearable robots can be used either to augment, train or supplement motor functions or to replace them completely. Wearable robots operate alongside human limbs, as is the case in orthotic robots, exoskeletons or robotic suits. Wearable robots have a high potential for applications in medical, industrial, and consumer domains, such as neuro-rehabilitation, worker support, or general augmentation. However, exoskeletons for enhancing rather than just restoring human capacities have been difficult to realize so far, at least for military purposes. The exoskeletons developed so far, according to Hugh Herr from MIT, are too bulky and tend to fight the natural rhythms of the body, which turns them into exercise machines rather than enhancers (Cornwall 2015). Brain-machine interfaces: Brain-computer interfaces (BCI) establish a direct communication pathway that allows users to control an external computer device exclusively with brain activity, bypassing the peripheral nervous and muscle systems. BCIs were originally developed as a therapeutic or assistive technology for neurological patients; they are used to repair, assist or augment cognitive or sensory-motor functions in patients with cognitive or sensory-motor impairments (Allison et al. 2007; Vallabhaneni et al. 2005). BCI based motor prostheses have successfully been trialed in animal models and patients to enable direct brain control on artificial limbs, wheelchairs and other devices (Fetz 2015). BCI applications have become available also to the public. Especially in combination with wireless technology, BCI has a high potential insofar as it might allow for the direct control of animal and, in principle, human brains and behavior at distance (Borton et al. 2013). It certainly also raises serious ethical concerns, namely because of the risk of hacking (Ienca & Haselager 2016) and violations of human autonomy, as the brain enables human self-regulation and self-determination. Robot testing and human training with autonomous robotic systems: In addition to technical challenges, developments in autonomous robotics also bring challenges from a broader sociotechnical perspective. There are two notable general challenges. First, in order to improve the safety of autonomous, interactive systems reliable tests of the interaction between complex systems and real people in a real environment are necessary. However, tests with real people in the real world are morally and legally problematic until technology has proven to be safe enough. This may lead to a stalemate in the progress of innovation. One proposal that has been advanced Part 2 – Background Information Page 42 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 is that of creating \"special zones\" for testing robotic technologies under the cover of special legislation (Weng et al. 2015). Second, the challenge arises of providing appropriate training to professionals and laypeople who may have to use or interact with autonomous robotic systems. A smooth interaction between human and non-human agents requires the best possible training on both sides. Part 2 – Background Information Page 43 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 2 Security This chapter outlines the current and future use of systems with some degree of operational autonomy in the security sector. It briefly defines what is meant by \"security sector\", presents types of autonomous systems currently in use in this sector, identifies difficulties in using such systems in military command and control structures using case studies, and provides an outlook on future developments. 2.1 Defining \"Security\" and \"Security Sector\" In this chapter, the discussion of the application of autonomous systems is limited to the security sector. This report uses the term \"security sector\" to refer to the large-scale economic markets interested in autonomous systems capable of coercing behaviors or protecting/rescuing persons. The most common actors in the security sector are governmental. They usually involve military, law enforcement, or emergency response and rescue organizations. However, it is possible for private companies to act as contractors for government agencies in this field and therefore for commercial organizations to participate in the security sector. Because the scope of this section is limited to the security sector, the use of the term \"security\" is limited to refer only to the security provided by security sector organizations (government agencies and private military/security companies). This report defines \"security\" in terms of \"the security sector\" and not the other way around and this will yield some important implications. For example, financial organizations may employ semi-autonomous or autonomous systems in the cyber domain to secure assets against hacking. Nevertheless, these systems are employed in the commercial sector rather than the security sector. Therefore, they fall outside the scope of this section. A state's Ministry of Defense might use the very same kinds of autonomous systems in similar ways to protect state secrets. Because it is employed by a security sector organization, however, this kind of security would fall within our definition of \"security.\" Thus, the primary subcategories with which this section is concerned are the application of operationally autonomous systems in military operations, law enforcement operations, and emergency response and rescue operations. Classifying autonomous systems within these three operational categories (military, law enforcement, and emergency response and rescue) is difficult because the requirements vary significantly from one category to the next. For example, domestic law enforcement agencies are interested in keeping peace and using violence only as a last resort. There is a requirement, for example, for law enforcement officers to have alternatives to firearms. The United Nations Congress on the Prevention of Crime and the Treatment of Offenders suggests that \"governments and law enforcement agencies should develop a range of means as broad as possible\" to include \"the development of non-lethal incapacitating weapons\" (United Nations 1990). Therefore, the weapons used by domestic law enforcement agencies must cover the whole range demanded by the escalation of force, including both lethal and non-lethal means. As a result, the weapons that are intended to be non-lethal (e.g., Tasers) are important because they are (intended to be) non-lethal. Likewise, those intended to be lethal (e.g., firearms) are important for their lethality. Muddying the waters, however, is the empirical fact that so-called non-lethal weapons have in fact killed people and so-called lethal weapons have in fact caused non-fatal injuries (Haar & Iacopino 2016). In the military context, the intent is, broadly speaking, to target the enemy's war-fighting capability. Because there will be harms associated with such actions, ethical and legal frameworks that seek to govern military weapons do so with respect only to the harm such weapons cause without distinguishing between weapons intended to be lethal and those intended to be non-lethal. There is no standing apparatus for legally evaluating soPart 2 – Background Information Page 44 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 called non-lethal military weapons. The International Committee of the Red Cross (ICRC) claims that the Article 36 requirement for legal reviews of new weapons applies to weapons broadly, \"be they anti-personnel or anti-materiel, 'lethal,' 'non-lethal,' or 'less than lethal.'\" (ICRC 2006, p. 9). Nevertheless, there is no separate set of criteria for evaluating the legality of weapons intended to be non-lethal or less than lethal other than that which applies to weapons that are intended to be lethal, grounded in the expected harms resulting from their design and their intended and expected use. 2.2 Types of Autonomous Systems in the Security Sector The vast differences in requirements for autonomous systems across the three operational categories introduced above makes the task of classifying such systems difficult. A look at current technologies with different degrees of autonomy in each sector may help to clarify the difficulty and take initial steps toward solving it. 2.2.1 Emergency Response and Rescue There have been significant developments in the application of robotics to search and rescue operations in the recent past (see also section 1.4.). Organizations such as the Center for Robot-Assisted Search and Rescue (CRASAR) have devoted considerable resources, and made some significant strides, in adapting robotics technology to search and rescue operations. Thus far, however, the most important added value of these systems is their ability to operate in situations that are unsafe for humans (as in the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear accident)4 or in spaces so small that humans cannot fit (as in the World Trade Center rescue operations that followed the 9/11 attacks).5 However, the majority of robotic applications in the search and rescue sphere have been remotely controlled (via radio frequency communications or a wire tether) and thus, the dimension of autonomy such systems employ has been generally limited to \"control distance\" (see section 1.3). The only CRASAR robots capable of autonomous operations (in this case, image collection) in real-life emergency scenarios are two aerial systems called Rita and Virginia that \"can be preprogrammed to collect images autonomously.\"6 Such systems employ degrees of autonomy in six of the seven dimensions described in section 1.3 (Control Distance, Compartmentalized Functions, Spatial and Temporal Scales, Task Complexity, Environmental Complexity and Human-non-human interaction) but not self-organization and collective agency. The small size and maneuverability of the robots involved in post-9/11 rescue operations allowed them to penetrate areas of the rubble that people were unable to reach. This capability yielded some unexpected results. The US military quickly recognized the value of such systems in the search for Osama bin Laden and other al Qaeda leaders in the mountains of Afghanistan and began to pursue similar technologies for such a purpose (INTV20). This is just one example of a technology developed for one of the three operational categories introduced above, and subsequently transferred to a different operational category. One lens through which to view this phenomenon is the admission that, in addition to systems intended for dual-use (systems that were designed to be used in more than one operational category) there may be unforeseen and unintended transfers as well. 4 As the iRobot Packbot 510 did. CRASAR, \"Heads Up, SUGV!,\" http://crasar.org/robot-petting-zoo/heads-up-sugv/. 5 As the Inuktun microVGTV – named Bujold – did. CRASAR, \"Bujold's Rock Climbing Wall,\" http://crasar.org/robot-petting-zoo/bujolds-rock-climbing-wall/. See also Snyder (2001). 6 CRASAR, \"Rita and Virginia, the Sywriters,\" http://crasar.org/robot-petting-zoo/rita-and-virginia-the-skywriters/. Part 2 – Background Information Page 45 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 2.2.2 Law Enforcement Domestic law enforcement organizations already employ systems with some limited autonomous capability that can determine automobile speed, assess that real-world speed against the posted speed limit, and in the case of a violation, record the vehicle's license plate number. These systems are often tied into government data centers or networks such that the citation is automatically printed and sent by mail to the offender (DC Metropolitan Police Department). There have also been kinetic uses of robotics technology in law enforcement applications. In a contentious turn of events, the Dallas Police Department (US) recently appropriated military robotics technology to a domestic law enforcement application. The Remotec Androx Mark V A-1 delivered a 1-pound C4 payload to target a sniper that had been shooting at police officers in July 2016 (Sidner & Simon 2016; Karimi et al. 2016). This system employs very little autonomy and, like many of the rescue robots mentioned above, the only dimension of autonomy it employs is \"control distance\" (see section 1.3). Nevertheless, this system that allows increased \"control distance\" was employed in this way for the first time (Peterson 2016). Though it represents a true first, and therefore an important step toward further technological automation in US domestic police activity, it does not appear to have violated US law (Roberts 2016), though the use of explosives in law enforcement operations is a controversial issue from an international human rights law perspective. There are at least two important issues at stake in this example. First, there is the migration of equipment that is traditionally and originally associated with the military (the robot itself, and the C4 explosives) to domestic law enforcement use. This transfer is analogous to the transition of rescue robot technology to military high-value target search applications especially in countries such as the United States (see section 2.2.1). Much has been written on the rapid growth of military-style equipment among domestic law enforcement agencies and such growth has been ongoing for decades (Kraska & Cubellis 1997). A thorough account of this phenomenon falls outside the scope of this report. Here we need only notice that though the human rights law that governs law enforcement activity and the international humanitarian law that governs military action stand quite apart, there is an increasing cross flow of equipment from the military to the law enforcement context and this may generate some causes for ethical and legal concerns. Second, though the Dallas police robot is better characterized as remotely operated than autonomous, it nevertheless was used to hold the sniper at risk while reducing the risk to the police officers involved. Should the Dallas example become a precedent and operations of this kind become a trend, it might prove to be a trend that many find uncomfortable. Though in the military context, increasing risk to one's enemies while decreasing risk to one's own forces (provided there is no parasitic increase in risk to noncombatants) is not merely permissible, but it is often an intended purpose of military operations. In the domestic law enforcement case, however, the normative purpose of such operations, according to the UN Congress on the Prevention of Crime is to \"apply non-violent means before resorting to the use of force and firearms\" (United Nations 1990). One wonders whether armed robots will naturally lend themselves to unnecessarily rapid (and therefore perhaps unjustified) escalations of force that unnecessarily increases risk to civilians thereby imposing a kind of moral hazard.7 7 For comparison, find a well-thought out application of this moral hazard in the military context in Kaag & Kreps (2014). Part 2 – Background Information Page 46 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Another less controversial application of autonomous systems to law enforcement operations is a commercially available system that identifies the point of origin of a discharged firearm without required inputs from police officers or witnesses. Where installed, \"ShotSpotter Flex\" measures the latency of the shot's sound in multiple microphones at varying distances and directions. It then autonomously triangulates the point of origin and transmits that location to police vehicles in the vicinity (ShotSpotter). As was the case with some of the rescue surveillance systems listed above, the autonomy of this system can be measured in terms of six of the seven autonomy dimensions in section 1.3 (Control Distance, Compartmentalized Functions, Spatial and Temporal Scales, Task Complexity, Environmental Complexity and Human-non-human interaction) but not self-organization and collective agency. 2.2.3 Military Examples of autonomous systems in the military context include the US Air Force and Navy RQ-4 Global Hawk, the US Navy's Mk-15 Phalanx Close in Weapons System, Israel's Iron Dome missile defense system, South Korea's SGR-1 defense weapon, and the UK's Taranis technology demonstrator. Though the Global Hawk can be controlled real-time, it is autonomous in the sense that it is capable of flying preprogrammed, Intelligence, Surveillance, Reconnaissance (ISR) missions from start to finish (Drezner & Leonard 2002). Israel's Iron Dome missile defense system identifies inbound rockets and missiles, determines whether those projectiles are directed toward residential areas, and if so, automatically fires a missile to intercept the inbound projectile (Berman 2012). Though a human may be able to interrupt or \"abort\" the engagement, human action is not required for the engagement to commence. The US Navy's Mk-15 Phalanx Close In Weapons System, though used primarily for fleet defense, has also been deployed in a land-based force protection role. It is capable of autonomously targeting aerial threats that meet a predetermined set of flight profile conditions. A subsequent iteration of the system includes an optional setting that requires human crewmembers to visually confirm targets prior to engagement (Raytheon Corporation). South Korea's SGR-1 is deployed to the demilitarized zone between North and South Korea and, though it is capable of targeting and engaging dismounted personnel autonomously, designers have included the requirement that a human operator consent to weapons employment prior to engaging enemy soldiers (Prigg 2014). Finally, the UK's technology demonstrator \"Taranis\" is often listed as an autonomous weapons system and it can conduct entire missions autonomously. The degree of autonomy with respect to targeting and weapons employment, however, is a closely held secret (Del Prado 2015). 2.3 Status of Autonomous Capacities in Military Command & Control Structures One should recognize that while the current level of technological sophistication and algorithmic control may be quite a recent development, the fact of autonomy is not. Conceptually, these systems function based on a series of if/then determinations to reach the \"launch\" or \"engage\" decision. For example, in the Iron Dome case, (1) if a projectile is detected, (2) and if it has the parabolic flight path of an inbound rocket or mortar, (3) and if the projectile is pointed toward a residential area, then a missile is launched in response. Each of these conditions is evaluated technologically without human input. The same kind of autonomy, though admittedly lacking in technological and algorithmic sophistication, has been present in land mines for over 100 years. A land mine is – following our considerations regarding autonomy in section 1.3. – rather an automated weapon with an abysmal record of meeting the discrimination and proportionality requirements of international humanitarian law and the just war tradition. The fact that \"operational autonomy\" is a category that admits cutting edge and future technologies as well as centuries old technologies is thus another good reason to consider (operational) autonomy on a sliding scale Part 2 – Background Information Page 47 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 and to define such systems based not on the false autonomous/not autonomous dichotomy, but on a graduated spectrum of less to more autonomous according to the dimensions listed in section 1.3. In addition to stand-alone autonomous systems, a number of US military leaders see human-machine teaming as the next immediate step in autonomous systems development. Applications in this sphere would range from ISR operations to logistical support to kinetic combat operations. For example, Mr. Matt Donohue, Director of the US Army's Ground Maneuver Technology Portfolio suspects that autonomous systems will develop \"layer-by-layer\" and that the next such development will allow for a convoy \"leader-follower\" capability (McNally 2014) allowing a manned vehicle to lead a convoy of unmanned follower vehicles (Judson 2016). Likewise, Dr. Greg Zacharias, the US Air Force's Chief Scientist, has said that \"truly unmanned\" air vehicles will be partnered with a manned aircraft flight lead as \"loyal wingman\" within a decade (Malenic 2016). The US Air Force Small Unmanned Aircraft Systems Flight Plan 2016-2036 suggests that ISR functions such as onboard processing, exploitation, and dissemination (PED) will be 90% autonomous within the next twenty years, that swarming technologies will be half human-controlled and half autonomously-controlled, but that targeting operations against human targets will still remain entirely under the control of a human decision-maker (ISR 2016). Bob Work, the US Deputy Secretary of Defense, has summarized these views saying that \"the way we go after human-machine collaboration is allowing the machine to help humans make better decisions faster\" (Pellerin 2015). 2.3.1 Case Studies The difficulty that naturally arises in classifying such systems is grounded in a number of intersecting concepts. The following examples will be assessed in terms of the dimensions of autonomy introduced in section 1.3: (1) control distance, (2) compartmentalized functions, (3) spatial and temporal scales, (4) task complexity, (5) environmental complexity, (6) human and non-human interaction, and (7) self-organization and collective agency. Consider a few notional examples. Emergency Medicine System on the Battlefield: As a first example, imagine an autonomous medical system tasked with conducting battlefield triage of friendly combatants, enemy combatants, and noncombatants wounded in the fighting. Two prima facie problems arise: First, what if the system malfunctions? Or, put a better way, what if the system encounters an operational reality that its designers did not foresee? There may be a case in which a human doctor would have chosen to treat person A ahead of person B for a host of complex reasons and that the system's capabilities are insufficient to manage that complexity. The end result could be a catastrophic decision that causes someone to die who would otherwise not die. In this medical, non-combat application, there are nevertheless life-and-death consequences for failure. The second concern may present itself even if the system is performing as intended. Here, suppose the system makes determinations based on the severity of wounds and likelihood of revival according to the same variables on which a human doctor would decide. There may be ethical concerns over sacrificing one human life for another at the direction of a robot, even if the structure and the outcome of the decision-making process is identical to the one that would have been made by the human. In this case, we see the following dimensions of autonomy at play: Even if the system is adequately programmed and prepared for its (2) compartmentalized functions and (5) rather extreme environmental complexity, (1) the level of human interaction combined with (4) task complexity yields a potentially ethically dubious result. Drone Surveillance: In a second case, consider the real-world example of a US Air Force MQ-1 Predator pilot tasked with observing and collecting patterns of life on a high value individual (HVI) in Afghanistan Part 2 – Background Information Page 48 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 in 2012. Each day, the HVI walks to a neighboring field where children often play, takes a child and places that child on the back of his motorbike before proceeding to conduct his duties as an operational leader of al Qaeda in Afghanistan. The HVI is obviously using the child as a human shield, attempting to prevent the US from striking him. After three weeks of observation, the pilot in command of the Predator is told that the ground force commander would like to strike the individual today. The pilot asks a number of the officers and soldiers involved why it has to be today – why not yesterday and why not tomorrow? He is unable to get a satisfactory answer from the ground force that is directing the strike. He is told only that the proportionality, discrimination, and necessity requirements of the international laws of war have all been met. The pilot, on his authority as an officer and the commander of the aircraft, refuses to take the shot, leaving both the child and the HVI alive. Imagine an attempt at automating this targeting process in some future weapons system. It seems that the only standards available with which to equip the autonomous targeting system to make its determinations are those provided by the Just War Tradition and International Humanitarian Law. But these demands of proportionality, discrimination, and necessity were met in this case. Therefore, where a human resisted and chose not to engage on ethical grounds or grounds of conscience, it is difficult to imagine a system that is designed in such a way that it would likewise choose not to engage. Here, the concepts at play include (1) the control distance between the human operator (and his or her conscience) and the system, (2) the compartmentalized functions (in that only the objective international humanitarian law considerations, and not considerations of ethics and morality as such, can be plausibly delegated to the system, and (6) human interaction, given that the ethical content of the scenario is grounded largely in the presence of a child. It is unclear whether the user would want the system to violate the standing guidance (i.e., proportionality, discrimination, necessity) for some other, perhaps poorly defined and likely deontological moral intuition. Rescue Robot: In a third case, consider a notional autonomous robot capable of digging through enormous pieces of rubble to rescue trapped persons. The intentionality of such a system seems undeniably good (it is not designed to harm and it is designed to help innocent people in dire need of help). Nevertheless, in order for the system to move heavy pieces of concrete it would have to be quite large, and therefore probably dangerous to unprotected humans. Imagine a case in which such a system is employed in an area that is dangerous for human rescue personnel. Consider a notional example like the 2001 New York World Trade Center such that the first tower had fallen but the second had not yet fallen. Rescue workers responding to the first tower's collapse would be subjected to the very high risk of the second tower's collapse. Sending in the autonomous rescue robot would reduce the risk to responders. Such a system, though it is capable of removing large pieces of concrete, is also capable of crushing the very people it was designed to help. Here, once again, there are multiple, intersecting concepts at work. These are, most importantly, (6) the impacts of the system's interaction with human victims, but also the (4) task and (5) environmental complexity in association with that human interaction. Finally, in order to provide any safety to human responders, the system must operate at some (1) control distance, making it more difficult for human operators to engage a \"kill switch\" to shut the system down if something were to go wrong. Wide Area Motion Imagery System: Finally, consider as a forth case a military wide area motion imagery (WAMI) intelligence, surveillance, and reconnaissance (ISR) system. Such a system (already being pursued by the US Air Force) would provide imagery coverage of more than 100 square kilometers. Current bandwidth limitations are such that the system is unable to transmit the entire coverage area to the ground-based intelligence personnel who provide processing, exploitation, and dissemination (PED). So the system transmits only \"video chips\" and \"subviews\" (Menthe et al. 2012). Suppose the determination of which video chips and subviews to distribute to ground-based intelligence personnel were automated Part 2 – Background Information Page 49 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 such that the system would decide, based on pre-programmed factors, which video would be seen by the human user in real-time. Such a system might prove a valuable decision-aid for military commanders. Such a system might be programmed to maintain awareness of known enemy vehicles, then identify times and places in which the vehicles are co-located and transmit that \"subview\" to the ground crews, allowing for higher resolution PED. While potentially valuable, such a capability comes with some opportunity cost. While the system autonomously directs the intelligence personnel (and by extension, the commander) to a particular area of interest, given the bandwidth limitations, it necessarily does so at the expense of other areas. It is easy to imagine, as was the case with previous notional examples, that the system might perform exactly how it was intended, and yet miss an important element because the importance of that particular element was unforeseen by the designers. In such a situation, the machine autonomously directs the commander's attention toward something and therefore also away from something else. This is precisely what happened to human operators (without contributions from artificial intelligence) in the inadvertent 2015 AC-130 strike against a Doctors Without Borders hospital in Kunduz, Afghanistan. The aircrew focused so heavily on the building under their crosshairs – and as a result failed to look at other possible buildings – and convinced themselves that the description they received of the enemy compound matched the hospital (Hickman, 2015). In the Kunduz case, human error led to task saturation, confirmation bias, and channelization. It is not difficult to imagine that an ISR decision aid might, even while perfectly performing its pre-programmed code, result in the same kind of error (Caliskan-Islam et al. 2016). This difficulty can be viewed through the autonomy dimensions of (2) compartmentalized functions, (3) special and temporal scales (e.g., for how long is the system permitted to operate autonomously before its software must be updated to reflect new operational realities and observations), (5) environmental complexity, owing to the difficulty in determining a priori which variables will be tactically important, and (7) the dangers of a learning system identifying new important variables incorrectly without human interaction and correction. These four examples are by no means intended to be exhaustive nor conclusive. They are instead intended to be instructive. The real-world application of autonomous systems, regardless of the context, generates difficult ethical and legal challenges. 2.4 Outlook of Likely Developments Autonomous technologies will undoubtedly continue to develop. Insofar as the military and law enforcement contexts are concerned, however, there are three ways in which the deployment of these systems will be limited; or perhaps more helpfully, three perspectives from which one can view limitations on forthcoming developments. 2.4.1 Technological Limitations First, the development of autonomous systems will be limited by technological restrictions. Experts disagree as to how far the technology will develop in the next ten to fifteen years. Varying conceptions include the following important distinctions. Some recognize the difference between being ethical and behaving ethically. One expert claims that the technology is \"not anywhere close\" to being able to produce moral reasoning (INTV04). Another expert suggests that \"an absolute minimum criterion for ethically justified killing is the ability to grasp the moral context of killing\" (INTV03). If such a \"grasp\" or understanding on the part of the system is admitted as a prerequisite (a claim that falls outside the autonomy dimensions described in section 1.3) for the ethical use of lethal autonomous systems, then the technological ability to Part 2 – Background Information Page 50 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 design and program moral reasoning stands as a significant barrier to ethically justifiable lethal autonomous systems. Another strictly technological concern regards transparency. On the one hand, in order to produce the kinds of military effects leaders seem to be seeking, the advertised systems must incorporate machine learning. But, according to one expert, \"machine learning systems are by nature black boxes – we only see the output\" (INTV02). Another suggests that the transparency of the learning system depends upon whether it is a statistical learning system (that will admit of some transparency) or a neural net (that will not) (see section 1.3). The fact that such systems can learn provides the capability in question, but the fact that they can learn implies that we may be unable, ex post facto, to discover the reasoning for a particular decision. As a result, transparency as to why a system capable of machine learning acted in the way it did may be either inherently impossible or, at the very least, extremely difficult. 2.4.2 Legal Limitations The second kind of limitation is grounded in legal requirements. The experts universally agree that technological systems must conform to standing international humanitarian law (IHL) in the military context and human rights law in the law enforcement context. One particularly salient IHL requirement is that military actions only be conducted when the military value of the target exceeds the magnitude of the expected collateral damage (ICRC Customary; IHL Rule 1.4). Though proportionality considerations carried out by human military commanders may often be portrayed as a \"numbers game,\" such considerations are in fact not at all simple for humans and therefore are very difficult to automate. There is no consensus among the experts interviewed as to whether the technological developments over the next ten to fifteen years will be able to satisfactorily meet these requirements. IHL also requires that soldiers discriminate between combatants and non-combatants (ICRC Customary; IHL Rule 1). There is some consensus among experts that the difficulty of the discrimination problem is dependent upon the particular context in question and perhaps even the domain of war in question. It is likely the case that in the next ten to fifteen years, autonomous systems will still be unable to distinguish between the insurgent (combatant) carrying an AK-47 and the farmer (non-combatant) carrying an AK47 (see Roff, 2014). Nevertheless, they may be able to distinguish between combatant and noncombatant underwater vessels, aircraft, or spacecraft.8 There is an additional problem with algorithmic approaches to discrimination. Such approaches would likely require systems to identify combatant targets based on past behaviors. One result might be that even if an enemy combatant lays down his weapons, the system would be unable to recognize that particular action, and therefore the change in status (INTV09), violating the IHL mandate to accept surrendering soldiers as prisoners of war rather than as combatants (ICRC Customary; IHL Rule 47). Thus, technological developments may make autonomous targeting systems plausible in some domains and contexts but not in others. An additional legal concern surrounds the function creep (or mission creep) associated with developing technologies. For example, the Dallas Police Department's June 2016 use of a military-style robot carrying a C4 explosive (Sidner & Simon 2016) to target a sniper was the first law enforcement use of a robotic system in this way (Sidner & Simon 2016; Karimi et al. 2016). According to one expert (INTV21), one 8 We have included spacecraft because there is a conceivable intercontinental ballistic missile (ICBM) exchange in which a defensive missile defense system must distinguish between a hostile ballistic missile in the exoatmospheric phase of flight and a neutral cell phone provider's satellite. Part 2 – Background Information Page 51 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 standard by which such an action might be evaluated is the list of equipment the department issues as standard. The Dallas Police Department (and many other US police departments) regularly issues explosives as a means of intentionally detonating explosive material. It probably had the robot for the same reason: for defusing explosives while keeping police officers at a safe distance. So the use of the explosive carrying robot may have been legally justified because the Police Department standardly carries robots and explosives even though this particular application of robots and explosives was both unconventional in the combination of the two elements and unconventional in that the target was an active shooter (rather than an explosive device). The foreseeable legal problem in the law enforcement category is that a means is justifiable if one already has it, but one will only have it if it is justifiable. Thus, incremental changes in the use of such weapons may generate incremental changes in the normative legal standards for their use. 2.4.3 Operational Limitations The final way of looking at these limitations is from the military or law enforcement commander's perspective. It may be the case that a system that is deemed legal and that is capable of acting autonomously may nevertheless be unable to achieve the commander's intent. We might return to the case of distinguishing between the AK-47 clad Afghan farmer and the AK-47 clad Afghan insurgent. While failing to discriminate between these two generates a legal and ethical problem, it also generates an operational and strategic problem. If the commander intends to win a counterinsurgency war, for example, then winning \"hearts and minds\" will be critical to that effort (United States Army 2006). As a result, failing to distinguish between combatant and non-combatant is not only a moral and legal failure, but an unwise operational decision. This problem may, under some circumstances, generate peculiarly operational issues (that is, without generating legal and ethical problems), but in the general case there will likely be significant overlap between the ethical and legal requirements and the commander's operational requirements. This section warrants a brief note about dual use systems. It is difficult to discuss \"search and rescue technologies\", because any system designed for search and rescue could be likewise used for weaponized military applications (as demonstrated above in the 9/11 search and rescue robots case, see section 2.2.1). There is also an increasing trend in the modularity of such systems. A state or individual might purchase a drone for the purposes of intelligence, surveillance, and reconnaissance (ISR) operations and then modify the drone to carry a weapon (as ISIS has done in Syria; Gibbons-Neff 2016). Because some systems are designed with this modularity in view, it is difficult to define the system on the whole. For example, Insitu's ScanEagle aircraft widely used for ISR operations around the world is capable of carrying 140 after market payloads offered by more than 60 manufacturers. Some of these add lethal capabilities to what would otherwise be an ISR system. Currently, according to interviewed experts, the Swiss government's legal review of proposed weapons systems (and similar reviews of other states including the US) require that the whole system be evaluated. Notionally, if the Swiss government were to legally review and purchased the ScanEagle at a time when no lethal payloads were available and subsequently, such payloads were made available, the Swiss government would have to conduct a new review of the entire system, including new payloads prior to buying any new payloads. This practice seems wise and will likely continue. We mention it here only to suggest that as this trend in modularity continues, such reviews will likely increase in importance, but will also likely become more time-consuming and cumbersome. Part 2 – Background Information Page 52 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 3 Law This chapter gives an overview of the law governing autonomous weapons systems.9 Given that several of the substantive legal issues have already been discussed in previous sections (notably sub-sections 2.3.1 and 2.5.2) this section strongly focuses on the legal processes currently under way and the genesis of the debate on the international plane; it provides a sketch of the relevant actors and initiatives (section 3.1). The section then only briefly highlights the main issues arising under both the law of armed conflict and the law applicable in peacetime (section 3.2), while linking back to the legal issues discussed in the previous section. It concludes with a short outlook on likely developments (section 3.3). 3.1 Actors and Initiatives on the International Plane The international legal debate on autonomous weapons systems takes place mostly in Geneva, within the forum provided by the Certain Conventional Weapons Convention (CCW)10. The process was broadly set into motion in 2012, although the academic discussion on ethical and legal aspects of autonomous weapon systems started earlier (e.g., Sparrow 2007; Singer 2009; see also the International Committee for Robot Arms Control, founded in 2009 by Juergen Altmann, Peter Asaro, Noel Sharkey, and Rob Sparrow, which has been driving the discussion forward. One document that was instrumental in getting it moving was a report by Human Rights Watch (Docherty et al. 2012), written together with the Harvard International Human Rights Clinic and entitled \"Losing Humanity: The Case against Killer Robots\"11. The report argued that the advent of \"killer robots\", namely weapons systems that are capable of killing fully autonomously, was imminent. Since, according to \"Losing Humanity\", such systems would fail to comply with international humanitarian law, the report proposed a \"preemptive prohibition on their use and development\" (Docherty et al. 2012, p. 1). The report fed into a broadly anchored \"Campaign to Stop Killer Robots\" which was launched in April 2013. At the same time, a report of the United Nations Special Rapporteur on extrajudicial, summary or arbitrary executions, Christoph Heyns, of April 2013 called for national moratoria on the development of \"lethal autonomous robotics\": \"This report is a call for a pause, to allow serious and meaningful international engagement with this issue\" (Heyns 2013, para. 33). This report had been preceded by an interim report by the previous UN Special Rapporteur on extrajudicial, summary or arbitrary execution, Philip Alston. Already the interim report diagnosed a lack of discussion in civil society about the employment of robots in warfare (Alston 2010, p. 16). The interim report had relied on Singer (2009), which had already broken some ground for a broader discussion about robots in warfare in general. Heyns' report also recommended to the United Nations Human Rights Council to \"call on all States to declare and implement national moratoria on at least the testing, production, assembly, transfer, acquisition, deployment and use of LARS [Lethal Autonomous Robotic Systems] until such time as an internationally agreed upon framework [...] has been established\" (Heyns 2013, para. 113). The report urged the establishment of an expert group to assess the implications of robots under humanitarian and human 9 This chapter, especially subsection 3.1, draws on Burri (2016), where specific views of autonomy are examined. 10 Convention on Prohibitions or Restrictions on the Use of Certain Conventional Weapons which may be deemed to be Excessively Injurious or to have Indiscriminate Effects (with Protocols I, II and III), 1342 UNTS 163 (engl.), 10 October 1980. 11 For an immediate reaction to \"Losing Humanity\", see Thurnher (2013). For an accessible discussion of the process in Geneva, see Weaver (2014), pp. 131 et seq. For a broad discussion of robots and cybernetics, see Rid (2016). Part 2 – Background Information Page 53 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 rights law (ibid., para. 35). Soon thereafter, experts met three times informally in Geneva, namely in May 2014 (United Nations 2014), April 2015 (United Nations 2015), and April 2016 (United Nations 2016b) in the context of the CCW12 to discuss lethal autonomous weapons and possible measures necessary to address them (on unmanned warfare more generally, see also Galliott 2016). Autonomous weapons systems also came to figure prominently on the agendas of high-level events such as the World Economic Forum in Davos in 2016 (World Economic Forum 2016) and the Munich Security Conference of 2016 (Ignatius 2016). In December 2016, the fifth Review Conference of CCW formally decided to establish an open-ended Group of governmental experts to address lethal autonomous weapons:13 \"To establish an open-ended Group of Governmental Experts (GGE) related to emerging technologies in the area of lethal autonomous weapons systems (LAWS) in the context of the objectives and purposes of the Convention, which shall meet for a period of ten days in 2017, adhering to the agreed recommendations contained in document CCW/CONF.V/2, and to submit a report to the 2017 Meeting of the High Contracting Parties to the Convention consistent with those recommendations. The GGE will hold its first session from 24 to 28 April 2017 or from 21 to 25 August 2017 and its second session from 13 to 17 November 2017 in Geneva. [...]\". A number of actors have converged around this CCW process, of which states have traditionally been in charge, in order to address autonomous weapons systems. Civil society is represented by NGOs such as Amnesty International (2015), Article 36, the International Committee for Robot Arms Control14 and Human Rights Watch (Docherty et al. 2012, 2014, 2015). The international movement of the Red Cross, notably the International Committee of the Red Cross (ICRC 2016) and the International Conference of the Red Cross and the Red Crescent (ICRC 2015: pp. 44-47), is also effectively engaged in addressing autonomous weapons systems in the light of the laws of armed conflict. The argument about autonomous weapons systems has also reached administrators, lawyers, and lawmakers concerned with the law applicable during peacetime (see the Dallas police incident discussed above, in section 2.2.2). Doubts have notably arisen whether the use of autonomous weapons systems by law enforcement would be in compliance with human rights, but the discussion is still in its infancy (Docherty et al. 2014; Heyns 2013). On a different note, organizations normally occupied with technical issues have become engaged in the discussion about law and ethics of autonomous systems more generally. Thus, the IEEE in 2016 began to devote time and effort to autonomous systems (including weapons systems). In a broadly anchored participatory process involving more than 100 experts the IEEE Global Standard Initiative on Ethical Considerations in Artificial Intelligence and Autonomous Systems elaborated a charter on \"Ethically Aligned Design\". While this charter discusses autonomous systems generally, it also includes a chapter on weapons systems (IEEE 2016, pp. 68-79). The European Parliament has begun to consider autonomous systems, too. It adopted a report with certain recommendations on civil use of 12 See Final Report (United Nations 2013), Meeting of the High Contracting Parties to CCW, CCW/MSP/2013/10, 16 December 2013, para. 32 for the establishment of the first informal meeting of experts on lethal autonomous weapons systems; for the second meeting: Final Report, Meeting of the High Contracting Parties to CCW, CCW/MSP/2014/9, 27 November 2014, para. 36. 13 Final Document (United Nations 2016) of the Fifth Review Conference [Advance version], FIFTH REVIEW CONFERENCE OF THE HIGH CONTRACTING PARTIES TO THE [CCW], 23 December 2016, Decision 1, p. 9. 14 See www.icrac.net, including the \"Original Mission Statement\" of 2009 and the \"Berlin Statement\" of 2010 (under „Statements\"). Part 2 – Background Information Page 54 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 robotics.15 This document does not address autonomous weapons systems in depth, though, for the European Union (and thus the Parliament) lacks the power to address security issues, since according to the founding treaties of the Union most powers in the security domain remain with the member states. 3.2 The Substance of the International Debate The international debate about lethal autonomous weapons systems centers on the international humanitarian law laid down in the Geneva conventions (including the three additional protocols). The principal idea of international humanitarian law is that in armed conflict – in contrast to non-conflicts in which human rights apply rather than humanitarian law – it is not a priori unlawful to kill or harm humans provided that certain legal principles, namely distinction, necessity and proportionality, are observed. Roughly speaking, one may only attack military targets, such as combatants; the military gain an attack offers must also be in reasonable relationship to the damage it causes. One of the main concerns under humanitarian law is that autonomous weapons systems will not be used in compliance with the principles of distinction and proportionality or that they undermine the human responsibility to ensure compliance with those legal obligations.16 The application of these principles is highly context-dependent; a lawful target may become an unlawful target within seconds, e.g. when a combatant signals that he or she surrenders. (For further illustrations, see the case studies in section 2.3.1.) The principles also require the careful balancing of the interests at stake, sometimes in situations in which information is scarce and the time to consider a decision is limited. So far, humans have exercised measured judgment in these situations. Although the future development of technology is uncertain at this point in time, the worry now is that the use of autonomous weapons systems will not be in accordance with these principles and will consequently violate humanitarian law; hence the push by some for banning them. It was described above in section 3.1 how civil society and non-governmental organizations drive much of the push for a ban. However, there is pushback too. Anderson and Waxman (2013), for instance, argue against a ban of lethal autonomous weapon systems, instead opting for an incremental approach by gradually evolving existing codes of conduct. According to Schmitt and Thurnher, a ban would be \"insupportable as a matter of law, policy, and operational good sense\" (Schmitt & Thurnher 2013, p. 233). Kerr and Szilagyi, in contrast, draw attention to the fact that lethal autonomous weapon systems would have an impact on international humanitarian law. Such weapons systems would notably result in a changed understanding of what would be considered militarily necessary. According to them, international humanitarian law contributes to this change in the idea of necessity through its neutrality towards new technology. Despite this pushback, most stakeholders seem to agree in principle that the decision to kill should not be transferred to machines. The debate is most heated, however, on the question when this would happen, 15 Draft Report with recommendation to the Commission on Civil Law Rules on Robotics, EUROPEAN PARLIAMENT (COMMITTEE ON LEGAL AFFAIRS; RAPPORTEUR: MADY DELVAUX), 2015/2103(INL), 31 May 2016. 396 MEP voted in favor, 123 against and 85 abstained (see Cooper & Plucinska 2017). 16 This is not the only problem though. Roff (2014), identifies problems with the targeting process when autonomous weapons systems are involved. Part 2 – Background Information Page 55 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 while the uncertainty about the future \"autonomy\" of systems further complicates the debate. \"Meaningful human control\" over the decision to kill appears to be required, but it is hard to determine what this means.17 Variations of control already exist in that humans may be \"in\", \"on\" or \"out of the loop\", but these are rough approximations to a wide range of control options available. (see also section 4.2.2.). The law of armed conflict traditionally applies in physical, real-world conflict where embodied autonomous weapons systems can be deployed. However, autonomous systems also operate in cyberspace where the legal situation is even less clear (Walter 2015, p. 685). With cyberspace being outside the scope of this report, it is only noted briefly that the law of armed conflict and the prohibition to use force, a basic principle upon which the United Nations Charter is built (see article 2(4)), seem applicable in cyberspace (Schmitt 2013). In cyberspace, control (over software, etc.) is also a thorny legal problem, especially so when cyber warfare leads to loss of life. If autonomous weapons systems were deployed in non-conflicts, e.g. for purposes of law enforcement and police work (again see the Dallas incidence above section 2.2.2, though the only dimension of autonomy it employed was \"control distance\", see section 1.3), the applicable legal framework would change (Asaro 2016). Depending on each state's treaty obligations, human rights law (rather than humanitarian law) is applicable; they are typically supplemented by constitutional rights and freedoms. Killing a human is only lawful under rare and exceptional circumstances within this civil human rights framework, so lethal autonomous weapons systems will likely feature less prominently than in armed conflict. However, the use of police force more generally may possibly be automated in the future. In the human rights framework, the question of when restrictions of the rights to life and corporal integrity resulting from the use of police force are lawful is answered by means of a careful exercise of balancing which involves flexible and highly context-dependent notions such as necessity and proportionality. The worry with autonomous systems is that they will not be capable of exercising the measured judgment needed for this balancing exercise in concrete situations. In addition, control over autonomous systems may be difficult to conceptualize and measure. While these issues broadly reflect the conceptual challenges autonomous weapons systems give rise to under international humanitarian law, the legal concerns under human rights law seem more serious, since collateral damage is tolerable to a lesser extent and strong due process rights need to be respected. It will be up to domestic legal orders to deal with these issues. In Switzerland, the cantonal police forces operate in a well-established and robust framework of cantonal administrative laws. It would have to be assessed with reference to the applicable cantonal law, for instance, whether the use of explosives in circumstances such as those prevailing in the Dallas incidence would be lawful. The fundamental rights individuals enjoy pursuant to the Swiss federal constitution (and international human rights instruments) would have to be fed into the assessment, namely the right to life and corporeal integrity (article 10 paragraphs 1 and 2 of the Swiss federal constitution). Precedent could provide some, though limited guidance.18 To the best of the authors' knowledge, no case involving autonomous systems has so far reached the Swiss courts. Under both humanitarian and human rights law, liability is a major concern.19 With control distance increasing, causation, a key concept in liability, becomes difficult to establish. The behavior of autonomous systems may not always be fully predictable either, especially with machine learning systems (see section 17 For attempts to conceptualize human control, see Crootof (2016, p. 9 et sq.), Roff & Moyes (2016), Sharkey (2016). 18 See the famous killing shot taken by the police of the Grisons in Chur in 2000, discussed in Chapman 2010. 19 Asaro (2011) already pointed out two problems with liability of robots/AI: moral agency and punishment. See also Human Rights Watch (Docherty et al. 2015) and von Bothmer, Frederik (2014). Part 2 – Background Information Page 56 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 1.1.8). Their behavior may sometimes not even be fully explainable even with the benefit of hindsight and under ideal circumstances of full transparency (see section 1.3 and Burri 2017). Consequently, it becomes unclear who is responsible when a system causes damage (on the responsibility gap, see below, section 4.1). While the resulting uncertainty complicates liability both under civil and criminal law, insurance is not a way out under criminal law (unless certain basic conceptions of criminal law were fundamentally changed). In international law, similar complications arise in the contexts of international criminal liability of individuals and international responsibility of states and international organizations. Certain technical approaches, though, seem to have the potential to make liability work for autonomous systems (Kroll et al. 2017, p. 699 et sq.). A final legal problem with autonomous systems stems from the fact that they can be used in various ways. Certain uses may be relevant under humanitarian law, while others may be purely civilian. One typical example is a flying drone, which, depending on circumstances, may be used for civilian purposes or as a weapon. This potential dual use complicates legal assessment and enforcement (and a ban on autonomous weapons systems) as well as the testing of new weapons pursuant to article 36 of the Additional Protocol to the Geneva Conventions (Protocol I)20. For more details on testing and use of autonomous weapons systems, see US Department of Defense (2012). 3.3 Possible Developments in the Law The outcome of the CCW process is uncertain at this point in time. Yet it is not very likely that a strong ban on autonomous weapons systems will be agreed upon. Operational autonomy along various dimensions (see section 1.3) and in various degrees is present in too many weapons systems already in lawful use for that to be a realistic option. \"Autonomy\" is also a less clear notion than, for instance, \"blinding lasers\". (A ban on blinding lasers had been the result of a process similar to that currently underway with regard to autonomous weapons systems; Doswald-Beck 1993). A ban would also have to be widely accepted in order to be effective. A legal instrument no one subscribes to or complies with is not in the interest of anyone involved in the CCW process. A more likely outcome is the prohibition against or regulation of specific uses of autonomous weapons systems. Ideally, the notion of \"meaningful human control\" would be fleshed out in some more detail. This is by no means simple. The number of rules and regulations needed to allocate ordinary \"control\" at the right place in conventional armed forces (where no autonomous systems are involved) is indicative of difficulties ahead. Similarly, despite the evolution of a theory of agency in philosophy, political science and economics, we only have a basic understanding of who (or what) controls whom (or what) and under which circumstances. The work of the group of governmental experts established pursuant to the decision taken in December 2016 in the context of CCW will take time. It took the international experts assembled by the ICRC in 1989 two years to come to grips with blinding lasers (and blinding lasers were relatively straightforward), and it took four more years for Protocol IV to the CCW on blinding laser weapons to be adopted. There is no guarantee that the work will end in success either. States will likely make their influence felt in the group 20 Article 36 Protocol I: \"New weapons. In the study, development, acquisition or adoption of a new weapon, means or method of warfare, a High Contracting Party is under an obligation to determine whether its employment would, in some or all circumstances, be prohibited by this Protocol or by any other rule of international law applicable to the High Contracting Party.\" Part 2 – Background Information Page 57 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 of experts and their interests diverge. The likely \"haves\" among them will be reluctant to forgo the strategic and tactical advantage autonomous weapons confer, while the likely \"not-haves\" will push for a strong ban. That the process will be wrenched from CCW – as happened with land mines when a separate, more expeditious negotiation channel had been opened which ultimately resulted in a comprehensive treaty banning land mines (Convention Mines 1997; for details see Burri 2016, pp. 357-358) – is a possibility. But there seems to be less consensus on autonomous weapons systems than there had been on land mines. Given the state of technology, it is probably also less urgent to regulate them. Finally, both ban and regulation could to some extent become redundant, if compliance with humanitarian law could somehow be programmed into autonomous systems (Arkin 2009; Anderson & Anderson Leigh 2015, p. 324 et sq.). Part 2 – Background Information Page 58 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 4 Ethics In this chapter, we will review the ethics of autonomous robotic systems as defined in chapter 1 and in particular the definition of autonomy in section 1.3. The primary ethical concerns discussed in this section will relate to using autonomous robotics systems that are equipped with the capacity to harm or destroy. In the previous sections (sub-sections 2.3.1, 2.5.2, and chapter 3), we have discussed laws and policies as they relate to these systems but ethics is a third important factor in judging the value of autonomous weapons systems. Autonomous weapons systems are an emerging technology and emerging technologies add another layer of difficulty in our ethical analysis. The rate of change in these technologies can outpace the ability of governments to properly discuss and regulate them before the next iteration of change occurs (see the essays in Marchant et al. 2011). The disruption to the policy and legal status quo created by new technologies produces policy gaps where these new technologies can push what is possible beyond what was imaginable just a few decades earlier. The philosopher James Moor (2005) claims that these moments are where the philosophical study of ethics is particularly helpful. While ethics is neither a physical nor a social science, it is informed by law and the sciences and is a necessary first step in creating not only a survivable future with autonomous weapons systems, but also one that might be worth living in as well. We will begin by outlining the special ethical concerns raised in the discussions about autonomous robotics systems in general and autonomous weapons systems specifically. The next subsections will look at the ethical arguments that have been raised both pro and contra towards weapons systems autonomy. We will conclude with a short look at some likely developments in these technologies that must inform our discussion on the ethics of autonomous weapons systems. 4.1 Outlining the Ethics of Autonomous Robotics Discussion Autonomous weapon systems raise many ethical concerns (cf. Enemark 2014; Galliott 2016; Di Nucci & Santoni de Sio 2016), as do autonomous vehicles aka self-driving cars (cf. Maurer et al. 2015) and healthcare/assistive/companionship robots (cf. Sharkey 2012a; van Wynsberghe 2015). Beyond the obvious political impacts there is also a growing apprehension regarding the likely effects that interacting with these kinds of systems will have on human social interaction (Turkle 2011; van den Brule et al. 2014). Others have focused on the risks of machine learning (Matthias 2004), especially when it is combined with systems autonomy (Haselager 2005; Noorman & Johnson 2014). In order to begin to address these, and similar, concerns a close collaboration between science, engineering, and humanities has been called for (Veruggio & Operto 2008). This call has been heeded and the interdisciplinary study variously known as, Robot Ethics, Machine Ethics, or RoboEthics has come into being (Anderson & Anderson 2011; Lin et al. 2012; Royakkers & van Est 2015, Royakkers & van Est 2016). In this field, scientists and scholars from various disciplines actively work together towards the responsible development of robotics (Asaro 2008; Lichoki et al. 2011; Pagallo 2017). This work has grown out of the general methodology of embedding ethical and societal considerations into the development of technologies using frameworks like Responsible Innovation (Owen et al. 2012) and Value-Sensitive Design (Friedman & Kahn 2003; van den Hoven et al. 2007). The ethical debate over autonomous systems can be divided in to the following main areas: responsibilities, rights, virtues, and harm. We will now look at each of these debates in turn. We remark that many of those debates are relying on experiences with the use of remotely piloted aircrafts (RPAs), which are Part 2 – Background Information Page 59 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 not systems with a high degree of autonomy (see Chapa 2018). However, issues raised by RPA foreshadow the issues that might be raised by autonomous weapons systems. 4.1.1 The Responsibility Gap A first set of concerns is whether autonomous systems may be designed in such a way that responsibility gaps between morally and legally relevant agents are avoided (Matthias 2004; Sparrow 2007; Human Right Watch, 2015). These relevant agents may be producers, owners, instructors, collaborators, or endusers for civilian applications; and producers, politicians, commanders or end-users for military applications. As robots cannot be expected to possess any high-level moral capacities, proper human accountability for a robot's actions has to be ensured at all times in morally, legally and economically appropriate ways (see the debate on military robots on this point in section 3.1 and Asaro 2008; Krishnan 2009; Guarini & Bello 2012; Sharkey 2007, 2012a, 2012b). The more autonomous capacities the systems possess, the more relevant this point becomes. This is a concern that cuts across many domains, but it has been more explicitly discussed in relation to military technologies and autonomous vehicles. As was discussed in section 1.3, the sense in which weapons systems are said to be \"autonomous\" typically refers to the engineering sense of the word. However, we have to be careful since the term \"autonomy\" also has a long history in legal, moral, and ethical philosophy and equivocation in in the use of the word \"autonomy\" with between these various meanings is an easy and common mistake. Roff (2013) argues that maintaining an insistence on paying attention to the strong philosophical sense of autonomy is required in the moral analysis of lethal autonomous weapons systems, or we risk becoming completely befuddled when discussing what commentators refer to as the responsibility gap. Given the difference between autonomous robots and the autonomy required of moral agents, Roff prefers to use the term Lethal Autonomous Robot (LAR rather than the more common Lethal Autonomous Weapons (LAWs) or Lethal Autonomous Weapons Systems (LAWS). This is an important distinction as it makes LARs not simply one more type of weapons system, but instead they function more as a new kind of artificial combatant, one that has no means of making ethical decisions, and one that is not morally equivalent to the other human combatants it may engage with. These artificial agents can confuse our ability to ascribe responsibility for a given lethal act since the machine itself cannot be the locus of responsibility because in a robot, \"there is no discussion of intent, of consciousness, or of the type of freedom that admits of moral operators of praise or blame. The robotic notion of autonomy is radically minimalist, as it removes ethical evaluation by definitional fiat\" (Roff 2013). Following this logic, LARs are not moral agents and therefore cannot be held to jus in bello considerations like any human soldier would, meaning that the more we see these systems used, the less we can hold anyone responsible for affronts that may occur to jus in bello that are committed by LARs: The deployment of LARs in combat presents us with a never before seen challenge to just war theory. First, it divorces jus in bello judgments of responsibility from the behavior of combatants, as the combatants are no longer considered moral agents capable of moral standing. By doing so, it forces any evaluations of responsibility to jus ad bellum considerations of who decides to initiate war and to use LARs in combat. Instead of deciding whether political officials started an aggressive war, and thus can be charged with a crime of aggression, we must now discern whether those officials can be held morally and legally responsible for the conduct of autonomous machines (Roff 2013). This is a strong and important argument but it relies on a definition of moral agency that requires a robust requirement of freedom of will in determining which agents count as moral agents and which do not. It Part 2 – Background Information Page 60 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 is possible that the requirement of robust freedom of will is too strong for even human agents given various biological, social, and cultural factors that certainly influence actions. If human agents cannot cross that very high bar, why should we expect robotic agents to do so as well before we grant them any moral status (Sullins 2006)? In this way if we place too high a requirement for free will in autonomous actions and accept Roff's critique of LARs, then we may be committing ourselves to a much deeper indictment of Just War Theory more generally since neither robot nor a human soldier can meet these requirements. Therefore, it follows that for pragmatic reasons we should consider the ramifications of these arguments but realize that none of them are yet conclusive. We can see from this section that ascription of responsibility for the actions of Lethal Autonomous Systems is a difficult and open question, and this fact needs to be honestly discussed in any proceedings regarding the acquisition or use of any lethal autonomous system. 4.1.2 Human Rights and Autonomous Robotics Systems A second concern is how to design systems so that they do not negatively affect basic human rights. This concern has been voiced especially in relation to possible violations of both physical and psychological integrity by healthcare robots (Sharkey and Sharkey 2012), violations of moral autonomy of medical patients (Sorell & Draper 2014), their privacy (Calo 2011) and dignity (Veruggio & Operto 2008; Coeckelbergh 2010; Sharkey 2014). In addition, autonomous military robots have been strongly criticized for their potentially negative impact on human rights as we discussed in section 3.1. Issues of rights and justice have also been raised in the debate on the crash avoidance algorithms to be embedded in self-driving cars (Lin 2015). Issues of privacy and security, such as the risks of these systems being hacked have been raised about surveillance drones. Furthermore, there are urgent concerns about the impact autonomous systems will have on employment and labor conditions and the right to work (e.g. Ford 2015). 4.1.3 Autonomous Robotics Systems and Human Virtues A third set of concerns is whether and how autonomous robots may negatively affect the development of valuable human character traits, virtues, and skills. This phenomenon occurs in a similar way to the loss of professional skills, such as piloting skills, that become less frequently used in the presence of technologies such as automatic flight controls (for a good discussion of this see Mindel 2015). This concern includes the skills needed to establish meaningful human relationships both in specific professional contexts, such as care practices in medicine (e.g., van Wynsberghe 2015), and in ones that are more informal such as in friendship and loving relationships (e.g., Turkle 2015; Vallor 2016; Sullins 2012). The ethical debates on the impact of autonomous robots on human virtues, skills, and relationships impacts the discipline of social robots and affective computing but they can also have an effect on the design of military robots as well. Semi-autonomous robots have been criticized for potentially impeding the development of the traditional martial virtues and changing the perception of military valor – both the perception of military valor at a cultural level and the self-perception of the war-fighter themselves. Nick Turse and Tom Engelhardt for example wrote that utilizing these technologies \"cannot be war, as anyone has ever understood the word, if one side is never in danger\" (Turse and Engelhardt 2012, p. 64). And Noam Chomsky and Andre Vltchek wrote that \"warfare has moved away from man-to-man combat, and is now dominated by deadly missiles, bombing campaigns and the latest terrible weapons: drones, which are synonymous with terrorism and absolute impunity – they kill without the invading nation having to risk its own soldiers\" (Chomsky and Vltchek 2013, p. 172). In addition, militaries often pride themselves in Part 2 – Background Information Page 61 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 the development of courage, bravery and valor under fire for their members. Thus, the question emerges whether war-fighters that are not physically present on the battlefield can share these virtues. Given these concerns, it is likely that military virtues – that are highly prized by military organizations – will suffer through the expanded use of autonomous weapons systems. Courage, loyalty, honor, and mercy will all have to be substantially redefined in this new context (Sparrow 2013). Perhaps this will be seen as an acceptable loss, if it turns out that warfare using autonomous systems is less destructive and produces fewer casualties on all sides. We also have to acknowledge the possibility that these technologies might enable moral vice in the military context through fostering conflicts that are motivated by \"colonialist, imperialist, or downright racist motivations...where the self-proclaimed Herrenmenschen and the harbingers of civilization discipline the brutes, mostly by killing them\" (Steinhoff 2013, p. 207). However, the position that military virtue will suffer under the effects of these new technologies does not go unchallenged. These worries have been challenged with the argument that these new technologies do provide suitable platforms for the development of martial virtue (Chapa 2014). Nevertheless, there is some evidence that, at least in the US military, there has been resistance from the military culture to giving awards and promotions to those service members that pilot remotely piloted aircrafts (RPA). However, there are those that argue that these criticisms do not speak to the reality of serving in this branch of the military and the very real stress it places on these warfighters (Blair 2012). Colonel Eric Mathewson21 is reported to have said that \"valor to me is not risking your life; valor is doing what is right. Valor is about your motivations and the ends that you seek. It is doing what is right for the right reasons. That to me is valor.\" 4.1.4 Moral Harm Caused by Autonomous Weapons Systems The fourth set of moral concerns is the moral harm that is endured both by the warfighters who must do the killing that is demanded in wartime and those noncombatants who must live and survive in these new battle zones. We will address the moral harm to warfighters first. If it were possible to remove the threat of physical harm from warfighters through autonomous and semi-autonomous weapons systems, then it might be seen as an overall moral good. It is a reasonable and ethical choice to remove the soldier from the conflict. This move saves her from the physical risk and since they are not in direct combat, we might expect that there would be less of the psychological damage that can be done when we ask people to kill and then return them to civil society afterwards (Vallor 2016, p. 215). Nevertheless, it is not as simple as that. Researchers in the US Defense Department have reported that RPA aircrew22 face problems such as depression, anxiety, and PTSD at the same rate as pilots that are flying manned aircraft in combat experience (Dao 2013; for more thorough psychological studies see Chappelle et al. 2012, 2013, 2014, 2014b; Christen et al. 2014; Fitzsimmons & Sangha 2013). Therefore, even if the aircrews of these machines are not in danger of physical harm, they are still very much in danger of suffering psychological and moral harm. 21 Mathewson was Commander of the 432nd and 57th Operations Groups, Creech Air Force Base and Nellis Air Force Base, Nevada, where he led six active duty and six Air Reserve Component attack and reconnaissance squadrons flying the MQ-1 \"Predator\" and MQ9 \"Reaper\" aircraft both in training and in combat operations around the globe. Information gathered from Colonel Mathewson Bio, retrieved from https://www.hpc.msstate.edu/UAS/files/Mathewson_Bio.pdf. The quote emerges from Jaffe, 2010, Combat Generation: Drone operators climb on the winds of change in the Air Force. Washington Post. February 28. http://www.washingtonpost.com/wpdyn/content/article/2010/02/27/AR2010022703754.html 22 Additionally, it is possible that some support personnel such as intelligence analysist involved in the operation of UAV may also suffer adverse psychological effects but at this time, this claim is disputed and lacks research to confirm or deny. Part 2 – Background Information Page 62 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Obviously, there are also important effects to those societies that are under threat from these systems that we must also address. While these weapons do not produce the civilian casualties that traditional bombs might, they do produce a significant number of unintended casualties. Many of the persons targeted by these weapons tend to be irregular combatants that live amongst civilians. These civilians may or may not know that they are living next to a person whom is at war with states that can, and will, use lethal force against him or her thus placing their neighbors in mortal danger. Inevitably, people are caught in the blast radius who are not the intended target. When this happens, it can begin a tragic chain of events. Since there has been a significant number of years of experience with semiautonomous weapons being used extensively in various conflicts, there has been some evidence of what it is like to live for years under constant surveillance which is punctuated by periodic deadly strikes. The International Human Rights and Conflict Resolution Clinic at the Stanford Law School with the Global Justice Clinic at the NYU Law School produced a report on the subject in 2012. The report suggests that there are some significant effects, \"... mental health professionals, and journalists interviewed for this report described how the constant presence of US drones overhead leads to substantial levels of fear and stress in the civilian communities below\" (International Human Rights and Conflict Resolution Clinic and Global Justice Clinic 2012, pp. 80-81). Since it is impossible to know who these drones may be tracking and targeting, civilians of all ages but children in particular who live in the areas of operation are reported to suffer from anticipatory anxiety which is common for those living in war zones(ibid). Those who may have seen the results of a drone strike often suffer from PTSD. We should remember that much of the time, these people are not living in official warzones, yet they suffer as if they were. This suffering includes physical manifestations of mental stress. One Pakistani physician interviewed for the report stated that he saw people suffering from, \"...physical symptoms without a real [organic] basis, such as aches, and pains, vomiting, etcetera\" (ibid). A number of documentaries have attempted to track the effects of drone warfare on both warfighters as well as those living under the operations of these technologies. Two notable examples are \"Living Beneath Drones,\" a documentary by Jamie Doran and Najibullah Quraishi (Doran and Quraishi 2016) and \"National Bird,\" directed by Sonia Kennebeck (2016). Both of these films give the viewer a visceral look at how these technologies have effected individual lives.23 One tragic outcome of all this is when a relative of a casualty becomes motivated to take up arms as a result of civilian casualties even though they might not otherwise have done so. Often they are driven by the cultural need to seek revenge for the killing of a loved one. The West is not the only warrior culture involved in these conflicts and those in the blast radius have their own set of warrior virtues under which they try to live. Akbar Ahmed, in his book The Thistle and the Drone, warns us that when we inadvertently kill an innocent tribe member in the mountains of Pakistan while targeting a known terrorist, their kin have a moral debt to seek revenge: \"A tribesman without honor is much like a Christian without a soul. Honor thus has social as much as spiritual content. Transgressions against honor necessitate revenge, which can often get out of hand. This brings to mind a Pukhtu proverb: 'He is not a Pukhtoon who does not give a blow in return for a pinch'\" (Ahmed 2013, p. 53). However, since the perpetrator of killings that involve covert operations using RPA systems is not known and not even present at the time of the killing, there is no legitimate person for against whom the tribesman can seek revenge.24 This can cause them to take targets of opportunity or to join forces with people that even they find morally reprehensible. Ahmed 23 The fidelity of these documentaries have faced challenges. For an alternative analysis of \"National Bird,\" see Chapa 2017. 24 It is true that conventional aerial bombardment has many of these same problems, but with drone warfare, the strikes can happen well outside of known warzones and can often seem completely unprovoked to the civilian victims caught up in the killing. Part 2 – Background Information Page 63 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 (2013) claims that these tribesmen of Waziristan – after being confronted with drones – turned to a new type of weapon: the inhuman, un-Islamic, and deadly suicide bomber. It is claimed that this tactic of using suicide as an extension of war was unknown even during the bleakest days of fighting Soviet troops in Afghanistan (Ahmed 2013). Thus, there is the possibility of serious moral harm that can occur to both the operators and the unintended victims of autonomous weapons systems. This negates the claim that autonomous weapons systems remove humans form the harmful effects of war. These problems are imminent in the case of asymmetrical warfare, where Shannon Vallor argues, \"in fact, asymmetrical warfare arguably doubles the types of moral horror for which the human family is accountable. On the one hand, we have mechanical and impersonal technics of killing, one that fosters a military psychology in which the most grievous human suffering of innocent civilians can be reduced to the vocabulary and calculus of 'bugsplats'25. On the other side, we witness surges of increasingly gruesome and indiscriminate violence from those who pursue their low-tech methods of brutality without even the merest semblance of moral restraint\" (Vallor 2016, p. 216). Those concerns need to be addressed in the design and deployment of future systems. 4.2 Ethics of System Autonomy From the discussions so far in this report as well as in the sections that follow, we see that the primary issues that will determine the ethical and moral status of systems autonomy are as follows: Do the systems under analysis have meaningful human control? Are these systems safe and their use transparent? Do their learning algorithms lead to predictable behavior? Arguments against these systems all attempt to show that these systems display serious deficiencies in addressing these questions while the pro arguments will try to reassure us that each of these problem areas can be properly mitigated. 4.2.1 The Moral Status of System Autonomy System autonomy is not a simple designation. As discussed in sections 1.3, a robot is a system composed of many subsystems, some of these subsystems might operate autonomously and others may not. The degree of autonomy a system displays is contextual and is a complex mix of human independence, mission complexity, and environmental complexity. Therefore, a system such as an RPA might be autonomous in certain contexts but not others. For instance, a RPA might operate under control of a remote aircrew but have the ability to return autonomously to a landing point if the system loses contact with its aircrew due to a malfunction or some kind of active jamming. Therefore, context and use will matter a great deal in the ethical analysis of autonomous systems. Likewise, a traditionally piloted aircraft might also be autonomous in some contexts. The US Air Force's C-17 Globemaster III, for example, is capable of flying entire missions by means of a pre-programmed flight management system (FMS).26 25 The notion of 'bugsplats' appears widely in the critical literature about drones as an exemplar on the dehumanizing effect of this weapon. However, \"bugsplat\" was the name of a software that depicted the expected blast and fragmentation pattern of the various air-to-surface weapons in the U.S. inventory; it was renamed \"Fast Assessment Strike Tool-Collateral Damage (FAST-CD)\" already in 2003. It wasn't that \"the dead\" were depicted as squished bugs. People were not depicted at all. The software was developed to show how urban terrain would impact the blast and fragmentation pattern of a given weapon on a given target. See for further information: https://warontherocks.com/2017/06/drone-ethics-and-the-civil-military-gap/ 26 In fact, C-17 flight manuals encourage aircrew to fly using \"the highest level of automation\" (Air Force Instruction Manual 11-2C-17 2011, p. 73) available, so long as it does not act to the detriment of the crew's situational awareness. Part 2 – Background Information Page 64 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Perhaps the most important aspect of the ethical analysis of autonomous systems comes in the capacity for that system to make its own plans of action using its own computational abilities. As we described in section 1.3., certain systems do not have the capacity yet others do. However, besides operational autonomy, we also need to address the fact that no system today explicitly includes ethical values in its decision-making process, no matter how artificial intelligent the system is. Systems that have an ethical impact but do not reason about that effect are sometimes called Ethical Impact Agents (EIA). While any system that reasons at all in any way about that impact could be called artificial ethical agents (AEA), and finally, a system that had the capacity to fully reason about the ethics and morality of its actions would be called an artificial moral agent (AMA). Wallach and Allen describe three types of artificial ethical agency in their book Moral Machines (2009). They break it down as a function of system autonomy and ethical sensitivity. For instance, a particular system might have a certain amount of autonomy in its decision making along with a fair amount of ethical sensitivity making it a viable AEA, or it might have a high amount of autonomy but a low level of ethical sensitivity making it a EIA and a dangerous one at that. If one considers artificial ethical agency as desirable, then the ultimate goal would be to build a system with high levels of both autonomous intelligence and ethical sensitivity making this system a full AMA. This ultimate goal is, however, beyond the technological capacities of today and those that are likely in the near future. Following the suggestions of one of our interview partners (INTV06), these additional categories might be relevant for assessing the moral qualities of autonomous systems: 1) Hybrid human 'control.' We ought to have not only the physical manifestation of exoskeletal and other forms of human-machine hybrid limbs and joints; but furthermore we should have shared goal-seeking behavior by human-machine systems to relieve cognitive load on humans for a number of reasons27. 2) More robust social vision. In-the-wild social vision is the ability for computational systems in any form to understand our social context, from emotion and tactical sociality to strategic social interactions around them. Autonomous systems would need such robust social vision. This will make computational systems far more socially 'aware' of the human group world around them. 3) Autonomous help-request processes. We will eventually need help centers available to provide human guidance to autonomous machines while the machine's primary operator is absent. For example, in areas like autonomous driving, when the driver is utterly gone, the system must be able to access a help center with humans in it that can provide help to cars. This pattern will be widespread, and for this to work, machines will need to have the general capability of understanding when to ask for help and how to ask for help correctly for situation awareness to happen properly. This means that each of these potential autonomous systems has a different set of ethical and legal arguments for and against allowing autonomy within its field of operation and we will have to deal with this kind of complexity in our analysis. We will find that strong arguments can be made in favor of some systems autonomy where the ethical impact is low while others with high levels of ethical impact but low levels of ethical sensitivity are more deeply problematic. 27 Hybrid human control is useful to relieve workload from humans, assist those who suffer from disabilities such as dementia, but we should also be wary of how they can contribute to the control of human behavior. Part 2 – Background Information Page 65 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 4.2.2 Meaningful Human Control Human control of autonomous systems has been discussed at length in this report so far (1.1.4, 1.3, 3.2, 3.3). The notion of 'meaningful human control over individual attacks' was coined by the NGO Article 36, to express the core element that is challenged by the movement towards greater autonomy in weapons systems (Roff & Moyes 2016). This term was critiqued in section 3.2 as one that is still debatable in the legal context (see also Footnote 18). Strong proponents of meaningful human control such as the NGO Article 36 argue that it essentially means that sufficient human control is maintained in all aspects of the choosing of targets and the decision to use lethal force against those targets (Roff & Moyes 2016; Human Rights Watch (April 11,2016)). Two premises must be accepted to follow this argument, one is that it is unacceptable for a machine to apply lethal force without being under human control, and the second is that a human simply pressing a fire, or 'on' button is not sufficient to establish human control (Roff & Moyes 2016, p. 2). \"On this basis, some human control is required and it must be in some way substantial – we use the term 'meaningful' to express that threshold\" 28 (ibid). The Center for New American Security (Horowitz and Scharre 2015, p. 4) provides three criteria for meaningful human control: 1. Human operators are making informed, conscious decisions about the use of weapons. 2. Human operators have sufficient information to ensure the lawfulness of the action they are taking, given what they know about the target, the weapon, and the context for action. 3. The weapon is designed and tested, and human operators are properly trained, to ensure effective control over the use of the weapon. From a legal standpoint, it follows that, if IHL explicitly requires human control of lethal weapons, then as soon as the degree of autonomy makes meaningful human control impossible autonomous weapons systems would not be in compliance. One might counter by stating that a requirement for human control is not explicitly stated anywhere in IHL but that it is merely implied by context or precedent. We have looked at the legal arguments in section 3 already. What still needs to be addressed is the claim that even if it can be decided that lethal autonomous weapons systems operating outside of meaningful human control are legal under IHL, we might still want to claim that they are nonetheless unethical or immoral in ways that the law does not yet capture. If one follows this argument, then lethal autonomous weapons systems highlight a potential ethical flaw in IHL, namely its inability to address the responsibility gap (see the discussion in section 4.1.1), and that deficiency needs to be addressed in the interests of ethical jurisprudence and to make the world more human and just. Some examples of those who make or discuss ethical arguments like these are; Sparrow (2007), Asaro (2012), Sharkey (2012b), Allen and Wallach (2013), Grut (2013), Roff (2013), O'Connell (2014), and Horowitz and Scharre (March 2015). One counter argument to this position is that there are no additional ethical problems that go beyond what IHL already addresses (Schmitt and Thurnher 2013), those who champion this position maintain that this debate is a legal issue alone to which ethics does not contribute. Another counter argument, which we will see again in the sections below, claims that meaningful human control might only mean that one is justly confident of the intended operation designed into lethal autonomous systems and that they will bring about just and legal outcomes when used (Arkin 2007, 2009, 2010; Lin et al. 2008; Anderson & Waxman 2013; Sullins 2010). 28 It is important to note that not all the authors of this report endorse this argument, but it is an important one to know since it is plays a strong role in the case against autonomous weapons systems. Part 2 – Background Information Page 66 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 The above provides evidence that there is an intense debate on the moral status of systems autonomy and that debate will surface again in the sections below. 4.2.3 Major Ethical Positions in the Current Debate against Lethal Autonomous Weapons Systems Researchers writing on the intersection of ethics and robotics have largely come out in opposition to the deployment of lethal autonomous weapons systems. Critics argue that as these systems become increasingly autonomous, the human designers and users of these systems commit an unjustified abdication of moral accountability in life and death decision-making (Altmann 2009; Asaro 2008; Sharkey 2009, 2010, 2011, and 2012; and Sparrow 2007, 2009a, 2009b, 2011). This has caused some of them to join an effort called Stop Killer Robots, which is a multinational effort to ban autonomous weapons systems from the battlefield (see section 3.1). The other side of the debate rejects the a priori assumption that there is no accountability possible in these systems. This move treats accountability as an empirical problem, where we have to look at actual systems and analyze both the negative, as well as the potential positive ethical impacts they might have before we pass judgment on each system (Lin et al. 2008; Kershenar 2013; Schmitt 2013; Strawser 2010; Di Nucci & Santoni de Sio 2016). Still others argue that it might be possible to program higher levels of ethical sensitivity and value judgement in these systems (Arkin 2007, 2010; Sullins 2010). If either of these positions is correct, it is possible that not designing and deploying such systems could be itself an ethically problematic course of action given that these systems might have a more positive ethical impact on the battlefield than human warfighters would without the aid of these systems. 4.3 Arguments Contra System Autonomy 4.3.1 Autonomous Systems in General Autonomous systems, even those that are not designed with the intention of causing harm, present certain concerns for those who argue against the use pf autonomous systems in general. The primary concerns we will look at in this section are; function creep, intransparency, implicit bias, responsibility, dual use, control, reliability, predictability, trust, and safety. Function creep: As systems upgrade, surplus military equipment becomes available for use by civil authorities and this leads to the system being used in domains they may not have been initially designed for. Systems that are ethically tolerable in a military context are not always appropriate for civil society, and vice versa (Wynsberghe & Nagenborg 2016). For instance, systems designed to surveil dangerous terrorists that are later deployed in civilian contexts or in boarder control operations run grave risks of reducing civil privacy rights and might possibly run counter to human rights protections; e.g., when a country uses them to militarize a border where persistent illegal immigration might be occurring. Intransparency and implicit bias: Many autonomous systems (such as RPAs, although they only have a low degree of autonomy) are first designed for surveillance purposes; i.e., they are not meant to draw attention to themselves. As the example of drones shows, it would be difficult for those living in a society that was using this technology to distinguish the normal commercial use of drones from those on surveillance missions. Additionally, those who might be aware that they are under surveillance are unlikely to be able to know for sure who is operating these systems and that would make it impossible for them to Part 2 – Background Information Page 67 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 correctly judge if the actions these systems are doing are just and authorized by a legitimate authority. These systems may also dehumanize those being surveilled making the users of the surveillance drones less sensitive to honoring their human rights29. For instance, they would likely be used over populations that already have difficult relationships with law enforcement and this could be exacerbated by the implicit biases already present in the law enforcement agencies in question. One of our experts (INTV03) points out the problem that hidden/implicit harmful biases in training data/design/use might lead to unlawful, discriminatory or otherwise unjust outcomes for surveillance missions. A future example might be an earthquake disaster robot that prioritizes the rescue of victims from large homes or wealthy neighborhoods, or a security robot that disproportionately follows and harasses people of color at public gatherings. Thus, one would have to ensure that any self-learning system's program alterations are well understood and monitored for the emergence of unpredicted or novel harms. Responsibility: Another problem is accounting for the responsible parties when these systems are involved in accidents. This can be seen already when hobby drones have made dangerous nuisances of themselves around fires or other emergency response situations, where they are trying to get photos of the disaster. It is difficult to determine who the operator is and this would be even harder if the system were operating with more autonomy. According to one of our experts (INTV05), intransparency of responsibility may not be an urgent requirement for non-weaponized systems. However, accidents could still happen, and there will need to be an accounting of that. Another complication for responsibility is the possibility that the system embeds the bias, either implicit or explicit of their designers. This could lead to an unethical diffusion of responsibility (INTV05). Dual Use: Dual use occurs when the system can be used in many other ways than it was originally designed for, which may produce unintended consequences in its use and deployment. Systems designed to be nonlethal will not stay that way since they can be easily modified into lethal systems as was discussed in section 2. Generally, every system is lethal, even a self-driving supply vehicle, especially in a battle space. Machinery in general is potentially lethal (INTV04). Capacities that are the basic building blocks of autonomous systems prime them for use as lethal systems. As one of our expert said (INTV05): \"It's a short hop from a nonlethal system to a lethal one, once the targeting/identification capability is in place.\" One of our experts (INTV03) identified an interesting possibility that could be found if two, presumably ethically designed, systems were linked to make a third system whose ethical impacts had not been assessed: The linking of any seemingly autonomous but unarmed system with one that has complementary kinetic capacities that can take destructive action could be a tremendous temptation. For example, a human remotely piloted armed drone is used and we regard its principled and legal use as ethical. An AIenabled facial recognition system installed in public spaces and trained to identify and track the position of likely hostile actors, with no kinetic powers, is another. However, it would be all too simple to link them in a network in which the human judgment and control of the lethal instrument is rendered practically meaningless, producing a functional equivalent of an unethical LAWS. We probably can best deal with these outcomes by trying to anticipate them in the design phase of these technologies; perhaps by using a value-sensitive design methodology that factors in potential ethical impacts and tries to mitigate them from the early stages of design (see INTV19 and Owen et al. 2012; Friedman et al 2003; van den Hoven et al. 2014). 29 Privacy and surveillance are well-known ethical problems but autonomous systems present a novel vector for vast amounts of new data to be collected without the consent of those being surveilled. Part 2 – Background Information Page 68 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Control, reliability, predictability, trust, and safety: Even non-weaponized systems that are made autonomous will have increased safety and control concerns. The more autonomous systems become, the larger these problems get. We might be required to tolerate some of these issues in certain circumstances but for most situations, we have to demand high levels of safety and reliability. All autonomous systems have to be predictable and it must be ethical to place our trust in them. When they will do the task they were designed for, we have to demand a high degree of success. Autonomy may be very desirable in certain military applications where we want or have to limit contact with the system so that it is not discovered or hacked by an enemy, but that does not absolve us of the responsibility to be able to shut that machine down in the event that it is behaving in a way that was unforeseen. Autonomous technologies will need to be thoroughly audited and tested before it can be ethically deployed. Certainly, all security sector technology must be audited/tested and its actual social effects studied and regulated to ensure that their design and use: Is safe Is secure (from abuse, hacking, etc.) Is more effective/less costly than traditional means Is reliable Allows appropriate role for human oversight and, if necessary, intervention Does not create, amplify or reinforce injustices, unlawful or immoral discrimination, or otherwise unjustifiably reduce human welfare (INTV03). Furthermore, we have to realize that robotics is still a new technological field. While there have been significant advances in the success rates of robotic systems performing as programmed, we are still very far from the point at which these autonomous systems will be sufficiently safe to deploy. Videos that show off the great advances in robotics, particularly those videos released by Boston Dynamics, which display their ingenious walking robots that are built designed to support troops in the field in future conflicts30. However, one of our experts (INTV04) cautions us to remember that much of this is marketing. Initially Boston Dynamics systems failed all the time, they now fail half the time. This is a great improvement, but these systems would not be ethical to deploy at this time. When actual people's lives depend on it, these systems would have to work all the time. A significant additional problem occurs when we contemplate adding machine learning capabilities to autonomous systems. Any system that used machine learning either in the design or programming phase, or that had the ability to learn from experiences in the field, would likely fail in an audit of its ethical use. This is because even the designers of a learning system have a difficult time fully describing why a system trained in this way behaves the way it does (for a good discussion on this see Burrell 2016). Because of this, it is difficult to ethically justify how an autonomous system might make a decision that has ethical implications. One of our experts (INTV05) remarks that in addition this problem as we do not understand how neural nets or certain learning algorithms in general work, not only are predictability and trust major issues, but liability becomes problematic as well. 30 See the Boston Dynamics YouTube channel for many examples of these videos: https://www.youtube.com/user/BostonDynamics Part 2 – Background Information Page 69 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 4.3.2 Autonomous Weapons Systems Autonomous weapons systems that are designed to be used in combat and law enforcement contexts cause harm to individuals and destroy property. This means that the ethical issues raised by them will have many different ethical impacts than autonomous systems in general. Yet some of the concerns discussed in the last section also apply here such as function creep, implicit bias, intransparency, accountability, control and safety. Additional concerns that we will address in this section include the ethical justification of allowing autonomous weapons systems to create physical harm to persons or their property whether that harm is intended to be lethal or nonlethal. Primarily these concerns center on whether or not we can believe that these systems are under meaningful human control, and on their capacity to comply with the Law of Armed Conflict (LOAC). Function creep: This concern is shared with autonomous systems in general. However, it requires special mention here since it is a much more urgent concern with autonomous weapons systems than it is with systems designed for surveillance. While gradually creeping into a surveillance state is bad enough, one that regularly used armed drones with high degrees of autonomy in civil law enforcement would be completely intolerable. To the extent that this is a possibility, then this becomes a strong argument against designing and deploying these weapons systems. Justifying physical harm: There are ethical issues in the use of systems that are designed to cause harm, whether the system is designed to cause lethal or non-lethal harm. In fact, some of the ethical concerns are exacerbated in the law enforcement context because in this context, human rights law and ethics dictate that the taking of life is typically unlawful and this is not entirely the same in the armed conflict context (see section 3.2). Thus, in either context, autonomous systems designed to cause harm generate special ethical concerns. Above we discussed the legal challenges made by the Campaign to Stop Killer Robots (section 3.1) but here we will look more closely at the main ethical arguments raised against autonomous weapons systems. As ethical arguments, their force will depend upon their ability to convince you that a world with autonomous weapons systems is not one that is worth living in, even if it might be one in which these systems might be considered legal and/or beneficial for the survival of some culture or political system. A final point in this argument is that at the very least machines should not be choosing targets in a military or security context. According to one expert (INTV19), unsupervised autonomous systems are unethical, since they lack the full capacities of human judgment, including for instance emotion, phronesis, and wisdom. This argument should cause us to maintain that choosing targets, even with non-lethal ammunitions, should still be something that is directed by a human controller. Another of our experts described the problem as one of accurate targeting (INTV05). According to him, systems have to be programed to correctly distinguish legitimate targets. However, in a world of guerilla warfare, where combatants do not wear uniforms, this might be impossible. If armed forces are tagged with identifying features such as RFIDs, for instance, they can be removed, or innocent civilians could be made to wear them to throw off targeting systems. Facial recognition systems also can be spoofed. Even identifying weapons may result in false positives, for example a shepherd with an AK-47 to protect his flock. The ethical problem here is that both humans and autonomous systems cannot meet the discrimination demands of just war theory and IHL. Part 2 – Background Information Page 70 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Risk transfer and lowering the threshold for the use of lethal force: Earlier we discussed these concerns in detail in our discussion of autonomous systems in general. However, these problems take on a more tragic character when decision makers realize the political expediency of risk transfer. Since lethal danger is transferred from the human warfighters to machines, this can cause increased, and less thoughtful, deployment of lethal autonomous systems. When this happens there is far less political risk to those who decide to take us to war, thus potentially leading to more armed conflict (Strawser 2013). This problem follows into the civil use of these systems where the use of them may be chosen over more traditional policing methods that might be more expensive or difficult. This would lead to an increased use of lethal force over the capture of those suspected of crime. Ethical justification/accountability: This is simply the acknowledgement that lethal decisions must be ethically justifiable. It is a serious decision to use force. Especially the use of intentional lethal force and there are important legal and ethical steps that must be taken before it is used. The worry here is that if we were to give autonomous systems the ability not only to make factual decisions but also value decisions, then, based on this argument, we have created a system that cannot be ethically justified. In order for the decision to be justified, we would have to be able to fully account for the actions of the machine not only from a mechanical description of how it chose a target but also why it was ethically justified in doing so (Wallach 2013). Another of our experts (INTV19) elaborated further on this issue and it is worth looking at his comments in more detail. He begins with the claim that these systems are neither full artificial moral agents (AMA) nor do they deserve much consideration as moral patients, (meaning that they have no intrinsic rights that have to be respected beyond perhaps the property rights of their owners).31 Given this ambiguous moral status, they should never be given autonomy for making decisions and taking actions that have a high level of ethical impact. Lethal capacity is only justified if a system has full capacities of human judgment and agency (and in addition full capacities of human patiency32), such systems should only be used under strict human supervision, and should not be fully autonomous, in particular with respect to the dimensions of control-distance and capacity for self-organization and collective agency. His claim is that humans rely on a certain set of skills that are peculiar to us and difficult, if not impossible, to replicate in machine intelligence. If capacities such as emotion, practical ethical wisdom, or the skill to notice and attend to ethical problems as they arise are indeed beyond machines, then we cannot say that the ethical decisions they make are equivalent to those made by a skilled human ethical agent.33 According to the expert (INTV19), humans rely on emotions, practical ethical wisdom, and so on, whereas machines by definition lack these capacities, even if they could be very intelligent. Since only humans can experience the threats, risk, and suffering that comes with lethal threats, then machines cannot know what it means to (threaten to) kill or to (threaten to) harm a human being. Therefore, only human beings, if anyone or anything, should be allowed to make lethal decisions or commit lethal actions. It is important to point out that these criticisms apply mostly to the autonomous targeting and killing of human targets. But a system that is designed to make ethical \"calculations\" might still be allowed to make 31 For instance, they do not hold nor deserve to hold any rights similar to human rights this lack of a moral right to existence is one of the things that make them preferable to humans for putting into dangerous situations. 32 The notion of \"patiency\" means the quality that humans have to be seen as moral patients and refers to their capacity to hold human rights, etc. 33 One may have to distinguish two aspects here: either the delegation of moral decisions to machines is morally risky as they do not understand important facts and can make wrong decisions, or delegation is intrinsically morally wrong as life and death decisions should be made by agents equipped with ethical capacities, emotions, etc. Part 2 – Background Information Page 71 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 decisions not to fire or to make the decision to abort an action that fails to meet certain programed ethical parameters. This would produce systems that had a kind of functional morality that might be complex enough to make them an AEA or artificial ethical agent (see section 4.2.1). However, one can object that if a military action is proportional, discriminate, necessary and being taken in support of a just war, and the military action is intended to prevent some great harm (e.g., an enemy force firing upon civilians, for example), failing to act in these instances may itself be an ethical wrong. It follows that if this is the case, then it is not clear why one would allow the machine to commit an ethical wrong of one type (a decision not to fire causes moral harm), but of another type (a decision to fire causes moral harm). Also, the expert (INTV19) does not exclude the possibility that such systems could have their own builtin ethical constraints, which could make \"ethical\" calculations that try to distinguish between civilian and non-civilian targets, etc. – i.e. they can and should have capabilities for functional morality. However, since these technologies are likely never sufficient in complex situations (and on the battlefield situations are generally complex) and since ethics should never be reduced to just following rules, calculation, or even what machine learning can do at this time, then humans should at least supervise and control all autonomous system (INTV19). One could conclude from these arguments that a ban on lethal autonomous weapons is warranted and if a ban is not possible, then strong regulations should be enacted to control the deployment of these systems. This is actually what the expert recommends: \"An international framework to regulate these weapons is absolutely necessary, morally speaking, and although a ban is not likely to happen, one should at least try to convince people/nations and influence their decisions\" (INTV19). Finally, two additional issues should be mentioned. The first is to acknowledge that there may be increased risk for non-combatants when autonomous weapons systems are deployed to the battlefield and if this were to happen, then it would be a strong reason against their deployment. The second is that some of the systems already in development are very complex and secret; if one of them were lost on a mission, there could be a strong motivation to get it back and this could lead to escalation of a conflict. 4.4 Arguments Pro System Autonomy As chapter 1 has outlined, there are many good technological and operational reasons for improving autonomous capacities of systems; in particular, in settings, where the communication between operator and system may be unreliable and where humans may make more mistakes due to specific operating conditions (e.g., time constraints). Those technological reasons may also have ethical relevance; however, in the following, we focus solely on (positive) ethical considerations of the use of autonomous systems in the security sector. 4.4.1 Autonomous Systems in General As we will see in this section, some of the factors that worry opponents of autonomous weapons systems such as function creep, dual use, and risk transfer can take on a positive role in the arguments that favor the development and use of autonomous systems in general. Function creep and dual use: Not all function creep is necessarily a bad thing. A good example is the use of surveillance systems in the area of conservation and environmental monitoring. Autonomous systems Part 2 – Background Information Page 72 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 could do a lot of good in protecting endangered species and the environment. One expert (INTV06) mentioned that 'giving chase' to poachers is something that might work extremely well with such systems. E.g., non-lethal chasing of rhino hunters, persistently tracking them, or anyone else that is a suspect will probably become ubiquitous across countries with threatened animal populations, and these systems can be highly automated. Earlier we brought up the concern that these systems might contribute to making borders more militant. However, they can also help in decreasing deaths that occur as people attempt to illegally cross the border in dangerous terrain. One expert (INTV06) mentioned the example that far fewer people might die of thirst after getting lost crossing the Texas border, because the systems may detect them and order help to rescue them. These environmental and humanitarian missions might not be what the systems were originally designed to do but both military and civilian entities can extend the missions of these systems to include these tasks. Inevitability: It is clear that across the globe autonomy is going to continue to be a hot research topic. As discussed in section 1, autonomy is far too useful, in so many different realms, not to be researched and deployed. This means that countries that wish to participate in these technological developments have to find a way to make the best of these coming technologies and find ways of dealing with the problems that may emerge in the various application domains. One expert (INTV05) remarked that even high-profile accidents could be treated as outlier cases that need to be debugged, rather than cautionary lessons to reduce autonomy. Risk Transfer: In the section on the arguments against autonomous systems above, we saw that risk transfer could be seen as ethically worrisome, but there are important factors that can make this a pro argument. Since these technologies allow war-fighters, police, and rescue personnel to be removed from potentially harmful situations. This is an undeniable appeal and means that we can expect a great deal of research dedicated to making this a reality since it helps keep warfighters from physical harm. As one expert clarified (INTV04), autonomy is a pillar of US Department of Defense (DoD) planning and we will be seeing a lot of it in the future. Many of the applications will be non-lethal. Anything that reduces danger to war-fighters is a priority. 4.4.2 Autonomous Weapons Systems Many of the arguments in favor of autonomous systems in general also apply to autonomous weapons systems. There are, however, a few additional arguments that specifically apply to autonomous weapons. Limit allowed targets: One way around the serious ethical problems we discussed above is to limit the targets we allow these systems to engage. Our experts have some suggestions on how this might work. One expert believes that combat situations involving robots vs. robots will emerge first, at least at scale, to demonstrate reliability and control in lethal actions (INTV05). Much of the public outrage around the systems already in use (RPAs and the like, although those systems only have very limited autonomy) might be because they are used in ways that produce civilian casualties. Acceptance of lethal autonomous systems might be enhanced by deploying them in less ethically challenging situations. There is very little public outcry against bomb disposal robots, for instance. As one of our experts observes they are best used not in situations around civilians such as counter terrorism or counter insurgency. Examples include patrol in demilitarized zones, perimeter protection, use in monitoring nuclear weapons and facilities in Part 2 – Background Information Page 73 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 verifying arms reduction treaties, as well as being used in building clearing operations. These uses are not without ethical impacts but it is easier to make the case that they are ethically permissible (INTV04). The argument here is that autonomy of various degrees has been a part of a number of weapons systems and increasing system autonomy should be promoted in ways that will not invite undue criticism. For instance, undersea systems that loiter and wait for a target, or any other fire and forget systems. Autonomy in this sense has been around for years (INVT04). They act in environments where a low degree of autonomy already is considered ethically acceptable – and increasing system autonomy in those circumstances is less likely to create ethical problematic outcomes. Control and Safety: One of the more important pro arguments is that as long as lethal autonomous systems result in making situations on the modern battlefield that are at least as ethical as they are now, then they are a useful technology (Lin et al 2008). Arkin (2007, 2009, 2010, 2014) makes the case that ethical behavior by human soldiers on the battlefield is not as good as we would hope for. This means that while lethal autonomous systems might not be ideal in regards to the ethical impacts they might cause, these outcomes are still likely to be preferable to those that human agents might cause in similar situations. In our interview with Arkin he elaborated on this point explaining that in regards to lethal actions from autonomous weapons systems their \"[e]thical impact must be at a minimum as good as a human but they should actually be better than human ethical decisions\" (INTV04). Some of our experts also added that, \"It is important to explain what \"meaningful human control\" means. This should include the ability of the system to cause the human users to make better ethical decision than they would have without the system (INTV04).34 Ethical Accountability and responsibility: In the section on contra arguments above, some critics felt strongly that lethal autonomous weapons were an abdication of the human responsibility to make lethal decisions. Even though the role of the human might be reduced down to simply turning the machine on and pointing it at an enemy the loss of accountability and responsibility can be seen as a red herring fallacy. In truth the responsibility lays where it always has, with the commanders and political leaders that chose to deploy these systems. One of our experts expressed this idea thusly, \"Whomever gave the system its target signature, the author of its orders, these people can be held responsible\" (INTV04). Whether we can simply decide to make individual people responsible in this way and in this context, is a very controversial issue both from a moral and from a legal point of view (see, for instance, Saxon 2016). However, it is true that there are plenty of real human moral agents involved in the design and deployment of these systems so what the systems do is ultimately the result of human decision-making – so no abdication of accountability or responsibility for the actions of the systems would be legitimate. Given that these systems collect a vast amount of data during their operation, it is possible that these systems might actually increase accountability and responsibility by leaving a thick data trail that can be analyzed after every mission. \"[Autonomy should provide] the ability to identify and understand nuances in many scenarios that could weigh against lethality, i.e., to avoid incorrect kill decisions. But if [the systems] are made overly cautious, then operators may lose trust in the systems, making them less useful\" (INV05). International Humanitarian Law (IHL): As we discussed in chapter 3 and section 4.2.1 in detail, we have a large body of settled law in the IHL that provides specific guidelines for the use of lethal force. According to Schmitt (2013), if we diligently follow these laws, then the use of lethal autonomous systems will 34 See sections 3.2 and 4.2.1 for a discussion on \"meaningful human control\". Part 2 – Background Information Page 74 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 be legally justified and therefore ethically justified as well (please refer to section 4.2.1 for more discussion). The pro argument here suggests that it is better to regulate these weapons through IHL than try to ban them outright and lose any influence over those that would build them anyway. However, one of our expert suspects that it is unclear whether additional international laws, even a ban or a moratorium, can be enforced or verified (INTV05). It is one thing to inspect a nuclear or chemical facility, and another to inspect any company that's develops robotics or AI. Another benefit provided by these systems is that human warfighters have a very natural tendency to prefer to preserve their own lives, even if that preference might lead to a regrettable outcome such as firing when they perceive a weapon that is not there. Lethal autonomous weapons systems would not need to have preference strong motive for self-preservation. They could wait to apply lethal force and fully assess the situation before acting, even if that risks their destruction. This would allow them to have an initial stance against using force, which is something that is hard to achieve with human warfighters or even human police officers. One of our experts argues that this gives the autonomous system an important ethical advantage over humans. \"Even in humans, the choice not to shoot is the cornerstone of their own autonomy and ethical behavior (INTV04). At this time, the world is not engaged in any conflicts between superpowers, but if human history is any indication of the future, it is just a matter of time before it could happen again. In the same way that the international community was unprepared for the atrocities committed in WWI and WWII, we might be in the same situation regarding the technologies that could be used in another large-scale conflict. \"This is why we have to solve these problems now, and not wait until political situations force us to deal with weapons we are unprepared to deal with\" (INTV04). Following this line of thought, Arkin (2007, 2009, 2010) therefore argues against a ban on the research and development of lethal autonomous weapons: \"A ban on these systems may not be the best thing for us since these systems are not entirely defined. Sure, let us ban 'the Terminator' but we do not have those, we have specific systems that need to be dealt with on a case-by-case basis. Some of these systems may indeed provide moral good that we will not receive if there is a blanket ban\" (INTV04). 4.5 Likely Developments The two major trends to come out of the discussions in this section are calls for: a) machine ethics (can we teach morality to machines?), and b) Value-sensitive design (how can we design systems to prevent unwanted consequences of autonomy while reaping its potential benefits?) Developments in machine ethics will be necessary to address the growing autonomy already evident in \"smart\" weapons systems. In section 4.1.1, we saw that an important part of the debate is whether or not artificial agents can be considered moral agents. In section 4.2.1 we discussed the relationship between ethical awareness and autonomy described in Wallach and Allen (2009). The dangerous option is to create systems that have a high degree of autonomy but a low degree of ethical reasoning capacity and then place that system in a situation where it will significantly impact humans. On the other hand, if machine ethics is successful, then these systems will be autonomous ethical agents (AEA) which would have the capacity to better navigate these ethically significant situations. Developments in values sensitive design (VSD) techniques are growing in the civilian context. A significant example of this is the EU Data Protection Regulation that has created \"Data Protection by Design Part 2 – Background Information Page 75 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 and by Default\"35. We can see law and ethics working together here to create real change in the way technologies are designed and deployed. It is uncertain if VSD will be implemented in defense systems design but it should be encouraged through legal and ethical arguments and government policies. Some additional technological developments may have an impact on the ethical assessment of system autonomy. We tend to think of these future autonomous systems in terms of what we already have, which is single systems like the MQ-1 Predator that may interact with other weapons systems. However, current RPAs only have a low degree of autonomous capacities comparable to any other 21st century military aircraft. They may therefore misguide our intuitions. For example, in the near future, we are likely to see autonomous systems operating in swarms. These swarms will likely have emergent properties that come about as multiple systems attempt to engage a target. Furthermore, as autonomy becomes more complex, it is actually going to be difficult to classify autonomous systems in a way that would facilitate regulations or bans by treaty. While biological weapons are easy to define, autonomy presents more dimensions for legal and ethical assessment and resists clear definitions. One of our interviewees, the roboticist Ronald Arkin, described his recent work on advancing systems autonomy for this report. He and his research group have been working on autonomy for over thirty years in all manner of domains including military and civilian. One of their ongoing projects is the development of Slow-Bots, which are modeled after biological systems such as the Slow Loris. They are learning what they can about how this primate survives and they are applying that knowledge to create autonomous systems that can persist in the environment for years at a time. These kinds of systems could be used for many applications but one military application would be persistent surveillance. Slow-bots, would have very low energy requirements depending on the application they are used for, and would be able to reap that energy from the environment itself. They might also require very low levels of communication with human users and the communications they do have with human users will be accomplished through autonomously formed ad-hoc networks of robots (Arkin 2014). Often systems autonomy is conflated with the idea that the machines will have to be large and complex but as this example shows, it may first come with modest machines that have very low energy requirements and operate mostly through ad hoc networks that autonomously work together to accomplish the task they are intended to do. There also is likely to be advancement on larger more traditional systems as well. As we have seen in the previous section, all of our experts place the requirement that these systems must have some capacity to reason ethically if they are to be responsibly deployed in a situation where they were to make lethal decisions. On the other hand, many of the experts are deeply skeptical that this can be achieved anytime in the near future. For example, the roboticist Illah Nourvakhsh does not believe that the whole \"robots thinking ethically\" issue will pan out in the next decade. People will realize that rules of engagement are nowhere near rational or codifiable enough given the actual perceptual abilities of machines, for machines to implement them. Instead, also in the near future we will see highly shared control with humans-in-theloop for lethality (INTV06). Unlike law, some ethical systems resist being put into a code. Ethical norms are not always simple and are constantly evolving as well as being deeply contextual. This means that there is not a book or code that one may point to that could be translated into programing and used by an autonomous system. The 35 See: http://www.eudataprotectionregulation.com/data-protection-design-by-default [accessed October 24 2017]. Part 2 – Background Information Page 76 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 roboticists we interviewed both cast doubts that we are anywhere close to being able to program ethics into a machine (INTV04, INTV06). However, behaving ethically and being ethical are very different things. Even in the far future, we may never be able to be an actual ethical agent with full moral reasoning capabilities, but the capacity for these systems to behave ethically is within reach. It is not unreasonable to expect that near future developments that will take the current status of our lethal autonomous weapons systems form ethical impact agent (EIA) to autonomous ethical agent (AEA), even if full Artificial Moral agency (AEA) is out of reach. Part 2 – Background Information Page 77 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 5 Material 5.1 Author Team Thomas Burri is assistant professor of international law and European law at the University of St. Gallen in Switzerland; Dr. iur. (Zurich), LL.M. (College of Europe, Bruges), lic.iur. (Basel), admitted to the bar of the canton of Zurich, Venia Legendi for international law, European law, and constitutional law. Contact: Thomas.burri@unisg.ch Joseph Chapa is a Major in the U.S. Air Force and an instructor in the U.S. Air Force Academy Department of Philosophy, Colorado/USA. Currently, he is doctoral student in philosophy at the University of Oxford/UK. His research interests are in Applied Ethics, the Just War Tradition and Remote Warfare. Contact: joseph.chapa@us.af.mil. The views expressed are those of the author and do not necessarily reflect those of the US Air Force, the US Department of Defense, or the US Government. Markus Christen is research group leader at the Institute of Biomedical Ethics and History of Medicine and Managing Director of the UZH Digital Society Initiative of the University of Zurich, Switzerland. He is the principal investigator of this project. His research interests are in empirical ethics, neuroethics, and ethics of technology. Contact: christen@ethik.uzh.ch Raphael Salvi is assistant at the Chair for Philosophy, ETH Zurich, Switzerland. His research interests lie in the fields of philosophy of technology and ethics of specific emerging technologies. Contact: raphael.salvi@phil.gess.ethz.ch Filippo Santoni de Sio is assistant professor at the Section Ethics/Philosophy of Technology of Delft University of Technology, the Netherlands; he is co-director of the NWO research project \"Meaningful Human Control over Automated Driving Systems\". His research interests are in the theory of moral and legal responsibility, and in robot ethics. Contact: f.santonidesio@tudelft.nl John Sullins is full professor in the department of Philosophy and a board member of the Sonoma State University Center for Ethics Law and Society, California/USA. His specializations are: philosophy of technology, philosophical issues of artificial intelligence/robotics, cognitive science, philosophy of science, engineering ethics, and computer ethics. Contact: john.sullins@sonoma.edu 5.2 List of Interviewed Experts The following experts were interviewed (face-to-face, Skype or e-mail) for the preparation of this report. Not all expert interviews are directly referenced. All interviewed experts were invited to comment the draft of the report; experts marked with a (*) provided feedback. INTV01 Nicholas Mull, US Navy, former head of operations in the law department (he was in charge of the article 36 weapons review for the US Navy). Interview on Saturday, 8 October 2016 by Thomas Burri. INTV02 Julian Padget*, Senior Lecturer at the Dept. of Computer Science, University of Bath, UK (he is involved in the IEEE Global Standard Initiative on Ethical Considerations in Artificial Intelligence and Autonomous Systems). Interview on Wednesday, 21 December 2016 by Thomas Burri. Part 2 – Background Information Page 78 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 INTV03 Shannon Vallor*, Department of Philosophy, Santa Clara University, USA (she is President of the international Society for Philosophy and Technology). Interview on Wednesday, 28 December 2016 by John Sullins. INTV04 Ronald Arkin, School of Interactive Computing, Georgia Tech, Director of the Mobile Robot Laboratory (he is a leading expert in the growing field of robot ethics). Interview on Monday, 14 November 2016 by John Sullins. INTV05 Patrick Lin, Philosophy Department and Director, Ethics + Emerging Sciences Group, California Polytechnic State University, USA (he is well published in technology ethics, especially on robotics and AI). Interview on Saturday, 11 November 2016 by John Sullins. INTV06 Illah Nourbakhsh, Department of Philosophy, The Robotics Institute at Carnegie Mellon University, USA (she is Director of the Community Robotics, Education and Technology Empowerment (CREATE) lab). Interview on Sunday, 1 January 2017 by John Sullins. INTV07 Travis Burdine (Colonel, US Air Force retired), Strategy and Business Development Manager at Insitu, Inc., A Boeing Company (he is involved in the design & production of small and medium sized unmanned aircraft systems for defense, government, and commercial applications). Interview on Wednesday, 23 November 2016 by Joe Chapa. INTV08 Heather Roff*, Senior Research Fellow in the Department of Politics and International Relations, University of Oxford and a Research Scientist at the Global Security Initiative, Arizona State University, USA (she is an Artificial Intelligence, Future of War, and Cyber Security Fellow at the New America Foundation). Interview on Thursday, 10 November 2016 by Joe Chapa. INTV09 Matthew Studley*, Associate Head of Department, Engineering Design and Mathematics and Head of Research and Scholarship at the University of The West of England (UWE), Bristol, UK (he is a senior member of the Bristol Robotic Lab). Interview on Thursday, 25 November 2016 by Joe Chapa. INTV10 Michael Meier, Special Assistant to the US Army Judge Advocate General for Law of War Matters (he is a retired US Army Officer and Judge Advocate and former attorney at the US Department of State). Interview on Monday, 21 November 2016 by Joe Chapa. INTV11 Reto Wollenmann, deputy head arms control, disarmament, non-proliferation, EDA & Michael Siegrist, international law, EDA (both work for the Federal Department of Foreign Affairs (EDA) and are involved in the United Nations CCW discussion on Lethal Autonomous Weapons Systems). Interview on 6 December 2016 by Markus Christen & Raphael Salvi. INTV12 Roland Siegwart, Director of Autonomous Systems Lab, ETH Zurich (he is a leading researcher in the field of autonomous robotics). Interview on 13 December 2016 by Markus Christen & Raphael Salvi. INTV13 Daniel Krauer, Col., Swiss Armed Forces, Doctrine Research, VTG / Anita Noli-Kilchenmann*, Doctrine Research, Swiss Armed Forces, VTG / Martin Krummenacher, Doctrine Research, Swiss Armed Forces, VTG (Federal department of Defence, Civil Protection and Sports). Interview on 12 December 2016 by Markus Christen & Raphael Salvi. Part 2 – Background Information Page 79 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 INTV14 Marco Hutter, Robotic Systems Lab ETH Zurich (he is a researcher in autonomous robotics). Interview on 30 November 2016 by Markus Christen & Raphael Salvi. INTV15 Neil Davison*, Scientific and Policy Adviser, Arms Unit, Legal Division, International Committee of the Red Cross, Arms Unit (he provides technical and policy advice on weapons issues in support of the ICRC's priorities to better protect victims of armed conflict). Interview on 5 January by Markus Christen. INTV16 Vincent Choffat, Deputy Head Arms Control and Disarmament, Swiss Armed Forces (he is a specialist in Arms Control and disarmament and follow the discussion at the UN in Geneva). Interview on 21 December 2016 by Markus Christen & Raphael Salvi. INTV17 Robert Babuska, Scientific director of the TU Delft Robotics Institute. Interview on 1 December 2016 by Filippo Santoni de Sio. INTV18 Chris Verhoeven, Associate professor, department of microelectronics at the Delft University of Technology (he is Leader of the Swarm Theme of the TU-Delft Robotics Institute). Interview on 12 January 2017 by Filippo Santoni de Sio. INTV19 Mark Coeckelbergh, Department of Philosophy, University of Vienna, Austria (he is member of the IEEE Global Initiative for Ethical Considerations in Artificial Intelligence and Autonomous Systems). Interview on Wednesday, 11 January 2017 by John Sullins. INTV20 John Blitch, Department of Behavioral Sciences and Leadership, US Air Force Academy, Colorado (he is an artificial intelligence researcher with the Air Force Research Laboratory). Interview Friday, 16 December 2016 by Joe Chapa. INTV21 Anonymous; Special Agent, United States Federal Bureau of Investigations (FBI). Interview by Joe Chapa. 5.3 List of Workshop Participants The following experts were invited for a workshop together with the research team that took place January 19-20 2017 in Zurich. During the workshop, a first draft of the label system has been discussed. All invited experts received the draft of the report; experts marked with a (*) provided feedback. Anita Noli-Kilchenmann*, Swiss Armed Forces, Doctrine Research Daniel Messelken*, University of Zurich; Centre for Ethics, Center for Military Medical Ethics Heather Roff*, University of Oxford and Arizona State University, Global Security Initiative Markus Hoepflinger*, armasuisse Research+Technology, Research Director autonomous systems Martin Krummenacher, Swiss Armed Forces, Doctrine Research Matthew Studley*, University of the West of England, Dept. Engineering, Design and Mathematics Michael Siegrist, Federal Department of Foreign Affairs, Humanitarian Rights Section Neil Davison*, International Committee of the Red Cross, Arms Unit (day 1 of the workshop only) Ron Arkin, Georgia Institute of Technology, Director Mobile Robot Laboratory Vincent Choffat, Federal Department of Defense, Deputy Head Arms Control and Disarmament Part 2 – Background Information Page 80 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 5.4 List of Abbreviations 9/11 September 11 (2001) attacks AEA Artificial Ethical Agent AI Artificial Intelligence AK-47 Awtomat Kalashnikowa aka Kalashnikov (Russian Assault Rifle) AMA Artificial Moral Agent BCI Brain-Computer Interface CBRNC Chemical, Biological, Radiological, Nuclear and Explosives CCW Certain Conventional Weapons Convention (UN) CRASAR Center for Robot-Assisted Search and Rescue DMZ Demilitarized Zone DoD (United States) Department of Defense EDA Federal Department of Foreign Affairs (CH) EIA Ethical Impact Agent GGE Group of Governmental Experts GNSS Global Navigation Satellite System GPS Global Positioning System HEL High Energy Laser HVI High Value Individual ICBM Intercontinental Ballistic Missile ICRC International Committee of the Red Cross IED Improvised Explosive Device IEEE Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers IHL International Humanitarian Law INTV Interview ISR Intelligence, Surveillance, Reconnaissance LAR Lethal Autonomous Robotics LAWS Lethal Autonomous Weapons Systems LEL Low Energy Laser Lidar Light detection and ranging LOAC Law of Armed Conflict MIT Massachusetts Institute of Technology NGO Non-Governmental Organization PED Processing, Exploitation and Dissemination PTSD Posttraumatic Stress Disorder RFID Radio-Frequency Identification RPA Remotely Piloted Aircraft UAV Unmanned Aerial Vehicle UGV Unmanned Ground Vehicle UMV Unmanned Maritime Vehicle UN United Nations US United States of America VSD Value Sensitive Design VTG Federal Department of Defence, Civil Protection and Sports (CH) WAMI Wide Area Motion Imagery Part 2 – Background Information Page 81 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 5.5 Annotated Literature Below, the cited literature is listed. Some important papers are accompanied with a short comment outlining their content (printed in bold italic). Air Force Instruction Manual 11-2C-17 (2011): C-17 Operations Procedures, Vol. 3, 16 November 2011 (incorporating Change 1, 20 March 2015) pp. 73. URL: http://static.e-publishing.af.mil/production/1/af_a3_5/publication/afi11-2c-17v3/afi11-2c-17v3.pdf [accessed October 24 2017]. Akbar, Ahmed S. (2013): The Thistle and the Drone: How America's War on Terror Became a Global War on Tribal Islam, Brookings Institution Press: Washington. Allison, Brendan Z. et al. (2007): Brain–computer interface systems: progress and prospects, in: Expert Review of Medical Devices, Vol. 4, No. 4, pp. 463-474. Alston, Philip (2010): Interim report of the Special Rapporteur on extrajudicial, summary and arbitrary executions, submitted to the Human Rights Council, focuses \"especially on the relevance of new technologies in tackling the challenge of extrajudicial executions and the rampant impunity that attaches to the phenomenon\", August 23 2010, United Nations (UN) General Assembly: Geneva. The interim report diagnosed a lack of discussion in civil society about the employment of robots in warfare: \"Although robotic or unmanned weapons technology has developed at astonishing rates, the public debate over the legal, ethical and moral issues arising from its use is at a very early stage, and very little consideration has been given to the international legal framework necessary for dealing with the resulting issues.\" This UN interim report had relied on Singer, Peter W. (2009): Wired for War. Altmann, J. (2009): Preventive Arms Control for Uninhabited Military Vehicles, in: Ethics and Robotics, R. Capurro and M. Nagenborg (eds.), AKA Verlag: Heidelberg. Amnesty International (2015): Autonomous Weapons Systems: Five Key Human Rights Issues for Consideration, Amnesty International Publications: London. Anderson, Michael and Anderson, Susan Leigh (2011): Machine Ethics, Cambridge University Press: New York. Anderson, Michael and Anderson, Susan Leigh (2015): Toward ensuring ethical behavior from autonomous systems: a case-supported principle-based paradigm, in: Industrial Robot: An International Journal, Vol. 42, No. 4, pp. 324-331. Anderson, Kenneth and Waxman, Matthew C. (2013): Law and Ethics for Autonomous Weapon Systems: Why a Ban Won`t Work and How the Laws of War Can, in: American University, WCL Research Paper 2013-11 and Columbia Public Law Research Paper 13-351, Stanford University, The Hoover Institution (Jean Perkins Task Force on National Security and Law Essay Series). These authors argue against a ban of lethal autonomous weapon systems, instead opting for an incremental approach by gradually evolving existing codes of conduct. Aqel, Mohammed O.A. et al. (2016): Review of visual odometry: types, approaches, challenges, and applications, in: SpringerPlus, 5:1897. Arkin, Ronald C. (2007): Governing Lethal Behavior: Embedding Ethics in a Hybrid Deliberative/Reactive Robot Architecture, Technical Report GITGVU-07-11, Mobile Robot Laboratory College of Computing GATECH: Atlanta. Arkin, Ronald C. (2009): Governing Lethal Behavior in Autonomous Robots, CRC Press: Boca Raton. Arkin, Ronald C. (2010): The case for ethical autonomy in unmanned systems, in: Journal of Military Ethics, 9(4): 332–341. Arkin, Ronald C. (2014): Bio-inspired Slowness for Robotic Systems, Mobile Robot Laboratory College of Computing GATECH: Atlanta, URL: http://www.cc.gatech.edu/ai/robot-lab/online-publications/Arob2.pdf [accessed March 28 2017]. Article 36 Non-governmental organization (NGO): The organization specifically also deals with the subject of autonomous (lethal) weapons and has spoken at the CCW informal meetings, published articles about meaningful human control in autonomous weapons systems and is considered as a founding member of the \"Campaign to Stop Killer Robots\". The website of the non-profit organization holds an extensive documentation. URL: http://www.article36.org [accessed March 27 2017]. Asaro, Peter (2008): How Just Could a Robot War Be?, in: Current Issues in Computing and Philosophy (pp. 50-64), P. Brey, A. Briggle, & K. Waelbers (eds.), los Press: Amsterdam. Asaro, Peter (2011): A Body to Kick, But Still No Soul to Damn: Legal Perspectives on Robotics, in: Robot Ethics: The Ethical and Social Implications of Robotics, pp. 169-186, Lin, Patrick et al. (eds.), MIT Press: Cambridge. This Paper points out two key problems with liability of robots/AI: moral agency and punishment. Asaro, Peter (2012): On Banning Autonomous Weapon Systems: Human Rights, Automation, and the Dehumanization of Lethal Decision-Making, in: International Review of the Red Cross, Special Issue on New Technologies and Warfare, Summer 2012, Vol. 94, No. 886, pp. 257-269. Asaro, Peter (2016): \"Hands Up, Don't Shoot!\" HRI and the Automation of Police Use of Force, in: Journal of Human-Robot Interaction, Vol. 5, No. 3, pp. 55-69. This paper is focusing on human robot-interfaces for police work. The author urges a moratorium on the automated use of force in police work due to the serious challenges one is confronted with when it comes to \"automating violence\". Baldi, Pierre (2016), as cited in: Castelvecchi, Davide (2016): The black box of AI, in: Nature, Feature News, Vol 538, Oct. 2016, p. 222: Macmillan/Springer. Part 2 – Background Information Page 82 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Beer, Randall D. (2009): in: Scholarpedia 4(4):1531, revision #91061. Berman, Lazar (2012): Israel's Iron Dome: Why America is Investing Hundreds of Millions of Dollars, American Enterprise Institute (AEI), September 24 2012, URL: https://www.aei.org/publication/israels-iron-dome-why-america-is-investing-hundreds-of-millions-of-dollars/ [accessed March 21 2017]. Blair, Dave (2012): Ten Thousand Feet and Ten Thousand Miles: Reconciling our Air Force culture to Remotely Piloted Aircraft and the New Nature of Aerial Combat, in: Air and Space Power Journal, Vol. 26, No. 3, May-Jone 2012, pp. 61-69. Bohidar, S. et al. (2014): Energy Supply System in Robotic Machines, in: IJIRST, Vol. 1, Issue 6. Borton, David A. et al. (2013): An implantable wireless neural interface for recording cortical circuit dynamics in moving primates, in: Journal of Neural Engineering, April 2013, Vol. 10, No. 2: 026010. Burgess, Lisa (2008) Report faults computer in Guam B-2 crash, in: Stars and Stripes, 7 June 2008, URL: https://www.stripes.com/news/reportfaults-computer-in-guam-b-2-crash-1.79781#.WcJmUZOGOuU [accessed September 20 2017]. Burrell, Jenna (2016): How the Machine \"Thinks\": Understanding Opacity in Machine Learning Algorithms, in: Big Data & Society, Januar-June 2016, Vol. 3, No. 1, pp. 1-12. Burri, Thomas (2016): The Politics of Robot Autonomy, in: European Journal of Risk Regulation, Vol. 7, No. 2, June 2016, pp. 341-360. Burri, Thomas (2017): Machine Learning and the Law: 5 Theses, URL: https://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=2927625 [accessed March 24 2017]. Caliskan-Islam, A. et al. (2016): Semantics derived automatically from language corpora necessarily contain human biases, in: ArXiv.org, eprint arXiv:1608.07187. Calo, Ryan M. (2011): The Drone as Privacy Catalyst, in: Stanford Law Review, December 2011, Vol. 64, No. 29, SLR Online, URL: https://www.stanfordlawreview.org/online/the-drone-as-privacy-catalyst/ [accessed April 22 2017]. Campaign to Stop Killer Robots: One of the prominent campaigns with its goal to \"pre-emptively ban fully autonomous weapons\". The campaign is an international coalition with some well-known members in their steering committee (such as Human Rights Watch, Article 36, ICRAC, Nobel Women's Initiative etc.), mostly NGOs. URL: http://www.stopkillerrobots.org [accessed March 28 2017]. Castelvecchi, Davide (2016): The black box of AI, in: Nature, Feature News, Vol 538, Oct. 2016, pp. 20-23: Macmillan/Springer. This publication gives a clearly understandable introduction on what problems one is confronted with in machine learning – especially when confronted with \"deep learning\" that is already implemented in a wide range of applications. Center for Robot-Assisted Search and Rescue (CRASAR): Texas A&M University, URL: http://crasar.org [accessed March 31 2017]. Chapa, Joseph (2014): The Virtuous Drone Pilot, MA Thesis, Boston College: Boston, URL: http://hdl.handle.net/2345/bc-ir:104048 [accessed April 22 2017]. Chapa, Joseph (2017): Film Review: National Bird, Directed by Sonia Kennebeck, in: Journal of Military Ethics Vol. 16, Nos. 1-2, pp. 130-137. Chapa, Joseph (2018): The Ethics of Remote Weapons: Reapers, Red Herrings, and a Real Problem, in: One Nation Under Drones, ed. John Jackson (Naval Institute Press, forthcoming 2018). Chapman, Matthias (2010): Die Problematik bei einem finalen Rettungsschuss, in: Tages Anzeiger, September 10 2010, URL: http://www.tagesanzeiger.ch/schweiz/standard/Die-Problematik-bei-einem-finalen-Rettungsschuss/story/30715061 [accessed March 22 2017]. Chappelle, Wayne L. et al. (2013): Symptoms of Psychological Distress and Post-Traumatic Stress Disorder in United States Air Force \"Drone\" Operators, in: Military Medicine, Vol. 179, No. 8, pp. 63-70. Chappelle, Wayne L. et al. (2012): Prevalence of High Emotional Distress and Symptoms of Post-Traumatic Stress Disorder in U.S. Air Force Active Duty Remotely Piloted Aircraft Operators, 2010 USA-FAM Survey Results, Final Technical Report, Air Force Research Laboratory: Wright Patterson AFB. Chappelle, Wayne L. et al. (2014): Assessment of Occupational Burnout in United States Air Force Predator/Reaper 'Drone' Operators, in: Military Psychology, Vol. 26, No. 5-6, pp. 376-385. Chappelle, Wayne, Tanya Goodman, Laura Reardon, William Thompson (2014) An Analysis of Post-Traumatic Stress Symptoms in United States Air Force Drone Operators, in: Journal of Anxiety Disorders, June 2014, Vol. 28, No. 5, pp. 480-487. Chomsky, Noam and Vltcheck, Andre (2013): On Western Terrorism: From Hiroshima to Drone Warfare, Pluto Press: London. Christen, Markus et al. (2014): Measuring the Moral Impact of Operating 'Drones' on Pilots in Com-bat, Disaster Management and Surveillance, Twenty Second European Conference on Information Systems: Tel Aviv. Coeckelbergh, Mark (2010): Health care, capabilities, and AI assistive technologies, in Ethical Theory Moral Practice, Vol. 13, No. 2, pp. 181–190. Convention Mines (1997): Convention on the Prohibition of the Use, Stockpiling, Production and Transfer of Anti-Personnel Mines and on their Destruction: 2056 UNTS 241; 36 ILM 1507 (1997). Part 2 – Background Information Page 83 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Cooper, Harry and Plucinska, Joanna (2017): Don't kill us, R2-D2: MEPs warn against robot revolt, in: Politico, February 16 2017 resp. February 21 2017, URL: www.politico.eu/article/dont-kill-us-r2-d2-meps-warn-against-robot-revolt [accessed March 22 2017]. Cornwall, Warren (2015): In Pursuit of the Perfect Power Suit, in: Science, October 16 2015, Vol. 350, No. 6258. Crootof, Rebecca (2016): A Meaningful Floor for \"Meaningful Human Control\", in: Temple International and Comparative Law Journal, Vol 30, pp. 53-62. Dao, James (2013): Drone Pilots Are Found to Get Stress Disorders Much as Those in Combat Do, in: The New York Times, February 22 2013, URL: http://www.nytimes.com/2013/02/23/us/drone-pilots-found-to-get-stress-disorders-much-as-those-in-combat-do.html [accessed March 27 2017]. DC Metropolitan Police Department, Automated Speed Enforcement: Frequently Asked Questions, URL: http://mpdc.dc.gov/page/automatedspeed-enforcement-faq [accessed 11 Jan 2017]. De Crook, Arthur (ed.) et. al. (2016): Robotics for Future Presidents: Leading Experts on the Next Revolution in Automation, Robotics Institute, TU Delft: Delft. Defense Science Board (2016): Summer Study on Autonomy. US Department of Defense, June 2016. URL: http://www.acq.osd.mil/dsb/reports/2010s/DSBSS15.pdf [accessed October 22 2017]. De Maria, G. et al. (2012): Force/tactile sensor for robotic applications, in: Sensors and Actuators A: Physical, 175. 60-72: Elsevier. Del Prado, Guia Marie (2015): This drone is one of the most secretive weapons in the world, in: Business Insider UK, Tech News, September 29 2015, URL: http://uk.businessinsider.com/british-taranis-drone-first-autonomous-weapon-2015-9 [accessed March 21 2017]. Di Nucci, Ezio and Santoni de Sio, Filippo (2016): Drones and responsibility: legal, philosophical and socio-technical perspectives, Routledge: London. Docherty, Bonnie et al. (2012): Losing Humanity: The Case against Killer Robots, Human Rights Watch and Harvard International Human Rights Clinic Report, Goose, Steve (ed.), November 2012: New York. With its main goal to protect human rights of people worldwide, HRW published one of the first NGO reports in 2012 that deals directly with the subject of \"fully autonomous weapons\" and their legal and ethical concerns. They acknowledge that fully autonomous systems do not yet exist, but argue that such systems would be unable to meet basic principles of international humanitarian law, and consequentially recommend (together with The International Human Rights Clinic (IHRC) at Harvard Law School) to all states that the use, development and production of fully autonomous weapons should pre-emptively be prohibited \"through an international legally binding instrument\". Docherty, Bonnie et al. (2014): Shaking the Foundations: The Human Rights Implications of Killer Robots, Human Rights Watch and Harvard International Human Rights Clinic Report, Goose, Steve (ed.), May 2014: New York. Docherty, Bonnie et al. (2015): Mind the Gap – the Lack of Accountability for Killer Robots, Human Rights Watch and Harvard International Human Rights Clinic Report, Goose, Steve (ed.), April 2015: New York. This report goes more deeply into the subject of accountability issue when it comes to the use of fully autonomous weapons or \"killer robots\". It argues that, even if there is success in liability assignment, \"the nature of the accountability that resulted might not realize the aims of deterring future harm and providing retributive justice to victims.\" The report supports the case against fully autonomous weapons and the call for a ban (see also: Docherty, Bonnie et al. (2012): \"Loosing Humanity: The Case against Killer Robots\"). Dorigo, Marco et al. (2014): Swarm robotics, in: Scholarpedia, 9(1):1463, revision #138643. Doran, Jamie and Quraishi, Najibullah (2016): Living Beneath Drones, Al Jazeera, September 19. Doswald-Beck, Louise (1993): Les armes qui aveuglent – rapports des réunions d'experts organisées par le Comité Internationale de la Croix Rouge sur les lasers de combat 1989-1991, CICR: Geneva. Drezner, Jeffrey A. and Leonard, Robert S. (2002): Innovative Development: Global Hawk and DarkStar HAE UAV ACTD Program Description and Comparative Analysis, RAND Corporation: Santa Monica. Enemark, Christian (2014): Armed Drones and the Ethics of War: Military virtue in a post-heroic age, Routledge: London. European Parliament (2016): Draft Report with recommendations to the Commission on Civil Law Rules on Robotics (2015/2103(NL)), PE 582.443v0100, Committee on Legal Affairs, Rapporteur: Mady Delvaux, May 31 2016. Fetz, Eberhard E. (2015): Restoring motor function with bidirectional neural interfaces, in: Progress in Brain Research, Vol 218, pp. 241-252, Elsevier: Amsterdam. Fitzsimmons, Scott and Karina Sangha (2013) Killing in High Definition: Combat Stress among Operators of Remotely Piloted Aircraft, Canadian Political Science Association/American Political Science Association; International Studies Association Annual Meeting. Ford, Martin (2015): Rise of the Robots: Technology and the Threat of a Jobless Future, Basic Books: Boulder. See also: Kaplan, Jerry (2015). Friedman, B., and Kahn, P. H., JR. (2003): Human values, ethics, and design, in: The Human-Computer Interaction Handbook, J. Jacko and A. Sears (Eds), Lawrence Erlbaum Associates: Mahwah NJ. Galliott, Jai (2016): Military Robots Mapping the Moral Landscape, Routledge: New York. Part 2 – Background Information Page 84 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Gibbons-Neff, Thomas (2016): ISIS used an armed drone to kill two Kurdish fighters and wound French troops, report says, in: The Washington Post, October 11 2016, URL: https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/checkpoint/wp/2016/10/11/isis-used-an-armed-drone-to-kill-two-kurdishfighters-and-wound-french-troops-report-says/?utm_term=.891c8d960b77 [accessed March 22 2017]. Grut, Chantal (2013): The Challenge of Autonomous Lethal Weapon Systems to International Law, in: Journal of Conflict and Security Law, Vol. 18, No. 1, pp. 5-23. This article discusses the implications of weapons autonomy on IHL. Guarini, Marcello and Bello, Paul (2012): Robotic warfare: Some Challenges in Moving from Noncivilian to Civilian Theaters, in: Robot Ethics: The Ethical and Social Implications of Robotics, pp. 129-145, Lin, Patrick et al. (eds.), MIT Press: Cambridge. Guo, Yi (ed.) (2013): Selected Topics in Micro/Nano-robotics for Biomedical Applications, Springer: New York. Haar, Rohini J. & Iacopino, Vincent (2016): Lethal in Disguise: The Health Consequences of Crowd-Control Weapons, Zwibel C., Suciu A., Ennarah, K., Pol, L., Santos, L. (eds.), Report of the International Network of Civil Liberties Organizations and Physicians for Human Rights. Haselager, Willem F.G. (2005): Robotics, philosophy and the problems of autonomy, in: Pragmatics & Cognition, Vol. 13, No. 3, pp. 515-532. Heyns, Christof (2013): Annual report of the Special Rapporteur on extrajudicial, summary and arbitrary executions, submitted to the Human Rights Council pursuant to its Resolution 17/5, focuses on lethal autonomous robotics and the protection of life, April 9 2013, United Nations (UN) General Assembly: Geneva. Christof Heyns, the then UN Special Rapporteur on extrajudicial, summary and arbitrary executions, submitted his annual report to the Human Rights Council of the United Nations that focuses on lethal autonomous robotic systems and the protection of human life. It recommends to states around the world a \"national moratoria\" on aspects of lethal autonomous robotic (LAR) systems, and \"calls for the establishment of a high level panel on LARs to articulate a policy for the international community on the issue.\" While doing this, the report raises questions about how such systems can be programmed to comply with IHL and how legal accountability is dealt with. Hickman, William B. (MG) (2015): Investigation Report of the Airstrike on the Médicins Sans Frontiéres / Doctors Without Borders Trauma Center in Kunduz, Afghanistan on 3 October 15, declassified, USFOR Afghanistan: Kabul. Horowitz, Michael C. and Scharre, Paul (2015): Meaningful human control in weapon systems: A Primer, Project on Ethical Autonomy, Working Paper, March 2015, Center for New American Security. Human Rights Watch (April 11, 2016): Killer Robots and the Concept of Meaningful Human Control: Memorandum to Convention on Conventional Weapons (CCW) Delegates, HRW and IHRS, April 2015. A discussion of what has changed in regards to human control when we move from standard weapons to ones that have autonomous capabilities. Human Right Watch (2015). Mind the Gap: The Lack of Accountability for Killer Robots. Retrieved from https://www.hrw.org/report/2015/04/09/mind-gap/lack-accountability-killer-robots Ienca, Marcello and Haselager, Pim (2016): Hacking the brain: brain–computer interfacing technology and the ethics of neurosecurity, in: Ethics and Information Technology, Vol. 18, No. 2, pp. 117-129. Ignatius, David (2016): In Munich, a frightening preview of the rise of killer robots, in: The Washington Post, February 16 2016, URL: https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/checkpoint/wp/2016/10/11/isis-used-an-armed-drone-to-kill-two-kurdish-fighters-and-woundfrench-troops-report-says/?utm_term=.891c8d960b77 [accessed March 22 2017]. Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineer (IEEE) (2016): Ethically Aligned Design: A Vision for Prioritizing Human Wellbeing with Artificial Intelligence and Autonomous Systems, Version 1 for Public Discussion, December 13 2016: United States. International Committee for Robot Arms Control (ICRAC): Founded in 2009 by Juergen Altmann, Peter Asaro, Noel Sharkey and Rob Sparrow, this International Non Governmental Organization (NGO) \"seeks to discuss with the international community implications of the use of robotics and strive for a \"regulation of robot weapons\" and a \"peaceful use of robotics in the service of humanity\". Mission statement(s) URL: http://icrac.net/statements [accessed March 31 2017]. International Committee of the Red Cross (ICRC) (2006): A Guide to the Legal Review of New Weapons, Means, and Methods of Warfare: Measures to Implement Article 36 of Additional Protocol I of 1977, ICRC: Geneva. International Committee of the Red Cross (ICRC) (2015): International Humanitarian Law and the Challenges of Contemporary Armed Conflicts, 32nd International Conference Paper, October 2015, Red Cross and Red Crescent Conference (December 8-10 2015), ICRC: Geneva International Committee of the Red Cross (ICRC) (2016): Autonomous Weapon Systems Implications of Increasing Autonomy in the Critical Functions of Weapons, ICRC Report, Expert Meeting, March 15-16 2016: Versoix. International Committee of the Red Cross (ICRC Customary): Customary IHL Rules, in: Customary IHL Database URL: https://ihl-databases.icrc.org/customary-ihl/eng/docs/Home [accessed March 22 2017]. International Human Rights and Conflict Resolution Clinic and Global Justice Clinic (2012): Living under Drones: Death, Injury, and Trauma to Civilians from US Drone Practices in Pakistan, Stanford Law School & NYU School of Law: September 2012. ISR Deputy Chief of Staff for Intelligence, Surveillance, and reconnaissance (2016): Small Unmanned Aircraft Systems (SUAS) Flight Plan: 2016-2036, Bridging the Gap Between Tactical and Strategic, Report, U.S. Air Force, April 30 2016: Washington. Jaffe, Greg (2010): Combat Generation: Drone operators climb on winds of change in the Air Force, in: The Washington Post, February 28 2010, URL: http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2010/02/27/AR2010022703754.html [accessed March 28 2017]. Part 2 – Background Information Page 85 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Judson, Jen (2016): US Army Putting Finishing Touches on Autonomous Systems Strategy, in: DefenseNews, March 17 2016, URL: http://www.defensenews.com/story/defense/show-daily/ausa-global-force/2016/03/17/army-autonomous-system-strategy/81897736/ [accessed March 22 2017]. Kaag, John and Kreps, Sarah (2014): Drone Warfare, Polity Press: Cambridge. Kaplan, Jerry (2015): Humans need not apply: A guide to wealth and work in the age of artificial intelligence, Yale University Press: New Heaven. Karimi, Faith, Shoichet, Catherine E., Ellis, Ralph (2016): Dallas Sniper Attack: 5 Officers Killed, Suspect identified, in: CNN Online, July 9 2016, URL: http://edition.cnn.com/2016/07/08/us/philando-castile-alton-sterling-protests/ [accessed March 21 2017]. Kennebeck, Sonia (2016): National Bird, Public Broadcasting Station (PBS), Independent Lens series, aired 1 May 2017. Kerr, Ian and Szilagyi, Katie (2016): Asleep at the switch? How killer robots become a force multiplier of military necessity, in: Robot Law, Calo, R.; Froomkin, A; M., Kerr I. (eds.), pp. 333-366. For the authors autonomous military robots (\"killer robots\") are \"force multipliers\" and therefore have the potential not only for increasing \"destructiveness and fatalities\" when developed, but also have the ability to \"change our own perceptions of \"necessity and proportionality\" and therefore have an impact in international humanitarian law. Kershenar, Stephen (2013): Autonomous Weapons Pose No Moral Problems, in: Killing By Remote Control: The Ethics of an Unmanned Military, Strawser, Bradley Jay, (eds.), Oxford University Press: Oxford. Killmister, Suzy (2008): \"Remote Weaponry: The Ethical Implications,\" Journal of Applied Philosophy Vol. 25, No. 2, pp. 121-133. Kraska, Peter B. & Cubellis, Louis J. (1997): Militarizing mayberry and beyond: Making sense of American paramilitary policing, in: Justice Quarterly, Vol. 14, No. 4, pp. 607-629. Krishnan, Armin (2009): Killer Robots: Legality and Ethicality of Autonomous Weapons. Ashgate Publishing, Ltd. Kroll, Joshua A. et al. (2017): Accountable Algorithms, in: University of Pennsylvania Law Review, Vol. 165, pp. 633-705. Liberatore, V. et al. (2004): Robotic Communication Systems for Flexible, Sustainable, Affordable, and Autonomous Space Operations, A white paper prepared for NASA, Case School of Engineering, Ohio. Lichocki, P., Kahn, P., & Billard, A. (2011): The ethical landscape of robotics, in: Robotics & Automation Magazine, IEEE, Vol. 18 No. 1, pp. 39-50. Lin, Patrick (2015): Why Ethics Matters for Autonomous Cars, in: Autonomes Fahren. Technische, rechtliche und gesellschaftliche Aspekte, Maurer M., Gerdes J. Ch., Lenz B., Winner H. (eds), Springer Open. Lin, Patrick et al. (2008): Autonomous Military Robotics: Risk, Ethics, and Design, California Polytechnic State University: San Luis Obispo. Lin, Patrick et al. (2008): The Ethical and Social Implications of Robotics, MIT Press: Cambridge. Lin, Patrick et al. (2012): Robot Ethics: The Ethical and Social Implications of Robotics, MIT Press: Cambridge. Malenic, Marina (2016): USAF 'Loyal Wingman' UAVs to emerge within a decade, in: IHS Jane's 360, May 19 2016, URL: http://www.janes.com/article/60471/usaf-loyal-wingman-uavs-to-emerge-within-a-decade [accessed March 22 2017]. Marchant, G., et al. (2011): The Growing Gap Between Emerging Technologies and Legal-Ethical Over-sight: The Pacing Problem, Springer Netherlands: Dordrecht. Matthias, Andreas (2004): The responsibility gap: Ascribing responsibility for the actions of learning automata, in: Ethics and Information Technology, September 2004, Vol. 6, No. 3, pp. 175-183. Maurer, Markus, et al. (2015): Autonomes Fahren. Technische, rechtliche und gesellschaftliche Aspekte, Maurer M., Gerdes J. Ch., Lenz B., Winner H. (eds), Springer Open. McNally, David (2014): Autonomous System Development: The U.S. Army Prepares for The Future, in: Army Technology, October 24 2014, Vol. 2, No. 6, p. 10. Menthe, Lance et al. (2012): The Future of Air Force Motion Imagery Exploitation: Lessons from The Commercial World, Technical Report, RAND Corporation: Santa Monica. Mindel, David A. (2015): Our robots, Ourselves: Robotics and the Myths of Autonomy, Viking: New York. Mitchell, Tom M. (1997): Machine Learning, Series in Computer Science, McGraw-Hill: New York. The author gives an explanatory introduction to the machine learning approaches that includes examples and discussion of relevant algorithms, techniques and concepts. It tackles some basic concepts that are important in the fields of \"artificial intelligence\" and can be seen as one of the early standard work on machine learning. Moor, James (2005): Why We Need Better Ethics for Emerging Technologies, in: Ethics and Information Technology, Vol. 7, No. 3, pp. 111–119. Reprinted in: van den Hoven (2008), pp. 26–39. Murphy, Robin B. (2004): Activities of the Rescue Robots at the World Trade Center from 11–21 September 2001, in: IEEE Robotics & Automation Magazine, September 2004, Vol. 11, No. 3, pp. 50-61. National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) (2015): NASA Technology Roadmaps TA 4: Robotics and Autonomous Systems. While the NASA's Technology Roadmap on Robotics and Autonomous System is generally a public available decision support tool for NASA to Part 2 – Background Information Page 86 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 estimate technology candidates for their future investments and applications, it also can give an outlook on what technologies in these fields most likely will develop within the next approx. twenty years and what obstacles such developments may encounter from a Space Agencies view that is more and more confronted with Robotics and Autonomous Systems. Norman, Merel and Johnson, Deborah G. (2014): Negotiating autonomy and responsibility in military robots, in: Ethics and Information Technology, March 2014, Vol. 16, No. 1, pp. 51-62. O'Connell, Mary Ellen (2014): Banning Autonomous Killing: The Legal and Ethical Requirement That Humans Make Near-Time Lethal Decisions, in: The American Way of Bombing: Changing Ethical and Legal Norms from Flying Fortresses to Drones, Evangelista M. & Shue H. (eds.), Cornell University Press: Ithaca/London. A discussion of the lawful and ethical problems associated with lethal autonomous weapons. Owen, Richard et al. (2012): Responsible research and innovation: from science in society to science for society, in: Science and Public Policy, Vol. 39, No. 6, pp. 751-760. Pagallo, Ugo (2017): When morals ain't enough: Robots, ethics, and the rules of the law, in: Mind and Machines, January 2017, Springer Online, pp. 1-14. Pellerin, Cheryl (2015): \"Work: Human-Machine Teaming Represents Defense Technology Future\" DoD News: Defense Media Activity, November 8 2015, URL: https://www.defense.gov/News/Article/Article/628154/work-human-machine-teaming-represents-defense-technologyfuture/ Peterson, Andrea (2016): In an apparent first, Dallas police used a robot to deliver bomb that killed shooting suspect, in: The Switch, The Washington Post, July 8 2016, URL: https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-switch/wp/2016/07/08/dallas-police-used-a-robot-to-deliver-bomb-thatkilled-shooting-suspect/?utm_term=.c0dc1bbbb354 [accessed March 21 2017]. Prigg, Mark (2014): Who goes there? Samsung unveils robot sentry that can kill from two miles away, in: Mail Online, September 15 2014, URL: http://www.dailymail.co.uk/sciencetech/article-2756847/Who-goes-Samsung-reveals-robot-sentry-set-eye-North-Korea.html [accessed March 21 2017]. Raytheon Corporation, Product Description: Phalanx Close-In Weapons System, URL: http://www.raytheon.com/capabilities/products/phalanx/ [accessed March 21 2017]. Rid, Thomas (2016): Rise of the Machines – the Lost History of Cybernetics, W.W. Norton & Company: New York. Roberts, Jeff John (2016): Why It's Legal for Police to Kill With a Robot, in: Fortune; Tech, July 9 2016, URL: http://fortune.com/2016/07/09/robotbomb [accessed March 21 2017]. Roff, Heather M. (2013): Killing in War: Responsibility, Liability and Lethal Autonomous Robots, in Routledge Handbook of Ethics and War: Just War Theory in the 21st Century, eds. Adam Henschke, Nick Evans and Fritz Allhoff (Routledge Press, 2013). In this paper, the author argues that just war theory assumes the philosophical autonomy of the agents and patients involved in a lethal decision. Since Lethal Autonomous Robots (LAR) are autonomous only in the engineering sense, this means that Just War Theory and allied systems of thought are thus incapable of incorporating LARs into their ethical framework regarding the behavior of combatants. Roff, Heather M. (2014): The Strategic Robot Problem: Lethal Autonomous Weapons in War, in: Journal of Military Ethics, Vol. 13, No. 2, pp. 211-227. This paper argues that if one wants to understand the consequences of creating and deploying lethal autonomous weapons systems, one need to \"look to the targeting process\" which includes \"how militaries actually create military objectives, and thus identify potential targets\". Roff, Heather M. and Moyes, Richard (2016): Meaningful Human Control, Artificial Intelligence and Autonomous Weapons, Briefing paper prepared for the Informal Meeting of Experts on Lethal Autonomous Weapons Systems, UN Convention on Certain Conventional Weapons, 1115 April 2016. This paper draws on thinking around 'meaningful human control' developed in collaboration with Dr. Heather Roff. With its name \"Article 36\" linked to the 1977 Additional Protocol I to the Geneva Conventions of August 1949 wherein states are required to review new weapons, this non-profit organization focuses on the prevention of \"harm caused by existing weapons and to build a stronger framework to prevent harms as weapons are used or developed in the future\". Royakkers, Lambèr and van Est, Rinie (2015): A Literature Review on New Robotics: Automation from Love to War, in: International Journal of Social Robotics, November 2015, Vol. 7, Issue 5, pp. 549-570. Royakkers, Lambèr and van Est, Rinie (2016): Just Ordinary Robots: Automation from Love to War, CRC Press: Boca Raton. Russell, Stuart J. and Norvig, Peter (2014): Artificial intelligence: a modern approach, Third Edition, Pearson Education: Harlow. Russell, Stuart, et al. (2015): Research Priorities for Robust and Beneficial Artificial Intelligence, in: Articles of the Association for the Advancement of Artificial Intelligence, Palo Alto. See also: Research Priorities for Robust and Beneficial Artificial Intelligence: An Open Letter, Future of Life Institute, URL: https://futureoflife.org/ai-open-letter/ [last accessed: 24.02.2017]. The Open Letter on Artificial Intelligence (2015) is signed by worldrenowned scientists and artificial intelligence experts (i.e. Stephen Hawking, Peter Norvig, Eric Horvitz, Stuart Russell, Max Tegmark). Its intention is to warn from pitfalls of the technology and the danger to become an existential threat for humans, but also to set research priorities in order to avoid such outcomes and foster a \"robust\" artificial intelligence. Saxon, D. (2016): Autonomous drones and individual criminal responsibility, in: Drones and responsibility: legal, philosophical and socio-technical perspectives, Di Nucci & Santoni de Sio (eds.), pp. 148-166, Routledge: London. Schmitt, Michael N. (2013): Autonomous Weapon Systems and International Humanitarian Law: A Reply to the Critics, in: Harvard National Security Journal Features, Presidents and Fellows of Harvard College and Michael Schmidt. Part 2 – Background Information Page 87 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Schmitt, Michael N. (ed.) (2013): Tallinn Manual on the International Law Applicable to Cyber Warfare, Cambridge University Press: Cambridge. Schmitt, Michael N. and Thurnher, Jeffrey S. (2013): 'Out of the Loop': Autonomous Weapon Systems and the Law of Armed Conflict, in: Harvard National Security Journal, February 5 2013, Vol. 4 No. 231. The authors argue that a ban of Autonomous Weapon Systems would be \"insupportable as a matter of law, policy, and operational good sense\". Sharkey, Amanda (2014): Robots and human dignity: A consideration of the effects of robot care on the dignity of older people, in: Ethics and Information Technology, March 2014, Vol. 16, No. 1, pp. 63–75. Sharkey, Noel (2007): Automated Killers and the Computing Profession, in: Computer (Journal), November 2007, Vol. 40, No. 11, pp. 122-124. Sharkey, Noel (2009): Death strikes from the sky, in: IEEE Technology and Society Magazine, 28(1): 16–19. Sharkey, Noel (2010): Saying 'no!' to lethal autonomous targeting, in: Journal of Military Ethics 9(4): 369–383. Sharkey, Noel (2011): Moral and legal aspects of military robots, in: Ethical and Legal Aspects of Unmanned Systems, Dabringer G (ed.), pp. 43–51, Institut für Religion und Frieden: Vienna. Sharkey, Noel (2012a): Killing Made Easy: From Joysticks to Politics, in: Robot Ethics: The Ethical and Social Implications of Robotics, Lin, P., Abney, K., and Bekey, G.A., pp. 111-128, MIT Press: Cambridge. Sharkey, Noel (2012b): The evitability of autonomous robot warfare, in: International Review of the Red Cross, Comments and Opinions, Summer 2012, Vol. 94, No. 886, pp. 787-799. Sharkey, Noel (2016): Staying in the loop: Human supervisory control of weapon, in: Autonomous Weapons Systems – Law Ethics Policy, Bhuta N., Beck S., Geiss R., Liu H., Kress C. (eds.), Cambridge University Press: Cambridge, pp. 23-38. Sharkey, Amanda and Sharkey, Noel (2012): Granny and the robots: ethical issues in robot care for the elderly, in Ethics and Information Technology 14 (1):27-40. This paper reports on six ethical concerns raised by healthcare robots: (1) the potential reduction in the amount of human contact; (2) an increase in the feelings of objectification and loss of control; (3) a loss of privacy; (4) a loss of personal liberty; (5) deception and infantilization; (6) the circumstances in which elderly people should be allowed to control robots. Shladover, Steven E. (2016): The Truth about \"Self-Driving\" Cars, in: Scientific American, June 2016, 314(6): 52-57. ShotSpotter: Law Enforcement, URL: http://shotspotter.com/law-enforcement [accessed June 16 2017]. Sidner, S. and Simon, M. (2016): How Robot, Explosives Took out Dallas Sniper in Unprecedented Way, in: CNN Online, July 12 2016, URL: http://edition.cnn.com/2016/07/12/us/dallas-police-robot-c4-explosives/ [accessed March 24 2017]. Singer, Peter W. (2009): Wired for War The Robotics Revolution and Conflict in the Twenty-first Century, The Penguin Press: New York. This work is based on hundreds of interviews with people from the robotics field, politics, military, etc. It describes and approaches the subject of deployment and development of unmanned vehicles and robots in warfare critically. Snyder, Rosalyn G. (2001): Robots assist in search and rescue efforts at wtc, in: IEEE Robotics and Automation Magazine, Vol. 8, No. 4, p.26-28. Sorell, Tom and Draper, Heather (2014): Robot carers, ethics, and older people, in: Ethics and Information Technology, September 2014, Vol. 16, No. 3, pp. 183-195. Sotala, K. and Yampolskiy R. (2013): Responses to Catastrophic AGI Risk: A Survey. Technical report 2013-2. Berkeley, CA: Machine Intelligence Research Institute. Sparrow, Robert (2007): Killer Robots, in: Journal of Applied Philosophy, Vol. 24, No. 1, pp. 62-77. Sparrow, Robert (2009a): Building a better warbot: Ethical issues in the design of unmanned systems for military applications, in Science and Engineering Ethics. 15, 2, p. 169 – 187. Sparrow, Robert (2009b): Predators or plowshares? Arms control of robotic weapons, In IEEE Technology and Society Magazine. 28, 1, p. 25 – 29. Sparrow, Robert (2011): Robotic weapons and the future of war, in New Wars and New Soldiers: Military Ethics in the Contemporary World. Tripodi, P. & Wolfendale, J. (eds.). Surrey, UK: Ashgate Publishing Limited, p. 117 133. Sparrow, Robert (2013): War without Virtue?, in: Killing by Remote Control, Strawser, B. J. (ed.), pp. 94-105, Oxford University Press: New York. Steinhoff, Uwe (2013): Killing Them Softly: Extreme Asymmetry and its Discontents, in: Killing by Remote Control, Strawser, B. J. (ed.), pp. 179-210, Oxford University Press: New York. Strawser, Bradley J. (2010): Moral predators: The duty to employ uninhabited aerial vehicles, in: Journal of Military Ethics, Vol. 9, No. 4, pp. 342–368. Strawser, Bradley J. (2013): Killing by remote control: The Ethics of an unmanned military, Oxford University Press: Oxford. Sullins, John P. (2012): Robots, Love, and Sex: The Ethics of Building a Love Machine, in: IEEE Transactions on affective Computing, Vol. 3, No. 4, October-December 2012. Sullins, John. P. (2010): RoboWarfare: Can Robots be More Ethical Than Humans on the Battlefield?, in: Ethics and Information technology, Vol. 12 No. 3, pp. 263-275. Part 2 – Background Information Page 88 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 Sullins, John P. (2006): \"When Is a Robot a Moral Agent?\" International Review of Information Ethics, Vol. 6, No.12, pp. 23-30: December. This paper argues for the minimum requirements for artificial moral agency in robotics. Thurnher, Jeffrey S. (2013): The Law That Applies to Autonomous Weapon Systems, in: insights, American Society of International Law, Vol. 17, No. 4, January 18 2013. This immediate reaction to the report \"Losing Humanity\" (see: Docherty, Bonnie et al.: 2012) tries to make clear from a legal perspective that it is important to distinguish \"policy, morality or ethical arguments\" from \"purely legal ones\" in regards to the field of international law. Turkle, Sherry (2011): Alone Together: Why We Expect More from Technology and Less from Each Other, Basic Books: New York. Turkle, Sherry (2015): Reclaiming Conversation: The Power of Talk in a Digital Age, Penguin Press: New York. Turse, Nick and Engelhardt, Tom (2012): Terminator Planet: The First History of Drone Warfare, 2001-2050, Dispatch Books/CreateSpace Independent Publishing Platform. United Nations (1990): Basic Principles on the Use of Force and Firearms by Law Enforcement Officials (September 7 1990), Adopted by the Eighth United Nations Congress on the Prevention of Crime and the Treatment of Offenders, August 27-September 7 1990: Havana. United Nations (2013): Report CCW/MSP/2013/10 (December 16 2013), Meeting of the High Contracting Parties to the Convention on Prohibitions or Restrictions on the Use of Certain Conventional Weapons Which May Be Deemed to Be Excessively Injurious or to Have Indiscriminate Effects, November 14-15 2013: Geneva. United Nations (2014): Report CCW/MSP/2014/9 (November 27 2014), Meeting of the High Contracting Parties to the Convention on Prohibitions or Restrictions on the Use of Certain Conventional Weapons Which May Be Deemed to Be Excessively Injurious or to Have Indiscriminate Effects, 13-14 November 2014: Geneva. Available at: http://www.unog.ch/80256EE600585943/(httpPages)/A038DEA1DA906F9DC1257DD90042E261?OpenDocument United Nations (2015): CCW Meeting of the High Contracting Parties, Final Report, Advanced Version, November 12-13 2015: Geneva. Available at: http://www.unog.ch/80256EE600585943/(httpPages)/6CE049BE22EC75A2C1257C8D00513E26?OpenDocument United Nations (2016): Report CCW/CONF.V/10 (December 23 3016), Advance Version, Fifth Review Conference of the High Contracting Parties to the Convention on Prohibitions or Restrictions on the Use of Certain Conventional Weapons Which May Be Deemed to Be Excessively Injurious or to Have Indiscriminate Effects, December 12-16 2016: Geneva. United Nations (2016b): Recommendations to the 2016 Review Conference, Advanced Version, 2016 Meeting of Experts on LAWS, Submitted by the Chairperson of the Informal Meeting, URL: http://www.unog.ch/80256EDD006B8954/(httpAssets)/ 6BB8A498B0A12A03C1257FDB00382863/$file/Recommendations_LAWS_2016_AdvancedVersion+(4+paras)+.pdf [accessed March 31 2017]. See further details: Reaching Critical Will Organisation (2016): CCW Report, April 15 2016, Vol. 3, No. 5, URL: http://www.reachingcriticalwill.org/disarmament-fora/ccw/2016/laws/ccwreport [accessed April 15 2017]. United States Army (Dec, 2006): Field Manual 3-24, Counterinsurgency (COIN-FM3-24), December 2016, Department of the Army: Washington. US Department of Defense (2012): Autonomy in Weapon Systems, Directive No. DoDD 3000.09, November 21 2012. US Department of Defense (2015): Law of War Manual. Available at: https://publicintelligence.net/dod-law-of-war/ [accessed July 16 2017] Vallabhaneni, Anirudh et al. (2005): Brain–computer interface, in: Neural Engineering, He Bin (ed.), pp. 85-121, Kluwer Academic/Plenum Publishers: New York. Vallor, Shannon (2016): Technology and the Virtues: A Philosophical Guide to a Future Worth Wanting, Oxford University Press: New York. van den Brule, Rik et al. (2014): Do Robot Performance and Behavioral Style affect Human Trust?, in: International Journal of Social Robotics, November 2014, Vol. 6, No. 4, pp. 519-531. van den Hoven, Jeroen (2007): ICT and Value Sensitive Design, in: The Information Society: Innovation, Legitimacy, Ethics and Democracy, Goujon P., Lavelle S., Duquenoy P., Kimppa K., Laurent V. (eds.), IFIP International Federation for Information Processing, Vol. 233, pp. 67-72Springer: Boston MA. van den Hoven, Jeroen (2008): Information Technology and moral philosophy, Cambridge University Press: Cambridge. van den Hoven, Jeroen (2014): Responsible innovation: a new look at technology and ethics, in: Responsible innovation 1: innovative solutions for global issues, Van den Hoven et al. (eds.), pp. 3-13, Springer: Dordrecht. van der Vyver, J.-J. et al. (2004): Towards genuine machine autonomy, in: Robotics and Autonomous Systems, Vol. 46, No. 3, pp. 151-157. van Wynsberghe, Aiimee (2015): Healthcare Robotics: Ethics, Design and Implementation, Routledge: London. van Wynsberghe, Aiimee and Nagenborg, Michael (2016): Civilizing drones by design, in: Drones and responsibility: legal, philosophical and sociotechnical perspectives, Di Nucci & Santoni de Sio (eds.), pp. 148-166, Routledge: London. Veruggio, Gianmarco and Operto, Fiorella (2008): Roboethics: Social and ethical implications of robotics, in: Springer Handbook of Robotics, Siciliano B. and Khatib, O. (eds.), pp. 1499-1524, Springer: Berlin. Part 2 – Background Information Page 89 University of Zurich, UZH Digital Society Initiative, October 2017 von Bothmer, Fredrik (2014): Robots in Court Responsibility for Lethal Autonomous Weapons Systems, in: Mensch und Maschine Symbiose oder Parasitismus?, pp. 102-112, Brändli, Sandra et al. (ed.), Schriften der Assistierenden der Universität St. Gallen (HSG), Vol. 9, Stämpfli Verlag: Bern. Wallach, Wendell (2013): Terminating the Terminator, in: Science Progress, Center for American Progress, January 29 2013, Online Journal, URL: https://scienceprogress.org/2013/01/terminating-the-terminator-what-to-do-about-autonomous-weapons/ [accessed March 28 2017]. Wallach, Wendell and Allen, Colin (2013), Framing Robot Arms Control, in: Ethics and Information Technology, Vol. 15, No. 2, pp.125-135, Springer: Dordrecht. In this article, the authors apply concepts from their work on autonomous robots in general to the task of autonomous weapons arms control. Wallach, Wendell and Allen, Colin (2009): Moral Machines: Teaching Robots Right from Wrong, Oxford University Press: Oxford. As the book title indicates: Wallach and Allen aim to implement morality into robotic systems, namely to create \"artificial moral agents (AMAs)\", so that robots can i.e. distinguish \"good\" from \"bad\". They tackle this large-scale idea from an ethical, engineering and cognitive science perspective. As more as artificial agents are engaged in responsible decisions within their sphere of action, as more it becomes inevitable from Wallach and Allen's perspective to develop and implement solutions that allow robots to make moral decisions whether such a morality is directly implemented or self-learned by robotic systems. Walter, Christian (2015): Cyber Security als Herausforderung für das Völkerrecht, in: JuristenZeitung, Vol. 70, No. 14, July 2015, pp. 685-693(9). Weaver, John Frank (2014): Robots are People too – How Siri, Google Car, and Artificial Intelligence will Force Us to Change Our Laws, Praeger: Santa Barbara. Weng, Yueh-Hsuan et al. (2015): Intersection of \"Tokku\" Special Zone, Robots, and the Law: A Case Study on Legal Impacts to Humanoid Robots, in: International Journal of Social Robotics, Vol. 7, No. 5, pp. 841-857. Winfield, Alain (2012): Robotics: A Very Short Introduction, Oxford University Press: Oxford. World Economic Forum (WEF) (2016): Robots in war: the next weapons of mass destruction?, 17. January 2016, URL: https://www.weforum.org/agenda/2016/01/robots-in-war-the-next-weapons-of-mass-destruction/ [accessed October 12 2017]."}
{"meta": {"title": "An Idea of Donnellan", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Kaplan, David", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "This is a story about three of my favorite philosophers—Donnellan,\n          Russell, and Frege—about how Donnellan’s concept of having in mind\n          relates to ideas of the others, and especially about an aspect of Donnellan’s\n          concept that has been insufficiently discussed: how this epistemic state can\n          be transmitted from one person to another.", "date": "2011", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/KAPAIO", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2017-09-08T20:28:37Z"}, "text": "ALMOG-Titlepage-Revised Proof III December 2, 2011 12:55 PM Having in Mind Th e Philosophy of Keith Donnellan Edited by Joseph Almog and Paolo Leonardi xwx 1 w ( 122 ) ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 122 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM CHAPT ER 8 An Idea of Donnellan DAVID KAPL AN This is a story about three of my favorite philosophers-Donnellan, Russell, and Frege-about how Donnellan's concept of having in mind relates to ideas of the others, and especially about an aspect of Donnellan's concept that has been insuffi ciently discussed: how this epistemic state can be transmitt ed from one person to another. BACKGROUND Donnellan compared his notion of the referential use of defi nite descriptions with Russell's notion of a genuine proper name . 1 On Russell's view the type of expression that comes closest to performing the function of the referential use of defi nite descriptions turns out, as one might suspect, to be a proper name (in \"the narrow logical sense\"). Many of the things said about proper names by Russell can, I think, be said about the referential use of defi nite descriptions without straining senses unduly. (Donnellan 1966 , 282) And I want to end by a brief examination of a picture of what a genuine referring expression is that one might derive from Russell's views. I want to suggest that this picture is not so far wrong as one might suppose and that strange as this may seem, some of the things we A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  123  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 123 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM have said about the referential use of defi nite descriptions are not foreign to this picture. Genuine proper names, in Russell's sense, would refer to something without ascribing any properties to it. Th ey would, one might say, refer to the thing itself, not simply the thing in so far as it falls under a certain description. (Donnellan 1966 , 302–3) Although he later seemed to withdraw the comparison (Donnellan 1970 , 337–38), his reasons for doing so relate more to Russell's changing ideas about what we can be acquainted with than with the fundamentals of Russell's approach. In withdrawing, Donnellan had the wrong Russell in mind. 2 Even though Donnellan is writing about defi nite descriptions and Russell is writing about proper names, the comparison between Donnellan's referential use and Russell's genuine proper names is indeed apt. Th ey each emphasize an epistemological requirement: the having in mind required for Donnellan's referential use and the acquaintance required for Russell's use of a genuine proper name. And they each insist that there are two uses of the same linguistic expression, with one semantic analysis for the case in which the epistemological requirement is satisfi ed and a quite diff erent semantic analysis for the case in which the epistemological requirement is not satisfi ed. 3 RUSSELL'S VIEW In 1903 Russell developed his view that for a use of a proper name to refer directly to an individual (Donnellan's genuine reference), and not by way of a description, the speaker must stand in a special epistemological relation to the named individual. He must be acquainted with the individual. If one were not acquainted with an individual, one might still speak or think about the individual, but only indirectly, through the use of a defi nite description. If a name were used, it would be no more than an abbreviation for a defi nite description. One has direct knowledge, knowledge by acquaintance , of that with which one is acquainted and, at best, only knowledge by description of that with which one is not acquainted. Th e sort of knowledge that Russell invokes here is not that of the propositional att itude \"knows that\" knowledge of truths. Rather it is knowledge of things . As Russell later put it: Th ere are two sorts of knowledge: knowledge of things, and knowledge of truths. We shall be concerned exclusively with knowledge of things, of which in turn we shall have to distinguish two kinds. Knowledge of things, when it is of the kind we call knowledge by acquaintance , is essentially simpler than any knowledge of truths, and logically independent of knowledge of truths, though it would be rash to assume that human ( 124 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 124 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM beings ever, in fact, have acquaintance with things without at the same time knowing some truth about them. Knowledge of things by description , on the contrary, always involves, as we shall fi nd in the course of the present chapter, some knowledge of truths as its source and ground. ([1912] 1961) Knowledge of things by description is grounded in the linguistic form of the defi nite description and in denoting . Defi nite descriptions are denoting phrases that express denoting complexes . 4 Th e denoting complexes are constituents of the propositions expressed by sentences containing denoting phrases. A denoting complex denotes the individual that uniquely satisfi es it (if there is such an individual; otherwise there is no denotation). Denoting is important because Russell insisted that we could only entertain a proposition, that is, hold it in thought, if we were acquainted with all of its constituents. Otherwise, as he later said, we would not know what we were thinking. 5 We may know that a certain defi nite description, for example, \"the spouse of Smith,\" is uniquely satisfi ed, although we are not acquainted with the individual that uniquely satisfi es it. However, if we are acquainted with all the elements of the denoting complex, the relations, the properties, and so on that are expressed by language in the defi nite description, we would be able to entertain a proposition that incorporates the denoting complex and thereby, through denoting, be able to think about the individual denoted. 6 Th us knowledge by description (that is, through denoting) may extend the range of individuals we can think about well beyond those we know by acquaintance. Here, briefl y, is Russell's picture. Propositions are built from worldly objects: individuals, properties, relations, and complexes of these. Such propositions straightforwardly represent states of the world, both actual and otherwise. Th us they are straightforwardly truth-evaluable. However, these worldly constructions are also the objects of thought. Th ey are the very things we entertain in thought. So external, material objects, like Donnellan himself or Mont Blanc, have to become or be transformed into cognitive objects . I need to be able to hold Donnellan and Mont Blanc in thought if I am to entertain the proposition that Mont Blanc is older than Donnellan. It is acquaintance that does this for us. Before I was acquainted with Donnellan, Mont Blanc, and the property of being the older than , I could not entertain this proposition. Once I am acquainted with them, I have a way of holding or representing them in thought, and thus I can entertain the proposition. (But see below for another view of the role of acquaintance in Russell's philosophy.) Now consider some ancient artifact I have never seen or interacted with, directly or indirectly, in any way. Perhaps it remains buried where it was left thousands of years ago. Th ere exists the proposition that it is older than A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  125  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 125 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM Donnellan. (Th is is a truism of the theory of Russellian propositions.) But how could I ever entertain such a proposition? I have no cognitive access to the artifact, no means to represent the artifact in thought. I might believe, even know that there are ancient artifacts still undiscovered aft er thousands of years, but how could I hold a particular one in mind? Once these epistemological ideas about acquaintance came into play, they supplanted Russell's earlier semantic views about the use of names (\"Names just name\"). Here is the passage from \"Points about Denoting,\" an unpublished manuscript of 1903, in which Russell introduces (for the very fi rst time) his special epistemological notion of acquaintance and states his epistemological principle \"All thinking has to start with acquaintance; but it succeeds [through denoting] in thinking about many things with which we have no acquaintance.\" (In all quotations, bracketed insertions are my comments.) . . . If I ask: Is Smith married? and the answer is affi rmative, I then know that \"Smith's wife\" is a denoting phrase [i.e., a phrase that does denote], although I don't know who Smith's wife is. We may distinguish the terms [i.e., individuals] with which we are acquainted from others which are merely denoted. E.g. in the above case, I am supposed to be acquainted with the term [individual] Smith and the relation marriage, and thence to be able to conceive a term [individual] having this relation to Smith, although I am not acquainted with any such term [individual]. . . . We know that every human being now living has one and only one father . . . . Nevertheless, it's a wise child etc. 7 Th is shows that to be known by description is not the same thing as to be known by acquaintance, for \"the father of x \" is an adequate description in the sense that, as a matt er of fact, there is only one person to whom it is applicable. . . . It is necessary, for the understanding of a proposition, to have acquaintance with the meaning of every constituent of the meaning, and of the whole [bett er, acquaintance with every constituent of the proposition, each of which may be taken to be a meaning]; it is not necessary to have acquaintance with such constituents of the denotation as are not constituents of the meaning. ([1903] 1994, points 1, 5) 8 It is obvious from this passage that Russell, in this pre-sense-data era, took it that one could be acquainted with an external material object like his friend Smith, probably as an \"object of perception.\" Russell's distinction between knowledge by acquaintance and knowledge by description was really a schema, with the notion of acquaintance as a parameter. We can fi ll in diff erent notions of acquaintance, and the schema will tell us which things we can think about only through denoting, that is, for which things we must have mere knowledge by description. In 1903, when Russell fi rst hit upon his schema and fi rst articulated his epistemological ( 126 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 126 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM principle-all thinking has to start from acquaintance, but it succeeds (through denoting) in thinking about many things with which we have no acquaintance-he took it that we are acquainted with those material objects that we perceive. Th at is why he says in \"On Denoting\" that we are not acquainted with other people's minds; he takes it that we are acquainted with their bodies. Roughly, we are acquainted with our acquaintances but have only knowledge by description of those individuals we have only heard about. Our knowledge of the latt er depends on inferences from truths that we accept, whereas knowledge by acquaintance is noninferential. Later, and much more famously, Russell reset the parameter. He demanded that we know objects of acquaintance \"perfectly and completely\" ([1912] 1961, paragraph 2) and concluded that we are never acquainted with external material objects but only with sense data, universals, the self, and the present time. 9 Th is had the result, according to the schema, that only those things could be named by a genuine name, that is, a name that is not a disguised defi nite description. And this led people to think that Russell's genuine names-also known as \"logically proper names\"-were very peculiar things indeed. But it wasn't the names that were peculiar; names always refer directly to what they name (provided the speaker is acquainted with it). It was the extreme narrowing of the underlying notion of acquaintance, what I have called the resett ing of the parameter. If we take perception as a paradigm for acquaintance with external material objects, it becomes natural to say that one is acquainted with one's acquaintances. And the notion that Russell might be acquainted with Smith, but not his wife (though knowing about her), has all the commonsense plausibility that Russell seems to have assigned it. Th e same plausibility att aches to his view that merely learning the name of Smith's wife (\"Triphena,\" as it turns out) would have had no eff ect on his epistemic relation to her. 10 It is this lesser-known Russell, the Russell of 1903, whose views about genuine uses of names (names used by one acquainted with the individual named) and denoting (knowledge by description) should be compared with Donnellan's views about the referential and att ributive uses of defi nite descriptions. 11 DONNELLAN'S HAVING IN MIND COMPARED TO RUSSELLIAN ACQUAINTANCE Donnellan's and Russell's views coincide in several interesting ways. As noted, they both subscribe to the view that there are two uses of the same linguistic expression. For Russell, a proper name, which appears to be nondescriptive, may be used to express a descriptive denoting complex (or may A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  127  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 127 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM be used to genuinely refer to the individual), and for Donnellan, a defi nite description may be used to genuinely refer, that is, to put the individual itself into the proposition (or may be used descriptively). Russell's denoting and knowledge by description seem to be drawn from the same cluster of concepts as Donnellan's att ributive use of a defi nite description. Russell, of course, never noticed the referential use of defi nite descriptions. Perhaps he was too literal-minded for that. But much of Russell's discussion of acquaintance versus denoting is parallel to Donnellan's discussion of referential versus att ributive uses of defi nite descriptions. It is also striking that both set what is seemingly the same epistemological state as the prerequisite for, and ultimate source of, reference. (Here and henceforth I use \"reference\" for the form of designation in which we designate \"the thing itself, not simply the thing insofar as it falls under a certain description\"; this is intended to contrast with \"denotation,\" which gives the individual satisfying a defi nite description.) Donnellan's having in mind and Russell's acquaintance play the same role in enabling referential intentions and what we may call singular or nondescriptive thoughts, and appear to be, in essence, the same notion. What I am calling a singular thought is sometimes called a de re thought. I prefer to reserve de re and de dicto for indirect discourse reports on thought. A drawback to my nomenclature is that the term singular thought misleadingly suggests that such a thought amounts to nothing more than our entertaining a Russellian singular proposition, a proposition containing an individual. Th is is exactly what Russell believed and may be what Donnellan believes, but it isn't what I believe, so please don't read it that way. (I don't believe that thoughts are Russellian propositions.) Le Verrier's naming of Neptune poses an interesting test for the hypothesis that having in mind and Russellian acquaintance are in essence the same notion. In the 1850s Le Verrier predicted that a previously unknown planet would be found in a certain orbit. Th e prediction was made on the basis of observed perturbations in the orbit of Uranus. Such perturbations would be explained, according to Newtonian gravitational theory, by a planet-size body traveling in the given orbit. Le Verrier was so confi dent about his prediction that he named the predicted planet \"Neptune\" before anyone actually spott ed it (which they eventually did). Le Verrier's knowledge of Neptune before it was seen would be a paradigm case of knowledge by description for Russell. And we see Donnellan following Russell in denying that Le Verrier's knowledge licensed \"reference to the thing itself.\" Th e sort of knowledge that Le Verrier had did not provide for the requisite epistemic state. 12 So similar standards apply to having x in mind and to being acquainted with x . Just as for Russell, the mere introduction of the proper name cut no ice for Donnellan. 13 ( 128 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 128 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM BUT WHAT ABOUT FREGE? One might think from reading Donnellan (or Russell) that what we have in mind is the individual itself, and that's the end of it. And in a way, this is correct, at least if we look only at the truth condition of our thought (the possible state of aff airs that our thought represents). Donnellan intends that the semantic content of what is said when using a defi nite description referentially will have the individual itself as a constituent, just as Russell intends that the proposition one entertains when using a genuine name will have the individual itself as a constituent. One might put it this way: Donnellan, like Russell, seems to claim that a singular thought is nothing more than a singular proposition (in Russell's sense of a proposition containing an individual at the relevant place). If our only concern is the truth of certain simple sentences, 14 then the sort of semantic content that has the individual itself as a constituent may well suffi ce. But if we are concerned with the sort of meaning that we grasp when we understand and communicate through language, the sort of meaning that fi gures into our ability to reason and act on the basis of what we take to be true, in short, the very sort of meaning that Russell took us to entertain in thought, then Russellian singular propositions will not do. Th is sort of meaning is what Frege called the cognitive signifi cance of an utt erance, and the individual itself couldn't be the constituent of this sort of meaning. 15 Frege's fi rst objection was that material objects can't be constituents of a thought, as he claimed in a horrifi ed response to a lett er from Russell: Truth is not a component part of the thought, just as Mont Blanc with its snowfi elds is not itself a component part of the thought that Mont Blanc is more than 4000 metres high . . . . Th e sense of the word \"moon\" is a component part of the thought that the moon is smaller than the Earth. Th e moon itself (i.e., the meaning [ Bedeutung ] of the word \"moon\") is not part of the sense of the word \"moon\"; for then it would also be a component part of that thought. 16 But a second, perhaps stronger objection is that there are diff erent ways in which one might, in Donnellan's own sense of having in mind , have the same individual in mind. And these diff erences make a diff erence in our reasoning, our belief-based actions, and our understanding of one another. Consider Donnellan's original case of the referential use of a defi nite description, the case of the man drinking a martini: Suppose one is at a party and, seeing an interesting-looking person holding a martini glass, one asks, \"Who is the man drinking a martini?\" If it should turn out that there is A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  129  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 129 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM only water in the glass, one has nevertheless asked a question about a particular person, a question that it is possible for someone to answer. (Donnellan 1966 , 287) I accept the claim that the referential use of \"the man drinking a martini\" succeeds in referring to the interesting-looking man before us. It is he whom I have in mind, and having him in mind guides my construction of a defi nite description that will succeed in calling your att ention to this man. I thereby convey to you who it is that I am asking about, which partially determines what I have said, what question I am asking. Donnellan's paradigms for the referential use of a description are cases in which the speaker has the intended referent in mind prior to the formation of the description and in a way that is independent of the description used. It is this independence that allows the description to mischaracterize the referent. Th e user intends that if push comes to shove, the individual in mind trumps the individual described. Donnellan believes that this is a regularized, convention-sanctioned use of defi nite descriptions in English (as opposed to an unintended, idiosyncratic, or spontaneous use). Th e description used is chosen for pragmatic, contextual reasons (to maximize communication with an addressee, to minimize communication with eavesdroppers, to avoid rudeness, to express an att itude, to display an att itude one does not actually have, etc.). With the same individual in mind, diff erent descriptions will be chosen on diff erent occasions of use. Maximizing the accuracy of the description may or may not maximize communication, but other contextual considerations may override maximizing accuracy while still allowing adequate communication. In cases of mischaracterization, the speaker may or may not have foreseen that the description used will not accurately describe the intended referent. Kripke and some others disagree that such uses are conventional. 17 Th ey regard them as spontaneous and unintended. But no one disagrees, I think, that whether conventional or not, such scenarios do arise and conversational participants do oft en (I would say usually ) recognize the speaker's intention and understand what was said as having the intended referent. It is the use of a description in such a scenario that I call a referential use . I myself think of such scenarios on the model of a demonstrative use of the description and regard what the speaker intends to express in such a scenario as a kind of meaning. Simply by following Donnellan's paradigm, we can show that there must be diff erent ways in which we can have that very man in mind. Extend the story back to the time at which we entered the room where the party was held. Suppose that we entered through an open archway (no door or doorway being involved) and that there was a man, in fact this very same man, but with his face obscured, wearing a brown hat and an enveloping overcoat, ( 130 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 130 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM standing in the shadows just inside the archway, and greeting certain of the guests. He did not actually greet us , but we thought he did (he was greeting the people behind us). Now I can certainly have that man in mind, in Donnellan's sense, as easily as I can have the man before us in mind. (Perhaps a bit of short-term memory is required.) 18 Recalling our entrance to the party, I can ask a second question: \"Who was the man who greeted us in the doorway?\" Here we have a new question, also containing a referential use of a defi nite description. Each question is guided by a having in mind in which, unbeknown to me (and to you), the same individual is in mind . But the questions, as understood and as communicated, are very diff erent. One might answer the second question by saying \"He is the man drinking the martini.\" But one would never answer the fi rst question that way. Now Russell or Donnellan might respond to this challenge by saying that the two questions have the same meaning, and that the diff erence in cognitive signifi cance merely fi gures into a nonsemantic account of why one answer is acceptable and the other not. Semantic meaning is one thing; cognitive signifi cance is another. Note, however, that we are not discussing a mere question of linguistic felicity. If I ask you, \"Invite the man drinking the martini to join us,\" you will head off in one direction; however, if I ask you, \"Invite the man who greeted us in the doorway to join us,\" you will head off in another direction. Th e diff erence in cognitive signifi cance is real, and it, rather than the object in mind, is what plays into understanding, reasoning, and the explanation of behavior. In both cases it can truthfully be said that you are seeking Bernard J. Ortcutt . But this will not explain why you went in one direction rather than the other. 19 I have posed this scenario as if it depended on communication and your understanding of what I aimed to communicate. But it doesn't. On your own initiative, you might have said, \"I'm going to invite the man drinking the martini to join us.\" Or you might have said, \"I'm going to invite the man who greeted us in the doorway to join us,\" and the results would be the same. Th ese statements express diff erent thoughts that would prompt different behavior. Furthermore there would be no fl aw in your reasoning if you thought Th e man who greeted us in the doorway was fr iendly. Th e man drinking a martini looks interesting. But there seem to be no fr iendly, interesting-looking people at this party. If, on the other hand, you had reasoned from just those two premises to the conclusion Th erefore there is a fr iendly, interesting-looking person at this party , a logician would complain that your reasoning was fl awed. For you to understand what I said, it does not suffi ce for you to simply represent the individuals I have in mind in your own ways; you must represent them in ways that coordinate with the ways I represent them. Suppose A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  131  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 131 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM a loud noise had drowned out part of my request, and because we had been discussing \"the man who greeted us,\" you thought I said \"who greeted us\" when I actually said \"drinking a martini.\" In that case you would have misunderstood what I asked. You would have failed to grasp what I meant. I have argued that a theory of meaning that aims to account for how we understand utt erances and communicate with them, in a sense in which understanding and communication can infl uence reasoning and behavior, must take account of the diff erent ways we can have a given individual in mind. And a theory of cognitive states, which Russell's theory of propositional att itudes pretends to be, must do likewise. Th is is why Russell's identifi cation of singular thoughts with singular propositions will not do. Th e nondescriptive ways in which one has a worldly object in mind are neither worldly objects themselves nor Russellian denoting complexes. Th e ways are drawn from a realm of cognitive entities much more fi ne-grained than Russell's worldly objects. Russell had warnings that something was amiss (see below on \"Is that Scott ?\"), but it would have required a wrenching change in his outlook on language and its representational role to incorporate ways of having in mind . 20 Note that the two havings in mind involved in my two questions are grounded in distinct perceptual episodes. I think of each of these two events, involving att ention to a perceptually available individual, as leaving us with a way of having an (unnamed) individual in mind and thus with the ability to entertain and articulate singular thoughts regarding each of them. I see these grounding episodes as loosely analogous to name-giving events, as if I had silently dubbed the one \"Doorway Man\" and the other \"Martini Man.\" 21 Naming also endows us with the ability to entertain and articulate singular thoughts. To press the analogy, I also regard \"Is Hesperus Phosphorus?\" and \"Is Hesperus Hesperus?\" as diff erent questions. Th e points made regarding ways of having in mind could easily be made using proper names rather than referential uses of defi nite descriptions. Still, having in mind seems the more general, and perhaps more interesting, notion since we have many individuals in mind for whom we have, or can recall, no name. 22 For Donnellan, the semantic value of a referential use of a defi nite description is what the speaker has in mind. But we have come up against Frege's Enduring Insight : When it comes to cognitive signifi cance, in addition to the what , there is always a how . 23 What the thinker has in mind is an individual, pure and simple. But how the thinker has that individual in mind may be neither pure nor simple. To repeat: Th is does not imply that the ways of having in mind are descriptive. I take it that they are not. 24 But it is important to see that diff erent nondescriptive ways of having the same individual in mind have the same ( 132 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 132 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM eff ect on communication, understanding, reasoning, and behavior as different descriptive ways of thinking about the same individual. We oft en give explanations of behavior in terms of diff erent descriptive ways of thinking about an individual. We might say of a bartender looking for someone to reach a bott le on a high shelf, \"He didn't go into the offi ce because he didn't realize that the offi ce manager was the tallest person in the club .\" We treat such reports as explanations of behavior, and that requires the widely accepted result that we must reject substitution of co-denoting defi nite descriptions in such reports. But such explanations of behavior are incomplete if they cannot account for behaviors that turn on diff erent nondescriptive ways of having in mind . Th e one notable diff erence between descriptive and nondescriptive representations is in regard to truth conditions. My assertions \"Th e man drinking a martini is a spy\" and \"Th e man who greeted us in the doorway is a spy\" have the same truth conditions (in virtue of the referential uses with a common referent in mind), whereas analogous assertions expressing descriptive thoughts would typically have distinct truth conditions. With the exception of truth conditions, all the reasons to distinguish thoughts involving distinct co-denoting defi nite descriptions are reasons to distinguish thoughts in which the thinker has the same individual in mind but in diff erent nondescriptive ways. A singular ( de re ) thought involving one nondescriptive way of having Ortcutt in mind may be among our beliefs, whereas the thought resulting from the substitution of a diff erent nondescriptive way of having Ortcutt in mind may fail to be among our beliefs. Both thoughts are singular and have the same truth conditions. Yet we may believe the one and fail to believe the other (or even believe the negation of the other) without irrationality. Th is is not because a thought can both be and not be among our beliefs. It cannot. Nor is it because we can have contradictory singular beliefs without being irrational. We cannot. It is because they are diff erent thoughts. Th e case for rationality here is exactly the same as it would have been if the distinct, not logically equivalent, nondescriptive ways of having Ortcutt in mind had been distinct, not logically equivalent, descriptive ways of having Ortcutt in mind. Frege himself is oft en said to use only defi nite description-like mental representations and thus to have nothing that corresponds to Russellian acquaintance or Donnellan's having in mind . But this is not historically correct. In the infamous section 8 of \"Begriff sschrift ,\" wherein Frege states his early doctrine that identity is a relation between linguistic expressions, he briefl y discusses the case of a name given by ostension, thus given to an object with which the name giver and his audience are perceptually acquainted. He states that there is a mode of determination associated with A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  133  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 133 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM such a name, and says that the perceived object \"is determined . . . immediately through intuition [ Anschauung ].\" He calls this mode of determination \"direct\" (intended, I believe, to contrast with \"descriptive\"). Note that this mode is nondescriptive. By calling it \"nondescriptive,\" I do not mean thin or point-like. A perceptual presentation can obviously be quite thick and rich. But it does not describe the object it represents. Th e object it represents is not necessarily the one that best matches the presentation qualitatively, that most looks like the presentation. Rather it is the object that the perception is of , the object that was perceived. Th is remains true even if the perceptual system distorts the presentation in such a way that a bett er match can be found at another location. In a powerful anticipation of the theory of \"Sinn und Bedeutung,\" Frege contrasts this mode of determination with a descriptive mode of determination for the same object. He then goes on to use the two modes of determination to explain the need for an identity symbol to express a judgment involving the two modes of determination. Th e judgment is roughly Th at point = the point of intersection between line A and circle B when line A is rotated to tangential position. To my knowledge, Frege never comes back and directly discusses how the perceptual mode of determination fi ts in with the developed theory of \"Über Sinn und Bedeutung\" ([ 1892 ] 2001). 25 Th is is a shame. Russell's own examples illustrate the need to take account of diff erent ways of being acquainted with the same object. 26 In \"On Denoting\" itself, Russell sets out to explain what it means to give the description primary scope in \"George IV wished to know whether Scott was the author of Waverley .\" He says that the proposition expressed would assign to George IV the thought he would have expressed if he had seen Scott in the distance and asked, \"Is that Scott ?\" Now just think for a minute. What is the nature of the proposition whose truth value George IV is uncertain about? He is acquainted with Scott (qua \"Scott \"). He is perceptually acquainted with the individual he is pointing at. Th ey are the same object. So according to Russell, George IV should be entertaining a singular proposition of the form x = x. Has Russell att ributed an interest in the law of identity to the fi rst gentleman of Europe? Th e fact is that George had two diff erent ways of having the great poet in mind. Th e thought he was entertaining is a singular ( de re ) thought, but it doesn't have the form of a logical truth. Th e fact that there is a how of cognitive signifi cance challenges Russellian acquaintance just as it does Donnellan's having in mind . Russell didn't seem to recognize this unavoidable Fregean epicycle on his central epistemological notion. Th ese problems about the how of cognitive signifi cance fl ow from what I call \"the recognition problem,\" an epistemological fact of life about our relationship to the sort of thing that has, as it were, a \"front\" and a \"back\" (and ( 134 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 134 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM so can be perceived from diff erent angles) or persists through time (and so can be perceived on diff erent occasions). Th e same problem arises for identical siblings, whether of the biological kind or of the linguistic kind, like the oral presentations of the words \"scent,\" \"sent,\" and \"cent\" or the names of my mother's two Doctors Shapiro. Th e problem is that no matt er how severely we constrain what will count as acquaintance with such an object, situations can always arise in which we are acquainted with the same object from diff erent angles or on diff erent occasions without recognizing it, making it sensible to wonder whether it is the same object. I originally thought of the recognition problem as the analogue for demonstratives of the co-reference problem for names (Frege's puzzle), \"that\" and \"that\" versus \"Hesperus\" and \"Phosphorus.\" But the recognition problem also infects our very means of expression: \"color\" and \"colour,\" \"Peking\" and \"Beijing,\" \"Paderewski\" and \"Paderewski\" We transmit words through perceptible presentations, and this makes them subject to the recognition problem. Here is a species of \"linguistic error,\" misrecognizing a word, that we cannot ensure against by semantic and syntactic study. 27 If I observe Venus in the morning and wonder \"Is that a planet?,\" and then observe it in the evening many months later and wonder \"Is that a planet?,\" I might not take myself to be entertaining the same thought. But according to Russell, it is the same thought. Cases like this, and my opening case of the man both \"in the doorway\" and \"drinking a martini,\" seem so obvious that it is hard to understand why Russell didn't see that there could be distinct cognitive modes of acquaintance with the same object. (Similarly, it is hard to understand why Frege fell into descriptivism instead of pursuing his good insight into perceptual modes of determination in section 8 of \"Begriff sschrift .\") It is interesting to speculate whether it was the recognition problem that drove Russell inward, drove him to eliminate external material objects as the objects of acquaintance. Donnellan, to my knowledge, never got caught up in any epistemologically implausible att empts to avoid the recognition problem. Even one who regards acquaintance and having in mind as cognitive relations to objects, relations that do not involve mediating cognitive representations, should acknowledge that there can be distinct such relations to the same individual. Th e relationist can accommodate this requirement by pointing, for example, to the distinct perceptual episodes that ground the two ways (as Martini Man and as Doorway Man) that I have the same individual in mind. But I don't know how we could store a pure relation in memory (a relation that would slowly fade aft er a certain period of time and disuse) without its having some occurrent feature in cognition. Donnellan's omniscient observer of history noticed the relation between the child who A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  135  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 135 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM was awakened and the awakening behavior of a certain guest at the party. However, if the child had not retained something in cognition that referred to or represented that guest (in this case, the name \"Tom\"), there would have been nothing for the omniscient observer to explain. So the view that acquaintance and having in mind are mediated in some such way seems plausible to me. Frege, of course, would account for such relations by postulating distinct constituents of cognition that mediate the relations. We might think of such a mediator as the cognitive witness of a relation stretching back along a path to the referent. My sympathies are with Frege. But whatever position one takes on the existence of such mediators, Frege was certainly on to something that is a very pervasive feature of cognition, namely, that there are distinct ways in which one can be acquainted with the same thing. Th is fl ows, in my opinion, from the hazards of recognition failures. SO WHAT ABOUT DIRECT REFERENCE? Direct reference has its place in the theory of objective truth conditions. We noted earlier that diff erent ways of having the same individual in mind do not aff ect the truth conditions of thoughts (not just the truth values but the truth conditions ). But I have argued that the diff erences in cognitive signifi cance among sentences with the same truth condition are linguistically important and are naturally taken to be a kind of meaning or semantic value . We do more with language than just making truth-evaluable assertions. I have called att ention to several areas in which the ways of having in mind do need to be taken into account. 28 Still, I have some appreciation for the claim that matt ers of cognitive signifi cance that go beyond direct reference are nonsemantic. It follows a line that Wett stein has argued vigorously since 1986, when he rightly criticized my att empt in \"Demonstratives\" to extract cognitive signifi cance from that paper's notion of linguistic meaning. 29 Wett stein's line was, very roughly, semantics is one thing; cognitive signifi cance is another. To try to sort this out adequately, I must go back and examine both Russell's and Frege's semantics more carefully. Russell viewed language as a system of representation for the objects, properties, relations, and (possible) states of the world. Russellian propositions are built from worldly objects (even the sense data to which he later reverted are, for Russell, worldly objects, as are properties and relations). In his reply to Frege's lett er, he insists that Mont Blanc is a component of \"what is actually asserted\" and calls such \"objects of thought\" objective propositions to indicate their worldly, object-oriented status. ( 136 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 136 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM I believe that in spite of all its snowfi elds Mont Blanc itself is a component part of what is actually asserted in the proposition \"Mont Blanc is more than 4000 metres high.\" We do not assert the thought, for this is a private psychological matt er: we assert the object of the thought, and this is, to my mind, a certain complex (an objective proposition, one might say) in which Mont Blanc is itself a component part. If we do not admit this, then we get the conclusion that we know nothing at all about Mont Blanc. 30 (Th e fi nal sentence of this passage suggests another outlook on Russellian acquaintance . Earlier I claimed that its purpose was to make an external object available to cognition. But here we see Russell looking at things from the opposite point of view. Suppose we use concept for a way of having in mind without the necessary connection to an object, like a word that we take to be a name , but without prejudice as to whether it names anything or is empty. If we start from cognition, with the nondescriptive concepts Mont Blanc and Donnellan , what is it that gives them objective content ? What separates us from a brain in a vat? Perceptual acquaintance! Th is explanation accords bett er with Russell's empiricism and anti-idealism than my earlier one.) Let us adopt Russell's terminology and speak of Russellian semantic values as the worldly objective content of a linguistic representation. Th e role of words, phrases, and sentences is to represent a certain worldly objective content . A Russellian proposition, the objective content of a declarative sentence, should be seen as a partial state of the world (perhaps not an actual one), or as Wett stein calls it, a state of aff airs . As Wett stein ( 1986 ) emphasizes, it is natural to distinguish a \"cognitive perspective\" on a state of aff airs from the state of affairs itself. 31 Th e sentence \"Mont Blanc is older than Donnellan\" represents, for Russell, a certain proposition, an object-fi lled complex involving Mont Blanc, the relation is older than, and Donnellan. 32 Th is state of aff airs obtains (the relation does, in fact, hold between its relata), so the sentence is true. 33 But there are many other sentences that represent the same state of aff airs, for example \"Mont Blanc is older than I,\" utt ered by Donnellan; \"Mont Blanc is older than you,\" utt ered to Donnellan; \"Th at mountain is older than you,\" utt ered to Donnellan while pointing at Mont Blanc; \"Th at mountain is older than he,\" utt ered while pointing fi rst at Mont Blanc and then at Donnellan. Each of these may represent a diff erent cognitive perspective on the same state of aff airs, a diff erent thought, as Frege would put it. Th ese thoughts diff er in their relata, which are diff erent (nondescriptive) ways of having Mont Blanc and Donnellan in mind. 34 If I view a certain state of aff airs as my pants being on fi re , it will prompt action in a way that viewing the same state of aff airs as that man's pants being on fi re (noticing a man in a mirror) might not. Same worldly objective content, diff erent cognitive signifi cance, diff erent action. It is natural to extend Russell's idea of objective content to thoughts, which, like A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  137  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 137 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM sentences, may also be seen as a form of representation with a worldly objective content. 35 Returning to the fi ve sentences with the same objective content, we see that direct reference theory washes out the cognitive diff erences, the ways of having in mind , and takes us directly to the worldly objective content. Th us direct reference theory has its place in the Russellian theory of worldly objective content. It is part of a theory of objective content and should not pretend to be a theory of cognitive signifi cance. 36 Even the kind of linguistic meaning I called Character (which I imprudently claimed was known to competent users) should not be confused with cognitive signifi cance. Th e Character of \"I\" is unchanging on diff erent occasions of utt erance and is always distinct from the Character of \"you.\" But an utt erance of \"I\" can have the same cognitive signifi cance as an utt erance of \"you.\" When Donnellan says, \"Mont Blanc is older than I,\" and I reiterate by saying to him, \"Mont Blanc is older than you,\" the cognitive signifi cance of his utt erance of \"I\" and my utt erance of \"you\" will likely be the same for Donnellan. And they will likely be the same for me. Here is why: I expect my utt erance of \"you\" to evoke \"He means me \" in Donnellan. When someone addresses me and uses \"you,\" I take it personally. (Th is presupposes that I realize that I am the person being addressed.) It doesn't matt er whether I am being accused of having a pain in my lower back, being younger than Mont Blanc, or being dehydrated. I always take it personally. I never understand the remark as saying \"the person being addressed is\" . . . or as saying \"David Kaplan is\" . . . or as saying \"this body is.\" . . . I always take it personally. I always understand it as saying \"I.\" . . . And I expect others to react the same way. So when I say, \"I am not!,\" and you assert, \"You are too!,\" my understanding of my utt erance directly contradicts my understanding of your utt erance. Th e cognitive signifi cance (for me) of the two utt erances is contradictory (it is not just the two objective contents that are contradictory). Th is is why I say that the cognitive signifi cance of Donnellan's utt erance of \"I\" and my utt erance of \"you\" will likely be the same for Donnellan. Th e cognitive signifi cance of the two utt erances will also likely be the same for me, for analogous reasons. Is the cognitive signifi cance of the two utt erances for Donnellan the same as the cognitive signifi cance of the two utt erances for me? Not if Frege is right about the fi rst person. In a situation like this, where we are addressing one another, Frege doesn't expect Donnellan to have himself in mind the way I have him in mind. Th at sounds plausible to me, but all matt ers of interpersonal identifi cation of cognitive states are diffi cult. Th is is a view of cognitive signifi cance that is consonant with Frege's claim in \"Th ought\" ([1918] 1997) that my utt erance of \"today\" yesterday and my utt erance of \"yesterday\" today may have the very same cognitive signifi cance, provided I have kept track of the days correctly. If I am not ( 138 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 138 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM bothering to keep track of the days, and they all seem to fade into one another, the cognitive signifi cance of \"yesterday\" might even be partially descriptive, and thus diff erent from what the cognitive signifi cance of \"today\" was yesterday. Alternatively, I may be tracking the passing days very carefully. I became acquainted with the day yesterday and expressed that way of being acquainted in my use of \"today.\" Assuming no recognition or tracking failures and no memory failures, I should be able continue to have the day in mind in the same way today, though of course I will refer to it as \"yesterday.\" 37 Here we see, once again, that the cognitive signifi cance of an utt erance should not be identifi ed with linguistic meaning. Compare the situation with \"yesterday\" and \"today\" with coming to have any individual in mind (in a certain way ) and later using diff erent linguistic devices appropriate to the occasion to express singular thoughts involving this same way of having in mind . Frege on \"yesterday\" and \"today\" is just another issue about cognitive dynamics. We need to leave linguistic meaning and turn to industrial-strength ways of having in mind to give a proper analysis of the notions in this area. 38 I am tempted to push this line of thought further, to the conclusion that those who, like myself, fi rst heard the names \"Hesperus\" and \"Phosphorus\" in a context in which we immediately learned that they named the planet Venus, have only a single way of having the planet in mind (although we have three names for it). Th is is because I already had Venus in mind, and when I was told about Hesperus and Phosphorus I immediately assimilated them to Venus. (More on this below.) If this is correct, there is really no saying whether the cognitive content of the three names is or is not the same. It will be the same for some people at some times and diff erent for some people at some times. Strangely, Russell seems to make no provision at all for cognitive signifi cance. He sounds at times as if he is worried that too much legitimacy for cognitive signifi cance will promote a slide into idealism. He even insists that propositional att itudes (believes that, desires that, fears that, wonders whether, etc.) are simply relations between thinkers and objective states of aff airs. 39 But this view faces a problem of internal coherence. Although the objective content of \"Th at man's pants are on fi re\" and \"My pants are on fi re\" will be the same on certain occasions, the objective contents of \"I believe that that man's pants are on fi re\" and \"I believe that my pants are on fi re\" may still be two, quite diff erent worldly states of aff airs. Th e diff erence between those two worldly, objective states will be the way I have myself in mind. Th is diff erence is every bit as worldly as the diff erence between having a certain belief and not having it. Frege, in a lacuna that matches Russell's in strangeness, seems to make no provision at all for worldly objective content. Frege starts off from a radically A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  139  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 139 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM diff erent place than Russell. He assumes that language is a system of representation for thought and its constituents. 40 Th e primary representational function for linguistic expressions is to stand for a Sinn , a bit of cognitive content (in Frege's special sharable sense). I don't know how one would fi nally sett le the disagreement between Russell and Frege as to the representational role of language. (I tilt toward Russell because if we make Russell's assumption that what are represented are worldly objects, the how of representation will naturally refl ect cognitive perspectives. 41 But there is a lot to be said for the view that the role of cognitive objects and states is to represent worldly objects and states. Th is suggests that Fregean semantics needs Russellian semantics. And here, I believe, Frege's theory leaves a gap. Because Frege cares about factual truth, he adds a secondary form of representation, Bedeutung, whereby elements of cognition are given worldly values. But the values he assigns are extensions. Th is jumps over Russell's worldly objective content (which, for those familiar with the terminology, is intensional ). 42 Frege's Bedeutung takes us from the cognitive representation (or indirectly from the linguistic representation) directly to the actual extension. Th us from a sentence or thought to a truth value; from a predicate or property to a set of individuals. Th ese extensions are not the entities that cognitive objects and states are meant to represent. Th e role of Fregean thoughts is certainly not to represent truth values (although Frege sometimes sounds as if he is trying to talk himself into this view). Frege's cognitive contents should be seen as representing Russell's worldly objective contents, and extension should be defi ned on the latt er. For nondescriptive cognitive representations, the Bedeutung (extension) and the objective content coincide, which may lead one to confuse the two notions. But even in the case of nondescriptive representations, Bedeutung and objective content function diff erently. Fregean nondescriptive modes of representation (like my ways of having in mind ) are surely rigid. A perceptual representation of Ortcutt could not perceptually present another guy. Keep in mind that we have assumed that perception presents its object nondescriptively, that is, not as the individual I am now perceiving immediately in fr ont of me nor as the individual who looks like this . 43 Th e fact that nondescriptive representations are typically rigid is captured by Russell's notion but not by Frege's. Russellian objective contents, not extensions, are the locus of modality. Th e diff erence between Bedeutung and objective content is also easily seen for descriptive representations and for certain predicates. For descriptions, Frege's way of reaching out to the world, through Bedeutung , would lead one to think, quite wrongly, that the worldly content of a defi nite description is an individual. But it is not; it is, as Russell saw, a complex of properties and relations. 44 In an analogous case, Russell complains that a truth value (the extension of a sentence) is no part of the meaning of a sentence. ( 140 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 140 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM For predicates, consider a common noun that stands for a natural kind. Presumably there are many diff erent ways to have such an empirical entity in mind. Remember the three blind men and their perceptual acquaintance with the elephant. Imagine a single blind man with three such perceptual encounters with an elephant. He will not recognize the beast. He will not even recognize a common kind of beast. At the level of Sinn , this blind man has three diff erent Sinne , three diff erent ways of thinking about elephants. 45 At the level of Bedeutung , there is the set of all (actual) elephants that is the common Bedeutung for all three Sinne . But the natural kind Elephantidae , which is Russell's worldly objective content, has disappeared from view. Th e possibility that elephants may become extinct has neither to do with cognitive content nor with a set of actual animals. It is notable that Russell, who was interested in representation, not modality, developed a semantics so well att uned to modal distinctions. I agree with Frege that something like cognitive signifi cance is required to individuate thoughts. But Russellian objective contents are the locus of modality, temporality, and truth. I can wonder whether the man drinking a martini is the man who greeted us in the doorway because I don't know whether he is or not. But if I claim that he might not be, my claim will be false. Th e thought Th e man drinking a martini is the man who greeted us in the doorway is true. Indeed this thought is (or represents) a necessary truth, in virtue of its objective content, which does have the form of the law of identity. But neither the sentence nor the thought is a logical truth, a truth of reason . Reason and rationality do not operate at the level of objective content. Th ey operate at the level of the representation. (Th is alone should be an adequate reason to consider diff erences in the way objects are represented a part of the theory of meaning.) 46 So here are two theories of linguistic representation: a theory of objective content and a theory of cognitive signifi cance. Which one is \"semantics\"? I have contrasted Russell's and Frege's semantics in terms of the representational role that each sought in language. Th is was to emphasize the fact that they were pursuing diff erent projects, and even made use of distinct ontologies. Th e problem with taking Russellian propositions to be the objects of propositional att itudes is not that they aren't fi ne-grained enough. It is that they are not meant to be thoughts; they are meant to be the worldly objects and states that thoughts represent. And the reason the Babylonians could rationally believe that Phosphorus was seen in the morning but Hesperus wasn't is not because rational people can believe contradictory thoughts. And it isn't because the cognitive signifi cance of a name is always descriptive. It is because thoughts aren't meant to be objective states of the world. Th e Babylonian's were entertaining non contradictory thoughts that cannot both be true because they represent contradictory objective states of the world. A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  141  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 141 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM Separating the theory of objective content from the theory of cognitive signifi cance, if, in the end, that seems appropriate, does not imply that a systematic theory of cognitive signifi cance has nothing to contribute to investigations traditionally thought to be semantic. Cognitive signifi cance is not foreign to semantics. For the maximum explanatory power, our semantic theory should countenance cognitive content, objective content, and extensions. Let us now return to Donnellan's claim that pure reference fl ows from having in mind . Did he really think that the individual itself was a constituent of the thought? Well, what he says is that the individual is a constituent of what is said when using a description referentially. So did he think that the individual was a constituent of the objective content of the thought? For this to be the case would require that the cognitive constituent be nondescriptive, and you will recall that for many readers of Frege, nondescriptive modes of representation seemed highly problematic. Th is, I think, is exactly the issue that Donnellan was addressing. His claim was that when one has an individual in mind (in his sense), the cognitive constituent is nondescriptive, and thus the objective content is the individual pure and simple. Th e existence of nondescriptive modes of representation may continue to be controversial, but I think Donnellan correct. Russell's view could be described from this perspective as follows: Acquaintance provides one with a nondescriptive cognitive representation whose objective content is the individual itself. If one then associates a name of that individual with this representation, it becomes, in the user's mouth, a genuine name. BACK TO DONNELLAN, RUSSELL, AND FREGE Frege needs ostensive modes of determination, the nondescriptive representations in thought of robust Russellian acquaintance. (He also needs Russellian objective contents, but that's another matt er.) And both Russell and Donnellan need Frege's ways of being acquainted or having in mind . One may speculate that Frege dropped the ostensive modes of determination in part because he wanted his sharable Sinne to determine their reference by the intrinsic properties of the Sinn -the way defi nite descriptions seem to do-rather than by their extrinsic properties, the way ostensive modes of determination must. He may also have worried that ostensive modes of determination weren't plausibly public or complete, and therefore, by Frege's lights, not shareable. 47 Th is completes my Fregean critique of both Russell and Donnellan (and my Russellian critique of Frege). Th ough I have tried to show that Donnellan's ( 142 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 142 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM idea of having in mind is coordinate with Russell's idea of acquaintance , there is a diff erence, an important diff erence. DONNELLAN DEPARTS FROM RUSSELL Donnellan once said to me that he could imagine the name \"Aristotle\" having been fi rst introduced in the Middle Ages by scholars who previously had used only defi nite descriptions to write and speak about Aristotle. According to Donnellan, these scholars may well have had Aristotle in mind, and through their conversations, through the referential use of defi nite descriptions and other devices, passed the epistemic state of having Aristotle in mind from one to another. Th us they were properly situated from an epistemic point of view to be able to introduce a proper name, and one that subsequent users could use referentially, as a genuine name. Th ey would know the truths (or falsehoods) that were expressed (not just know that the sentences expressed truths or falsehoods). Th is conversation with Donnellan probably took place in the late 1970s or early 1980s. To my knowledge he has never published anything about it, though Geach ( 1969 , 288–89) introduces a notion he calls \"mediated acquaintance\" that may be just what Donnellan was talking about. 48 In any case, the topic seems so interesting and important that I am taking it up. Donnellan's idea is a striking departure from Russell's notion of acquaintance. Russell would have, and should have, strongly rejected such a notion as incoherent with his epistemology. It strikes at the heart of his ideas about knowledge by acquaintance and knowledge by description. 49 It appears to directly violate his dictum that any knowledge (\"of things\") that depends on inferences or the acceptance of truths must be knowledge by description. Some form of acceptance of truths, that there was such a person, seems a prerequisite for Donnellan's story. 50 Presumably if the medieval scholars had not accepted what they were being told as true, if, for example, they thought they were being lied to by their senior colleagues, no having in mind would pass. Th is is how we do react when people tell fantastic stories about being abducted by space aliens. In Russell's original example, if Smith had said to Russell, \"Wait till you meet my wife, you will fi nd her very interesting. She's a physician,\" this still would not have acquainted Russell with Smith's wife. He would still, according to Russell, have knowledge about her only by description. Th e fact that Smith, who presumably was acquainted with his wife, had his wife in mind at the time would have cut no ice with Russell. So for Russell, there is no transmission of acquaintance / having in mind . But I have come to think that Donnellan is right, that having in mind can be transmitt ed, and even that it is transmitt ed when Smith tells Russell A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  143  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 143 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM about his wife. 51 Having in mind may be the functional equivalent of Russellian acquaintance for certain purposes, but it is not Russellian acquaintance since Russellian acquaintance, plainly, cannot be transmitt ed. It may be that we have not understood the importance of the transmission of having in mind because we, and Donnellan himself, have been too focused on the epistemic requirements for the initial step. SIDEBAR ON THE INITIATION OF HAVING IN MIND Are there constraints on how an individual must be given to one who initiates a having in mind chain? I will mention three views, though there are others and many varieties of the three. 52 Pure Russellianism : As we have seen from the \"Neptune\" case, Donnellan was insistent that one could not introduce a genuine name, that is, a name that was referential, merely by fi xing its reference on the basis of an arbitrary defi nite description (unless, of course, the description was already being used referentially). If the name is introduced by ostension, as is oft en assumed, the name introducer will be acquainted (in the Russellian sense) with the name bearer, and thus can have the name bearer in mind, in Donnellan's sense. In this case a genuine name will be introduced. Donnellan seems to want the initial step to require something like Russellian acquaintance. Causal Russellianism : Others would allow evidence cases as initial steps. Surveying the eff ects of an individual's causal agency-at fi rst the footprint, then the broken lock-we hypothesize the existence of the individual, whom we hold in mind as we build a mental picture, piece by piece, from his causal residue. 53 Here we may have Pure Russellian acquaintance with the causal eff ects, for which we postulate a cause. It is not required that we be directly acquainted with the eff ects; we need only have them in mind and (correctly) postulate some sort of causal origin. Th is process plainly involves reasoning and the acceptance of truths. 54 Th is standard would encompass Le Verrier's relation to Neptune. It would also encompass a reader's relation to the author. Donnellan did not share the view of the Causal Russellians; he considered the descriptions used in such cases to be att ributive. As noted, Donnellan's paradigms for the referential use of a description are cases in which the speaker has the intended referent in mind prior to the formation of the description and in a way that is independent of the description used. In contrast, in these causal cases, what we have in mind seems to remain descriptive. When I notice that my computer has been ripped from its mooring and is missing, my way of thinking about the person who stole ( 144 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 144 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM my computer is as \"the person who stole my computer.\" Th ere seems no room here for mischaracterization, nothing to trump the object described. But suppose we go looking for the brigand, succeed in fi nding him, and it turns out that, unbeknown to either of us, he has an ownership right in the computer, so it wasn't actually a theft or (on the basis of some even more fantastic scenario) it isn't actually a computer. We did fi nd the person we were looking for, but we had drawn some wrong conclusions from the evidence and so we mischaracterized him. Th ere is oft en a kind of looseness, a post hoc adaptability, in such descriptions that allows for some mischaracterization. Th is looseness is not characteristic of all uses of descriptions. If you bet me that the next computer we see will not be a computer but a very computer-like table lamp, you can't win no matt er what we see. And the shortest spy couldn't turn out to actually be not quite as short as another spy. Th is looseness may suggest that the Causal Russellians are right, that we are able to have the cause in mind in a nondescriptive way. If we do, it would account for the looseness and would provide enough independence to qualify as a referential use. It is natural to think that in evidence cases we don't have causes in mind in quite the manner in which we have the eff ects in mind. It is one thing to read the book and think about the author, and another to meet the author. It is even one thing to be told about the book and another to be told about the author. Still, we do seem to stand in a special epistemic relation to the causes. Th ey have spoken to us; they have impinged on us. We are on their trail, or at least in their wake, and our connection with them is diff erent from our connection with the many individuals for which we could dream up a description (like the shortest spy). Perhaps there is a kind of singular thought based on this kind of awareness of an individual that is not quite the singular thought based on the kind of having in mind that Donnellan invokes. Th is would be a compromise with the Causal Russellians (one that I will not pursue). I want to dispose of one argument against the Causal Russellians. Th e claim that a reader can have the author in mind does not imply that he cannot also wonder whether the author is Sir Walter Scott , and in that sense, fail to know who the author is. Even a Pure Russellian can glimpse a colleague entering an elevator or see him in the distance and, in that sense, fail to know who he is. Th ere is no incompatibility between not knowing who x is, understood in a natural sense, and having x in mind. Referential Conversion : Th is is a radically anti-Russellian view that ascribes to all of us the ability to simply convert an arbitrary piece of knowledge by description to a state in which we hold the described individual in mind in a nondescriptive way. 55 Strawson seems to have held something like this radically anti-Russellian view as early as 1950. In \"On Referring\" he A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  145  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 145 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM claims that in sentences with a defi nite description as subject, the defi nite description is a referring expression , not just in the sense of being a singular term, but seemingly also in the sense that the assertion one makes in using the sentence contains the denotation of the defi nite description as a constituent and does not involve the descriptive conditions, which are relegated to presuppositional status. (It is hard to see what else might serve as the assertion once the descriptive conditions are made presuppositional.) Th is assertion is precisely the proposition that Russell claimed we could only describe, not entertain, without acquaintance. 56 It is also the assertion that Russell denied we could make when he explained that we could have only descriptive knowledge about an individual with whom we were not acquainted. Strawson's leap is almost breathtaking in its audacity, at least from a Russellian point of view-as it was surely intended to be. Strawson seems to have been the fi rst person to emphasize the use of a defi nite description in a way akin to what Kripke calls fi xing a reference . 57 Like Kripke, he set no epistemic condition, such as Russellian acquaintance (or near acquaintance), for a reference-fi xing use; nor did he require that the speaker have the object in mind in any way other than that given by the defi nite description. Nor did he argue from special properties of proper names, such as rigidity, since proper names play no role at all in his discussion of this use of a defi nite description. 58 On the contrary, he thought this the natural use of defi nite descriptions when they appear in subject position. He called it the referring use of a defi nite description and berated Russell for not recognizing it. 59 One could imagine a compromise between the Strawsonians and the Russellians according to which one could make a referring use, in Strawson's sense, only of certain defi nite descriptions, defi nite descriptions that in some sense encapsulate one of the varieties of Russellian acquaintance, for example, what I call evidence cases , those countenanced by the Causal Russellians, \"the person whose fi ngerprints are on the jewel case.\" 60 Not wanting to allow that we can entertain singular thoughts about the fi rst child to be born in the twenty-second century (aka \"Newman 1\"), I once held a view of this kind myself (Kaplan 1968 ). Th e general view of Referential Conversion-that an arbitrary defi nite description can be converted- may confound a mental state with a genuine epistemic state. I can obsess about Newman 1 and make her a central character of my mental life. My thought about her may have more vivacity than my thought about dimly remembered acquaintances. But I do not have knowledge of her. 61 I appreciate the seriousness of the disputants on the issue of the initiation of having in mind , having held confl icting views on the matt er myself. 62 But methodologically, I want to separate my focal issue, the transmission of having in mind , from the independent issue of its initiation . For me, ( 146 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 146 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM Donnellan's notion of having in mind is taken as an intuitively understood primitive. And speculation about how it might be initiated is part of the diff erent theories of having in mind . Of course if one doesn't believe that having in mind can be initiated by, say, Causal Russellianism, one won't believe in certain cases that there is any having in mind to be transmitt ed. So we have to assume that having in mind has been initiated in some way or other. Given that assumption, what I will argue for is the plausibility and ease of transmission. THE TRANSMISSION OF HAVING IN MIND So long as a touch of Russellian acquaintance remains in our standard for initiating a chain of singular thought, whether it is a chain of transmission of having in mind or a chain of use of a proper name, many of the ultimate participants in the chain will surely lack Russellian acquaintance with the individual in question. Th is fact set Donnellan to wonder what puts the ultimate name user in the requisite epistemic position to refer to the name bearer. . . . Why, if indeed it is true, is one in a position to assert and know de re things about an entity when the entity becomes (in the right way) a part of the history of one's use of the name? What does that accomplish that allows for this possibility? But perhaps this is a misconceived question. Perhaps the only answer is that that is just when we do ascribe de re propositional att itudes. Perhaps the only task we can perform is . . . to make sure that we have spelled out as exactly as possible the conditions under which such att itudes are correctly ascribed. (Donnellan 1979 , fi nal paragraph) An alternative answer is to spell out as exactly as possible the conditions under which having in mind is transmitt ed. I think that these conditions will turn out to be much less stringent than those working in the Russellian tradition have thought (since they have generally thought that it could not be transmitt ed). Perhaps Donnellan had been thinking about such an alternative answer when we had our conversation. Before the present refl ections on my conversation with Donnellan about the medievals being able to have Aristotle in mind without having a name for him, I had argued that it was through names that we were able to have someone in mind with whom we were not acquainted. I thought that my ability to think and talk about Aristotle arose basically from the transmission of the name \"Aristotle\" into my vocabulary. It was in this way that I saw language as what enabled me to think about Aristotle while a nonlinguistic animal living today could not. 63 Although these views were formulated aft er A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  147  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 147 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM my conversation with Donnellan, what struck me at the time of the conversation was that if Donnellan were correct, and the name could have been introduced by the medievals, we would not be able to track \"Aristotle\" back to Aristotle. Th is troubled me. Now, aft er further refl ection, I think it obvious that names are an inessential artifact for having and holding an individual in mind. Helpful, but inessential. I still think that language is what gives me my comparative advantage over our dog (at least when it comes to thinking about Aristotle). But it is not because his name can be transmitt ed to me; it is because I can be told about him. 64 Consider a language that has no names, or one in which for, say, theological reasons, one is reluctant to use a name. 65 Would it be impossible to entertain singular thoughts about revered ancestors? To wish for or even expect their return? To pray to or for them? We may not have had the pleasure of their acquaintance, but we have Geachean mediated acquaintance with them. As the discourse referents people have noted, we can keep in mind an individual who is mentioned in a conversation and track anaphoric references to that individual through a discourse even though the individual's name, if the individual even has a name, is never mentioned or used. 66 Furthermore, we can retell the story about that individual and even elaborate on it, ask questions about the individual, or give commands to take certain actions with regard to the individual. Th ose commanded will have to keep the individual in mind in planning their actions. All this can happen in a name-free environment. Language is what enables me to think about Aristotle, but it isn't the presence of names that does it, it's the ability to transmit a having in mind , it's your ability to understand that in my discourse I have told you about a certain individual, an individual that you can then talk about, speculate about, or question me about. You will recall that I said that when Smith tells Russell about his wife, Smith's own acquaintance with his wife should cut no ice for Russell. But I now think that Smith has passed the ability to have her in mind. Of course the conversation doesn't \"acquaint\" Russell with her (in Russell's sense). Russell is right about that. His relation to her is through Smith; it is mediated by his acquaintance with Smith. Russell is only vicariously acquainted with her. Still, the more Smith tells Russell about her, the more fi rmly embedded Russell's having her in mind seems to become. And when Smith fi nally whispers to Russell, \"You know, we're not really married,\" it is only Russell's moral sensibility, not his cognitive state, that is shatt ered. 67 Cognitively, Russell will take the correction in stride, a feat that would have been impossible had he known her only \"by description\" as \"Smith's wife.\" 68 Once Russell has her in mind in a nondescriptive way, he can fairly freely ( 148 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 148 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM att ach and detach properties as new information comes his way. But he would not have been able to detach the property is married to Smith from the denoting complex Smith's wife . Th e example of Smith's wife is to illustrate a point: In many typical scenarios that Russell would describe as our obtaining knowledge by description, what is really going on is transmission of having in mind . What this has come down to for me is that there are two ways to come to have someone in mind. Th e fi rst way is to do it on our own. Russell's way, by perceptual (or \"direct\") acquaintance with the individual, is the most prominent way of doing it on our own. A second way, the one I am advocating for here, is being told about the individual, told, among other things, that there is such an individual. Th at's how having Aristotle in mind passed down to the imagined medievals. Th is passage of having in mind seems much more fundamental than the passage of names. Th e diff erence, so important to Russell, between a chain of communication initiated by Pure Russellian acquaintance and one initiated by a Causal Russellianism, as in the Neptune case, seems to matt er litt le to the transmission of having in mind . If the police report on good evidence that a madman is loose and has been committ ing gruesome murders, I will respond cognitively the same way whether they have glimpsed this madman or only seen his victims. Perhaps their having glimpsed him makes all the diff erence epistemically, but I don't see why it should. Reports of this kind, about serial killers, are not rare. And having a nom de crime for the killer doesn't seem to make much diff erence to us cognitively, again undercutt ing the importance I once att ached to the introduction of a name. Th ere are those who argue that we can obtain knowledge of truths , knowledge that P , by hearsay testimony. 69 Donnellan's idea might be characterized by saying that we can obtain knowledge of things by hearsay testimony. I now think that the reason proper names mediate singular thoughts is that in the paradigm cases of name giving, the name giver has the individual in mind, and when we \"receive\" a proper name for the fi rst time, it typically comes with an explicit or implicit being told about the individual. 70 Note that I do not require that the name giver be acquainted with the individual, only that he has the individual in mind. Th is is in line with my methodology of separating my focal issue, the transmission of having in mind , from the independent issue of the initiation of having in mind . When we transmit having in mind , we sometimes transmit a name, but sometimes we don't. Many of the things we have in mind have no names (that pothole where I always turn onto Amalfi Drive), and we think and talk freely about individuals who have names but whose names we do not know. Th ere is that Navy SEAL who shot Bin Laden. I don't see how knowing that his A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  149  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 149 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM buddies all called him \"Bear\" would make a diff erence to my ability to think about him, to have him in mind. In the past, I had the relation between names and having in mind backward. Th e name rides on the having in mind , not the reverse. 71 Th e idea that one can come to have an individual in mind by being told about the individual has come to seem more natural to me as I age. I don't travel as much as I used to, when I was out there perceiving new individuals right and left . I depend more and more on vicarious experience, which is usually safer (and oft en more enlightening) than when I was racing around to check things out for myself. I read the newspapers, check the Internet, watch television news, and talk, through email, with many friends. I have a lot of new individuals in mind through that route. Th ere is that guy who left the Republican Party to run for the Senate on his own, but then lost to the offi cial Republican nominee. He was the governor of some southern state. I know a lot about him. I even know his name, but I can't think of it at the moment. Th ere is a particular person whom I have in mind, and I'm trying to think of his name. But, as is so oft en the case nowadays, I'm not succeeding. We began with Donnellan's speculation that the medievals, even if they had no name for Aristotle, would have been able to have Aristotle in mind and to transmit the epistemic state of having Aristotle in mind through the referential use of defi nite descriptions and other devices. 72 Just to keep things straight, Donnellan's classic case \"Who is the man drinking the martini?\" is not a case of transmission of having in mind by being told about an individual. Donnellan does talk about communicative aims in this case, but he isn't communicating the having in mind by telling about ; he is doing it by calling his friend's att ention to a particular, perceptually available individual. Th e having in mind in the friend is accomplished by good old, do-it-yourself Russellian acquaintance, just as it was for the speaker. Most of Donnellan's cases seem to be of this kind. 73 MY INSPIRING TEACHER Within the Donnellan tradition, the kind of having in mind that I have been exploring is what is required as a source for a referential intention, the intention required for a referential use of a defi nite description. I also take having in mind as suffi cient (and perhaps necessary) for what I have called a singular thought. Imagine the following dialogue: \"I had an inspiring logic teacher at UCLA,\" I announce. \"I'd like to meet him,\" you assert. \"Is he still in L.A.?\" you ask. \"If so, please call him and arrange for us to meet,\" you politely, conditionally command. ( 150 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 150 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM If a test of having in mind is its ability to enable a referential use of a definite description, then the preceding dialogue gives us an example of the transmission of having in mind . \"Have you had a chance to call the inspiring math professor you told me about?\" you ask (mischaracterizing my logic teacher). I think Donnellan should and would regard this as a prime case of the referential use of a defi nite description. 74 Note that when you meet my teacher, you will certainly be able to say, as Donnellan demands for having in mind , \"You are the person I've looked forward to meeting for the past two weeks.\" Although I have used a mischaracterization to exemplify a referential use, the essence of a referential use is the referential intention enabled by a prior having in mind . It is certainly not required that the description mischaracterize the referent in order for the use to be referential, as Donnellan indicates in his case of the referential use of \"the murderer.\" As Donnellan notes, the focus on mischaracterizations is primarily to eliminate the likelihood that the use is att ributive. If we are prepared to say, as seems natural, that in your questions, assertions, and commands about my logic teacher you have in mind the person I was speaking of, then having in mind transmission may be easier to pull off than some of us have thought. Let me conclude my argument for the transmission of having in mind by making a comparative argument. Few would deny that full television coverage of a trial, including fi lm of the judge and the accused, enables singular thought about those participants. 75 But then, I claim, a newspaper account from a reporter and a sketch artist (as we oft en do get for courtroom events) should do likewise. In one case we have information in the form of images and sound stored in a physical medium and then reproduced. In the other we have information, including images and sound, stored in human memory and then reproduced. One might resist this step by insisting on the vastly greater confi dence we have in the veridicality of the camera. \"Pictures don't lie.\" However, in the age of Photoshop and Industrial Light and Magic, this proverb no longer rings true. When we take a picture at face value we must presuppose the honesty of the photographer and others involved in the processing of the image, just as we presuppose the honesty of journalists when we take newspaper accounts of events at face value. It may be argued that the video would allow us to recognize the participants, whereas the verbal report (without the sketches) would not. But the report may include identifying biographical facts that are not apparent to visual inspection (that she donated one of her kidneys to her sister), and so provide a sounder basis for identifi cation than a visual image. Reading the report and viewing the sketches certainly puts us one \"mediator\" away from Russellian acquaintance. But, as I have argued, viewing the video also puts a mediator, whose A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  151  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 151 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM integrity we must assume, between us and the trial participants. And if we once take the fi rst step, what reason is there not to iterate and accept the transmission of having in mind through a biography writt en by a conscientious biographer who consulted contemporaneous newspaper accounts and records? In this way, it should be seen that a chain of tellings is subject, in principle, to the same kinds of preservation and degradation as a chain of video reproductions would be. BLIND DESCRIPTIONS Th ere is an important kind of description (really a use of a description) that I call a blind description , a description for which you know, or at least are confi dent, that it is uniquely satisfi ed, but a description that does not evoke any individual with which you are epistemically connected, thus a description that does not evoke an individual with which you are acquainted or have been told about or in whose causal wake you lie (\"the fi rst child to be born in the twenty-second century,\" \"the shortest spy,\" \"the tallest living woman,\" \"the next Republican nominee for president,\" 76 \"the oldest ancient artifact still undiscovered aft er thousands of years\"). We may be told that there will be a next Republican candidate and that he will be a man and a conservative. But such tellings do not involve having in mind transmission, 77 and, more important, we don't take them as if they do. One of Donnellan's most important insights, independent of the actual intentions of the speaker, is that we hear defi nite descriptions in two diff erent ways: usually, I believe, as an expression of having in mind , thus referentially, but sometimes as blind. I take the deployment of blind description as a usage that is relatively rare but important in forward-looking (and certain other) situations. I don't rule out cases in which a description is used referentially but heard as blind (or vice versa). Blind uses of descriptions are not merely att ributive uses. Th ey are the paradigm of att ributive use, the most att ributive of the att ributives. Donnellan regards the descriptions generated by evidence cases (\"the cause of the perturbations,\" \"the person who stole my computer\") as att ributive, and he may be right since they do not quite fi t his paradigm for referential use. But evidence cases are not blind. In using such descriptions we signal an epistemic connection with the denotation that is not present in blind uses. And, as noted, there is some wiggle room for mischaracterization. 78 I contrast blind uses of descriptions with those that are directed. Th is is not meant to be an exhaustive classifi cation; uses of descriptions that one does not hear as satisfying the usual presuppositional requirements are neither blind nor directed. 79 Whether one regards all directed descriptions as referential depends, ( 152 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 152 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM in part, on one's views about the initiation and transmission of having in mind . Th e notion of a blind use of defi nite descriptions is meant to be neutral regarding those issues. Th e distinction, such as it is, between blind and directed defi nite descriptions applies also to indefi nite descriptions. Th e indefi nite in \"A student stole my lunch\" is directed (it's an evidence case); whereas the indefi nite in \"A student will speak, if the instructor remains silent long enough\" seems blind. 80 Although some linguists claim that it is infelicitous to use a defi nite description if the individual (so given) is \"unfamiliar\" to the audience, it seems that no foundation needs to be laid for the felicitous use of a blind description. 81 Blind descriptions are important because Russell took them to be typical of the mainstream use of defi nite descriptions. In contrast, I believe that most uses of defi nite descriptions are not blind. (And not only our uses but also the way we hear defi nite descriptions used by others.) Russell might be said to have taken blind uses as the only use of defi nite descriptions. In his discussions of the use of names and descriptions, he seems intent on ignoring any epistemic relations other than direct acquaintance. 82 \"On Denoting\" off ers an analysis of the semantics of blind descriptions. Donnellan treated blind descriptions as att ributive uses , but did not distinguish blind descriptions from other nonreferential uses (nor need he have). 83 I claim that most uses of defi nite descriptions are intended to pick out something that we are acquainted with or that we have already been told about, something that we have in mind (even if we exclude evidence cases). 84 Nonfi ction writers tend to write about what (and whom) they know, and we hear them as telling us about individuals they have in mind. Not every description we use denotes something we have been told about or have in mind in some other way, but I believe that most of them do. In Donnellan's terms, the preponderant use of defi nite descriptions is referential. 85 (In assessing this claim, keep in mind the fact, argued for earlier, that having an individual in mind is compatible with not knowing who the individual is.) My disagreement with Russell is probably due to the fact that I believe that having in mind is much more widely distributed than he does. Th e question of which use of descriptions is preponderant should, I believe, aff ect how we think about what belongs to the common, conventionalized meanings that we call semantic. Consider the use of demonstrative gestures associated with the demonstrative \"this.\" Usually, what Frege calls \"the pointing of fi ngers\" is guided by perceptual acquaintance. And so we (or many of us) are inclined to give weight to the speaker's intentions in determining the referent when a demonstrative is used conventionally. But there are also blind uses of a demonstrative, as when a blindfolded offi cial A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  153  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 153 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM picks a ball from an urn fi lled with numbered balls and announces, \"Th is shows the winning number.\" If the latt er were the preponderant use of \"this\" and the perception-guided uses were considered to be deviant, peeking cases, we would, I believe, have a diff erent view of the semantics of demonstratives. WAYS AND PATHS Finally, I want to go back to my ways of having an individual in mind and the individuation of such ways interpersonally and intrapersonally, especially when one has been told about an individual that the speaker has in mind. Suppose I go home and tell my wife about our encounter with the man with a martini glass. (To fi ll out this scenario, let's put aside the encounter at the entryway and suppose that you answered my question \"Who is the man drinking a martini?\" in an informative way.) It is the thesis of this paper that she can, and probably will, thereby come to have the man in mind. 86 Since I still subscribe to my old slogan, \"No Mentation without Representation!,\" I think that he will be represented by some element of her cognition. It is this element of cognition that determines (in the sense of leads to ) the referent. It does this by way of its origin, by way of a particular descending path through a network of tellings about , a path that ideally is ultimately grounded in an event involving a more fundamental epistemological relation such as some form of Russellian acquaintance. I do not rule out cases in which the path is blocked (in the sense of Donnellan 1974 ) by a lie or a story made up from whole cloth. But in this case we know that the path is properly grounded. If my wife thinks she recognizes the man (\"Oh, that must have been Janet's husband. I'm surprised he was drinking in public\"), she will just assimilate the individual she is being told about to the individual she already has in mind and associate the new information with her old representation. It is an important fact that we oft en do recognize individuals we are told about. Otherwise our minds would be clutt ered with an even greater welter of singular thoughts. 87 If my wife doesn't think she recognizes the man, then she will create a new representation. In what way will she think of him if she doesn't recognize him? Will she think of him as the man drinking a martini ? Almost certainly not. I might not have mentioned martinis. What I have called the ways of having an individual in mind are essentially nondescriptive, though they may form the center of a cluster of descriptive material. 88 Th ere may be diff erent ways of having the same individual in mind that are diff erentiated only by their occasion of formation. I have Ortcutt in mind in a certain way , ( 154 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 154 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM but the way is not as the man drinking a martini . Th at's just a description that I (mistakenly) believe true of the individual I have in mind. It isn't essential to the very grasp I have of him. It is assumed in all of Donnellan's scenarios of referential use that we can have an individual in mind in a way that is independent of the description that we use to refer to it. Generally speaking, when a speaker has someone in mind and refers to that individual through referential uses of defi nite descriptions, the speaker will use diff erent descriptions on diff erent occasions. Th e description used is shaped to the occasion and the situation of the person addressed. If you or I recognize \"the man drinking a martini\" on another occasion when no one would take him to be drinking a martini, we will not use \"the man drinking a martini\" to refer to him. In the cases I have presented, both you and I have Ortcutt in mind through perception (and memory) in two diff erent ways corresponding to the two diff erent occasions on which we perceived him. Th ere may be properties that are essential to the ways we have him in mind, but martini drinking and doorway greetings are not among them. So do the diff erent ways of having the same individual in mind correspond to paths that are grounded by diff erent events (for example, the two perceptual events that grounded our two ways of having Ortcutt in mind)? It would be nice if things were that simple, but they aren't. I earlier suggested that for you to understand me when I ask you to invite Ortcutt to join us, your representations should \"correspond\" to mine. We each have Ortcutt in mind in two ways . What is it for the two ways in which we each have Ortcutt in mind to be synched up in such a correspondence? Th e example of Doorway Man and Martini Man, where there were only two (shared) grounding events, may have suggested that it is being on the same path. But it isn't. You might have arrived well before me but had the same kind of experience with Ortcutt at the entrance that I did. Th e grounding events of acquaintance would have occurred at diff erent times and thus will have been distinct events. Also, you might not have noticed Ortcutt , standing there with the martini glass, until I called your att ention to him. Again, my grounding perceptual event may have occurred long before yours. In this scenario, our four ways of having Ortcutt in mind are all on diff erent paths. But they are coordinated pairwise. What is it that makes for such coordination? I don't know. Th e fact that we each have two ways of having a particular x in mind doesn't suffi ce for communication. We need to be in synch. It is very hard to say what this interpersonal coordination amounts to, but it is not that we are on the same path, nor that we are on paths grounded in the same event. Even in the easier case of intrapersonal ways of having in mind , we cannot identify distinct ways with paths that are grounded by distinct events. We have already seen one case (my wife recognizing Ortcutt ) in which recognition A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  155  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 155 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM and assimilation allow paths grounded in diff erent events to yield a single way of having in mind . Others are easily generated. I believe that I have each member of my immediate family in mind in only one way, although I have had thousands of sightings of each of them and thousands of occasions of being told about them. But I recognize them by sight and in the tellings, and I immediately assimilate them to the original way of having in mind . So despite the many paths to many grounding events, few new ways of having in mind are retained. 89 It can also happen that paths to a single grounding event may lead to distinct ways of having in mind . Suppose that long aft er I told my wife about \"the man drinking a martini\" you or I tell my wife another story about him. (He turned out to be quite an interesting character.) I have forgott en that I already told her one story about him (and you never knew that I told her about him), and she fails to recognize that it is the same man. (Who would think that the star bugle player who wakes the troops every morning would also lead evening prayers at the Magen David Synagogue?) She may even remember the fi rst report and think, \"All those interesting people at that party-I'm sorry I missed it.\" She will come to have a new representation of Ortcutt , a second way of having him in mind. But both of the paths involved are grounded in the same event. Th e fact that my wife takes it that I have told her about two diff erent people shows that she has misunderstood what I told her. If she had understood, she would have quickly concluded that there is a bugle player who leads prayers. But her failure to recognize the bugle player in the second story blocks her from making the inference. And when she declares that the bugle player has the property F and separately that the prayer leader has the property G, I will misunderstand her to believe that someone is both F and G. She and I are out of synch, and the misunderstandings are mutual. Our cognitive perspectives on the objective content of our utt erances are not coordinated. She may come to wonder whether the individuals that she has in mind in these two ways are one (\"Is that he?\") in the way that Russell wondered about Scott seen in the distance (\"Is that Scott ?\"). Like Russell, my wife is entertaining a singular thought. But it may be impossible for me to understand (in a certain sense) and represent what she is wondering about. Th is is understanding in the sense that those who understand another's thoughts can share or at least represent the other's thoughts in a way that translates them into their own. Translational understanding is what is expressed by our usual de dicto propositional att itude talk. Such translations are impossible if one of the persons has an individual in mind in more ways than the other. You can't translate one representation of an individual into two, nor two into one. However, there is another sense of understanding in which one surveys another's thought fr om above , noting, from one's own ( 156 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 156 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM point of view, failures to recognize and assimilate as well as misrecognitions leading to confl ations. Understanding from above should enable explanations of behavior and reasoning even in cases where translational understanding is blocked. Consider an observer who knew-or believed he knew-the whole story: that aft er seeing Ortcutt in the doorway we had failed to recognize him when we saw him holding the martini glass, and so we had him in mind in two diff erent ways . Th is observer might be said to understand what I said. I have called this latt er way of understanding description fr om above . In this sense, the observer could understand our state of mind and explain our behavior. He would characterize us as having failed to recognize the same individual when we saw him the second time. Similarly, if we were persuaded that we knew the whole story-that the observer had wrongly confl ated two individuals, and so had a single way of having two diff erent individuals in mind-we could understand him by description from above. We would characterize him as having confused the man drinking a martini with the man who greeted us at the doorway. So this sense of understanding by description from above is independent of whether the subject's thought corresponds to reality. To return to the bugler and the prayer leader. Because my wife and I are out of synch in this area, it may be impossible for me to understand my wife's thought by translation. Let me put it this way: Th ere is no translation that captures what the description from above captures: both the fact that her thought is singular and the good explanations of behavior and of her reasoning. 90 It seems that the number of ways in which one has a given individual in mind depends on recognition (and assimilation) versus failure to recognize and misrecognition. Th ese mental events are independent of the external paths and their groundings, the realities of reference. 91 Interpersonal synching also seems to be dependent on a kind of mutual recognition. It is striking that failures in the recognition of things are so much more disruptive to the framework in which we ordinarily understand (and talk about) one another's thought than failures in the att ribution of properties. Th e latt er is the kind of error the framework seems designed to accommodate. I think of these two kinds of errors as Russell did, as mistakes in our knowledge of things and mistakes in our knowledge of truths . I take Russell's talk of knowledge of things seriously, and think that in spite of all the work on reference, issues concerning the transmission and coordination of our knowledge of things have been understudied. I read Kripke's \"A Puzzle about Belief \" (1979) as a contribution to this study (though I don't know if he intended it that way). At the time of the lectures that included my \"Words\" (1986), I argued that Peter had made a \"linguistic mistake\" when he misidentifi ed (failed to A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  157  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 157 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM recognize) a second occurrence of the same word and added a bogus name to his lexicon. What was said to him implied that some politicians are musical. But he misunderstood it. It is as if he had failed to track anaphoric pronouns correctly. His misunderstanding was due to a failure to disambiguate all occurrences of the generic name \"Paderewski\" correctly. Since the stated (and natural) preconditions of disquotation require that no linguistic mistake is made, we were not justifi ed in making de dicto reports of his beliefs on the basis of any avowals that use the bogus name. Th is still seems to me correct. However, in the name-free cases that are under discussion here, like that of my wife's multiple interesting partygoers, I see no linguistic error. So diffi cult problems about representing the beliefs of another persist in a name-free environment. CLAIMS In conclusion, I would like to pull together a series of claims that have been made (and in some cases argued for) in this paper. 1. In comparing Donnellan to Russell, as Donnellan does, we must use the Russell of 1903–5. For that Russell, the comparison is indeed apt. 2. Within Russell's theory, acquaintance plays two roles: It transforms a worldly object into one accessible to cognition. Th e objects we are acquainted with are those we can represent or hold in thought. Acquaintance also plays the role of connecting our mental concepts to the world, thus giving them worldly objective content and ensuring that we are not brains in vats. Acquaintance with an individual, x , gives us the power to entertain in thought a singular proposition, in Russell's sense of a proposition with x as a constituent at the relevant place. For the 1903 Russell, we were acquainted with our acquaintances, but not with individuals we had only been told about and had never encountered. Our knowledge about the latt er could only be under a description. With that understanding of acquaintance, his distinction between knowledge by acquaintance and knowledge by description has commonsense plausibility. 3. Donnellan's and Russell's views coincide in several interesting ways. Th ey both subscribe to the view that there are two uses-referring and descriptive-of the same linguistic expression (for Russell, names; for Donnellan, defi nite descriptions), and Donnellan's having in mind and Russell's acquaintance play the same role in enabling singular or nondescriptive thoughts. Also, Russell's denoting and knowledge by description are conceptually parallel to Donnellan's att ributive use of a ( 158 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 158 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM defi nite description. Furthermore both Donnellan and Russell seem to take perceptual acquaintance as their paradigm. Th us having in mind and Russellian acquaintance initially look to be, in essence, the same notion. 4. Donnellan, like Russell, appears to claim that a singular (or de re ) thought is nothing more than a singular proposition (in Russell's sense). Th is cannot be correct because there are diff erent ways in which one might have the same individual in mind (in Donnellan's own sense of having in mind ). Th e case of the man in the doorway who is also the man drinking a martini shows that a theory of meaning-in the sense in which meaning plays into reasoning and aff ects behavior, communication, and understanding-must take account of the diff erent ways in which we can have the same individual in mind. Th is sort of meaning is what Frege called the cognitive signifi cance of an utt erance. Th e individual itself couldn't be the constituent of this sort of meaning. While agreeing that perceptual acquaintance allows one to cognitively represent an individual, I insist on Frege's Enduring Insight: that in the realm of cognitive signifi cance, we must account not only for what is represented but also for how it is represented. So Russell's identifi cation of singular thoughts with singular propositions will not do. 5. Our usual method of explaining behavior on the basis of belief can accommodate descriptive diff erences in belief. However, nondescriptive diff erences in ways of having in mind can play the same role in explaining behavior. If our method of explaining behavior on the basis of belief cannot accommodate nondescriptive diff erences in belief, it is incomplete. 6. Perceptual acquaintance, whatever descriptive or pictorial elements may accompany it, does not pick out its object descriptively. Perceptual acquaintance with one twin represents the twin perceived; it does not represent the other twin no matt er how perfectly the twins resemble one another. (Th us it is not an instance of Russellian knowledge by description). I would hope that all parties agree upon this. Once we have ways of perceptual acquaintance, it should not be surprising that Frege puzzles and their variants are easily generated purely within the realm of perceptual acquaintance (or purely within the realm of transmitt ed having in mind cases). Th ese puzzles fl ow from recognition problems. 7. For want of ways of having in mind (to appear in the objects of propositional att itudes), Russell has George IV expressing an interest in the law of identity when, upon seeing Scott in the distance, he asks, \"Is that Scott ?\" George IV is clearly acquainted with the man he perceives, and he is also acquainted with Scott (qua \"Scott \"). 8. Frege's continual citations of descriptive senses of names, not only for \"Aristotle\" but for names of individuals the speaker is plainly acquainted A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  159  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 159 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM with (for example, when the acquaintances of Dr. Lauben speak of him), may suggest that he entirely rejects the sort of nondescriptive having in mind that Donnellan and Russell fi nd so central to their theories of thought. But the discussion of perceptual modes of presentation in section 8 of \"Begriff sschrift \" involves exactly the sort of ways of being acquainted with an object that Russell and Donnellan need. Unfortunately, from \"Über Sinn und Bedeutung\" ([ 1892 ] 2001) on, Frege drops the discussion of perceptual modes of presentation and even switches his examples so that they become descriptions. Although his discussions of the fi rst-person pronoun and of other indexicals may suggest the possibility of nondescriptive constituents of thoughts, it is a possibility that Frege never follows up on. 9. Russell viewed language as a system of representation for the objects, properties, relations, and (possible) states of the world. Russellian propositions are built from worldly objects. (Even the sense data to which he later reverted are, for Russell, worldly objects, as are properties and relations.) Mont Blanc itself is a component of \"what is actually asserted,\" which he calls an objective proposition to indicate its worldly, object-oriented status. So words, phrases, and sentences represent their worldly objective content . Th e sentence \"Mont Blanc is older than Donnellan\" represents, for Russell, a certain objective proposition, an object-fi lled complex involving Mont Blanc, the relation is older than, and Donnellan. We may think of such an objective proposition as a state of aff airs. Th is particular state of aff airs obtains (the relation does, in fact, hold between its relata), so the sentence is true. Direct reference fi nds its place in Russell's theory of worldly objective content. 10. In addition to using language to represent the objects, properties, and states of the world, we also use language to convey our thoughts and to represent the thoughts of others. It would be convenient if our thoughts simply consisted of the very same objective states of aff airs that declarative sentences represent. But they don't. It is here that we must part company with Russell. Th ere are many sentences that represent the same state of aff airs as \"Mont Blanc is older than Donnellan,\" for example \"Mont Blanc is older than I,\" utt ered by Donnellan; \"Th at mountain is older than you,\" utt ered to Donnellan while pointing at Mont Blanc; and so on. Each of these may express a diff erent cognitive perspective on the same state of aff airs, a diff erent thought, as Frege would put it. Th ese thoughts diff er in their relata, which are diff erent (nondescriptive) ways of having Mont Blanc and Donnellan in mind. A natural view of these matt ers supports Frege's claim that an utt erance of \"yesterday\" today may have the same cognitive content as an utt erance of \"today\" yesterday. Th is makes it clear that cognitive signifi cance is not linguistic meaning. ( 160 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 160 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM 11. Frege starts off from a radically diff erent place than Russell. He assumes that language is a system of representation for thought and its constituents. Th e primary representational function for linguistic expressions is to stand for a Sinn , a bit of cognitive content (in Frege's special sharable sense). It is hard to know how one would sett le the disagreement between Russell and Frege as to the representational role of language. But there is a lot to be said for the view that the role of cognitive objects and states is to represent worldly objects and states. Th is suggests that Fregean semantics needs Russellian semantics. 12 . Strangely, Frege's theory makes no provision at all for Russellian objective content. Frege does add a secondary form of representation, Bedeutung, whereby elements of cognition are given worldly values. But the values he assigns are extensions. Th is jumps over Russell's worldly objective content, which is intensional. Extensions are not the entities that cognitive objects and states are meant to represent. Th e role of Fregean thoughts is certainly not to represent truth values. Frege's cognitive contents should represent Russell's worldly objective contents, and extension should be defi ned on the latt er. 13 . Strangely, Russell seems to make no provision at all for cognitive signifi cance. He sounds at times as if he is worried that too much legitimacy for cognitive signifi cance will promote a slide into idealism. He even insists that propositional att itudes (believes that, wonders whether, etc.) are simply relations between thinkers and objective states of aff airs. But this view faces a problem of internal coherence. Although the objective content of \"Th at man's pants are on fi re\" and \"My pants are on fi re\" will be the same on certain occasions, the objective contents of \"I believe that that man's pants are on fi re\" and \"I believe that my pants are on fi re\" seem to be two, quite diff erent worldly states of aff airs. Among the diff erences between those two worldly, objective states will be the way I have myself in mind. Th is diff erence is every bit as worldly as the diff erence between having a certain belief and not having it. 14 . Something like cognitive signifi cance is required to individuate thoughts, whereas Russellian objective contents are the locus of modality, temporality, and truth. I can wonder whether the man drinking a martini is the man who greeted us in the doorway because I don't know whether he is or not. But if I claim that he might not be, my claim will be false. Th e thought Th e man drinking a martini is the man who greeted us in the doorway is true. Indeed this thought is (or represents) a necessary truth, in virtue of its objective content. But neither the sentence nor the thought is a logical truth, a truth of reason . Reason and rationality operate at the level of the representation, not the objective content. (Th is alone A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  161  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 161 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM should be an adequate reason to consider diff erences in the way objects are represented a part of the theory of meaning.) 15 . For the maximum explanatory power, our semantic theory should countenance cognitive content, objective content, and extensions. 16 . Donnellan's remarks that pure reference fl ows from having in mind are best understood as claiming that having in mind requires a nondescriptive cognitive representation, and thus one whose objective content will be an individual, pure and simple. 17. Despite their similarity, Donnellan's having in mind could not be Russell's acquaintance because Donnellan believed that we could come to have a nondescriptive cognitive representation of an individual, to have the individual in mind, not only through a perceptual encounter but also by being told about the individual by one who already had the individual in mind. His original idea was that he could imagine the name \"Aristotle\" having been fi rst introduced in the Middle Ages by scholars who previously had used only defi nite descriptions to write and speak about Aristotle. According to Donnellan, these scholars may well have had Aristotle in mind, and through their conversations, through the referential use of defi nite descriptions and other devices, transmitt ed the epistemic state of having Aristotle in mind from one to another. Th us they were properly situated from an epistemic point of view to be able to introduce a genuine proper name, and one that subsequent users could use referentially. 18 . We certainly gain knowledge of truths through the testimony of others (who already have knowledge of those truths). We can also gain knowledge of things by the testimony of others (who already have knowledge of those things). Th is is one way to characterize Donnellan's idea. 19. Historically, there have been confl icting views on how having in mind can be initiated. But methodologically, we can separate issues regarding the transmission of having in mind from the independent issue of its initiation . I take Donnellan's notion of having in mind as an intuitively understood primitive. Speculation about how it might be initiated is part of the diff erent theories of having in mind . 2 0 . Names are an inessential artifact for holding an individual in mind. We hold many things in mind that either have no names or whose names we do not know. Some of these things we have interacted with directly, but others we have only read about or been told about. Perhaps the reporters who told us about these things witnessed them themselves, but it may also have been the case that they, in turn, were merely told about them. 21. Although it is widely believed that the transmission of a proper name enables singular thought-perhaps because proper names are nondescriptive ( 162 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 162 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM representations (like demonstratives and indexicals)-the transmission of names should be subsumed under the broader notion of being told about an individual. When a proper name is transmitt ed, we typically have been told about the individual. Th us having in mind has been transmitt ed, and we take the name to refer to the individual we were told about. Note that we may forget the name and remember the individual. 2 2 . A blind use of a description is one that does not evoke an individual with which the speaker is epistemically connected. In contrast, a directed description evokes an individual with which the speaker is acquainted or has been told about, or in whose causal wake the speaker lies. (In their standard use, \"the fi rst child to be born in the twenty-second century,\" \"the shortest spy,\" \"the oldest living woman,\" \"the next Republican candidate for president\" would all be blind.) Th is distinction is neutral regarding views about the initiation and transmission of having in mind . One of Donnellan's most important insights is that, independent of the intentions of the speaker, we hear defi nite descriptions in two diff erent ways: sometimes as directed, and sometimes as blind. Th e distinction applies also to indefi nite descriptions. Th e indefi nite in \"A student stole my lunch\" is directed (it's an evidence case), whereas the indefi nite in \"A student will speak, if the instructor remains silent long enough\" seems blind. Russell took blind uses of descriptions as typical of the mainstream use. In contrast, I believe that blind uses of defi nite descriptions are rare. Not only are most uses of defi nite descriptions directed, but most are intended to pick out something that the speaker is acquainted with or has been told about, something that the speaker has in mind. In Donnellan's terms, the preponderant use of defi nite descriptions is referential. Th is disagreement with Russell is due to the fact that I believe that having in mind is much more widely distributed than he did. 2 3 . Th e number of ways in which one has a given individual in mind depends on recognition (and assimilation) versus failure to recognize and misrecognition. Th ese mental events are independent of the external paths and their groundings, which determine what individual is in mind. 2 4 . Th ere are two senses of understanding another's thoughts. Th ere is understanding in the sense that those who understand another's thoughts can share or at least represent the other's thoughts in a way that translates them into their own. Translational understanding is what is expressed by our usual de dicto propositional att itude talk. Such translations are impossible if one of the persons has an individual in mind in more ways than the other. You can't translate one representation of an individual into two, nor two into one. However, there is another sense of understanding in which one surveys another's thought fr om above , noting, from one's own point of view, failures to recognize and assimilate as well A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  163  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 163 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM as misrecognitions leading to confl ations. Understanding from above should enable explanations of behavior and reasoning even in cases where translational understanding is blocked. I have called this latt er way of understanding description fr om above . Th is sense of understanding, by description from above, is independent of whether the subject's thought corresponds to reality. It may be impossible to understand another's thought by translation because there is no translation that captures what the description from above captures: both the fact that certain thoughts are singular and the good explanations of behavior and of reasoning. 2 5 . It is striking that failures in the recognition of things is so much more disruptive to the translational framework in which we ordinarily understand (and talk about) one another's thought (using the idioms of propositional att itudes) than failures in the att ribution of properties. Th e latt er is the kind of error the framework seems designed to accommodate. I think of these two kinds of errors as Russell did, as mistakes in our knowledge of things and mistakes in our knowledge of truths . 2 6 . Having an individual in mind may be a cognitive state that is more diffi cult to describe than has been thought, but it is also a state that is much easier to achieve than has been thought. Rather than its being a rare and precious thing, we are rife with singular thoughts about individuals we haven't personally met and events we haven't personally participated in but have only been told about. Th e moral is: For singular thought, vicarious or mediated acquaintance is as good as the real thing (as well as being a whole lot safer). And thank goodness I don't have to remember someone's name to think about him. HOMEWORK Now here is your homework assignment. If those medieval scholars could have Aristotle in mind, without having a name for him, and transmit this state to their students, couldn't they have been in an analogous cognitive state and transmit that state to their students even if there had never been an Aristotle, that is, if what they thought they had learned about him had originated as a fi ction or a lie? Would they ( 164 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 164 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM not be in qualitatively identical epistemic states (in the sense of Kripke [ 1972 ] 1980, lecture 2) with the actual medieval scholars? Perhaps in these cases the originating storytellers, the liars, have no one in mind, and so the recipients of the story also have no one in mind. But if the recipient believes the story, or enters into the form of pretence involved in listening to an acknowledged work of fi ction, it may feel just as it does in cases of actual having in mind . Th ere is that embeddedness and constancy of referential intention that seems characteristic of having in mind . And note that bogus and fi ctional individuals we are told about, like the real individuals we are told about, don't need to have names-witness the priest in Hamlet. Might there not also be diff erent ways of having nothing in mind? Th is way of thinking about the transmission of cognitive states similar to having in mind breaks the transmission of a cognitive state loose from problems of knowledge and existence, and thus from epistemology. In \"Speaking of Nothing\" Donnellan (1974) has made an analogous move with proper names, studying the network of transmission and the use of the name independently of the nature of initiating events. Part 1: Write an essay on having nothing in mind in a name-fr ee environment . Must every path down the tree end in a block (see Donnellan 1974 ), or could they end in an event that grounds the path in a nonentity? Are there diff erent ways to have the same nothing in mind? Part 2: What kinds of recognition problems can arise? Note that many diff erent people may tell you about the same nonexistent individual. Could their tales be grounded in diff erent events? Can Paderewski cases arise? Can the converse, so-called confusion or misrecognition cases arise? 92 NOTES Th anks to Joseph Almog, Michael O'Rourke, Robin Jeshion, Terry Parsons, and John Carriero, who commented on versions of this paper. Very special thanks to Alex Radulescu and Skef Iterum, who commented on many penultimate versions, and most special thanks to Sam Cumming, whose views, arguments, and examples have been very infl uential in my thinking about this topic. Unfortunately no one seems suffi ciently in agreement with the views stated herein to share the blame for errors. 1. Keith Donnellan's arrival at UCLA was a signifi cant event for me. He arrived just when we lost Carnap (Sept. 14, 1970) and were shortly to lose Montague (Mar. 7, 1971). All the rest of the philosophy of language group had been trained as mathematical logicians and were moving slowly to the consideration of \"natural language\" from that perspective. But Donnellan, although he had taught symbolic logic at Cornell, had been trained more in the tradition of Witt genstein and in the philosophy of mind. Indeed in some deep way, Donnellan is a mind-fi rst philosopher of language. His arrival created an immediate A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  165  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 165 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM broadening of perspectives. None of us, and certainly not I, would have begun thinking about what's in the head (and what isn't) in the way that we do now had it not been for his presence. His infl uence was powered by a profound philosophical mind and fl avored with a wonderful, wry sense of humor. Beyond the gift of his intellect, I've been the benefi ciary of a warm and rewarding friendship for over three decades. In the course of that friendship I have been moved by his fi erce rejection of coercion as a mechanism of institutional order. It is interesting that a former Air Force offi cer and Air Force Academy instructor should so fi ercely reject such methods. His repugnance for coercion strongly infl uenced our graduate program and was refl ected in the classroom, where students spoke admiringly of his \"intellectual modesty.\" I share their appreciation for his freedom from arrogance, but I appreciate his intellectual audacity even more. 2. Donnellan was focused on the logically proper names that appeared when Russell's epistemology drove him inward, sometime aft er \"On Denoting\" (1905) and before \"Knowledge by Acquaintance and Knowledge by Description\" (1910–11). He should have focused on the Russell of 1903–5, starting with \"Points about Denoting\" ([1903] 1994). Th is is the period in which Russell fi rst set an epistemological requirement on the use of a genuine proper name, introduced his special epistemological sense of acquaintance , introduced his so-called epistemological principle , and announced the distinction between knowledge by acquaintance and knowledge by description . Th is Russell had to be unearthed by Alasdair Urquhart from the Russell archives at McMaster. Th e relevant papers appear in the invaluable Collected Papers of Bertrand Russell, vol. 4: Foundations of Logic 1903–05 (1994), a must-have for Russell fans. 3. It is worth noting that no one has claimed that Russell's theory of proper names is not a semantic theory, despite the fact that there are both descriptive and referential uses of the same name and that the use is dependent upon the epistemic state and intentions of the user. Yet Donnellan's seemingly parallel claim about defi nite descriptions has been strongly challenged in Kripke's \"Speaker's Reference and Semantic Reference\" (1977) by an argument claiming that it is not a semantic theory. 4. Originally, in Th e Principles of Mathematics ([1903] 1938), Russell called them denoting concepts . Later on he uses denoting complexes . I follow the later usage, which bett er conveys the idea. At the time these ideas were developed, Russell had not yet \"eliminated\" defi nite descriptions and the associated denoting complexes. 5. One way to make Russell's claim seem plausible is to think of it in terms of entertaining the proposition expressed by a particular sentence. We need to understand or comprehend what the sentence means. For Russell, this comes down to knowing, by acquaintance, the meaning of each word. Th ese meanings are the constituents of the proposition. So to contemplate the proposition that the spouse of Smith is fortunate, we must be acquainted with Smith (the meaning of \"Smith\"), the relation spouse of , and the property of being fortunate. If you didn't know the meaning of \"spouse\" or didn't know who was meant by \"Smith,\" you wouldn't understand the sentence. You could mouth it, but you wouldn't know what you were saying. Th is is my way of making the claim plausible, but what Russell is thinking is bett er stated by saying that the proposition would be inaccessible to one who was not acquainted with all its constituents. 6. Much of this was to change with the advent of the theory of \"On Denoting\" (1905), which entirely eliminated the denoting complexes (while somehow maintaining knowledge by description) and left all the denoting on the shoulders of the linguistic, defi nite description. 7. Th e ancient proverb \"It's a wise child that knows its own father\" would have been familiar to Russell's contemporaries. 8. Th is last, though not as elegant as some of Russell's more polished formulations, is undoubtedly a formulation of the epistemological principle. ( 166 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 166 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM You may fi nd talk of constituents of the denotation puzzling. Th ey stem from Russell's early struggles to distinguish what he then called a denoting concept from the denotation. Th is was confusing because Russellian propositions are usually about their own constituents (the proposition that Russell met Smith is an example), but propositions containing denoting concepts are an exception to this rule. So in order to distinguish denoting concepts from their denotation he says things like: Consider the denoting concept the center of mass of the solar system . Th is denoting concept is complex, but the denotation, being a point, is simple. One has constituents; the other doesn't. Th e shift to the terminology denoting complex helped to emphasize this point. 9. Russell's \"perfect and complete\" knowledge seems to, and was possibly intended to, imply that if one were acquainted with x, one could not become acquainted with x again or in a diff erent way without recognizing that it was x. Th is would foreclose the recognition problem (see below) for objects of acquaintance. 10. Merely being acquainted with Triphena should not be suffi cient for Russell to understand or use sentences containing her name. He needs to associate her with her name. We may be sure that Russell has acquainted himself with the beautiful new physician at the clinic he visits. But he may not know that she is \"Triphena.\" I don't know of a place where Russell takes cognizance of this fact. A caution to scholars: In the manuscript he contrasts the semantics of the name \"Triphena\" with that of the denoting phrase \"Smith's wife\" from the point of view of one who is acquainted with her, thus anticipating the George IV puzzle of \"On Denoting.\" 11. I have argued for the philosophical interest of this earlier Russell in Kaplan 2005 , part 2. 12. In \"Th e Contingent A Priori and Rigid Designators\" Donnellan ( 1979 ) states that Le Verrier did not have de re knowledge of Neptune (by the mere act of naming it). He argues that Le Verrier could not truthfully assert, aft er fi nally traveling to Neptune, \"I knew many years ago that this planet was the cause of the perturbations in the orbit of Uranus.\" Nor could the Neptunians, who call their planet \"Enutpen,\" have truthfully said in the 1850s, \"Le Verrier knows that Enutpen is the cause of the perturbations in the orbit of Uranus.\" He also points out that it does not follow from the fact that a term is a rigid designator that when it enters into a statement of a de dicto propositional att itude, the object of the att itude ascribed must be a singular thought. His counterexample involves mathematical descriptions, which are arguably rigid designators. 13. Donnellan ( 1979 , section 2) does tentatively accept the possibility of reference-fi xing uses of defi nite descriptions to introduce rigidly designating proper names, which he qualifi es by saying that though we may know that a sentence containing such a name expresses a truth, we cannot know the truth that it expresses. Russell makes a strikingly similar claim when he writes, \"It would seem that, when we [use a proper name to] make a statement about something only known by description, we oft en intend to make our statement, not in the form involving the description, but about the actual thing described.\" Russell then shows how to specify, through a description, the proposition we intend to express. We may take the description to be \"the result of replacing the denoting concept in the proposition we do express by its denotation.\" Russell then continues, \"Th is proposition, which is described and is known to be true, is what interests us; but we are not acquainted with the proposition itself, and do not know it, though we know it is true\" ([1912] 1961). In one of my favorite passages, Russell remarks (perhaps harking back to his purely semantic intuitions) that when the speaker is acquainted with the referent of a proper name, \"the proper name has the direct use which it always wishes to have, as simply standing for a certain object, and not for a description of the object\" (emphasis added). 14. In particular, those not involving att ributions of mental states such as belief. 15. I take it that Frege's cognitive signifi cance of an utt erance is just the sort of meaning involved in understanding, action, communication, and thought. Frege's account may be fl awed, A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  167  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 167 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM but his sort of meaning is undoubtedly of the greatest importance in a theory of language. Th e most relevant Frege texts are section 8 of \"Begriff sschift \" ([1879] 1952), \"Über Sinn und Bedeutung\" ([1892] 2001 ), and \"Th ought\" ([1918] 1997). 16. Lett er from Frege to Russell dated November 13, 1904, in Frege 1980 . 17. See Kripke's \"Speaker's Reference and Semantic Reference\" (1977). 18. We could make the situations completely parallel by supposing that I turn away from the man who is holding a martini glass in order to talk to you. Donnellan includes such cases (his king/imposter case is such), and Russell does also (once having met Smith, Russell remains acquainted with him when he is not present). It would be odd to suggest that one could not continue to have an individual in mind once he walks out of view. 19. Perry 1977 urged this point. 20. Donnellan, on the other hand, moves easily in this realm of cognition. He adverts, obliquely, to cases in which there are two ways of having the same object in mind in section 3 of \"Th e Contingent A Priori and Rigid Designators\" (1979) and gracefully steps around them. 21. Recall that we began with a quote from Donnellan comparing referential use to Russellian genuine names. 22. Th is might be an appropriate place to raise the question whether these arguments show that proper names are not Millian. If Millian means that diff erent names of the same individual never diff er semantically, I do not think that names are Millian, because I take the way the bearer is represented, even if nondescriptive, to belong to semantic theory. However, Mill himself claimed only that names had denotation but no connotation. Connotation was, for Mill, descriptive meaning that determines denotation. Mill believed that predicates and natural-kind terms had such connotations. So if by Millian we mean that names do not have Millian connotations, then I do regard names as Millian since the way the bearer is represented is nondescriptive. As we have learned, it is important to separate how the individual is represented from the mechanism that determines what individual is represented. Th is is a distinction that the notion of a referential use of a defi nite description presupposes. 23. I read Burge as endorsing this insight in the second paragraph of note 2 of \"Five Th eses on De Re States and Att itudes\" (2009). 24. In this respect, John Perry's ( 1980 ) metaphor of a mental fi le for what I call a way of having in mind may be apt. (Perry att ributes the metaphor to Donnellan. A full history is in Recanati 2010 .) Th e metaphor doesn't work well for relations, which would seem to require that we put the fi les into each other. Skef Iterum calls such mental representations aggregative in contrast to his view of classical Fregean senses, which he terms compositional . 25. Fidelity to text requires me to mention that in section 8 the \"ostension\" is to a mathematical point, possibly as represented in a diagram. So some explaining has to be done to get from the chalk dot to the deferred referent, the imperceptible mathematical point. Part of the explanation is that Frege just liked to use mathematical examples, and in the present case he wanted to make the point that it requires a mathematical proof to establish that the two modes of determination determine the same thing. A similar point is made by an example in \"Über Sinn und Bedeutung\" ([ 1892 ] 2001), but without any discussion of the \"direct\" mode of determination given by \"intuition.\" In the example in \"Über Sinn und Bedeutung,\" both modes of determination are given descriptively. I recognize that I am exercising some imaginative extensions of Frege's brief remark in my interpretation of the section 8 example. But I still think it correct. Tyler Burge insists (in conversation) that nowhere in the Fregean corpus does Frege assert that senses of names must be descriptive. Th e evidence of section 8, the discussion of the fi rst-person pronoun, and perhaps that of indexicals, support the underlying suggestion ( 168 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 168 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM of the possibility of nondescriptive senses. Burge too has taken special note of section 8 in note 16 in. Th e view that a correct version of Frege's theory would include nondescriptive cognitive modes of representation of individuals has, by now, been explicitly endorsed by many, including Burge ( 1977 ), McDowell ( 1984 ), and Evans ( 1982 ). Th ese Fregean nondescriptive modes of determination also provide a textual foundation for the nondescriptive connotations of Ackerman ( 1979 ), although Ackerman's important work is focused on ordinary proper names rather than demonstratives or demonstrative thought. It seems natural to regard Frege's \"special and primitive way\" in which everyone is presented to himself or herself but to no one else (as is claimed in \"Th ought\" [(1918) 1997]) as being nondescriptive and thus akin to the perceptual mode of determination in this respect. 26. For brevity, I speak of diff erent ways of being acquainted for ways of having in mind that result from diff erent acquaintance events. 27. Th e more basic idiom seems to be recognize as . One may recognize Venus as the same heavenly body seen on recent mornings without recognizing it as the same heavenly body seen on much earlier evenings. Although a recognition failure is typically taken as a failure to recognize the same individual on two occasions, there is also misrecognition in which one incorrectly takes two individuals to be one. 28. Th is is not to denigrate what I below call worldly objective content as a kind of meaning or semantic value. Worldly objective content is, roughly, the Content of my \"Demonstratives\" (1989b). I only wish to resist the term \"semantics\" being hijacked for one kind of content. 29. See Wett stein 1986 . In Kaplan 1989b , section 17, \"Epistemological Remarks,\" I proposed to identify cognitive signifi cance, the way the proposition is presented, with what I called Character. I realized prett y quickly that taking this notion of linguistic meaning to be cognitive signifi cance was a bad idea-it was a piece of irrational exuberance-and Wett stein and others helped to drive the point home. Th e cognitive signifi cance of \"now\" (the way we have the time in mind) could not be unchanging from moment to moment since we notice the passage of time. (Another argument for diff erentiating cognitive signifi cance from linguistic meaning is given below in the text.) But the more important idea in section 17 was to make a distinction between the objective content of the thought and the way the thought is presented. My semantic notions of Character and Content provided a handy model for the distinction, which led me into a reductive error. But in rereading \"Epistemological Remarks,\" I note that there is very litt le that turns on the details of the model. Th e main thrust is that the relation between the relevant sharable cognitive states and the objective content that is thereby entertained is context-sensitive, in the sense that the objective content is not solely determined by the cognitive state, which requires the addition of contextual information to determine the content. Th e notion of cognitive state in Kaplan 1989b is somewhat diff erent from the one discussed below. 30. Russell to Frege, lett er dated December 12, 1904, in Frege 1980 . Th is correspondence takes place during the period of the Russell I am comparing to Donnellan. Note that he gets Frege's notion of a thought wrong, since for Frege, thoughts are not private but shared, which undercuts Russell's criticism. However, Sam Cumming has made me aware that it is very diffi cult to see what Frege's notion of sharable cognitive content comes to empirically. We should probably focus on what coordinated or synchronized cognitive content comes to empirically. Cumming 2010 makes such a proposal. 31. Wett stein 1986 . Th e view is elaborated in Wett stein 2006 . 32. In Russell's semantics the sentence has the function to represent that state. It is a separate question whether a given person can use the sentence to represent that state. For this, the given person must be acquainted with the three constituents of the state. Otherwise the person would just be mouthing the words without knowing their meaning, without entertaining A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  169  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 169 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM the proposition. Russell suggests that such a person entertains a diff erent, descriptive proposition, not the one the sentence has the role of representing. 33. Although Russellian propositions are naturally seen as being the truth conditions for sentences, Russell took the notion of such a condition obtaining (that is, the proposition being true or factual) as a primitive idea. It never occurred to him to give a recursive defi nition of this notion, though it should be easy to do so if the notion of a proposition is given by recursion. 34. I am assuming that the cognitive signifi cance of a nondescriptive singular term is a way of having the term's referent in mind, and that the referent is the objective content of both the term and the term's cognitive signifi cance. 35. Th ere are, of course, nondescriptive thoughts with no worldly objective content, just as there are, contra Russell, nondescriptive names with no worldly objective content. Th oughts about phlogiston and hallucinated objects are, presumably, both nondescriptive and with no worldly content. 36. In the formal developments of Kaplan 1989b , what I call Content is not objective content, not objects and complexes thereof, but rather a version of Carnap's intensions as represented in \"Modalities and Quantifi cation\" (1946) and Meaning and Necessity (1947) and refi ned by Kripke in \"Semantical Considerations on Modal Logic\" (1963). Such intensions are functions on possible states of the world. Th is allowed me to easily produce an intensional logic . To do Russellian semantics as Russell envisioned it we must think of the intensions as a way of representing objective content. I did so at the time, and it still seems plausible to me. (Carnap, I believe, tended to think of them as representing something closer to cognitive content.) To reconstruct the Russellian objective content we must fi rst represent the structure of complex contents. Th e representation by intensions wipes out structural diff erences between logically equivalent objective contents. Th is reconstruction does not seem diffi cult. Th ere is also a problem in reconstructing the objective content of quantifi ed sentences, if we wish to countenance the possibility of alternate domains of merely possible individuals. Russell's idea of using functions from individuals to objective propositions (propositional functions) will not work unless we alter the contemporary set-theoretical understanding of what a function is. 37. A tracking error - mis recognizing the referent of \"yesterday\" as a diff erent day, as Rip Van Winkle might do-is a more serious disorder, one that is discussed below. Th ere is a sense of \"cognitive signifi cance\" in which one might say there has been a change in cognitive signifi cance because I have learned many new facts about the day since yesterday (for example that it was not actually my birthday, as I had thought it was), so I would describe the day quite diff erently today from the way I would have described it yesterday. Th is is not my usage. 38. Given that Frege views language as a representation of thought, it would be odd to end up viewing cognitive content as nothing more than the conventional meaning of language. Perhaps one might say that the cognitive content of an utt erance is the idiolectal meaning of that utt erance. 39. As indicated in the lett er to Frege quoted above and quite explicitly in many other places. 40. See Kaplan 2005 , section 1.1.1 for the development of the two views about the representational role of language. 41. If we start with thought, especially purely descriptive thought of the kind Frege seemed to favor in his later years, I have Russell's brain-in-a-vat worry. Frege needs to say more about this, especially about how the mental predicates get their extensions (or their worldly objective content, if he were to accept that they do). 42. Quine seems to endorse Frege's ontology in. 43. Th ere is a lot more to say here, but it would take us too far afi eld. Suffi ce it to say that a bit of the essence in origin intuition is raising its metaphysical head. ( 170 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 170 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM 44. Note that it is not necessary to \"eliminate\" defi nite descriptions in order to make it clear that the objective content of a sentence involving a defi nite description contains a complex of properties and relations rather than the denotation of the description. 45. A bett er known philosophical example involving a nonnatural kind concerns the diff erence in cognitive signifi cance between \"Greeks\" and \"Hellenes.\" 46. Note that in intensional logics, like my \"Demonstratives\" (1989b), the relation of logical consequence is not defi ned on the intensions (my Content), but rather on the sentences (the representations) themselves. Russell was mistaken in thinking that logical consequence was a relation among his objective propositions. 47. As noted, Frege seemed to accept what may have been a nonpublic sense of the fi rst person. He says that in this use of the fi rst person the sense is \"special\" and \"primitive,\" though he doesn't actually say it is private. So maybe that formula-\"special\" and \"primitive\"- could also work for ostensive modes of determination. 48. Geach's account is sketchy and cryptic (his main topic lies elsewhere), and it is focused on justifying the maintenance of reference during the passage of a name, whereas part of the importance of Donnellan's point is that the phenomenon is independent of the presence of a name. Still, it is the only other place I have seen the idea, and the terminology \"mediated acquaintance\" seems just right. (A possible problem in Geach's brief discussion is that he seems to require face-to-face pure Russellian acquaintance for passage of a name, which ignores passage through documents by authors with whom one lacks face-to-face acquaintance.) 49. Russell is explicit that lack of acquaintance causes the names of the ancients, in our mouths, to be mere abbreviations of descriptions. See Russell ( 1912 ) 1961 on the name \"Julius Caesar.\" 50. Perhaps not, if the story that is passed down is explicitly fi ctional. But then, what is in mind? 51. Note how closely this case fi ts the paradigmatic scenario (described earlier) for the referential use of \"my wife\" by Smith. If I am correct that Donnellan's notion of reference to x is founded in the epistemic state he calls having x in mind , then the transmission of having in mind needs to have been at work in the background of his groundbreaking 1970 paper \"Proper Names and Identifying Descriptions.\" Surprisingly, having in mind shows up there only indirectly, by way of note 8, which reads, \"Although I do not have space to develop it, my account of proper names in this paper seems to me to make what I called 'referential' defi nite descriptions (as discussed in 'Reference and Defi nite Descriptions' . . . ) a close relative of proper names.\" \"Reference and Defi nite Descriptions\" (1966) is, of course, the source of the having in mind notion. 52. For useful taxonomies and critical reviews of the literature on this subject, see Jeshion 2010 ; Recanati 2010 . Both also present interesting theories of their own. Jeshion's paper was instrumental in starting me thinking about this topic again. 53. \"Ye shall know them by their fruits.\" Matt hew 7:16. 54. I use evidence in the manner of a detective searching for evidence of the perpetrator, not in the broader sense in which theorists cite evidence for the truth of their theories. Th e latt er is evidence for truths ; the former evidence of things . 55. I am among those who have held this view. I remember asking Saul Kripke in the early 1970s whether he found it surprising, as I did, that we could simply perform what is essentially a mental transformation, say, by introducing a new proper name and fi xing its referent by the use of a defi nite description, and thus expand the range of what we could say and think from the purely descriptive to the directly referential. As I recall, he agreed that it was surprising and that it could be done. See Kaplan 1989b , 560n76. Jeshion calls this view semantic instrumentalism . A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  171  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 171 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM 56. See note 13. 57. In Kripke ( 1972 ) 1980, lecture 1. He adds provocative remarks on the subject in lecture 3. 58. Here he is unlike Kripke and unlike me at the time of my conversation with Kripke alluded to in note 55. 59. Donnellan writes, \"Strawson, on the other hand, certainly does recognize a referential use of defi nite defi nitions. But what I think he did not see is that a defi nite description may have a quite diff erent role-may be used non-referentially, even as it occurs in one and the same sentence\" (1966, paragraph 4). I do not agree that Strawson recognizes what Donnellan calls \"a referential use.\" What is in common between Strawson and Donnellan is only that what is asserted contains, as a constituent, the referent itself rather than a complex corresponding to the descriptive phrase (a Russellian denoting complex ). So in both cases, we get something like what I called \"direct reference\" in \"Demonstratives\" (1989b). But the mechanism by which the referent is determined is radically diff erent. For Strawson, this referent is completely determined by the Russellian denotation of the descriptive phrase (or, when indexicals are involved, by what he calls a use of the descriptive phrase). For Donnellan, the referent is determined by what the speaker has in mind and is independent of the denotation of the descriptive phrase. It is for this reason that I think Russell, and not Strawson, is a natural counterpart to Donnellan. 60. In a lecture at UCLA in 2005, Kripke seemed to indicate that in Naming and Necessity he had assumed some such constraints on the descriptions that could be used to fi x the reference for the introduction of a proper name. But I may have misunderstood him. 61. In the sense of Kaplan 1968 . Th ere are other cases of more proximal future individuals that I am somewhat uncertain about. Given an actual knock-down lectern kit, containing instructions for assembly (form) and all the materials (matt er), why should we not be able to have in mind the lectern we are about to assemble? And if we procrastinate until the need is past, will we have in mind the unique, merely possible lectern that would have been assembled? I think of such examples as pregnancy cases . Another forward-looking case occurs when we view the murder victim's body. Th e body is evidence of the murderer's causal agency, but it also has its own causal agency. It foreshadows the coroner who will perform the autopsy. 62. Th e question In which cases does the right sort of relation hold between the individual and the thinker to enable having in mind ? seems to be a knowledge of things problem parallel to the Gett ier problem about the route of acquisition for knowledge of truths (but without the consensus of intuitions about specifi c cases that the Gett ier problem has generated). 63. See Kaplan 1989a , section 4, especially the discussion of the Instrumental Th esis . 64. Robin Jeshion has suggested in discussion that some animal behaviors may be understood as telling the herd about a predator. Th is slightly reduces my comparative advantage over the springbok. 65. I am told that there are languages of the latt er kind. 66. Th e notion of a discourse referent was introduced by Kartt unen in his 1969 dissertation and fi rst appeared in print in his 1976 paper \"Discourse Referents.\" Th ere are well-known developments by Hans Kamp ( 1981 ) and Irena Heim ( 1982 , 1983). For a recent take on the matt er, and one that very much infl uenced my own thinking, see \"Discourse Content\" by Sam Cumming ( 2009 ). 67. Here we must imagine a youthful, prim Russell. 68. Note that Russell cannot simply jump from one description to another and maintain the unity of the subject he is being told about. Nor can he anchor the descriptions in the name \"Triphena\" since, according to his doctrines, the name only again abbreviates the description \"Smith's wife.\" 69. See Burge 1993 . Burge uses \"testimony,\" presumably to emphasize solemnity and sincerity; I add \"hearsay\" to emphasize iteration. I believe that in a courtroom, facts told to a ( 172 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 172 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM testifi er but not witnessed directly are counted as hearsay and not accepted as testimony. But it is exactly this iterative possibility that I want to emphasize (and possibly Burge too). So, but for its overtones of untrustworthiness, I would prefer to use just \"hearsay.\" 70. I recall Donnellan talking about an atypical case in which a mailman reading from a package label asks, \"Does George Kaplan live at this address?\" Donnellan claimed that though the name is used, the mailman does not know what he is asking. Russell poses the same concern. 71. Even if inessential for having in mind , names have many advantages over descriptions used referentially or other ways to refer. Th ey are public, relatively stable in appearance, neutral, appropriate for most occasions, and almost perfectly individuating (in that such questions as \"Which Ignacy Jan Paderewski are you referring to?\" don't actually arise very oft en). Th ese virtues make them valuable for helping us to coordinate on whether we have the same individual in mind. It seems likely that if we banned names, certain defi nite descriptions used referentially would be standardized. Th ey would, in the words of Ruth Marcus, \"grow capitals\" (as did \"the Holy Roman Empire\") and take over the functions of names. In claiming that names are inessential, I was addressing only Donnellan's question: What puts the ultimate name user in the requisite epistemic position to refer to the name bearer? 72. Th e referential use of in defi nite descriptions (see below) might also have fi gured in. 73. Donnellan's king/imposter case may be a told about case since we don't know whether the speaker had observed the imposter or whether he had merely been told about him on good authority (for example, by the true heir to the throne). 74. A linguist might regard it as an anaphoric use, though such uses don't usually countenance errors. In any case, the ability to refer anaphorically is certainly compatible with having in mind and, from some points of view, represents a structure of record keeping that is very much like having in mind . I don't claim that all anaphoric uses of a pronoun express a way of having in mind . An anaphor tied to what I call a \"blind\" defi nite or indefi nite description (see below) would not express a way of having in mind because such descriptions do not transmit having in mind . 75. Few, other than those (of whom Frege sometimes seems to be one) who would deny the existence of singular thought altogether 76. Even if a campaign manager introduced his candidate in the primaries this way, I would not take the use to be referential, in Donnellan's sense. Rather I would take the introduction as a kind of identity claim: that Ortcutt will be the next Republican nominee for president (roughly, that Ortcutt will win the nomination). 77. Th ere seems no proper having in mind transmission path (see below) back to the individual under this description. 78. But this may turn out to be characteristic of all uses where the reason for the use does not require a literal reading. Robin Jeshion suggests, \"Stop at the next gas station with a bathroom,\" a blind description by my lights, but who cares if it is a gas station or an ethanol station? 79. I'm not certain I have correctly characterized the notion I am trying to articulate. Originally I thought of blind descriptions as descriptions that the speaker just dreamed up , as if one were merely playing with syntactical possibilities. But of course there is usually a good reason for the usage. 80. Note that the blind case is future-directed. 81. Th is is a speculation. 82. Th e closest he comes may be in \"Knowledge by Acquaintance and Knowledge by Description\" ([1912] 1961), where he states that \"there are various stages of removal from acquaintance.\" 83. Donnellan takes the use of \"the murderer\" by one who has viewed or been told about the victim as a paradigm of his att ributive use, which he does not distinguish from a blind use. A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  173  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 173 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM Insofar as we share Donnellan's way of hearing things (and he certainly has an acute ear), it is a mark against the Causal Russellians, who would allow this use to be referential. Russell's well-known treatment of \"the author of Waverly \" as an att ributive use demonstrates that he too was not a Causal Russellian (which we knew already). Th e Causal Russellians, of which there are currently many, must take the position that George IV had Sir Walter in mind in two diff erent ways : through acquaintance and as the authorial cause of the known novel Waverly . Since many of them are also direct reference theorists, Russell's puzzle should pose the same challenge when the description is given secondary scope as when the description is given primary scope (the problem discussed earlier). 84. I must admit that my empirical research is slim, derived from newspapers and introspection. In newspaper accounts, singular defi nite descriptions oft en appear as titles, \"the Speaker of the House,\" for example. I don't count these as specimens of the usage under study, but if I did, they would count in my favor. 85. I don't have a view as to which use of indefi nites is preponderant. Cumming 2011 seems to take the position that the most felicitous use is referential. Referential uses of indefi nites seem a natural and easy way to tell someone about an individual. Th us they are natural vehicles for the transmission of having in mind . 86. She may be so uninterested in what I say that she hardly takes note of the man and quickly puts him out of her mind. For a way of having in mind to have staying power, or perhaps even to take in the fi rst place, it must be of interest. Th is is a point emphasized by Jeshion. 87. It is also possible that my wife mis recognized the person I was telling her about, and Janet's husband is Frank Ortcutt , not Bernard J. Th e other recognition errors that have been discussed- failures to recognize-aff ect the ways of having in mind and may disrupt interpersonal coordination and understanding. Errors of mis recognition are much more serious. Th ey disrupt reference itself. How should we describe such a communicative disorder ? As a failure to transmit having in mind , or as a mis transmission of having in mind ? Does she not have Bernard J. in mind at all, or does she have two diff erent individuals in mind in the same way ? Note that exactly the same thing can happen when one learns a name. One may misrecognize the individual whose name one is learning and (mis)assimilate that individual to an already known individual. Th e result would be that one uses the name to refer to the \"wrong\" person. Th is may be an idiosyncratic error that washes out. But there is a form of this disorder that can become widespread, so widespread that this use overwhelms the \"correct\" use (namely, the one that follows the path back to the individual named). Th is occurs when one takes it that a name already in one's lexicon refers to an individual with whom one is not only acquainted but regularly interacting. In these cases, users are oft en inclined to say, \"Th is may not be the way you use NAME, but it is what I call NAME. Th at's how I use NAME.\" Misrecognition plus interaction trumps history. Th is, I believe, is the way that \"Madagascar\" changed its referent and that Native Americans became Indians. 88. If they were descriptive, we would not seek the referent by following the path of communication. Instead we would search for a best-fi t individual. 89. Alex Radulescu points out that we may retain both an earlier and a later way of having the same individual in mind even aft er the later presentation of the individual is recognized. When a long lost acquaintance returns, dramatically changed, he may be recognized as the person you once knew without extinguishing either the new or the old persona as separate ways of having him in mind. Rather than assimilating one to the other, one accepts an identity between them. 90. Th is seems to be the thrust of Kripke's \"A Puzzle about Belief \" (1979). But these matt ers are subtle. Because they are not the central thrust of this paper I will not continue to pursue the argument. 91. Even in the name-free environment that I have imagined, one might echo Donnellan's apt remark that it is the omniscient observer of history (knowing the correct description from ( 174 ) David Kaplan ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 174 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM above) who holds the answers to questions about the realities of reference (including cases of communicative disorders). 92. I am told that Donnellan has recently changed his view about whether Le Verrier could have had Neptune in mind at the time of the naming. Th is further separates Donnellan from Russell and is, perhaps, more coherent with Donnellan's idea about the transmission of having in mind . REFERENCES Ackerman, Felicia (writing under the name \"Diana\"). 1979. \"Proper Names, Propositional Attitudes, and Non-Descriptive Connotations.\" Philosophical Studies 35: 55–69. Burge, Tyler. 1977. \"Belief De Re. \" Journal of Philosophy 74: 338–62. --- . 1993. \"Content Preservation.\" Philosophical Review 102: 457–88. --- . 2009. \"Five Th eses on De Re States and Att itudes.\" In Joseph Almog and Paolo Leonardi (eds.), Th e Philosophy of David Kaplan , 246–316. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2009. Carnap, Rudolf. 1946. \"Modalities and Quantifi cation.\" Journal of Symbolic Logic 11: 33–64. --- . 1947. Meaning and Necessity. Chicago: University of Chicago Press. Cumming, Sam. 2009. \"Discourse Content.\" Available at htt p://www.philosophy.ucla.edu/ index.php/user-profi le-one/userprofi le/scumming . --- . 2010. \"Creatures of Darkness.\" Available at htt p://www.philosophy.ucla.edu/index. php/user-profi le-one/userprofi le/scumming . --- . 2011. \"A Puzzle about Indefi nites.\" Available at htt p://www.philosophy.ucla.edu/ index.php/user-profi le-one/userprofi le/scumming . Donnellan, Keith S. 1966. \"Reference and Defi nite Descriptions.\" Philosophical Review 75: 281–304. --- . 1970. \"Proper Names and Identifying Descriptions.\" Synthese 21, no. 3/4: 335–58. --- . 1974. \"Speaking of Nothing.\" Philosophical Review 83, no. 1 (1974): 3–31. --- . 1979. \"Th e Contingent A Priori and Rigid Designators.\" In Peter French et al. (eds.), Midwest Studies in Philosophy 2 , 12–27. Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press. Evans, Gareth. 1982. Th e Varieties of Reference. Oxford: Clarendon Press. Frege, Gott lob. (1879) 1952. \"Begriff sschrift .\" English translation in P. Geach and M. Black (eds.), Translations fr om the Philosophical Writings of Gott lob Frege , 1–20. Oxford: Blackwell. §8 of \"Begriff sschrift \" is translated by Michael Beaney as \"Identity of Content\" in Michael Beaney (ed.), Th e Frege Reader (Oxford: Blackwell 1997). --- . (1892) 2001. \"Über Sinn und Bedeutung.\" Zeitschrift für Philosophie und Philosophische Kritik 100: 25–50. Translated by Herbert Feigl as \"On Sense and Nominatum,\" in A. P. Martinich (ed.), Th e Philosophy of Language, 4th ed. Oxford: Oxford University Press. --- . (1918) 1997. \"Th ought.\" Translated by Geach and Stoothoff . In Michael Beaney (ed.), Th e Frege Reader. Oxford: Blackwell. --- . 1980. Frege's Philosophical and Mathematical Correspondence. Chicago: University of Chicago Press. Geach, Peter. 1969. \"Th e Perils of Pauline.\" Review of Metaphysics 23: 287–300. Heim, Irene 1982. \"Th e Semantics of Defi nite and Indefi nite Noun Phrases.\" PhD diss., University of Massachusett s, Amherst. --- . 1983. \"File Change Semantics and the Familiarity Th eory of Defi niteness.\" In R Bauerle et al. (eds.), Meaning, Use and the Interpretation of Language , 164–90. Berlin: Walter de Gruyter. Jeshion, Robin. 2010: \"Singular Th ought: Acquaintance, Semantic Instrumentalism, and Cognitivism.\" In Robin Jeshion (ed.), New Essays on Singular Th ought. Oxford: Oxford University Press. A N IDE A OF D ONNEL L A N  175  ALMOG-Chapter 08-Revised Proof 175 November 29, 2011 6:36 PM Kamp, Hans. 1981. \"A Th eory of Truth and Semantic Representation.\" In Jeroen Groenendijk et al. (eds.), Formal Methods in the Study of Language , 277–322. Amsterdam: Mathematics Center. Kaplan, David. 1968. \"Quantifying In.\" Synthese 19: 178–214. --- . 1989a. \"Aft erthoughts.\" In J. Almog, J. Perry, and H. Wett stein (eds.), Th emes fr om Kaplan , 565–614. Oxford: Oxford University Press. --- . 1989b. \"Demonstratives.\" In J. Almog, J. Perry, and H. Wett stein (eds.), Th emes fr om Kaplan , 481–563. Oxford: Oxford University Press. --- . 1990. \"Words.\" Aristotelian Society Supplementary Volume 64. --- . 2005. \"Reading 'On Denoting' on Its Centenary.\" Mind 114 (Oct.): 933–1003. Kartt unen, Lauri. 1976. \"Discourse Referents.\" Syntax and Semantics , vol. 7, Notes fr om the Linguistic Underground . Academic Press. Kripke, Saul. 1963. \"Semantical Considerations on Modal Logic.\" Acta Philosophica Fennica: Modal and Many Valued Logics : 83–94. --- . (1972) 1980. \"Naming and Necessity.\" In Gilbert Harman and Donald Davidson (eds.), Semantics of Natural Language. Dordrecht: Reidel. Revised edition published as a separate monograph, Naming and Necessity. Oxford: Basil Blackwell. References are to the revised edition. --- . 1977: \"Speaker's Reference and Semantic Reference.\" Midwest Studies in Philosophy 2: 255–76. --- . 1979. \"A Puzzle about Belief.\" In A. Margalit (ed.), Meaning and Use. Dordrecht: Reidel. McDowell. 1984. \"De Re Senses.\" Philosophical Quarterly 34: 283–94. Perry, John. 1977. \"Frege on Demonstratives.\" Philosophical Review 86: 474–97. --- . 1980. \"A Problem about Continued Belief.\" Pacifi c Philosophical Quarterly 61: 317–32. Quine Recanati, François. 2010. \"In Defense of Acquaintance.\" In Robin Jeshion (ed.), New Essays on Singular Th ought. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Russell, Bertrand. (1903) 1938. Th e Principles of Mathematics. 2nd ed. Cambridge, U.K.: Cambridge University Press. --- . (1903) 1994. \"Points about Denoting.\" In Alasdair Urquhart with the assistance of Albert C. Lewis (eds.), Th e Collected Papers of Bertrand Russell, vol. 4: Foundations of Logic 1903–05 , 305–13. London: Routledge. --- . 1905. \"On Denoting.\" Mind, ns 14: 479–93. --- . 1910–11. \"Knowledge by Acquaintance and Knowledge by Description.\" Proceedings of the Aristotelian Society, ns 11: 108–28. --- . 1912 (1961). \"Knowledge by Acquaintance and Knowledge by Description.\" In Th e Problems of Philosophy . Oxford: Oxford University Press. Reprinted (with Russell's approval) in Robert Egner et al. (eds.), Th e Basic Writings of Bertrand Russell. London: George Allen & Unwin. --- . 1961. Th e Basic Writings of Bertrand Russell , ed. Robert Egner et al. London: George Allen & Unwin. --- 1994. Th e Collected Papers of Bertrand Russell, vol. 4: Foundations of Logic 1903–05 , ed. by Alasdair Urquhart with the assistance of Albert C. Lewis. London: Routledge. Strawson, Peter. 1950. \"Referring.\" Mind , ns 59, no. 235: 320–44. Wett stein, Howard. 1986. \"Has Semantics Rested on a Mistake?\" Journal of Philosophy 83 (April): 185–209. --- . 2006. Th e Magic Prism. Oxford: Oxford University Press."}
{"meta": {"title": "An Onto-Epistemological Chronology of Plato’s Dialogues", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Ghomi, Mohammad Bagher", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "This paper aims to suggest a new arrangement of Plato’s dialogues based on a different theory of the ontological as well as epistemological development of his philosophy. In this new arrangement, which proposes essential changes in the currently agreed upon chronology of the dialogues, Parmenides must be considered as criticizing an elementary theory of Forms and not the theory of so-called middle dialogues. Dated all as later than Parmenides, the so-called middle and late dialoguesare regarded as two consecutive endeavors to resolve the problems drawn out in there; an effort in the theory of knowledge through Theaetetus, Meno and Phaedo and another in ontology through the second part of Parmenides, Sophist and Republic.", "date": "manuscript", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/GHOAOC", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2016-12-08T02:26:41Z"}, "text": "An Onto-Epistemological Chronology of Plato's Dialogues Mohammad Bagher Ghomi 1 Abstract This paper aims to suggest a new arrangement of Plato's dialogues based on a different theory of the ontological as well as epistemological development of his philosophy. In this new arrangement, which proposes essential changes in the currently agreed upon chronology of the dialogues, Parmenides must be considered as criticizing an elementary theory of Forms and not the theory of socalled middle dialogues. Dated all as later than Parmenides, the so-called middle and late dialoguesare regarded as two consecutive endeavors to resolve the problems drawn out in there; an effort in the theory of knowledge through Theaetetus, Meno and Phaedo and another in ontology through the second part of Parmenides, Sophist and Republic. Key Words: Plato; chronology; development; ontology; epistemology Introduction There are many determinative factors regarding the chronology of the dialogues about which our informationis terribly deficient. There is no certain evidence about the date of each of the dialogues, nor any reliable information about the beginning and ending time of Plato's writing. The most determinative issue among all chronological matters, I am inclined to insist, is the question that if did Plato use to manipulate or, as Dionysius of Halicarnassus said (1808, 406), polish, comb and curl his previously written dialogues and, if so, to what extent? 1 That there is almost no answer to this most crucial issue shows how far deficient, indefinite and inconclusive the chronological plans can be. 2 The fact that we do not even have enough information to decide, in case of Socratic dialogues, to what extent they are reporting or reflecting the actual dialogues of historical Socrates, and to what extent they are Plato-made stories so that even now we have a schizophrenic character between Socrates and Plato, can be good evidence for this deficiency. There are, nevertheless, somemore certain informations that can be contributive in case of the arrangement of some dialogues. a) The only external evidence provided by Aristotle that Lawswas written after Republic (Politics, II, 6) which was repeated by others 3 . b) Few internal evidences provided by references in dialogues themselves including: i) the cross references in the Sophist 217a and Politicus 257a and 258b which indicate the prior composition of Sophist; ii) Timaeus 27 which hints to Critias as its sequel; iii) Theaetetus 183e where Socrates says he met Parmenides when he was 1 PhD of philosophy, University of Tehran, mbqomi@gmail.com 2 young which has been taken as a reference to Parmenides; iv) a similar reference to the discussion of young Socrates with Parmenides this time in Sophist 217c; v) Sophist 216a refers to a previous discussion which has been thought to be referring to Theaetetus, and vi) the Timaeus 17b-19b in which Socrates tries to summarize his previous dialogue about the structure of cities, and the kind of men these cities must bring up to become the best people and so on which, among the dialogues we have now, must refer to Republic. 1. An onto-epistemological chronology These few internal and external references are not of course sufficient to offer an arrangement among more than thirty dialogues. In such a poor situation about information and the possibility of later manipulation of the dialogues, it seems the best criteria of presenting a chronology, if it can be possible at all, should be those which are the most fundamental on the basis that what is more fundamental must be the subject of change at last. Now, what kind of criteria can be chosen for an arrangement better than the ontology and the epistemology of the dialogues? Since the arrangement I am going to suggest here is to be based on the ontoepistemological status of the dialogues,I shall call itthe Onto-Epistemological Chronology of the Dialogues (OECD). Although it is, of course, more of a philosophical chronology than a style-based one, while trying not to violate both the referential and stylometric evidences, it does not focus on other features of the content of the dialogues. In fact, the arrangement that is suggested here comes closer, I believe, to the evidences. Nonetheless, it is still a revolutionary chronology, not only in its main differences with other chronologies in respect of the place of some key dialogues, but also in its formulation of the whole corpus. Whereas I am not to divide the dialogues into different periods as all the various chronologies are used to do, I classify them in different groups I call \"waves\"; a name I borrowed from Plato himself. When he gets to the theory of philosopher-king in Republic, he calls it the biggest wave which must be overpassed: I have now come to what we likened to the greatest wave (κύματι).4 (473c6-7) As each problem is like a wave for Plato that he has to overpass, each wave of dialogues focuses on resolving a main problem.Plato's philosophy can best be imagined as anocean. That his philosophy is as widespread, vast and deep as an ocean, maybe more than any other philosophy during all the history, is something that many would agree upon. It is not, nonetheless, the great and glorious character of his philosophy which is the intention of this poetical resemblance, but the characters of the waves of an ocean. Plato's dialogues can best be divided to groups that behave like waves. Like each group of his dialogues, a wave in theoceanhas a pushing force, a rising path, a high point and a fall. Each wave, independently identifiable, makes the movement of another wave possibleand so the next wave has the power of its previous waves leading it to go forward to do the same for its next wave.This 3 interwoven character of dependence-independence of each wave is what I have in mind about Plato's dialogues. Each group/wave of dialogues has a pushing force, a problem or paradox that is to be resolved in its way by some new theories and methods. The wave, thus, rises upward making both the problem and the need of its solution as radical as possible until it gets to the highest point by resolving the problem and getting to thefavourite results. Nevertheless, no solution is completely acceptable in Plato's philosophy and there are always new problems and issues. Therefore, every wave has a fall that can be the starting point of the next wave.The suggestion of waves of dialogues saysindeed that Plato's dialogues cannot be treated altogether by taking all the dialogues as a whole nor each of the dialogues singly and independent from all the other dialogues. The best is to treat couples of them as a chain that though is somehow independent has a special relation with couples of other dialogues.I distinguish four waves in Plato's dialogues as follows. i) Socratic Wave including: Alcibiades I, Alcibiades II, Apology, Clitophon, Crito, Hippias Minor, Lysis, Menexenus, Republic I, Theages, Laches, Charmides, Euthyphro, Hippias Major and Parmenides I. 5 ii) Epistemological Wave including: Protagoras, Gorgias, Euthydemus, Theaetetus, Cratylus, Meno andPhaedo. iii) Ontological Wave including: ParmenidesII, Sophist, Timaeus, Philosophos (Republic 473-541) iv) Political Wave including:Politicus, Ideal State (Republic357-473), Laws,Epinomis, Critias. Besides some maybe dubious or at least less important dialogues, I dismissed Philebus, Phaedrus andSymposiumfrom taking part in this chronology. In spite of some obvious resemblances with the dialogues of the ontological wave especially Timaeus, both in its ontological approach and even in its stylometric features, Philebus cannot be emplaced in the overall project of the waves. The ontoepistemological chronology, to be honest, is unable to read Philebus in Plato's corpus as I think none of the other chronologies could get at an acceptable explanation of its relation with the other dialogues. We have problems also to emplaceSymposium andPhaedrus in our plan. They seem to belong, nevertheless, more to the period between the epistemological and ontological waves or even coexistent with some dialogues of the latter wave.Phaedrusin which we are encountered with probably last serious echo of theory of anamnesis, 6 on the one hand, shows its close connection with Meno and Phaedo while its presenting of the method of collection and division, on the other hand, associates it to Sophist and Politicus. Contrary to most of the scholars who date the Phaedrus quite late in Plato's career 7 and afterSymposium, Moore (1973) insists on the converse relation of the two dialogues taking Phaedrus as earlier. 8 Whatever their relation might be, the similarities between the two dialogues besides their incompatibility with the epistemological and ontological waves may call for a different wave. 4 Except the first wave, of the order of its dialogues we discuss below, the dialogues of all the other three waves are arranged chronologically. When a dialogue is located after another dialogue and before a third one in the epistemological and ontological waves, it means that either its epistemological or ontologicalstatus, is between those dialogues. The case is the same about the order of the dialogues between different waves, except the last wave in which the order of the dialogues of the political wave must be considered parallel to, or interwoven with, the dialogues of the ontological wave. a) Socratic wave The first and longest wave, includes a) a group of ten dialogues (ordered alphabetically): Alcibiades I, Alcibiades II, Apology,Clitophon, Crito, Hippias Minor, Lysis, Menexenus, Republic I, Theages, b) a second group of four dialogues:Laches, Charmides, Euthyphro,HippiasMajor, and c) the first part of Parmenides. I distinguish these last five dialogues from all the other ones which are called Socratic 9 dialogues ordered alphabetically. Laches, Charmides, Euthyphro and Hippias Majormust be considered, without chronological order between themselves, after the Socratic dialogues and before the first part of Parmenides. It is not difficult to guess how surprising it looks for the reader to sea the first part of the Parmenides here in the first wave after Socratic dialogues and before all the other ones. This is the most revolutionary suggestion of OECD. The leading problem of the wave is historical Socrates' problem of acquiring knowledge reshaped by Plato in Socratic dialogues. It is this problem that leads to the theory of Forms in the Socratic dialogues and especially in Laches, Charmides, Euthyphro, Hippias Major and Parmenides I. While Hippias Major (301b2-6) criticizes the onto-epistemological grounds ofSocratic dialogues, Parmenides Icriticizes the theory of Forms as it is formulated in them. I agree that there is not enough material in there to be called a 'theory' of Forms to be criticized in ParmenidesI, but where else can such a theory be found? 10 The poor discussion of the theory in the early dialogues is the main reason that,as far as I know, noone has suggested that ParmenidesI is criticizing the theory of Forms of the early dialogues by now. As we will discuss below, the theory of Forms in those dialogues isindeed constructed in a way to escape those attacks. b) Epistmological wave This wave includes a) Pratogoras,Gorgias and b)Euthydemus,Theaetetus, Cratylus 11 , MenoandPhaedo.While I guess that Gorgias is probably later than Protagoras, I cannot be certain about their relation with the other six dialogues that are chronologically arranged. 12 I called this wave epistemological because I believe that it includesPlato's epistemological endeavor to solve the epistemological problem arisen in Parmenides I (133b-135a). 5 The backbone of this wave, however, is Plato's epistemological project from Theaetetus to Phaedo where 1) by the distinction of knowledge and true opinion, (a) the epistemological problems of the early dialogues are resolved and (b) the epistemological ground for the theory of Forms is provided (cf. Tim. 51d3-5); 2) by the doctrine of anamnesis, the method of hypothesis and the theory of Forms as causes, the epistemological problem resulted from the separation of the Forms and their participant as it had been drawn out at Parmenides 133b-135a, is resolved. The epistemological wave includes, thus, some essential modifications in Plato's theory of knowledge to save the theory of Forms as well as to solve some of the epistemological problems of the early dialogues. This means that this wave is an epistemological project, a doctrine that may not be accepted by some scholars. Charles Kahn, for instance, thinks that in what he calls the 'series of dialogues from the Meno to the Phaedrus', not only is not any sign of linear development, in which different epistemological theories replace each other, but 'different concepts of knowledge are used in different contexts for different purposes' (2006, 130). Although the epistemological wave does not say that there actually is a unique theory, it emphasizes the unity of a project or process. Moreover, some kind of a linear development from Theaetetus to Republic through Meno and Phaedo can be recognizable, but not a development of replacing different theories but a development of theory that gets enriched and more sophisticated. The complicated epistemological theory of Republic as is construed in the allegory of line can reasonably be taken as the development of the theory of the distinction of knowledge and belief in Theaetetusand Meno. c) Ontological wave The four dialogues of Parmenides II, Sophist, Timaeus, Philosophos 13 construct the ontological wave.These four dialogues have in themselves Plato's brilliant endeavor to solve the following problems by presenting a new ontology: i) Theontological problems of the early dialogues which was itself the ontological aspect of the problem of false belief 14 needed a change of approach to being. This shift was doneby accepting the being of not being based on the creative theory of 'difference'that is initiated in Parmenides II and attains to its fulfillment in Sophistand Timaeusand is used inTimaeusandPhilosophos. ii) The problems of participation (131a-e) and Third Man (TM) (132a-b,132d-133a) in Parmenides Ithatareresolved by the new theory ofbeing inSophistand the new theory of Forms inPhilosophos. The ontological wave, therefore, is to make Plato's main modification in his understanding of being that results in the refutation ofParmenides' principle and Plato's achievement to a new notion of being that cannot be the subject of the previous problems, neither the problems ofHippiasMajor(301b2-6) norParmenides I. 6 4. Political wave This wave is not chronologically separated from the ontological wave but gets along it as a somewhat synchronous wave. Although the dialogues of this wave, Politicus, Ideal state 15 (RepublicII-V), Laws, Epinomis and Critias are arranged chronologically after one another, their dates can be neither before nor after the ontological wave, save the publication of Laws which is almost certainly the last one of all the dialogues and after Plato's death. Politicus was certainly written after Sophist and probably before Ideal state which itself must have been composed before both the Laws and Timaeus.Epinomis, if it has been written by Plato himself that is strongly dubious, must be dated after the composition of Laws. The order of the dialogues of the two ontological and political waves, considered together, must be something like this: Parmenides II, Sophist, Politicus, Ideal state,Laws (composition),Epinomis, Timaeus, Critias, Philosophos/Republic, Laws (publication). The overall scheme of Plato's dialogues based on our arrangement of them is drawn in scheme 1 below. Scheme 1. Waves of Dialogues Hippias Major Socratic Dialogues: Alcibiades I &II, Apology, Clitophon, Crito, Hippias Minor, Lysis, Menexenus, Republic I, Theages Parmenides I Euthyphro Charmides Laches Timaeus Philosophos Sophist Parmenides II Republic Laws (Comp.) Ideal State Critias Politicus Gorgias Protagoras Phaedo Theaetetus Cratylus Euthydemus Meno 7 The development of Plato's philosophy based on our onto-epistemological investigation will be something like scheme 2 below. Plato who had started the Socratic wave with Socrates' search of knowledge as the motivating force of the wave provides a theory of Forms thatis referred to in dialogues like Laches, Euthyphro, 16 Charmides and Hippias Major. This theory is the very theory which Allen (2013) calls the 'earlier theory of Forms'; a theory that, as Allen argues (ibid, 67ff.), cannot be identified with thetheory of Forms presented in the dialogues of the so-called middle period. The onto-epistemologicalgrounds of these dialogues turn out as problematic in Hippias Major (301b2-6), as the theory of Form turns out to be problematic in the first part of Parmenides. Here is the first and biggest turning point of Plato's philosophy where based on those critiques, he tries to reconstruct his philosophy by changing the epistemological and ontological principles of his philosophy. The first effort is an effort in the theory of knowledge. In spite of the problems related to the false belief in Euthydemus and Theaetetus, knowledge turns out to be distinctfrom opinion in Theaetetus. This is, I think, the main goal of Theaetetus. 17 This distinction provides the epistemological grounds for the theory of anamnesis and the method of hypothesis in Meno andPhaedo, theories that are to resolvethe epistemological problem ofParmenides. Since besides the ontological aspect of the problem of false belief, the problems of participation and TM are still annoying not received their answers in the epistemological wave, the ontological wave tries to resolve them. These problems made Plato launch another wave, this time trying to change the theory of being. The starting point of the wave is the second part of theParmenides where the Parmenidean notions of being and unity are to be attacked. This attack has at least three important results: i) separating oneness from being in Parmenides' 'One Being', ii) accepting that ParmenideanOne and Being are problematic and finally iii) introducing the notion of 'difference'. Plato makes use of these results in Sophist, TimaeusandPhilosophos.The points (i) and (ii) lead in Sophist to the rejection of Parmenidean absolute being and provides a new relation between being and difference which makes resolving the problem of false belief possible.The new relation of being and difference helps to resolve the problems of participation and TM. Therefore, at the end of the ontological wave, the onto-epistemological problems of the early dialogues and the problems of the theory of Forms in Parmenides are all resolved. The development of Plato's thought based on our thesis is shown in Scheme 2 below. 8 Scheme 2. Plato's Onto-Epistemological Development Now it is time to defend the place of the dialogues that made the main changes in the current chronologies and turned it to OECD, namely Parmenides I, Euthydemus, Theaetetus, Parmenides II, Sophist, Timaeus, Republic and Laws. Anamnesis Resolution of P6: Knowledge of Forms Hypothesis Forms as Causes Knowledge ≠Opinion Parmenidean Ontology Socratic Epistemology Theory of Forms Problem of False Belief Resolution of P2-3-5: originalcopy model Ontology of Sophist and Republic NotBeing is One ≠ Same Being & Difference Good & Knowledge One ≠Being One & Good P5. Paradi gms P1. Forms for all things P2. Partici pation P6. Epistemolog ical Problem P4. Forms as Thought P3. Third Man Parmenides 9 2. Parmenides I 18 The place of Parmenides in the current chronologies is the cause of many problems. Not only the problems of Parmenides I, on the one hand,cannot be correctly appliable to the middle dialogues, butthere are problems either to observe its problems as invalid or valid. The main problem out of the place of Parmenides in the current chronologies, generally speaking, is that theycannot provide a consistent story of Plato's development in which Parmenides can have its deserving role. By the new place of this dialogue in OECD, we are not only to make the story consistent, but to dedicate the most prominent role to the dialogue. All Plato does in the socalled middle and late dialogues is going to be interpreted in OECD as Plato's two efforts in the theories of knowledge and being to resolve the problems of Parmenides I. To set Parmenides I at the end of the early dialogues and before all the other dialogues is the most astonishing and, at the same time, the most vital decisionof OECD. In fact, what changes the current chronologies to OECD is a new story of the development of Plato's thought based on the problems of the theory of Forms in Parmenides I.The new place of Parmenides in OECD can, I think, be explainedwell regarding what happens in the dialogues both before and after it. In relation to the other dialogues of the Socratic wave its place is so dramatic. Having challenged the Athenian interlocutors, Socrates (the wisest man of Athen),and his theory of Forms (the very instrument by which he used to refuse his interlocutors because they were not able to explain what a thing itself, i.e. the Form, is) are now the subject of the attacks of Parmenides, a non-Athenian, in almost the same way of the dialogue.Respecting the dialogues after it, what is done in Plato's other dialogues from Theaetetus to Phaedo in the epistemological and from Parmenides II to Philosophos in the ontological waves is nothing but Plato's effort to reconstruct his theory of Forms with his new doctrines and methods in epistemology and ontology. The best reason for accepting OECD'splace forParmenides Iis what happened in the dialogues of both the epistemological and the ontological waves. i) There appears to be a problem about OECD's place for Parmenides: where is that theory of Forms that is to be observed as the subject of Parmenides' problems? Since it is as long as a history that we are accustomed to recognize Plato's theory of Forms with what is suggested in Phaedo and Republic, it might then be wondrous to hear that Parmenides is criticizing the theory as it is in Euthyphro, Laches and HippiasMajor alongside some other Socratic dialogues and not as is proposed in Phaedo and Republic. First, if we mean by a theory a doctrine fully and completely 'constructed', I agree that there cannot be found such a theory in the early dialogues as it cannot be found anywhere else in the other dialogues as well. It is somewhat related to Plato's way of introducing his theories but is more, I think, related to the theory of Forms itself. Comparing with the theory of Forms, the doctrine of anamnesis, for example, as it is introduced and articulated in Meno and Phaedo or, even more obviously, the method of hypothesis in Phaedo and Republic are far better 10 theorized and constructed. It shows that Plato was able to construct a theory of Forms in some of his dialogues instead of reminding the theory dispersedly here and there. It indicates, I think, that he was hesitant to theorize it from the beginning. It is not, therefore, reasonable to expect him to provide such a theory at the outset and in his early dialogues when he is wavering about it even at his much later dialogues. Second, besides Plato's oral tradition, there actually exists a theory of Forms in the early writingsthe dialogues which have been considered by OECD as earlier than Parmenidesif we do not expect a fully constructed theory. This theory which is called by Allen (2013) as the 'earlier theory of Forms', differs in some essential features from the theory of Forms as construed in some of the dialogues of the epistemological and ontological waves (the so-called middle period dialogues). While the 'earlier' theory has some features that make it vulnerable to the attacks of Parmenides, the theory of the so-called middle period dialogues tries to resolve them. The way in which the theory tries to resolve the problems is discussed in the next section below. Nonetheless, the main point is that the universal 19 and unequipped Forms of the early dialogues turn to the Forms, which became much more equipped (by new theories) and even considered as paradigms (especially in Republic). Thirdly, the naive and elementary way of discussing and defending the theory by young Socrates who is ready more to suggest different views than defending one firm and fixed theory, approves that there is no such theory yet. Thus, I take Socrates'epiphet, \"young\", in Parmenides as functional because Parmenides refers to it as a cause of the naivety of the theory (e.g., 130e, 135c-d). 20 The critics of Hippias Major (301bf.), thirdly, can indicate how Plato did criticize his own theories in the Socratic wave. In spite of the fact that we cannot find anywhere in the dialogues before Hippias Major where Socrates be saying that he is cutting up things in words and so on, this attitude of Socrates is criticized in there. This shows that Parmenides' critiques can be read in the same way and there may be no necessity of finding more than what we have about the theory of Forms in the written works of the Socratic wave. ii) Resolution of Parmenides' problems in the middle period dialogues The chronologists' biggest assumption that Parmenides' objections must refer to the middle dialogues (e.g., Cornford, 1939, 70-71; Palmer, 1999, 180; Kahn, 1996, 329) cannot be accepted because both the problems and their answers are already worked upon there (for example cf. Meinwald, 1992, 372; Dorter, 1989, 200). We are not to claim that Plato answers directly to the objections of Parmenides in the dialogues of the second and third waves for such answers cannot be found anywhere in Plato's corpus even in his so-called late period dialogues. What we insist upon is that the epistemological and ontological grounds of the theory of Forms as is represented in the middle period dialogues is deliberately constructed so as not to be broken by those criticisms anymore. We suggest, thus, that not only Parmenides' 11 problems are not referred to the middle period dialogues but they are intentionally resolved there. Of the six main objections, i) the problem of Forms for all, even worthless, things (130c-d), ii) the problems of participation (131), iii) the problem of TM (132ab), iv) the problem of considering Forms as thoughts (132b-c), v) the problem of Forms as paradigms (132d) and vi) the epistemological problems of taking Forms as separated from particulars (133a-135a), putting aside the first and the fourth, we consider the third and the fifth as one, the regress problem or the problem of TM. Since TM difficulty, it seems, arises from a certain relation between a Form and its participants, all the second, third and fifth problems have the same basis.Therefore, if it can be shown that a) the problem of participation and alsoTM problem and b) the epistemological problem are resolved in some of the dialogues of the middle period, OECD's place for Parmenides will be better justified. 1) Problems of participation and Third Man in the Republic Allen argues that though, for Plato, the just itself is just and the beautiful itself beautiful, this does not imply SP because for this, the function \"... is F\" must be applied univocally to F itself and F particulars. This univocal application of F to F itself and F particulars, Allen says, can be correct only if both of them 'have identically the same character' (1998, 58) which obviously is not the case. He points that for Plato, both in the early and middle dialogues, Forms are paradigms or standards, that is they are 'things characterized not characters' (ibid, 64) and Plato did not think of themin the way he used to in the early dialogues and as common characters. 21 'Not only the regress arguments', he says, 'but all of the objections to participation in the Parmenides posit an identity of character between Forms and particulars' (ibid). The rejection of the identity of F in F itself and F particulars based on the theory of Forms as paradigms in the original-copy model is justified because Forms stand to particulars 'not as predicates stand to instances of predicates but as originals stand to shadows or reflections' (1961, 333 cf. 335). F. C. White thinks not only thatthe original-copy theorycannot be ascribed to all the dialogues of the so-called middle period dialogues but also that it cannot be helpful in meeting TM 22 (1977, 208). His reason is that if images are images at all, it is due to the fact that their properties are 'univocally in common with their originals' (ibid, cf.199). My own point of view is that while TM is not appliable to Republic, it is appliable to all the other so-called middle dialogues. I agree with White that i) there is no common theory in the middle dialogues about the nature of the relation between the Forms and their participants; ii) the original-copy model is not appliable to Phaedo 23 ; iii) the original-copy model cannot be helpful regarding SP. Nonetheless, I absolutely disagree with him about its help to TM. What I think is that while Plato has always been committed to SP, he tried in Republic to present the original-copy model that is completely helpful against TM. Plato does not try to reject TM by rejecting SP as some think, but he tries to reject TM while maintaining 12 SP. Because of the difference between original and its shadow, the original-copy model of the theory of Forms, as Allen noted, escapes TM. The reason is that by this theory, the nature of participation changes in a way that the identity of a Form and its participants is not the case anymore. This ontology, amongst so-called middle dialogues I confine to Republic, changes the nature of participation so that neither Parmenides' problem of participation nor TM will be appliable anymore. Not only does not it reject SP but it even strengthen it. It is primarily and completely the Form of F which is F; a participant's being F must be understood in a different way. A paradigm of F is the perfect example of being F. The paradigm of F is not Fness but F itself. The difference between F-ness and F itself can become evident if we examin SP about them: While SP is correct and meaningful about F itself, it looks bizarre and unacceptable about F-ness. Large itself, the paradigm of Large, its perfect example, is obviously large because it is nothing but this being large and thus SP is obviously meaningful here. But about F-ness: 'Largeness is large' or 'beauty is beautiful' looks completely unacceptable because F-ness or the concept of F cannot itself be F. TM is also based on the assumption that Plato's theory of Forms makes a Form necessary when there is a common thing between some things. It only by understands the Form of F as F-ness, a universal concept which is in common between a Form and its participants, that the necessity of the existence of what is common between them is followed. If Forms are not universal concepts but originals of which all participants are shadows, there will be no necessity for a third thing to represent the common feature. Therefore, Plato's original-copy model of his theory of Forms changes the relation between a Form and its participants in a way that none of the problems of participation and regress arguments of Parmenides can be effective anymore. The case is different about Phaedo because the original-copy model and the theory of Forms as paradigms are not yet theorized there. 24 2) The Epistemological Problem Besides the distinction of knowledge and true belief which can clearly be helpful for the epistemological problem, Plato's three famous doctrines, the theory of anamnesis, the method of hypothesis and the theory of Forms as causes, do substantially aim at solving the epistemological problem resulted from the chōrismōsbetween the Forms and their particulars. 25 a) While the first appearance of the theory of anamnesisin Meno (81) is not about Forms,it is Phaedo, however, where the epistemological function of the theory is straightly directed to the Forms. Allen's view in linking between the theory of anamnesis and the 'epistemological problem entailed by the separation of Forms and particulars' worths noting. He thinks that if the theory is an answer to this epistemological problem, it is not reasonable to say that the theory in Meno is not directed to the problem (1959, 172). I admit Allen's note that the difference of the theory of anamnesis in the Meno and Phaedo is that the theory in the Phaedo solves problems generated by a χωρισμός between Forms and particulars which Plato, 13 when he wrote the Meno, was perhaps groping for, but had not yet clearly formulated (ibid, 174). The prior knowledge of the Forms does obviously intend to solve the problem of knowing separated Forms. By this theory, our knowledge is not restricted to our own world anymore and it cannot be said, as is claimed at Parmenides 134a-b, that none of the Forms are known by us and thus the knowledge of Forms is not a problem any longer. They are not still in us and, therefore, do not have their being in relation to the things that belong to our world strictly as it is said at Parmenides 133c-d. Consequently, the theory of anamnesis suggests a solution to the problem of knowledge of Forms while keeping them separated. The gap between Forms and things is as complete and huge as it is in Parmenides 133e. Here they are even more separatedthen ever. It is the big presupposition of many Plato's commentators that he must have tried to diminish or eliminate the chōrismōs had he wanted to resolve the epistemological problem of Parmenides. Based on this presumption, Plato should have chosen the first and most simple way of solving problem. Thence we can see while the theory of anamnesis is so much obviously directed to the epistemological problem, no one tends to take it as a post-Parmenides thesis. b) As the doctrine of anamnesisis presented as a solution to Meno's problem, the method of hypothesis is suggested as another solution to the problem (Meno 86d8-e5 cf. 87a-b). The relation of the method with Meno's paradox in the mentioned passages is obvious enough. Phaedo's more complicated and better-constructed method which is not simply applying geometrians' method as it was in Meno, but a more philosophical and specified one, is still related with the problem of investigating something that is out of the region of our knowledge. Socrates' warning about the danger of watching directly an eclipse of the sun (99d-e) before discussing the method (100a f.) can throw light on this relation. Socrates who is searching for the causes is afraid of his soul completely being blind if he looks at things directly as someone who watches an eclipse of the sun might become blind in his eyes. As the one who wants to watch the eclipse must first see its reflection in water and similar things, Socrates who wants to find the aitiai, i. e. Forms, must use the hypotheses. Therefore, the method of hypothesis is to be, firstly, a method of getting the knowledge of the Forms (100a6). Immediately after the definition of the method at 100a, its relation with Forms becomes apparent at 100b f. The use of the method in the allegory of Line in Republicis also related with the Forms, though, contrary to Meno and Phaedo, it has nothing to do with anamnesis. While this method is not used in the dialectical proceeding from images to sensible things and then to the mathematical objects, the hypotheses are needed to proceed from them to the Forms and then to the first principle. Socrates' reference to the method of geometers saying 'they make these their hypotheses and do not think it necessary to give any account of them, either to themselves or to others, as if they were clear to everyone' (510c6-d1), indicates his intention, i.e. using Forms in an epistemological construction which, though has knowledge as its result, is not forced to explain Forms themselves. This is strictly directed against the epistemological problems arisen in Parmenides 134a-c. 14 c) Phaedo's theory of Forms as causes has clearly the epistemological function of the Forms as its purpose.The result Socrates gets to about the role of Forms in explanation, that only whatshares in a Form by its nature, refuses its opposite while it is itself, means that we can explain a thing not only by a Form but also by what always has its character (103e2-5). Everything that shares in a Form by nature is always called with that Form and can never be called by the opposite: It cannot 'admit that Form which is opposite to that which it is' (104b9-10). This helps him reach to some kind of necessary opposition between things that are not the opposites (105a6b1) which enables him to extend his previous safe and foolish theory of explanation by Forms to another not foolish but still safe theory of explanation (105b6-c6). Socrates' effort to show how Forms, without themselves being the explanation, can help us reach to a safe explanation of things is against Parmenides' problem (133c134a) that Forms cannot help to the knowledge of particulars. iii) That Plato wants to restart his search of knowledge in Theaetetus due to the previous arisen problems of knowledge in Parmenides I, is what was somehow agreed upon also in the other chronologies. In this respect, its place in OECD is the same, the beginning of a wave that is to resolve the problems of knowledge by redefining what knowledge is.The main step of the dialogue, I think, is the conclusion that knowledge is not true belief (187b ff.), nor true belief plus account (201d ff.) which has the distinction ofknowledge and beliefas its result. The vital role of this distinction for the theory of Forms is obvious enough from Timaeus 51d3-5: if understanding and true opinion are two kinds, then Forms must exist. ThatTheaetetusmust be posited after Parmenides is something almost all the current chronologies agree with. The difference is that OECD considers it as the starting point of an epistemological effort proceeding to Meno and Phaedo and thus a hopeful effort that gets to its own goals namely establishing the epistemological grounds for the theory of Forms. It is Theaetetus' distinction of knowledge and true opinion that is restated inMeno (85c-d, cf. 97a-98b) which is related tothe case of the slave boy and the doctrine of anamnesis; a doctrine thathas the duty of resolving the problem of knowledge of the separated Forms in Parmenides I (133b-135a).This doctrine is reformulated in Phaedo (72e ff.) and gets to its, what we may be allowed to call, cosmological explanation in Phaedrus. The method of hypothesis has the duty of making us capable of getting the knowledge of what we do not know (Meno 86ef.), the knowledge of particulars out of the hypothesized knowledge of the separated Forms (Phaedo101df.) and the knowledge of the separated Forms and the first principle out of the opinions we have of the sensibles (Republic510bf.). Therefore, the epistemological wave is a project of resolving the epistemological problem of Parmenides using the interrelated doctrines of the distinction of knowledge and belief, anamnesis and the method of hypothesis.The theory of Forms as causes in Phaedo can be interpreted in this way as well. ii) After the absence of the theory of Forms in Theaetetus 26 , Cratylus and Meno 27 , surprisingly we see in the other dialogues of both the epistemological and ontological 15 waves that Socrates asks his interlocutors to accept the existence of the Forms only as a hypothesis. At Phaedo 100b4-8 28 after recalling that he has never stopped speaking about the Forms, Socrates says: I turn back to those often mentioned things and proceed from them taking as hypothesis the existence (ὑποθέμενος εἶναί) of the beautiful, itself by itself, and Good and Great and all the others. If you grant this and agree (ἃεἴ μοι δίδως τε καὶ συγχωρει ς εἶναι ταῦτα) I hope to show you the cause.... It is of the highest importance to ask why Socrates who used to take the existence of the Forms for granted in the early dialogues (e.g., Euthyphro 6d-e, Hippias Major 287, 289d, 292e, 294d, Laches 191e-192a) 29 now is demanding that we accept it only as a hypothesis? 30 Is it not simply because their existence had been seriously attacked in Parmenides I? If we agree with OECD that the first part of the Parmenideshad been composed before such hypothesizings of Forms, it can be more understandable. Now, what OECD says provides a more consistent story: solutions provided in those dialogues are purposely directed to the problems that had been drawn out before. iv) With OECD's arrangement, we do accept that the problems of Parmenides were valid in Plato's point of view and hence we are not subject of the objection IX. OECD is safe regarding the objection X since: a) Aristotle's ignorance of Plato's self-criticism as it is shown in Parmenides' problems, are lot more understandable by OECD's arrangement than by the theory of those who take the problems valid. Considering Parmenidesas prior to the dialogues like Phaedoand Republic,where the theory is discussed more than anywhere else, could make Aristotle'sinadvertence more understandable because Parmenides goes farther 31 from them in time and thus more negligible and Plato's Forms-defending dialogues of the two waves after the Socratic wave provides no room to doubt that he believes in his theory. Even if Aristotle, who never mentions any development in Plato's thought, had seen Parmenides (something we are not sure about), he must have taken it either as an old dialogue without any significant importance because there was no sign of rejection in Plato'sactual way of treating with the theory or as a pedagogicdialogue. Whatever the relation of Aristotle and Parmenides might have been, having in mind Aristotle's attacks against the theory of Forms, we can be almost sure that he did not see Plato as a self-criticizing philosopher. It might be the same about the Academy. V) None of the stylometric evidences agrees with the current place for Parmenides and the irregularities of Parmenides' style regarding so-called late dialogues has always been surprising for many scholars. The case is totally different with OECD because most of thestylometric evidences show that Parmenidesis closer to the early or middle dialogues than the late ones. 16 3. Euthydemus I am not personally satisfied with OECD's place for Euthydemus. It must probably placed after Parmenides I, maybe before Theaetetus or during the time between Theaetetus and Meno.From an epistemological point of view, its discussion of false belief belongs to the period that is engaged with the problem of false belief, that is, in OECD, between Theaetetus and Sophist. The problem of learning either what one knows or what one does not know (276d) resembles Meno's paradox. Euthydemus, however, seems to be, epistemologically, close to Theaetetus and before it but ontologically prior to Sophist. The problems of the possibility of telling lies (283e), impossibility of false speaking (86c-d) and the paradox of knowing or not knowing (293c-d) all belong, epistemologically, to the period of the Theaetetusand Meno. Moreover, the definition of knowing as having knowledge (ἔχειν ἐπιστήμην) at 277b9-c1 can be considered as related with the same theory at Theaetetus 197b1 and prior to the distinction of having and possessing knowledge that follows it. Nonetheless, Euthydemus has neither any clear discussion of the distinction of knowledge and belief nor of the theory of Forms. All these can allow us to consider it epistemologically close to Theaetetus and prior to it 32 . Futhermore, this place does not affect the currentattitudes insofar as they consider it either as an early or transitional dialogue that is prior to Meno. The difference is then about its place regarding Parmenides I and Theaetetus. 4. Theaetetus and Sophist Both the current chronologies and OECD agree upon positing Theaetetus after Parmenides, but they differina) the place of Parmenides and b) Theaetetus'distance fromSophist. By bringing Parmenides to an earlier period while keeping Sophistcloser to the place it had before, the OECD'splan make a long distance between Theaetetus and Sophist consideringat least MenoandPhaedoin between. Here are our proofs for this arrangement: i) We believe thatMeno's discussion of the distinction of knowledge and opinion (97a-b, 97d-98b) must be posterior to Theaetetus' distinction (187bff., 201dff.) simply because while it is demonstrated in the latter, it is only used in the former. Phaedo highly resemblesMeno and, as it isgenerally agreed, belongs to the same period. ii) MenoandPhaedointend to resolve a) the problem of false beliefas it was drawn out in Euthydemus and Theaetetus and b) the epistemological problem of ParmenidesI, both epistemologically. The interrelated doctrines of the distinction between knowledge and opinion, anamnesis and the method of hypothesis try to solve those problems by a new theory of knowledge. Sophist, on the contrary, intends to deal with the problems ontologically. While the theory of anamnesis explains how we can have such a thing as true belief distinct from knowledge, which itself is kind of resolving the problem of false belief, it cannot explain how false belief can 17 ontologically be possible because it needs that the being of not being be accepted first, a thesis that is not accepted before Sophist. We also noted thatbesides the second part of Parmenides, Sophistcannot be later than Republic because it is in Sophistthat the being of not being is accepted before to be used in Republic. Now, a careful consideration of this fact besides the above discussion of the epistemological mission of Theaetetus, Meno and Phaedo to resolve the problems of (a) and (b) epistemologically, lead us to the important result that these last three dialogues,being unable to resolve the problems ontologically, tried to present epistemological solutions.This means that they were prior to the Sophist-Republic solutions because the ontological solution does not require the epistemological solution. OECD seems to be, therefore, right to make the epistemological wave prior to the ontological one. An evidence of this is the absence of the theory of anamnesis in Republic. Why it never appears in there? Mentioning the myth of Er at 619bff.and the later incarnation at 498d as evidence, Kahn (2006, 130) thinks that 'something like' anamnesis is actually presupposed in Republic. Nonetheless, he agrees that it does not appear in an epistemological context. Our question, nonetheless, is exactly about the absence of the epistemological role of the theory in Republic. Kahn (ibid) thinks that the omission of the theory in Republic is not because Plato changed his mind about knowledge. He notes that at 518c Plato is clearly a kind of innatist. Having the allegory of Cave in mind, his suggestion is that it has some rhetorical and artistic instead of conceptual and philosophical reasons. He thinks that the theory does not fit with exactly the same part of the Republic we departed as Philosophos, i.e., from the end of the book V to the end of the book VII. I hope my discussion about Plato's development can show why the theory is not needed anymore in Republic. This is an onto-epistemological and thus, contrary to Kahn, a philosophical reason. The omission of the theory in Republic is simply because by the new metaphysics suggested in the mentioned books of Republic, there is no need to the theory of anamnesis anymore. The classification of being and knowledge as it is drawn in the allegory of Line and the dialectical search of knowledge from the lower classes to the upper ones which is itself based on Republic's specific theory of hypothesis can provide the knowledge of Forms without having them before, i.e. without anamnesis. iii) What is the reason for consideringSophist immediately after Theaetetus? What is the reason for considering Theaetetus with Sophist, Politicus and Parmenides as Eleatic dialogues as, for instance, Dorter (1994) does except that their characters are from Elea? It is obvious that Theaetetus' reference at 183eand Sophist's at 217c to Parmenides do not prove anything more than that they are post-Parmenides dialogues. Even Sophist's reference at 216a to Theaetetus cannot mean more than that it is a later dialogue. The distance between these two dialogues can easily be shown by the obvious stylometric differences of Theaetetus on the one hand, and Sophist and Politicus on the other hand. While Sophist obviously belongs to the late period dialogues, Theaetetus, as Tarrant notes, 'approximates less to the style of the late dialogues as measured by stylometry than do the later books of the Republic' 18 (2000, 37). All the time references of the dialogues that yesterday we had such a discussion (Sophist 216a) or tomorrow will continue the other one (Theaetetus 210d) are, I think, only dramatic considerations and cannot be taken as exact chronological time distances. 33 What these references can at most signify is that one dialogue has the other dialogue in mind either dramatically or philosophically by intending to continue the issue or resolvethe problems that had been drawn in those dialogues, as Sophist continues the issues of both Theaetetusand Parmenides II. To say that some times after writing Theaetetus, Plato decided to write another dialogue with some of the same characters especially Theaetetus and as its sequel, probably because he wanted to pursue the same problem, 34 namely the problem of false belief, but this timewith a new ontological attitude, is quite more acceptable than Ryle's suggestion (1966, 284) that Plato kept Sophist and Politicus in his shelf, a suggestion that was mostly based on the stylometric evidence. The generally agreed supposition that Theaetetus and Sophist are sequel or, as Ryle says,'a sort of sequel' 35 (1939, 316) has even more problems. Theaetetus, firstly, is clearly a more close to the Socratic dialogues and is far less complicated than Sophist. Secondly, the method of collection and division to which Sophist is so bounded is almost absent in Theaetetus. The trilogy of dialogues promised at Sophist 217a3, thirdly, discussing sophist, stateman and philosopher starts with Sophistand not Theaetetus. 36 The ontological status of Sophist, fourthly and most importantly, is incomparable with that of Theaetetus that means they must belong to different periods. iv) Unlike Sophist and Republic that are inclined to distinguish between the objects of knowledge and belief, Theaetetus' epistemological theories like the theories of Meno and Phaedo do not make distinction between the objects. In the analogy of block of wax, the difference of two men, one judging truly while the other falsely, are explained in their waxes (194c-e). Whereas the wax of the soul of one man is deep, abundant and smooth and hence the signs that are imprinted on are lasting, it is vice versa in another one: hard, shaggy, rugged and without depth which in not well imprintable and hence does not have distinct impressions making it liable to false judgment. The problem of false belief is to be treated here in this analogy by a subjective analysis trying to make the difference in the knower and not in the object of knowing. The analogy of Aviary is also the same in this respect: possessing (κεκτῆθαι) and having (ἔχειν) are distinct but not by their objects. It is the same object, a coat, that you have when you are wearing it, but you possess when though you have bought it, you are not wearing it now (197b8-10). A man who has birds in his aviary possesses them but he does not have them in his control and his hand unless he will (c1-5). So is the knowledge (197e). The birds are the same whether you have or possess them. What is different is the knower's situation and not the known. It is exactly this kind of difference in the side of the knower that is to be taken as the explanation of the distinction of knowledge and true belief in Meno. True opinions are resembled to the statues of Daedalus that run away and escape if not tied down: true opinions become 19 knowledge (ἐπιστήμαι γίγονται) after being tied down (98a5-6) because knowledge differs from true opinion in being tied down (διαφέρει δεσμῷ ἐπιστήμη ὀρθῆς δόξης) (a7-8) which is itself done by the αἰτίας λογισμῷ (a34). The fact that there is obviously no distinction between the objects of knowledge and true opinion in Theaetetus and Meno keeps them far from Sophist and Republic where the being of not being makes a third status, ἔοικος, which is taken as the object of opinion and distinct from the object of knowledge. The case of Cratylus is much the same as Theaetetus. The explanation presented there about the word doxa based on toxon meaning shooting a bow (420b), has a sign of its closeness to Theaetetus. Moreover, false speaking is still impossible (429c, 430c). So it can be said that while Theaetetus, Cratylus and Meno have distinguished between knowledge and true belief, they have not yet reached to its ontological correspondent. 5. Parmenides II The second part of Parmenides that Palmer rightly calls 'the most puzzling and controversial text in the Platonic corpus' (1999, 148) is the only part in a dialogue that is totally different from its complementary part. Nowhere else can we make such an apparent distinction between parts of a dialogue. From Parmenides 137ff. we have a long chain of arguments hypothesizing various propositions regarding Parmenides' \"One\" and again hypothesizing their opposites making an inescapable labyrinth. Its obvious differencefrom the first part of the dialogue makes the idea of Parmenides as an assembled dialogue more probable; an idea thathas been suggested by some commentators. 37 i) The second part of the Parmenides is the initiating point of a new effort to save the theory of Forms. What Plato had tried to do in the epistemological wave was to provide solutions for the epistemological problem of Parmenides, but the problem of participation and TMare still fatal at the end of the epistemological wave. He had to start thus from the same point, i.e., Parmenides. This was not, nevertheless, his only reason to choose Parmenides as Socrates' interlocutor to attach this new writing to the previously written dialogue with him but there was a more principal reason. He needed to go beyond Parmenides' notion of One Being and this, I believe, was his main reason. What were to be reassessed was (1) Parmenides'principle of the tight attachment of \"one\" and \"being\"as the cause of his famous principle that 'being is one' and (2) Parmenideanunderstanding of \"being\" which was the cause of his principle of the impossibility of being of not being. In agreement with many commentators, I think ParmenidesII is the first step of Plato's going beyond these two notions, and this can be observed as a major purpose of the dialogue. It is in this passage that Plato criticizes the relation of being and the same (162d) which can be considered both as the basis and thenecessary result of Parmenides' principle, 'Being is one'. Thiscriticism that makes use of the notion of difference (143b) is only the preparatory step of his use of this notion in Sophist (255d ff.) by which the 20 Parmenidean principle of the impossibility of being of not being is rejected. If we read Parmenides II and Sophistas the sequel steps of an ontological project, we can see how the project of rejecting Parmenidean notions of One and Being leads to the notion of difference which itself is the basis of Plato'snew ontology in Sophist and Republic. This ontology has the solution of Parmenides I's problems of participation and TMand, at the same time, the problem of false belief. The second part of theParmenidesmust then be dated after the epistemological wave and as the starting point of the ontological wave.Why can't we, one might ask, observe this ontological wave parallel to, or interwoven with, the epistemological wave? My main reason for the chronological order of two waves is that the dialogues of the epistemological wave, or at least Menoand Phaedo, are still unaware of the ontological wave's solution. ii) The place of Parmenides II in OECD differs in two main regards from its place in the current chronologies: Theaetetus and Republic; while the contemporary chronologiesare accustomed to consider Parmenides, and consequently its second part, before Theaetetus and after Republic, we are suggesting its contrary in OECD. The change OECD implements regarding the place of these three dialogues is mostly because Parmenides II must ontologically be considered between Theaetetus and Republic. Theaetetus' all epistemological efforts to answer the question 'what is knowledge?' (145a) with theories like knowledge is perception (151e ff.) or true judgment (187b) or true judgment plus an account (201d) besides the analogies of block of wax (191c-e), the Aviary (197bff.) and the analogy of knowledge to birdand the explanation of getting knowledge as hunting,all still are Plato's epistemological efforts and do not think about the ontological solution. Regarding ontological issues, they are still faithful to Parmenidesand are not to challenge his principles as Parmenides II does. 38 It is directly asserted at 180e-181a that Socrates got stuck between Parmenidean and Heraclitean theories and wants to put a fight and escape. This effort, however, does not bring it to the point of Parmenides II.At Theaetetus167a7-8we are being said that 'it is impossible to opine what is not (οὔτε γὰρ τὰ μὴ ὄντα δυνατὸν δοξάσαι)' and at 189a10: 'opining not being is opining nothing (μὴ ὄν δοξάζων οὐδὲν δοξάζει)'. In Parmenides II, we have not still gone out of Parmenides'dominance but the first step is taken. At 160e, we are encountered with the necessity of dealing with not being with some adjectives like \"this\" or \"that\" and so on. Though still unable to be, not being must necessarily partake of many things: The One indeed cannot be, if it is not, but it is necessary that nothing prevent it from partaking of many things. (160e7-161a1) The whole of the sophisticated arguments of Parmenides II can show how much the Parmenides' understanding of being is problematic. What is said, for instance, at 162a can be a good example: If the one -which is notis to be not being, 21 it must have being a not-being as a bond in regard to its not-being, just as what is must have not-being what is not, if it is to be completely. Although the Parmenidean being is not overpassed in Parmenides II, these discussion shows that it is not accepted as before. Theaetetus' attention to the problem of Parmenidean being is confined to its contradiction with Heraclitean notion of flux. This understanding, I believe, is much more elementary than Parmenides II's attention to the problems arisen from Parmenides' understanding of the concept of being. If our arguments are sound, Parmenides II cannot be prior to Theaetetus because of its ontological status. This status, on the contrary, makes it prior to Sophist and Republic. The incomplete achievement to the being of not being in Parmenides II must antecedate its full achievement in Sophist and its implementation in Repubic. iii) Being dominant in Sophist and Politicus and absent from Theatetus, the method of collection and division has a predominant role in the second part of Parmenides 39 while cannot be seen in the first part of this dialogue. This is fully consistent with OECD's arrangement. While the first part of Parmenides and the Theaetetus are dated as prior to the dialogues of the epistemological wave, all unaware of the method of collection and division, the second part of Parmenides, the Sophist and Politicusare engaged with this new method. iv) Almost all the stylometric evidences are pro the antecedent date of Parmenides regarding Republic. 'In sofar as stylometry suggests anything', Tarrant says,'it strongly suggests that both works [i.e. Theaetetus and Parmenides] were begun far earlier than the Republic was finished' (2000, 141). 6. Republic and Laws The place of the Republic is the most confusing in the arrangement of the dialogues 40 .We have the following evidences: a) Based on ontological features, it must be dated after SophistandParmenidesII. b) Because of its ontological solution of the problems of participation and TM, it must be dated after Parmenides I. 41 c) Based on Aristotle's testimony (Politics, II, 6), it is prior to Laws. d) Laws is unaware of philosopher-king theory of Repulic which implies that its place after the final version of Republic might be problematic. 42 e) Stylometric evidences strongly suggest that Sophist, Politicus, Timaieus, Critias and Philebus belong to the same period of Laws. While the ontological evidences, (a) and (b), ask us to consider Republic after Sophist and Parmenides, the political evidences, (c) 43 and (d), alongside the stylometric evidences (e), tells that it must be prior to the so called late dialogues.The only solution is what has been suggested by somescholars that Republic is not a simple dialogue but a later composition of some dialogues. Except RepublicIitsseparation and being early is a more accepted fact, the passage 473-571is alsoa later attachment. Our reasons for its attachment are as follows. 22 i) After first book'saporetic ending like a Socratic dialogue, being unable to find what justice is, the second book starts by Socrates'statement that: 'when I said this [referring to his last sentences in the first book, namely that he could not find what justice is and soon], I thought I had done with the discussion, but it turned out to have been only a prelude' (357a). The discussion continues with the goodness or badness of injustice pursuing the first book's discussion. The search of finding individual justice transfers to a search for justice in a city by Socrates' suggestion that they might be more successful to find it if they search it in a larger thing, a city (368d), which leads them to construct a city in order to find justice there. This is the directing line of the argument whichtends to be exclusively treating with many political issues about all the details of constructing a city. After more than 65 Stephanus pages, we are given the result of this investigation of justice in the city, the larger object of investigation,in the middle of the fourth book (433). The discussants then try to find the justice in the individual by applying the result they got fromtheir investigation of justice in the city (434e ff.). This leads to the tripartite structure ofthe soul based on the structure of the city and finally to the result that the justice in an individual is just the same as it was in a city, that is, when each of its parts does its own work (441d ff.). They then look for injustice (444a ff.) and try to answer if justice is profitable or not (444e ff.) which leads itself to the comparison between types of souls and types of political constitutions (448c ff.).This topic is, however, postponed because of Polemarchus'demand for the explanation of what was said before, namely the question that how possessions can be held in common, which is at the very beginning of the fifth Book (449a). This topic, then, runs the discussion and brings some marginal discussions by 471d where the question of possibility of such an ideal city arises. In his first answer to the problem, Plato points to the fact that what he had drawn out was only a theoretical model that does not need to be proved as a possible city (472).I think this can be the end of the story of the Ideal State that had been started from the beginning of the second Book. What is said from 473c on is completely a new project and, I think, is attached to the Ideal State (357-472). The cities we have, Socrates says, is able to make the ideal state possible if the 'greatest wave' can be passed. This greatest wave is nothing but the theory of philosopher-king. Socrates is afraid of being ridiculed and laughed because of the theory (473c7-9) which shows both its importance and Socrates'understandable hesitation about it. Socrates' own statement can approve this: Until philosophers rule as kings or those who are now called kings and leading men genuinely and adequately philosophize ...Glaucon!cities will have no rest from evils nor, I think, will the human race. And, until this happens, the constitution we have been describing in theory will never be born to the fullest extent possible or see the light of the sun. It is because I saw how very paradoxical this statement would be that I hesitated to make it for so long... (473c11-e4) 44 23 Although this long time hesitation may hint that what we are being said is something that had been doubted to be written or published, we are not going to rely only on this. What happens after this and its overall difference from Ideal State can be more decisive. The theory of philosopher-king brings forth the question that: who are the true philosophers? (475e3) This question turns the discussion to a discussion of the philosopher from 473c on. Besides the fact that all of these pages are discussing onto-epistemological issues thatare related to the subject of philosopher, \"philosopher\" is itself the subject of the discussions. The question of \"who are the philosophers?\" leads to the passage (476e-479e) that distinguishes knowledge as what is set over being from opinion as what is set over what both is and is not. As the lovers of the objects of knowledge, i.e., what is, philosophers are distinct from the lovers of sights and soundswho love the objects of opinion (479e-484a). Philosophers are those who are able to grasp what the lovers of sights and sounds are not able, namely, what is always the same (484b). It is the nature (φύσιν) of philosopher which is the subject of inquiry (485a5, at 485a10: φιλοσόφωνφύσεων) and is described at 492a1-5 and is again connected with things themselves at 493ef.. Socrates then says that the philosophic nature is altered in the constitutions of his time and thus links the discussion of philosopher to that of the Ideal State (497b ff.) and concludes that philosophers are the best guardians of the city (503b) andthey must exercise in many subjects (503e) most importantly the Form of the Good (504e505a). This leads to the allegories of Sun, Line and Cave in the sixth and seventh books. After a full discussion of the way guardians must be brought about with different sciences in their carears to become philosophers, those who survived all the tests and saw the Form of the Good can order the city and become the philosopherkings (540a f.). It is the end of the search for philolopherand the way the philosopher must be brought about in the city and also the end of the seventh book (541b). Therefore, it can be said that the passage from the last pages of book V to the end of book VII, i. e., 473c-541b, has the philosopher as its subject. In addition to the unity of this passage of which we tried to provide a very short and thus insufficient review, what makes its attachment to the Ideal State more probable is that this discussion of philosopher is in the middle of the discussion of common possession in the city; a discussion that had been started from the beginning of fifth book (449) and continued till 471d where the problem of the possibility of the ideal state directs the discussion to the topic of the philosopher at 473c. By the end of the discussion about philosopher, we immediately fall into the same discussion at the very beginning of book VIII, even without any introduction or a linking paragraph: Well, then, Glaucon, we've agreed to the following: If a city is to achieve the height of good government, wives must be in common, children and all their education must be in common... (453a1f.) 24 After his long diversion from the previous topic, Socrates needs the beginning topic to be recalled and Glaucon, reminding the topic, says: 'you were talking as you had completed the description of the city' (543c7-8). If I am right in my consideration of the part we distinguished as an attachment, having in mind its topic, philosopher, and its place in OECD, after Sophist and Politicus, the first probability will be that this later attachment is so similar in its topic as well as its order, to the unwritten third part of the trilogy of sophist, statesman and philosopher that though had been promised at Sophist 217a3, has never been published.This motivated me to suggest that this passage that I cut up from the Republic might be the Philosophos, the third part of the trilogy.Plato never published the third part maybe because he was afraid, as he himself says, of its theme, namely that philosophers must be the kings, besides the fact that hegot stuck in another project and thus tried to reshape what he had in mind, or maybe even had somehow written, as the third part of the trilogy and emplace it in the larger plan of Republic.In her book, Philosophos: Plato's Missing Dialogue (2012), Gill believes that based on the fact that it is not included in the ancient survived list of Plato's dialogues, 'we can be fairly sure that the dialogue was not written and lost' (p.1). She thinks that Plato left it on purpose and 'deliberately withholds' it to stimulate his audience to combine the pieces about the subject in the other dialogues. Focusing on Parmenides, Theaetetus and Sophist, she does not let, of course, Republic to take part in this combining because, based on SCD Republic must be prior toall of them. OECD's arrangement of the ontological and political waves can explain why Plato who was thinking of that trilogy fell into the political wave.Suppose that at the time of composing Sophist, Plato was thinking that after writing about it, he will write a dialogue about statesman and then another one about philosopher as the culmination of the trilogy. It is not strange to imagine that this path was deviated to a political inquiry when he became engaged with political issues in Politicus. Instead of continuing it with a dialogue about philosopher, he became thus busy with Ideal State and Laws. Maybe it was only after Timaeus and with the use of all the hierarchical models he had discovered from Ideal State onward that he decided to assemble what he had in mind, or maybe in his shelf (!), about philosopher with his search for the Ideal State and based on the question of 'what is justice?' in Republic I,which had been composed long time ago. 45 If I am right in this suggestion, both the posterior date of the Philosophosand its difference from Ideal State can be more acceptable. ii) The epistemological difference between the Philosophos and Ideal State also worths remarking. What is said in the third book at 402b, that to know the copy, knowledge of original is necessary, seems prior to and even inconsistent, though not necessarily, with what is said in the sixth book and in the theory of hypothesis by which one goes upside from copy to original without having the knowledge of the original. The difference of 473-571 from the other passages of Republicand specially Ideal Stateis also clear from its mostly metaphysicalcontent that is definitely 25 separable from its previous passage dealing exclusively with political issues. This content is the very one which we considered as the evidence of Republic's being later than Parmenides II, Sophist andTimaeus. Therefore, if we accept that Republic II-X has at least two assembled parts, we will become able to manage the confusion arisen from the arrangement of Republic and Laws. It is the political part of Republic, Ideal state, which is prior to Laws and is referred there and, probably, was in Aristotle's mind 46 when said that Lawsis after Republic.The later date of the Philosophos, the very passage the idea of philosopher-king is drawn out there can also suggest a solution to the problem of Law's negligence of the philosopher-king doctrine that had surprised commentators. iii) 'Before stylometry', as Prior asserts, 'almost all scholars would have placed the Republic after the Sophist' (1985, 168). This was due to the stylometric evidences that Republicis dated now in SCD as middle and prior to many dialogues. Nonetheless, the assembled character of Republic suggests a sound solution for the biggest problematic decision of OECD regarding stylometric evidences. Suppose that Plato who had composed the first book of Republic much earlier and most probably in his early period of writing and the Ideal State in another time, now decides to compose the Republic which includes not only those dialogues but what was in his mind or even written, the Philosophos, as the third part of the trilogy. It is not then of a shock to say that since he wanted to rewritethem as the continuation of Republic I, he tried to keep a unified style as for as possible.Lutoslavski also approves a later date for the books VI and VII of Republic. 47 7. Timaeus By the suggestion of the distinction of the Philosophos from the Ideal State, the date OECD considered for Timaeus becomes more acceptable. The passage in Timaeus (17a, 18b) which has always been taken as referring to Republic,is indeedreferring to Ideal State. This helps us consider it as a prior dialogue to Republic because it seems thatits ontological statusindicates its place between Sophistand Philosophos. 48 Owen's main reasons for dating Timaeus after Republic and before Politicus (1998, 260-261) are these: a) The opening of the dialogue (17a) refers to a dialogue that had occurred the previous day that most probably is Republic. b) At Timaeus 18b the idea that guardians must have no gold or silver or any private property refers to Republic417a and 547b-548b. c) The Politicus (at 292a, c and 293a, c-d) insists four times (?) that whether the ruler has any wealth is completely irrelevant to the quality of his governance. Owen thinks that this is said as a novel doctrine. d) The system of marriage of the guardians in Republic (457c-465c) echoed in Timaeus (18c-d) is abandoned in Politicus (310c-311c). These evidences can lead to another arrangement between the dialogues if we accept Republic II-Xas having two parts, the Ideal State and the Philosophos: (a) and 26 (b) are clearly referring to the Ideal State and not to the Philosophos.Moreover, not only (c) and (d) are not problematic regarding OECD's arrangement but they can even be supportive because the more elementary status of Politicus' political discussion 49 regarding Ideal State is thoroughly consistent with OECD's later date for Ideal State and Republic. Unlike Owen, I think what is said about the rulers' wealth(293c8-d2)can be more of an evidenceapproving the priority of Politicus'theory than presenting a new theory against the past theory.Unlike Owen who thinks that this is a novel doctrine, I think it might equally mean that Plato is not yet achieved to his more complicated theory of propertyless rulers. Moreover, that Plato does not speak in Politicus of the marriage of the guardians can similarlybeout of the fact thatPoliticus is still unaware of the idea. Owen, however, agrees that neither Timaeus nor Critias seem to know anything about Republic's doctrine that 'a state may be saved by the supremacy not of immutable laws but of an ἀνήρ φρόνιμος above the law' (1998, 264).Owen and Nicholas P. White (1976, 91) are right that Timaeus is closer to Republic than the late dialogues 50 but Cherniss is also right that it is later than Parmenides. Notes 1 Thesleff says that in spite of the fact that the only evidence from which we can infer the chronology is the internal evidence, 'the value of such evidence is open to the general criticism that many, if not all, may have been re-written' (1989, 7). 'There is no reason', he continues, 'to suppose that Plato left his writing in exactly the same state in which they were first composed'. (ibid) 2 There are some issues about Plato's life that can overally change any chronological order. What Grombie calls 'the most critical event' (1969, 363) in Plato's life, namely his probable being prosecuted for defamation and being forbidden to teach at 372 can be one of these issues. 3 E.g. Diognes Laertius (Lives, III, 37), Olympiodorus (Prol. VI, 24) 4 This kind of naming is also compatible with Plato's own way of theorizing as he always makes use of entangible things as models trying to explain complicated matters. 5 By Parmenides I, I mean the first part of the dialogue which is discussing the problems of Socrates' theory of Forms and lasts till 137. Parmenides II consists the part from 137 to the end of the dialogue where Parmenides' One is being discussed. 6 The mentions of the theory in Philebus (342b) and Laws (732b) appear to be, as Sayre (2005, 193) notes, 'entirely removed' from the sense it had before. I am not convinced with Kahn's (1996, 367) appealing to Politicus 277d and Timaeus 41e-42d as the passages in which the theory is alluded or implied. 7 Kahn (1996, 373) points to some evidences of Phaedrus' referring to Republic (cf. Hackforth (1952, 3-7). Irwin believes that Phaedrus must be considered as a 'revision' or 'development' of the views of both Republic and Symposium and not an anticipation of them (1995, 12). 27 8 Being certain about Symposium's posterior date, Moore asserts that while writing Symposium, Plato must have 'firmly' had Phaedrus in mind. Mostly based on Phaedrus' more sophisticated logic represented in its method of collection and division, Dillon (1973) argues against him. 9 By so calling them, I do not mean, of course, that they are the real dialogues of historical Socrates. 10 Cf. Fine, 2003, 29 11 The relation of Cratylus and Theaetetus is a Problem with which the current chronologies do not know what to do (cf. Runciman, 1962, 2). While Cratylus looks close to the early dialogues, it has some unignorable similarities to Theaetetus, which is considered far from the early and after the middle period dialogues. While OECD resolves this problem easily considering Theaetetus as early, about the order between Theaetetus and Cratylus I cannot be certain at all since there cannot be found any certain ontological or epistemological priority between them. All that can be said is that they are close to each other as some of their main themes, especially the problems of flux, Protagoras' relativism and false belief might bring to mind. Never holding a 'confident opinion', Runciman, however, dates Cratylus 'somewhere before' Theaetetus (ibid). 12 Gorgiasmentions the distinction of knowledge and true opinion without discussing it, a distinction proved in Theaetetus and used in Meno. While it is accepted that there can be false conviction besides true conviction (πίστις ψευδὴς καὶ ἀληθής) (454d5), false knowledge (ἐπιστήμη...ψευδὴς) (d6-7) is strongly prohibited. Gorgias accepts the first simply by saying Ναί and rejects the second strongly by saying Οὐδαμῶς.It shows, though not strongly, that they might have been composed after Theaetetusand before Meno. While, on the other hand, the problem of teachability of virtue seems to indicate that both Gorgias and Protagoras may belong to the period of Meno, there might be some indications of their priority. I found Jane M. Day's (1994 cf. 10) points about the priority ofProtagoras tenable though maybe I am not as certain as she appears to be. She dates Gorgias later than Protagoras and closer to Meno. 13 As it will be discussed in detail, what I call as an independent dialogue is nothing but Republic 473-541 where the philosopher is the subject of discussion. 14 The epistemological aspect of the problem had been resolved by the distinction of knowledge and true belief in the epistemological wave. 15 That the books II-V of the Republic is mostly the same as the famous Ideal State has been suggested before. Cf., e.g., Ryle (1966) 16 Prior (1985, 9) insists that the theory of Forms is 'as explicitly present' in Euthyphro as it is in Phaedo and Republic. 17 Cornford's suggestion that the aim of the dialogue is to examine and reject the experimental approach to knowledge is not compatible with the place he and others dedicate to Theaetetus. It is not a suitable time, to reject the experimental approach after Meno, Phaedo and Republic since they are already out of the approach and need no rejection. 18 That the first part of Parmenides has the appearance of a work complete in itself, is something can hardly be deniedeven by those scholars, like Meinwald, who do not believe it as distinct from the second part and written at a different time (1991, 5-6). 28 19 Referring to Euthyphro (5d) and Hippias Major (300a-b), Allen notes that the Forms in the early dialogues are universal, which is the same (ταὐτόν), common (κοινὸν) in them and something identical (τιτὸαὺτό) in all its cases (2013, 69-70). 20 In his second letter (314c3-4), Plato asserts that his written works are not the works of Plato but of a Socrates 'made fair and young (καλοῦκαὶ νέουγεγονότος)'. This younghood must of course be considered as compared to the reral Socrates who was adult and old and, thus, does not mean as young as is represented in Parmenides. 21 Thinking that there is a 'partial or relative' identification of universals and paradigms, Gerson (1998, 138) criticizes their complete distinction. 22 He even points that appealing to the model of original-copy cannot be helpful to avoid SP while there are some 'independent reasons' that Plato was committed to it (White, 1977, 211). 23 Allen (1997, 106) mentions Phaedo 74b-75d as an evidence for the theory of paradigm in this dialogue. About Republic V, which White thinks is not committed to the theory, I am not convinced since I think there are not enough about the case in this book. White brings the use of μετέχεινorκοινωνίαor the use of πράγματαandμετέχοντα as evidence (1977, 201-2) which, I think, prove nothing. 24 Annas mentions Phaedo 74e (besides Republic, Euthyphro and Theaetetus (176e ?)) as one of the places in which Forms are considered as paradigms (1974, 278, n.50). Although it might be close to paradigm-based understanding of Forms, I am not certain about taking it so. That Form is something that participants want to be like (βούλεται μὲν τουτο ... εἶναι οἷον) but fall short, cannot necessarily mean that the Form is a paradigm here. Though the relation of Forms and participants in Phaedo might be directed towards what it will be in Republic, I do not think that we are allowed to assume them the same.Regarding the mention of paradigm in Euthyphro 6e the best suggestion is, I think, that it is not, as Fujisawa (1974, 43) says, 'a case of genuine paradigmatism we find in later dialogues' (cf.Lutoslawski 1897, 199-200). 25 Listing the anamnesis in Meno, the method of hypothesis in Phaedo and the nonhypothetical principle in Republic as three answers to the question of the knowledge of the Forms, Sayre reasonably thinks that the first one is the simplest. (2005, 299) 26 It is generally agreed that some uses of εἴδος or ἰδέαin Theaetetus (e.g., 184d3, 203c6, 203e4, 204a1, 205d4-5) are not in the same technical sense. 27 Besides Meno 72b-c, 75a can also correctly be taken as a reference to the theory though the word εἶδος at 72c7 is not repeated here again. These do not, nonetheless, refuse Fine's correct assertion that the theory of Forms is 'muted' in Meno (2003, 44). 28 There are some other passages where Plato puts question mark in front of the existence of Forms. Cf. e.g. Phaedo 65d, 74a, 76e-77a, Protagoras 330c, Cratulus 439c-d, Timaeus 51b-c. 29 Nicholas P. White, on the contrary, thinks that in the early dialogues Plato talks 'as if' he believed in Forms (1976, 6). 30 Vlastos (1991, 58f.) points to this difference between so-called early and middle dialogues. 29 31 Kahn argues that we have no reason that Aristotle had any evidence for the development of Plato's thought in his early period (1996, 81) especially if we observe that the date of Aristotle's arriving at the Academy is when Plato was at least sixty years old. 32 In spite of all these points, Euthydemus' way of talking about dialecticians at 290c sounds surprisingly like Republic. 33 The allusions to the historical events that occur occasionally in some dialogues can be interpreted merely as dramatic or, as Mackey says, 'later interpolations' using past events (1928, 11). As Maccabe (2008, 96) points out, even the dialogues making vigorous claims to historicity 'bear the marks of fiction'. The writer of the dialogues, like a play writer, designs the scene, chooses the most suitable location and time and to make it appear more real, uses some real events of that time and location. It cannot be denied that the dramatic features of the dialogues are not negligible for Plato. We will not thus rely on the allusions to the historical events. 34 Thinking that the reappearance of Theaetetus in Sophist is a 'clear reminder of continuity' of the same project (2013, 94), Kahn accepts that 'a considerable lapse of time' might have occurred between their composition. 35 He thinks that the two dialogues were composed after the Parmenides 'as a whole' (1939, 316-317). 36 Gill's suggestion (2012, 1) of a tetralogy opening with Theaetetus is not tenable. Besides the cross references of which we discussed above, I cannot understand how she can take the similarity of characters as an evidence whereas the difference of Theaetetus with those two in this respect is obvious enough. The change of Socrates as the main speaker in Theaetetus to a visitor from Elea as the leading character in the other two dialogues does not let us agree with her. Suppose we accept that the change of Socrates with a visitor from Elea in Sophist might be related to the duty of the dialogue in criticizing Parmenides: to guarantee, as Kahn (2013, 94) suggest, 'an atmosphere of intellectual sympathy'. What then about Politicus? Gill thinks, however, that 'Plato substantially revised an earlier version of the Theaetetus to fit into a series with the Sophist and Statesman' (p.3, n. 8). 37 Ryle, for example, thinks that these two parts were composed at 'considerably' different dates (1966, 216). Also cf. Thesleff (1989, 19) and Tarrant (2000, 140-141) 38 There is an explicit shift from epistemology to ontology at 188c-d saying that perhaps the problem of false belief is better to be dealt with the notions of being and not being rather than knowing and not knowing which immediately leads to the problem of the impossibility of thinking about not being (188d ff.). 39 Cf. Turnball, 1998, especially pages 41 and 173. 40 Nails (1998, 174) notes: 'We have perhaps less hope of accurately dating the Republic than of any other dialogue in the corpus'. Cherniss' phrases like 'orthodox opinion' (1998, 293) about the place of Republic is interesting. 41 I am not convinced with Thesleff's note that the opening of the Parmenides suggests that the Republic was finished at the time. He accepts, however, that the book X and 'some passages' in the earlier books might have been added later (1989, 19). 42 Moreover, as Lane (2006, 185) mentions, the book IX of the Laws implicitly suggests that the city drawn out in this dialogue is a second-best city as comparing not to the city of Republic but to that of the Politicus. 30 43 That Aristotle's evidence is in a political text discussing political issues might allow us to take it more as political evidence though it is not a political evidence but a chronological one. 44 See also: 499a 45 Aristotle' statement in Politics II 1264b39 that Socrates filled upthe Republic with 'extraneous discourses' can be noteworthy. Reminding that the 'three résumés of the original Ideal State' shows that it contained nothing about justice, theological fables or the dispensability of Homer, dialectic and so on, Ryle adds that our version of the Republic was not assembled until Plato returned from Sicily (1966, 244-245). 46 That Aristotel tells this in a political passage (Politics II, 6) makes this more probable. However, the reason can simply be the date of Law's publication which is surely later than Republic. 47 There are some other reasons that might be taken as evidence for the lateness of the Philosophos like its Pythagorean spirit, its discussion of the Good that seems to be the closest passage among Plato's dialogues to his famous lecture 'On the Good' and also Philebus. 48 Ryle notes that the discussion of pleasure at Republic 583b 'presupposes' and advances 'a long way beyond' Timaeus (1966, 249). 49 Lane (2006, 180) speaks of two points in Politicus that went unnoticed in Republic; (1) the knowledge of the Good 'in time' (2) which must be made authoritative over the requirements of fixed laws. These, however, cannot prove anything about the order of the dialogues. 50 Rickless also prefers to agree with Owen mostly because of the theory of Forms in Timaeus which resembles that of Republic (2007, 8). Works Cited Allen, R. E., 1959, Anamnesis in Plato's \"Meno and Phaedo\", The Review of Metaphysics, Vol. 13, No. 1, pp. 165-174 --------, 1961, The Argument from Opposites in Republic V, the Review of Metaphysics, Vol. 15 , No. 2, pp. 325-335 --------, 1997, Plato's Parmenides, Yale University Press --------, 1998, Participation and Predication in Plato's Middle Diologues, in: Smith, Nicholas D. (ed.), Plato: Critical Assessment, V. I, Routledge, pp. 55-71 --------, 2013, Plato's Euthyphro and the Earlier Theory of Forms, Routledge Annas, Julia, 1974, Forms and First Principles, phronesis, V. 19, N. 3, pp. 257-283 Cherniss, Harold, 1998, The Relation of the Timaeus to Plato's Later Dialogues, in: Smith, Nicholas D. (ed.), PLATO: Critical Assessment, V. iv, Routledge, pp. 273-305 Cornford, Francis MacDonald, 1935, Plato's Theory of Knowledge, Routledge and Kegan Paul Ltd. --------, 1939, Plato and Parmenides, Parmenides' Way of Truth and Plato's Parmenides, Routledge and Kegan Paul Ltd. Day, Jane M., 1994, Plato's Meno in Focus, Routledge 31 Dillon, John, 1973, Comments on John Moore's Paper, in: Moravcsik, J.M.E. (ed.), Patterns in Plato's thoughts, Papers out of the 1971 West Coast Greek Philosophy Conference, D. Reidel Publishing Company, pp. 72-77 Dionysius of Halicarnassus, Schaefer, G.H. (ed.),1808, De Compositione Verborum, Lipsiae Dorter, Kenneth, 1989, The Theory of Forms and Parmenides I, in: Anton, Jhon, Preus, Anthony (eds.), Essays in Ancient Greek Philosophy III, State University of New York Press, pp. 183202 -------, 1994, Formand Good in Plato's Eleatic Dialogues: the Parmenides, Sophist and Statesman, University of California Press Fine, Gail, 2003, Plato on knowledge and Forms, Oxford University Press Fujisawa, Norio, 1974, Ἔχειν, Μετέχειν, and idioms of 'Paradigmatism' in Plato, Phronesis, V. 19, N. 1, pp. 30-58 Gerson, Lloyd, 1998, A Distinction in Plato's Sophist, in: Smith, Nicholas D. (ed.), PLATO: Critical Assessment, V. IV, Routledge, pp. 125-141 Gill, Mary Louise, 2012, Phiolosophos: Plato's Missing Dialogue, Oxford University Press, UK Gormbie, I. M., 1969, Ryle's New Portrait of Plato, The Philosophical Review, V. 78, N. 3, pp. 362-373 Hackforth, R., 1952, Plato's Phaedrus, Cambridge University Press Irwin, Terence, 1995, Plato's Ethics, Oxford University press Kahn, Charles H., 1996, Plato and the Socratic Dialogues, Cambridge University Press -------, 2006, Plato on Recollection, in: Benson, Hugh H. (ed.), A Companion to Plato, Blackwell Publishing Ltd., pp. 119-132 -------, 2013, Plato and the Post-Socratic Dialogues: The Return to the philosophy of Nature, Cambridge University Press Lane, Mellisa, 2006, Plato's Political Philosophy: the Republic, the Statesman and the Laws, in: Gill, Mary Louise, Pellegrin, Pierre (eds.), Blackwell Companion to Ancient Philosophy, Blackwell Publishing Ltd. Lutoslawski, Wincenty, 1897, The Origin and Growth of Plato's Logic, George OlmsVerlag Meinwald, Constance C., 1991, Plato's Parmenides, Oxford University Press Nails, Debra, 1998, The Earty Middle Late consensus: How Deep? How Broad?, In: Smith, Nicholas D. (ed.), PLATO: Critical Assessment, Vollume I, Routledge, pp. 164-179 Maccabe, Mary Margaret, 2008, Plato's Ways of Writing, in: : Fine, Gail (ed.), The Oxford Handbook of Plato, Oxford New York, pp. 88-113 Mackey, D. S., 1928, On the order of Plato's Writings, The Journal of Philosophy, V. 25, N. 1, pp. 5-18 Meinwald, Constance C., 1992, Good-bye to the Third Man, in: Kraut, Richard (ed.), The Cambridge Companion to Plato, Cambridge University Press, pp. 365-396 Moore, Hohn D., 1973, The Relation Between Plato's Symposium and Phaedrus, in: Moravcsik, J.M.E. (ed.), Patterns in Plato's thoughts, Papers out of the 1971 West Coast Greek Philosophy Conference, D. Reidel Publishing Company, pp. 52-71 Owen. G. E. L., 1998, The Place of the Timaeus in Plato's Dialogues, in: Smith, Nicholas D. (ed.), PLATO: Critical Assessment, V. iv, Routledge, pp. 253-272 Palmer, John A., 1999, Plato's Reception of Parmenides, Oxford: Clarendon Press Prior, William J., 1985, Unity and Development in Plato's Metaphysics, Routledge 32 Rickless, Samuel C., 2007, Plato's Forms in Transition, A reading of the Parmenides, Cambridge University Press Runciman, W.G., 1962, Plato's Later Epistemology, Cambridge University Press Ryle, Gilbert, 1939, Plato's Parmenides (II), Mind, new series, V. 48, N. 191, pp. 129-151 --------, 1966, Plato's Progress, Cambridge University Press Sayre, Kenneth M., 2005, Plato's Late Ontology: A Riddle Resolved, Parmenides Publishing Tarrant, Harold, 2000, Plato's First Interpreters, Cornell University Press Thesleff, Holger, 1989, Platonic Chronology, Phronesis, V. 134, N. 1, pp. 1-26 Turnball, Robert G., 1998, The Parmenides and Plato's Late Philosophy, University of Toronto Press Vlastos, Gregory, 1991, Socrates Ironist and Moral Philosopher, Cambridge University Press White, F. C., 1977, Plato's Middle Diologues and the Indepedence of Particulars, The philosophical Quarterly, V. 27, N. 108, pp. 193-213 White, Nicholas P., 1976, Plato on Knowledge and Reality, Hackett Publishing Company"}
{"meta": {"title": "An Onto-Epistemological Chronology of Plato’s Dialogues", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Ghomi, Mohammad Bagher", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "This paper aims to suggest a new arrangement of Plato’s dialogues based on a different theory of the ontological as well as epistemological development of his philosophy. In this new arrangement, which proposes essential changes in the currently agreed upon chronology of the dialogues, Parmenides must be considered as criticizing an elementary theory of Forms and not the theory of so-called middle dialogues. Dated all as later than Parmenides, the so-called middle and late dialoguesare regarded as two consecutive endeavors to resolve the problems drawn out in there; an effort in the theory of knowledge through Theaetetus, Meno and Phaedo and another in ontology through the second part of Parmenides, Sophist and Republic.", "date": "manuscript", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/GHOAOC-2", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2020-04-30T03:48:01Z"}, "text": "An Onto-Epistemological Chronology of Plato's Dialogues Mohammad Bagher Ghomi 1 Abstract This paper aims to suggest a new arrangement of Plato's dialogues based on a different theory of the ontological as well as epistemological development of his philosophy. In this new arrangement, which proposes essential changes in the currently agreed upon chronology of the dialogues, Parmenides must be considered as criticizing an elementary theory of Forms and not the theory of socalled middle dialogues. Dated all as later than Parmenides, the so-called middle and late dialoguesare regarded as two consecutive endeavors to resolve the problems drawn out in there; an effort in the theory of knowledge through Theaetetus, Meno and Phaedo and another in ontology through the second part of Parmenides, Sophist and Republic. Key Words: Plato; chronology; development; ontology; epistemology Introduction There are many determinative factors regarding the chronology of the dialogues about which our informationis terribly deficient. There is no certain evidence about the date of each of the dialogues, nor any reliable information about the beginning and ending time of Plato's writing. The most determinative issue among all chronological matters, I am inclined to insist, is the question that if did Plato use to manipulate or, as Dionysius of Halicarnassus said (1808, 406), polish, comb and curl his previously written dialogues and, if so, to what extent? 1 That there is almost no answer to this most crucial issue shows how far deficient, indefinite and inconclusive the chronological plans can be. 2 The fact that we do not even have enough information to decide, in case of Socratic dialogues, to what extent they are reporting or reflecting the actual dialogues of historical Socrates, and to what extent they are Plato-made stories so that even now we have a schizophrenic character between Socrates and Plato, can be good evidence for this deficiency. There are, nevertheless, somemore certain informations that can be contributive in case of the arrangement of some dialogues. a) The only external evidence provided by Aristotle that Lawswas written after Republic (Politics, II, 6) which was repeated by others 3 . b) Few internal evidences provided by references in dialogues themselves including: i) the cross references in the Sophist 217a and Politicus 257a and 258b which indicate the prior composition of Sophist; ii) Timaeus 27 which hints to Critias as its sequel; iii) Theaetetus 183e where Socrates says he met Parmenides when he was 1 PhD of philosophy, University of Tehran, mbqomi@gmail.com 2 young which has been taken as a reference to Parmenides; iv) a similar reference to the discussion of young Socrates with Parmenides this time in Sophist 217c; v) Sophist 216a refers to a previous discussion which has been thought to be referring to Theaetetus, and vi) the Timaeus 17b-19b in which Socrates tries to summarize his previous dialogue about the structure of cities, and the kind of men these cities must bring up to become the best people and so on which, among the dialogues we have now, must refer to Republic. 1. An onto-epistemological chronology These few internal and external references are not of course sufficient to offer an arrangement among more than thirty dialogues. In such a poor situation about information and the possibility of later manipulation of the dialogues, it seems the best criteria of presenting a chronology, if it can be possible at all, should be those which are the most fundamental on the basis that what is more fundamental must be the subject of change at last. Now, what kind of criteria can be chosen for an arrangement better than the ontology and the epistemology of the dialogues? Since the arrangement I am going to suggest here is to be based on the ontoepistemological status of the dialogues,I shall call itthe Onto-Epistemological Chronology of the Dialogues (OECD). Although it is, of course, more of a philosophical chronology than a style-based one, while trying not to violate both the referential and stylometric evidences, it does not focus on other features of the content of the dialogues. In fact, the arrangement that is suggested here comes closer, I believe, to the evidences. Nonetheless, it is still a revolutionary chronology, not only in its main differences with other chronologies in respect of the place of some key dialogues, but also in its formulation of the whole corpus. Whereas I am not to divide the dialogues into different periods as all the various chronologies are used to do, I classify them in different groups I call \"waves\"; a name I borrowed from Plato himself. When he gets to the theory of philosopher-king in Republic, he calls it the biggest wave which must be overpassed: I have now come to what we likened to the greatest wave (κύματι).4 (473c6-7) As each problem is like a wave for Plato that he has to overpass, each wave of dialogues focuses on resolving a main problem.Plato's philosophy can best be imagined as anocean. That his philosophy is as widespread, vast and deep as an ocean, maybe more than any other philosophy during all the history, is something that many would agree upon. It is not, nonetheless, the great and glorious character of his philosophy which is the intention of this poetical resemblance, but the characters of the waves of an ocean. Plato's dialogues can best be divided to groups that behave like waves. Like each group of his dialogues, a wave in theoceanhas a pushing force, a rising path, a high point and a fall. Each wave, independently identifiable, makes the movement of another wave possibleand so the next wave has the power of its previous waves leading it to go forward to do the same for its next wave.This 3 interwoven character of dependence-independence of each wave is what I have in mind about Plato's dialogues. Each group/wave of dialogues has a pushing force, a problem or paradox that is to be resolved in its way by some new theories and methods. The wave, thus, rises upward making both the problem and the need of its solution as radical as possible until it gets to the highest point by resolving the problem and getting to thefavourite results. Nevertheless, no solution is completely acceptable in Plato's philosophy and there are always new problems and issues. Therefore, every wave has a fall that can be the starting point of the next wave.The suggestion of waves of dialogues saysindeed that Plato's dialogues cannot be treated altogether by taking all the dialogues as a whole nor each of the dialogues singly and independent from all the other dialogues. The best is to treat couples of them as a chain that though is somehow independent has a special relation with couples of other dialogues.I distinguish four waves in Plato's dialogues as follows. i) Socratic Wave including: Alcibiades I, Alcibiades II, Apology, Clitophon, Crito, Hippias Minor, Lysis, Menexenus, Republic I, Theages, Laches, Charmides, Euthyphro, Hippias Major and Parmenides I. 5 ii) Epistemological Wave including: Protagoras, Gorgias, Euthydemus, Theaetetus, Cratylus, Meno andPhaedo. iii) Ontological Wave including: ParmenidesII, Sophist, Timaeus, Philosophos (Republic 473-541) iv) Political Wave including:Politicus, Ideal State (Republic357-473), Laws,Epinomis, Critias. Besides some maybe dubious or at least less important dialogues, I dismissed Philebus, Phaedrus andSymposiumfrom taking part in this chronology. In spite of some obvious resemblances with the dialogues of the ontological wave especially Timaeus, both in its ontological approach and even in its stylometric features, Philebus cannot be emplaced in the overall project of the waves. The ontoepistemological chronology, to be honest, is unable to read Philebus in Plato's corpus as I think none of the other chronologies could get at an acceptable explanation of its relation with the other dialogues. We have problems also to emplaceSymposium andPhaedrus in our plan. They seem to belong, nevertheless, more to the period between the epistemological and ontological waves or even coexistent with some dialogues of the latter wave.Phaedrusin which we are encountered with probably last serious echo of theory of anamnesis, 6 on the one hand, shows its close connection with Meno and Phaedo while its presenting of the method of collection and division, on the other hand, associates it to Sophist and Politicus. Contrary to most of the scholars who date the Phaedrus quite late in Plato's career 7 and afterSymposium, Moore (1973) insists on the converse relation of the two dialogues taking Phaedrus as earlier. 8 Whatever their relation might be, the similarities between the two dialogues besides their incompatibility with the epistemological and ontological waves may call for a different wave. 4 Except the first wave, of the order of its dialogues we discuss below, the dialogues of all the other three waves are arranged chronologically. When a dialogue is located after another dialogue and before a third one in the epistemological and ontological waves, it means that either its epistemological or ontologicalstatus, is between those dialogues. The case is the same about the order of the dialogues between different waves, except the last wave in which the order of the dialogues of the political wave must be considered parallel to, or interwoven with, the dialogues of the ontological wave. a) Socratic wave The first and longest wave, includes a) a group of ten dialogues (ordered alphabetically): Alcibiades I, Alcibiades II, Apology,Clitophon, Crito, Hippias Minor, Lysis, Menexenus, Republic I, Theages, b) a second group of four dialogues:Laches, Charmides, Euthyphro,HippiasMajor, and c) the first part of Parmenides. I distinguish these last five dialogues from all the other ones which are called Socratic 9 dialogues ordered alphabetically. Laches, Charmides, Euthyphro and Hippias Majormust be considered, without chronological order between themselves, after the Socratic dialogues and before the first part of Parmenides. It is not difficult to guess how surprising it looks for the reader to sea the first part of the Parmenides here in the first wave after Socratic dialogues and before all the other ones. This is the most revolutionary suggestion of OECD. The leading problem of the wave is historical Socrates' problem of acquiring knowledge reshaped by Plato in Socratic dialogues. It is this problem that leads to the theory of Forms in the Socratic dialogues and especially in Laches, Charmides, Euthyphro, Hippias Major and Parmenides I. While Hippias Major (301b2-6) criticizes the onto-epistemological grounds ofSocratic dialogues, Parmenides Icriticizes the theory of Forms as it is formulated in them. I agree that there is not enough material in there to be called a 'theory' of Forms to be criticized in ParmenidesI, but where else can such a theory be found? 10 The poor discussion of the theory in the early dialogues is the main reason that,as far as I know, noone has suggested that ParmenidesI is criticizing the theory of Forms of the early dialogues by now. As we will discuss below, the theory of Forms in those dialogues isindeed constructed in a way to escape those attacks. b) Epistmological wave This wave includes a) Pratogoras,Gorgias and b)Euthydemus,Theaetetus, Cratylus 11 , MenoandPhaedo.While I guess that Gorgias is probably later than Protagoras, I cannot be certain about their relation with the other six dialogues that are chronologically arranged. 12 I called this wave epistemological because I believe that it includesPlato's epistemological endeavor to solve the epistemological problem arisen in Parmenides I (133b-135a). 5 The backbone of this wave, however, is Plato's epistemological project from Theaetetus to Phaedo where 1) by the distinction of knowledge and true opinion, (a) the epistemological problems of the early dialogues are resolved and (b) the epistemological ground for the theory of Forms is provided (cf. Tim. 51d3-5); 2) by the doctrine of anamnesis, the method of hypothesis and the theory of Forms as causes, the epistemological problem resulted from the separation of the Forms and their participant as it had been drawn out at Parmenides 133b-135a, is resolved. The epistemological wave includes, thus, some essential modifications in Plato's theory of knowledge to save the theory of Forms as well as to solve some of the epistemological problems of the early dialogues. This means that this wave is an epistemological project, a doctrine that may not be accepted by some scholars. Charles Kahn, for instance, thinks that in what he calls the 'series of dialogues from the Meno to the Phaedrus', not only is not any sign of linear development, in which different epistemological theories replace each other, but 'different concepts of knowledge are used in different contexts for different purposes' (2006, 130). Although the epistemological wave does not say that there actually is a unique theory, it emphasizes the unity of a project or process. Moreover, some kind of a linear development from Theaetetus to Republic through Meno and Phaedo can be recognizable, but not a development of replacing different theories but a development of theory that gets enriched and more sophisticated. The complicated epistemological theory of Republic as is construed in the allegory of line can reasonably be taken as the development of the theory of the distinction of knowledge and belief in Theaetetusand Meno. c) Ontological wave The four dialogues of Parmenides II, Sophist, Timaeus, Philosophos 13 construct the ontological wave.These four dialogues have in themselves Plato's brilliant endeavor to solve the following problems by presenting a new ontology: i) Theontological problems of the early dialogues which was itself the ontological aspect of the problem of false belief 14 needed a change of approach to being. This shift was doneby accepting the being of not being based on the creative theory of 'difference'that is initiated in Parmenides II and attains to its fulfillment in Sophistand Timaeusand is used inTimaeusandPhilosophos. ii) The problems of participation (131a-e) and Third Man (TM) (132a-b,132d-133a) in Parmenides Ithatareresolved by the new theory ofbeing inSophistand the new theory of Forms inPhilosophos. The ontological wave, therefore, is to make Plato's main modification in his understanding of being that results in the refutation ofParmenides' principle and Plato's achievement to a new notion of being that cannot be the subject of the previous problems, neither the problems ofHippiasMajor(301b2-6) norParmenides I. 6 4. Political wave This wave is not chronologically separated from the ontological wave but gets along it as a somewhat synchronous wave. Although the dialogues of this wave, Politicus, Ideal state 15 (RepublicII-V), Laws, Epinomis and Critias are arranged chronologically after one another, their dates can be neither before nor after the ontological wave, save the publication of Laws which is almost certainly the last one of all the dialogues and after Plato's death. Politicus was certainly written after Sophist and probably before Ideal state which itself must have been composed before both the Laws and Timaeus.Epinomis, if it has been written by Plato himself that is strongly dubious, must be dated after the composition of Laws. The order of the dialogues of the two ontological and political waves, considered together, must be something like this: Parmenides II, Sophist, Politicus, Ideal state,Laws (composition),Epinomis, Timaeus, Critias, Philosophos/Republic, Laws (publication). The overall scheme of Plato's dialogues based on our arrangement of them is drawn in scheme 1 below. Scheme 1. Waves of Dialogues Hippias Major Socratic Dialogues: Alcibiades I &II, Apology, Clitophon, Crito, Hippias Minor, Lysis, Menexenus, Republic I, Theages Parmenides I Euthyphro Charmides Laches Timaeus Philosophos Sophist Parmenides II Republic Laws (Comp.) Ideal State Critias Politicus Gorgias Protagoras Phaedo Theaetetus Cratylus Euthydemus Meno 7 The development of Plato's philosophy based on our onto-epistemological investigation will be something like scheme 2 below. Plato who had started the Socratic wave with Socrates' search of knowledge as the motivating force of the wave provides a theory of Forms thatis referred to in dialogues like Laches, Euthyphro, 16 Charmides and Hippias Major. This theory is the very theory which Allen (2013) calls the 'earlier theory of Forms'; a theory that, as Allen argues (ibid, 67ff.), cannot be identified with thetheory of Forms presented in the dialogues of the so-called middle period. The onto-epistemologicalgrounds of these dialogues turn out as problematic in Hippias Major (301b2-6), as the theory of Form turns out to be problematic in the first part of Parmenides. Here is the first and biggest turning point of Plato's philosophy where based on those critiques, he tries to reconstruct his philosophy by changing the epistemological and ontological principles of his philosophy. The first effort is an effort in the theory of knowledge. In spite of the problems related to the false belief in Euthydemus and Theaetetus, knowledge turns out to be distinctfrom opinion in Theaetetus. This is, I think, the main goal of Theaetetus. 17 This distinction provides the epistemological grounds for the theory of anamnesis and the method of hypothesis in Meno andPhaedo, theories that are to resolvethe epistemological problem ofParmenides. Since besides the ontological aspect of the problem of false belief, the problems of participation and TM are still annoying not received their answers in the epistemological wave, the ontological wave tries to resolve them. These problems made Plato launch another wave, this time trying to change the theory of being. The starting point of the wave is the second part of theParmenides where the Parmenidean notions of being and unity are to be attacked. This attack has at least three important results: i) separating oneness from being in Parmenides' 'One Being', ii) accepting that ParmenideanOne and Being are problematic and finally iii) introducing the notion of 'difference'. Plato makes use of these results in Sophist, TimaeusandPhilosophos.The points (i) and (ii) lead in Sophist to the rejection of Parmenidean absolute being and provides a new relation between being and difference which makes resolving the problem of false belief possible.The new relation of being and difference helps to resolve the problems of participation and TM. Therefore, at the end of the ontological wave, the onto-epistemological problems of the early dialogues and the problems of the theory of Forms in Parmenides are all resolved. The development of Plato's thought based on our thesis is shown in Scheme 2 below. 8 Scheme 2. Plato's Onto-Epistemological Development Now it is time to defend the place of the dialogues that made the main changes in the current chronologies and turned it to OECD, namely Parmenides I, Euthydemus, Theaetetus, Parmenides II, Sophist, Timaeus, Republic and Laws. Anamnesis Resolution of P6: Knowledge of Forms Hypothesis Forms as Causes Knowledge ≠Opinion Parmenidean Ontology Socratic Epistemology Theory of Forms Problem of False Belief Resolution of P2-3-5: originalcopy model Ontology of Sophist and Republic NotBeing is One ≠ Same Being & Difference Good & Knowledge One ≠Being One & Good P5. Paradi gms P1. Forms for all things P2. Partici pation P6. Epistemolog ical Problem P4. Forms as Thought P3. Third Man Parmenides 9 2. Parmenides I 18 The place of Parmenides in the current chronologies is the cause of many problems. Not only the problems of Parmenides I, on the one hand,cannot be correctly appliable to the middle dialogues, butthere are problems either to observe its problems as invalid or valid. The main problem out of the place of Parmenides in the current chronologies, generally speaking, is that theycannot provide a consistent story of Plato's development in which Parmenides can have its deserving role. By the new place of this dialogue in OECD, we are not only to make the story consistent, but to dedicate the most prominent role to the dialogue. All Plato does in the socalled middle and late dialogues is going to be interpreted in OECD as Plato's two efforts in the theories of knowledge and being to resolve the problems of Parmenides I. To set Parmenides I at the end of the early dialogues and before all the other dialogues is the most astonishing and, at the same time, the most vital decisionof OECD. In fact, what changes the current chronologies to OECD is a new story of the development of Plato's thought based on the problems of the theory of Forms in Parmenides I.The new place of Parmenides in OECD can, I think, be explainedwell regarding what happens in the dialogues both before and after it. In relation to the other dialogues of the Socratic wave its place is so dramatic. Having challenged the Athenian interlocutors, Socrates (the wisest man of Athen),and his theory of Forms (the very instrument by which he used to refuse his interlocutors because they were not able to explain what a thing itself, i.e. the Form, is) are now the subject of the attacks of Parmenides, a non-Athenian, in almost the same way of the dialogue.Respecting the dialogues after it, what is done in Plato's other dialogues from Theaetetus to Phaedo in the epistemological and from Parmenides II to Philosophos in the ontological waves is nothing but Plato's effort to reconstruct his theory of Forms with his new doctrines and methods in epistemology and ontology. The best reason for accepting OECD'splace forParmenides Iis what happened in the dialogues of both the epistemological and the ontological waves. i) There appears to be a problem about OECD's place for Parmenides: where is that theory of Forms that is to be observed as the subject of Parmenides' problems? Since it is as long as a history that we are accustomed to recognize Plato's theory of Forms with what is suggested in Phaedo and Republic, it might then be wondrous to hear that Parmenides is criticizing the theory as it is in Euthyphro, Laches and HippiasMajor alongside some other Socratic dialogues and not as is proposed in Phaedo and Republic. First, if we mean by a theory a doctrine fully and completely 'constructed', I agree that there cannot be found such a theory in the early dialogues as it cannot be found anywhere else in the other dialogues as well. It is somewhat related to Plato's way of introducing his theories but is more, I think, related to the theory of Forms itself. Comparing with the theory of Forms, the doctrine of anamnesis, for example, as it is introduced and articulated in Meno and Phaedo or, even more obviously, the method of hypothesis in Phaedo and Republic are far better 10 theorized and constructed. It shows that Plato was able to construct a theory of Forms in some of his dialogues instead of reminding the theory dispersedly here and there. It indicates, I think, that he was hesitant to theorize it from the beginning. It is not, therefore, reasonable to expect him to provide such a theory at the outset and in his early dialogues when he is wavering about it even at his much later dialogues. Second, besides Plato's oral tradition, there actually exists a theory of Forms in the early writingsthe dialogues which have been considered by OECD as earlier than Parmenidesif we do not expect a fully constructed theory. This theory which is called by Allen (2013) as the 'earlier theory of Forms', differs in some essential features from the theory of Forms as construed in some of the dialogues of the epistemological and ontological waves (the so-called middle period dialogues). While the 'earlier' theory has some features that make it vulnerable to the attacks of Parmenides, the theory of the so-called middle period dialogues tries to resolve them. The way in which the theory tries to resolve the problems is discussed in the next section below. Nonetheless, the main point is that the universal 19 and unequipped Forms of the early dialogues turn to the Forms, which became much more equipped (by new theories) and even considered as paradigms (especially in Republic). Thirdly, the naive and elementary way of discussing and defending the theory by young Socrates who is ready more to suggest different views than defending one firm and fixed theory, approves that there is no such theory yet. Thus, I take Socrates'epiphet, \"young\", in Parmenides as functional because Parmenides refers to it as a cause of the naivety of the theory (e.g., 130e, 135c-d). 20 The critics of Hippias Major (301bf.), thirdly, can indicate how Plato did criticize his own theories in the Socratic wave. In spite of the fact that we cannot find anywhere in the dialogues before Hippias Major where Socrates be saying that he is cutting up things in words and so on, this attitude of Socrates is criticized in there. This shows that Parmenides' critiques can be read in the same way and there may be no necessity of finding more than what we have about the theory of Forms in the written works of the Socratic wave. ii) Resolution of Parmenides' problems in the middle period dialogues The chronologists' biggest assumption that Parmenides' objections must refer to the middle dialogues (e.g., Cornford, 1939, 70-71; Palmer, 1999, 180; Kahn, 1996, 329) cannot be accepted because both the problems and their answers are already worked upon there (for example cf. Meinwald, 1992, 372; Dorter, 1989, 200). We are not to claim that Plato answers directly to the objections of Parmenides in the dialogues of the second and third waves for such answers cannot be found anywhere in Plato's corpus even in his so-called late period dialogues. What we insist upon is that the epistemological and ontological grounds of the theory of Forms as is represented in the middle period dialogues is deliberately constructed so as not to be broken by those criticisms anymore. We suggest, thus, that not only Parmenides' 11 problems are not referred to the middle period dialogues but they are intentionally resolved there. Of the six main objections, i) the problem of Forms for all, even worthless, things (130c-d), ii) the problems of participation (131), iii) the problem of TM (132ab), iv) the problem of considering Forms as thoughts (132b-c), v) the problem of Forms as paradigms (132d) and vi) the epistemological problems of taking Forms as separated from particulars (133a-135a), putting aside the first and the fourth, we consider the third and the fifth as one, the regress problem or the problem of TM. Since TM difficulty, it seems, arises from a certain relation between a Form and its participants, all the second, third and fifth problems have the same basis.Therefore, if it can be shown that a) the problem of participation and alsoTM problem and b) the epistemological problem are resolved in some of the dialogues of the middle period, OECD's place for Parmenides will be better justified. 1) Problems of participation and Third Man in the Republic Allen argues that though, for Plato, the just itself is just and the beautiful itself beautiful, this does not imply SP because for this, the function \"... is F\" must be applied univocally to F itself and F particulars. This univocal application of F to F itself and F particulars, Allen says, can be correct only if both of them 'have identically the same character' (1998, 58) which obviously is not the case. He points that for Plato, both in the early and middle dialogues, Forms are paradigms or standards, that is they are 'things characterized not characters' (ibid, 64) and Plato did not think of themin the way he used to in the early dialogues and as common characters. 21 'Not only the regress arguments', he says, 'but all of the objections to participation in the Parmenides posit an identity of character between Forms and particulars' (ibid). The rejection of the identity of F in F itself and F particulars based on the theory of Forms as paradigms in the original-copy model is justified because Forms stand to particulars 'not as predicates stand to instances of predicates but as originals stand to shadows or reflections' (1961, 333 cf. 335). F. C. White thinks not only thatthe original-copy theorycannot be ascribed to all the dialogues of the so-called middle period dialogues but also that it cannot be helpful in meeting TM 22 (1977, 208). His reason is that if images are images at all, it is due to the fact that their properties are 'univocally in common with their originals' (ibid, cf.199). My own point of view is that while TM is not appliable to Republic, it is appliable to all the other so-called middle dialogues. I agree with White that i) there is no common theory in the middle dialogues about the nature of the relation between the Forms and their participants; ii) the original-copy model is not appliable to Phaedo 23 ; iii) the original-copy model cannot be helpful regarding SP. Nonetheless, I absolutely disagree with him about its help to TM. What I think is that while Plato has always been committed to SP, he tried in Republic to present the original-copy model that is completely helpful against TM. Plato does not try to reject TM by rejecting SP as some think, but he tries to reject TM while maintaining 12 SP. Because of the difference between original and its shadow, the original-copy model of the theory of Forms, as Allen noted, escapes TM. The reason is that by this theory, the nature of participation changes in a way that the identity of a Form and its participants is not the case anymore. This ontology, amongst so-called middle dialogues I confine to Republic, changes the nature of participation so that neither Parmenides' problem of participation nor TM will be appliable anymore. Not only does not it reject SP but it even strengthen it. It is primarily and completely the Form of F which is F; a participant's being F must be understood in a different way. A paradigm of F is the perfect example of being F. The paradigm of F is not Fness but F itself. The difference between F-ness and F itself can become evident if we examin SP about them: While SP is correct and meaningful about F itself, it looks bizarre and unacceptable about F-ness. Large itself, the paradigm of Large, its perfect example, is obviously large because it is nothing but this being large and thus SP is obviously meaningful here. But about F-ness: 'Largeness is large' or 'beauty is beautiful' looks completely unacceptable because F-ness or the concept of F cannot itself be F. TM is also based on the assumption that Plato's theory of Forms makes a Form necessary when there is a common thing between some things. It only by understands the Form of F as F-ness, a universal concept which is in common between a Form and its participants, that the necessity of the existence of what is common between them is followed. If Forms are not universal concepts but originals of which all participants are shadows, there will be no necessity for a third thing to represent the common feature. Therefore, Plato's original-copy model of his theory of Forms changes the relation between a Form and its participants in a way that none of the problems of participation and regress arguments of Parmenides can be effective anymore. The case is different about Phaedo because the original-copy model and the theory of Forms as paradigms are not yet theorized there. 24 2) The Epistemological Problem Besides the distinction of knowledge and true belief which can clearly be helpful for the epistemological problem, Plato's three famous doctrines, the theory of anamnesis, the method of hypothesis and the theory of Forms as causes, do substantially aim at solving the epistemological problem resulted from the chōrismōsbetween the Forms and their particulars. 25 a) While the first appearance of the theory of anamnesisin Meno (81) is not about Forms,it is Phaedo, however, where the epistemological function of the theory is straightly directed to the Forms. Allen's view in linking between the theory of anamnesis and the 'epistemological problem entailed by the separation of Forms and particulars' worths noting. He thinks that if the theory is an answer to this epistemological problem, it is not reasonable to say that the theory in Meno is not directed to the problem (1959, 172). I admit Allen's note that the difference of the theory of anamnesis in the Meno and Phaedo is that the theory in the Phaedo solves problems generated by a χωρισμός between Forms and particulars which Plato, 13 when he wrote the Meno, was perhaps groping for, but had not yet clearly formulated (ibid, 174). The prior knowledge of the Forms does obviously intend to solve the problem of knowing separated Forms. By this theory, our knowledge is not restricted to our own world anymore and it cannot be said, as is claimed at Parmenides 134a-b, that none of the Forms are known by us and thus the knowledge of Forms is not a problem any longer. They are not still in us and, therefore, do not have their being in relation to the things that belong to our world strictly as it is said at Parmenides 133c-d. Consequently, the theory of anamnesis suggests a solution to the problem of knowledge of Forms while keeping them separated. The gap between Forms and things is as complete and huge as it is in Parmenides 133e. Here they are even more separatedthen ever. It is the big presupposition of many Plato's commentators that he must have tried to diminish or eliminate the chōrismōs had he wanted to resolve the epistemological problem of Parmenides. Based on this presumption, Plato should have chosen the first and most simple way of solving problem. Thence we can see while the theory of anamnesis is so much obviously directed to the epistemological problem, no one tends to take it as a post-Parmenides thesis. b) As the doctrine of anamnesisis presented as a solution to Meno's problem, the method of hypothesis is suggested as another solution to the problem (Meno 86d8-e5 cf. 87a-b). The relation of the method with Meno's paradox in the mentioned passages is obvious enough. Phaedo's more complicated and better-constructed method which is not simply applying geometrians' method as it was in Meno, but a more philosophical and specified one, is still related with the problem of investigating something that is out of the region of our knowledge. Socrates' warning about the danger of watching directly an eclipse of the sun (99d-e) before discussing the method (100a f.) can throw light on this relation. Socrates who is searching for the causes is afraid of his soul completely being blind if he looks at things directly as someone who watches an eclipse of the sun might become blind in his eyes. As the one who wants to watch the eclipse must first see its reflection in water and similar things, Socrates who wants to find the aitiai, i. e. Forms, must use the hypotheses. Therefore, the method of hypothesis is to be, firstly, a method of getting the knowledge of the Forms (100a6). Immediately after the definition of the method at 100a, its relation with Forms becomes apparent at 100b f. The use of the method in the allegory of Line in Republicis also related with the Forms, though, contrary to Meno and Phaedo, it has nothing to do with anamnesis. While this method is not used in the dialectical proceeding from images to sensible things and then to the mathematical objects, the hypotheses are needed to proceed from them to the Forms and then to the first principle. Socrates' reference to the method of geometers saying 'they make these their hypotheses and do not think it necessary to give any account of them, either to themselves or to others, as if they were clear to everyone' (510c6-d1), indicates his intention, i.e. using Forms in an epistemological construction which, though has knowledge as its result, is not forced to explain Forms themselves. This is strictly directed against the epistemological problems arisen in Parmenides 134a-c. 14 c) Phaedo's theory of Forms as causes has clearly the epistemological function of the Forms as its purpose.The result Socrates gets to about the role of Forms in explanation, that only whatshares in a Form by its nature, refuses its opposite while it is itself, means that we can explain a thing not only by a Form but also by what always has its character (103e2-5). Everything that shares in a Form by nature is always called with that Form and can never be called by the opposite: It cannot 'admit that Form which is opposite to that which it is' (104b9-10). This helps him reach to some kind of necessary opposition between things that are not the opposites (105a6b1) which enables him to extend his previous safe and foolish theory of explanation by Forms to another not foolish but still safe theory of explanation (105b6-c6). Socrates' effort to show how Forms, without themselves being the explanation, can help us reach to a safe explanation of things is against Parmenides' problem (133c134a) that Forms cannot help to the knowledge of particulars. iii) That Plato wants to restart his search of knowledge in Theaetetus due to the previous arisen problems of knowledge in Parmenides I, is what was somehow agreed upon also in the other chronologies. In this respect, its place in OECD is the same, the beginning of a wave that is to resolve the problems of knowledge by redefining what knowledge is.The main step of the dialogue, I think, is the conclusion that knowledge is not true belief (187b ff.), nor true belief plus account (201d ff.) which has the distinction ofknowledge and beliefas its result. The vital role of this distinction for the theory of Forms is obvious enough from Timaeus 51d3-5: if understanding and true opinion are two kinds, then Forms must exist. ThatTheaetetusmust be posited after Parmenides is something almost all the current chronologies agree with. The difference is that OECD considers it as the starting point of an epistemological effort proceeding to Meno and Phaedo and thus a hopeful effort that gets to its own goals namely establishing the epistemological grounds for the theory of Forms. It is Theaetetus' distinction of knowledge and true opinion that is restated inMeno (85c-d, cf. 97a-98b) which is related tothe case of the slave boy and the doctrine of anamnesis; a doctrine thathas the duty of resolving the problem of knowledge of the separated Forms in Parmenides I (133b-135a).This doctrine is reformulated in Phaedo (72e ff.) and gets to its, what we may be allowed to call, cosmological explanation in Phaedrus. The method of hypothesis has the duty of making us capable of getting the knowledge of what we do not know (Meno 86ef.), the knowledge of particulars out of the hypothesized knowledge of the separated Forms (Phaedo101df.) and the knowledge of the separated Forms and the first principle out of the opinions we have of the sensibles (Republic510bf.). Therefore, the epistemological wave is a project of resolving the epistemological problem of Parmenides using the interrelated doctrines of the distinction of knowledge and belief, anamnesis and the method of hypothesis.The theory of Forms as causes in Phaedo can be interpreted in this way as well. ii) After the absence of the theory of Forms in Theaetetus 26 , Cratylus and Meno 27 , surprisingly we see in the other dialogues of both the epistemological and ontological 15 waves that Socrates asks his interlocutors to accept the existence of the Forms only as a hypothesis. At Phaedo 100b4-8 28 after recalling that he has never stopped speaking about the Forms, Socrates says: I turn back to those often mentioned things and proceed from them taking as hypothesis the existence (ὑποθέμενος εἶναί) of the beautiful, itself by itself, and Good and Great and all the others. If you grant this and agree (ἃεἴ μοι δίδως τε καὶ συγχωρει ς εἶναι ταῦτα) I hope to show you the cause.... It is of the highest importance to ask why Socrates who used to take the existence of the Forms for granted in the early dialogues (e.g., Euthyphro 6d-e, Hippias Major 287, 289d, 292e, 294d, Laches 191e-192a) 29 now is demanding that we accept it only as a hypothesis? 30 Is it not simply because their existence had been seriously attacked in Parmenides I? If we agree with OECD that the first part of the Parmenideshad been composed before such hypothesizings of Forms, it can be more understandable. Now, what OECD says provides a more consistent story: solutions provided in those dialogues are purposely directed to the problems that had been drawn out before. iv) With OECD's arrangement, we do accept that the problems of Parmenides were valid in Plato's point of view and hence we are not subject of the objection IX. OECD is safe regarding the objection X since: a) Aristotle's ignorance of Plato's self-criticism as it is shown in Parmenides' problems, are lot more understandable by OECD's arrangement than by the theory of those who take the problems valid. Considering Parmenidesas prior to the dialogues like Phaedoand Republic,where the theory is discussed more than anywhere else, could make Aristotle'sinadvertence more understandable because Parmenides goes farther 31 from them in time and thus more negligible and Plato's Forms-defending dialogues of the two waves after the Socratic wave provides no room to doubt that he believes in his theory. Even if Aristotle, who never mentions any development in Plato's thought, had seen Parmenides (something we are not sure about), he must have taken it either as an old dialogue without any significant importance because there was no sign of rejection in Plato'sactual way of treating with the theory or as a pedagogicdialogue. Whatever the relation of Aristotle and Parmenides might have been, having in mind Aristotle's attacks against the theory of Forms, we can be almost sure that he did not see Plato as a self-criticizing philosopher. It might be the same about the Academy. V) None of the stylometric evidences agrees with the current place for Parmenides and the irregularities of Parmenides' style regarding so-called late dialogues has always been surprising for many scholars. The case is totally different with OECD because most of thestylometric evidences show that Parmenidesis closer to the early or middle dialogues than the late ones. 16 3. Euthydemus I am not personally satisfied with OECD's place for Euthydemus. It must probably placed after Parmenides I, maybe before Theaetetus or during the time between Theaetetus and Meno.From an epistemological point of view, its discussion of false belief belongs to the period that is engaged with the problem of false belief, that is, in OECD, between Theaetetus and Sophist. The problem of learning either what one knows or what one does not know (276d) resembles Meno's paradox. Euthydemus, however, seems to be, epistemologically, close to Theaetetus and before it but ontologically prior to Sophist. The problems of the possibility of telling lies (283e), impossibility of false speaking (86c-d) and the paradox of knowing or not knowing (293c-d) all belong, epistemologically, to the period of the Theaetetusand Meno. Moreover, the definition of knowing as having knowledge (ἔχειν ἐπιστήμην) at 277b9-c1 can be considered as related with the same theory at Theaetetus 197b1 and prior to the distinction of having and possessing knowledge that follows it. Nonetheless, Euthydemus has neither any clear discussion of the distinction of knowledge and belief nor of the theory of Forms. All these can allow us to consider it epistemologically close to Theaetetus and prior to it 32 . Futhermore, this place does not affect the currentattitudes insofar as they consider it either as an early or transitional dialogue that is prior to Meno. The difference is then about its place regarding Parmenides I and Theaetetus. 4. Theaetetus and Sophist Both the current chronologies and OECD agree upon positing Theaetetus after Parmenides, but they differina) the place of Parmenides and b) Theaetetus'distance fromSophist. By bringing Parmenides to an earlier period while keeping Sophistcloser to the place it had before, the OECD'splan make a long distance between Theaetetus and Sophist consideringat least MenoandPhaedoin between. Here are our proofs for this arrangement: i) We believe thatMeno's discussion of the distinction of knowledge and opinion (97a-b, 97d-98b) must be posterior to Theaetetus' distinction (187bff., 201dff.) simply because while it is demonstrated in the latter, it is only used in the former. Phaedo highly resemblesMeno and, as it isgenerally agreed, belongs to the same period. ii) MenoandPhaedointend to resolve a) the problem of false beliefas it was drawn out in Euthydemus and Theaetetus and b) the epistemological problem of ParmenidesI, both epistemologically. The interrelated doctrines of the distinction between knowledge and opinion, anamnesis and the method of hypothesis try to solve those problems by a new theory of knowledge. Sophist, on the contrary, intends to deal with the problems ontologically. While the theory of anamnesis explains how we can have such a thing as true belief distinct from knowledge, which itself is kind of resolving the problem of false belief, it cannot explain how false belief can 17 ontologically be possible because it needs that the being of not being be accepted first, a thesis that is not accepted before Sophist. We also noted thatbesides the second part of Parmenides, Sophistcannot be later than Republic because it is in Sophistthat the being of not being is accepted before to be used in Republic. Now, a careful consideration of this fact besides the above discussion of the epistemological mission of Theaetetus, Meno and Phaedo to resolve the problems of (a) and (b) epistemologically, lead us to the important result that these last three dialogues,being unable to resolve the problems ontologically, tried to present epistemological solutions.This means that they were prior to the Sophist-Republic solutions because the ontological solution does not require the epistemological solution. OECD seems to be, therefore, right to make the epistemological wave prior to the ontological one. An evidence of this is the absence of the theory of anamnesis in Republic. Why it never appears in there? Mentioning the myth of Er at 619bff.and the later incarnation at 498d as evidence, Kahn (2006, 130) thinks that 'something like' anamnesis is actually presupposed in Republic. Nonetheless, he agrees that it does not appear in an epistemological context. Our question, nonetheless, is exactly about the absence of the epistemological role of the theory in Republic. Kahn (ibid) thinks that the omission of the theory in Republic is not because Plato changed his mind about knowledge. He notes that at 518c Plato is clearly a kind of innatist. Having the allegory of Cave in mind, his suggestion is that it has some rhetorical and artistic instead of conceptual and philosophical reasons. He thinks that the theory does not fit with exactly the same part of the Republic we departed as Philosophos, i.e., from the end of the book V to the end of the book VII. I hope my discussion about Plato's development can show why the theory is not needed anymore in Republic. This is an onto-epistemological and thus, contrary to Kahn, a philosophical reason. The omission of the theory in Republic is simply because by the new metaphysics suggested in the mentioned books of Republic, there is no need to the theory of anamnesis anymore. The classification of being and knowledge as it is drawn in the allegory of Line and the dialectical search of knowledge from the lower classes to the upper ones which is itself based on Republic's specific theory of hypothesis can provide the knowledge of Forms without having them before, i.e. without anamnesis. iii) What is the reason for consideringSophist immediately after Theaetetus? What is the reason for considering Theaetetus with Sophist, Politicus and Parmenides as Eleatic dialogues as, for instance, Dorter (1994) does except that their characters are from Elea? It is obvious that Theaetetus' reference at 183eand Sophist's at 217c to Parmenides do not prove anything more than that they are post-Parmenides dialogues. Even Sophist's reference at 216a to Theaetetus cannot mean more than that it is a later dialogue. The distance between these two dialogues can easily be shown by the obvious stylometric differences of Theaetetus on the one hand, and Sophist and Politicus on the other hand. While Sophist obviously belongs to the late period dialogues, Theaetetus, as Tarrant notes, 'approximates less to the style of the late dialogues as measured by stylometry than do the later books of the Republic' 18 (2000, 37). All the time references of the dialogues that yesterday we had such a discussion (Sophist 216a) or tomorrow will continue the other one (Theaetetus 210d) are, I think, only dramatic considerations and cannot be taken as exact chronological time distances. 33 What these references can at most signify is that one dialogue has the other dialogue in mind either dramatically or philosophically by intending to continue the issue or resolvethe problems that had been drawn in those dialogues, as Sophist continues the issues of both Theaetetusand Parmenides II. To say that some times after writing Theaetetus, Plato decided to write another dialogue with some of the same characters especially Theaetetus and as its sequel, probably because he wanted to pursue the same problem, 34 namely the problem of false belief, but this timewith a new ontological attitude, is quite more acceptable than Ryle's suggestion (1966, 284) that Plato kept Sophist and Politicus in his shelf, a suggestion that was mostly based on the stylometric evidence. The generally agreed supposition that Theaetetus and Sophist are sequel or, as Ryle says,'a sort of sequel' 35 (1939, 316) has even more problems. Theaetetus, firstly, is clearly a more close to the Socratic dialogues and is far less complicated than Sophist. Secondly, the method of collection and division to which Sophist is so bounded is almost absent in Theaetetus. The trilogy of dialogues promised at Sophist 217a3, thirdly, discussing sophist, stateman and philosopher starts with Sophistand not Theaetetus. 36 The ontological status of Sophist, fourthly and most importantly, is incomparable with that of Theaetetus that means they must belong to different periods. iv) Unlike Sophist and Republic that are inclined to distinguish between the objects of knowledge and belief, Theaetetus' epistemological theories like the theories of Meno and Phaedo do not make distinction between the objects. In the analogy of block of wax, the difference of two men, one judging truly while the other falsely, are explained in their waxes (194c-e). Whereas the wax of the soul of one man is deep, abundant and smooth and hence the signs that are imprinted on are lasting, it is vice versa in another one: hard, shaggy, rugged and without depth which in not well imprintable and hence does not have distinct impressions making it liable to false judgment. The problem of false belief is to be treated here in this analogy by a subjective analysis trying to make the difference in the knower and not in the object of knowing. The analogy of Aviary is also the same in this respect: possessing (κεκτῆθαι) and having (ἔχειν) are distinct but not by their objects. It is the same object, a coat, that you have when you are wearing it, but you possess when though you have bought it, you are not wearing it now (197b8-10). A man who has birds in his aviary possesses them but he does not have them in his control and his hand unless he will (c1-5). So is the knowledge (197e). The birds are the same whether you have or possess them. What is different is the knower's situation and not the known. It is exactly this kind of difference in the side of the knower that is to be taken as the explanation of the distinction of knowledge and true belief in Meno. True opinions are resembled to the statues of Daedalus that run away and escape if not tied down: true opinions become 19 knowledge (ἐπιστήμαι γίγονται) after being tied down (98a5-6) because knowledge differs from true opinion in being tied down (διαφέρει δεσμῷ ἐπιστήμη ὀρθῆς δόξης) (a7-8) which is itself done by the αἰτίας λογισμῷ (a34). The fact that there is obviously no distinction between the objects of knowledge and true opinion in Theaetetus and Meno keeps them far from Sophist and Republic where the being of not being makes a third status, ἔοικος, which is taken as the object of opinion and distinct from the object of knowledge. The case of Cratylus is much the same as Theaetetus. The explanation presented there about the word doxa based on toxon meaning shooting a bow (420b), has a sign of its closeness to Theaetetus. Moreover, false speaking is still impossible (429c, 430c). So it can be said that while Theaetetus, Cratylus and Meno have distinguished between knowledge and true belief, they have not yet reached to its ontological correspondent. 5. Parmenides II The second part of Parmenides that Palmer rightly calls 'the most puzzling and controversial text in the Platonic corpus' (1999, 148) is the only part in a dialogue that is totally different from its complementary part. Nowhere else can we make such an apparent distinction between parts of a dialogue. From Parmenides 137ff. we have a long chain of arguments hypothesizing various propositions regarding Parmenides' \"One\" and again hypothesizing their opposites making an inescapable labyrinth. Its obvious differencefrom the first part of the dialogue makes the idea of Parmenides as an assembled dialogue more probable; an idea thathas been suggested by some commentators. 37 i) The second part of the Parmenides is the initiating point of a new effort to save the theory of Forms. What Plato had tried to do in the epistemological wave was to provide solutions for the epistemological problem of Parmenides, but the problem of participation and TMare still fatal at the end of the epistemological wave. He had to start thus from the same point, i.e., Parmenides. This was not, nevertheless, his only reason to choose Parmenides as Socrates' interlocutor to attach this new writing to the previously written dialogue with him but there was a more principal reason. He needed to go beyond Parmenides' notion of One Being and this, I believe, was his main reason. What were to be reassessed was (1) Parmenides'principle of the tight attachment of \"one\" and \"being\"as the cause of his famous principle that 'being is one' and (2) Parmenideanunderstanding of \"being\" which was the cause of his principle of the impossibility of being of not being. In agreement with many commentators, I think ParmenidesII is the first step of Plato's going beyond these two notions, and this can be observed as a major purpose of the dialogue. It is in this passage that Plato criticizes the relation of being and the same (162d) which can be considered both as the basis and thenecessary result of Parmenides' principle, 'Being is one'. Thiscriticism that makes use of the notion of difference (143b) is only the preparatory step of his use of this notion in Sophist (255d ff.) by which the 20 Parmenidean principle of the impossibility of being of not being is rejected. If we read Parmenides II and Sophistas the sequel steps of an ontological project, we can see how the project of rejecting Parmenidean notions of One and Being leads to the notion of difference which itself is the basis of Plato'snew ontology in Sophist and Republic. This ontology has the solution of Parmenides I's problems of participation and TMand, at the same time, the problem of false belief. The second part of theParmenidesmust then be dated after the epistemological wave and as the starting point of the ontological wave.Why can't we, one might ask, observe this ontological wave parallel to, or interwoven with, the epistemological wave? My main reason for the chronological order of two waves is that the dialogues of the epistemological wave, or at least Menoand Phaedo, are still unaware of the ontological wave's solution. ii) The place of Parmenides II in OECD differs in two main regards from its place in the current chronologies: Theaetetus and Republic; while the contemporary chronologiesare accustomed to consider Parmenides, and consequently its second part, before Theaetetus and after Republic, we are suggesting its contrary in OECD. The change OECD implements regarding the place of these three dialogues is mostly because Parmenides II must ontologically be considered between Theaetetus and Republic. Theaetetus' all epistemological efforts to answer the question 'what is knowledge?' (145a) with theories like knowledge is perception (151e ff.) or true judgment (187b) or true judgment plus an account (201d) besides the analogies of block of wax (191c-e), the Aviary (197bff.) and the analogy of knowledge to birdand the explanation of getting knowledge as hunting,all still are Plato's epistemological efforts and do not think about the ontological solution. Regarding ontological issues, they are still faithful to Parmenidesand are not to challenge his principles as Parmenides II does. 38 It is directly asserted at 180e-181a that Socrates got stuck between Parmenidean and Heraclitean theories and wants to put a fight and escape. This effort, however, does not bring it to the point of Parmenides II.At Theaetetus167a7-8we are being said that 'it is impossible to opine what is not (οὔτε γὰρ τὰ μὴ ὄντα δυνατὸν δοξάσαι)' and at 189a10: 'opining not being is opining nothing (μὴ ὄν δοξάζων οὐδὲν δοξάζει)'. In Parmenides II, we have not still gone out of Parmenides'dominance but the first step is taken. At 160e, we are encountered with the necessity of dealing with not being with some adjectives like \"this\" or \"that\" and so on. Though still unable to be, not being must necessarily partake of many things: The One indeed cannot be, if it is not, but it is necessary that nothing prevent it from partaking of many things. (160e7-161a1) The whole of the sophisticated arguments of Parmenides II can show how much the Parmenides' understanding of being is problematic. What is said, for instance, at 162a can be a good example: If the one -which is notis to be not being, 21 it must have being a not-being as a bond in regard to its not-being, just as what is must have not-being what is not, if it is to be completely. Although the Parmenidean being is not overpassed in Parmenides II, these discussion shows that it is not accepted as before. Theaetetus' attention to the problem of Parmenidean being is confined to its contradiction with Heraclitean notion of flux. This understanding, I believe, is much more elementary than Parmenides II's attention to the problems arisen from Parmenides' understanding of the concept of being. If our arguments are sound, Parmenides II cannot be prior to Theaetetus because of its ontological status. This status, on the contrary, makes it prior to Sophist and Republic. The incomplete achievement to the being of not being in Parmenides II must antecedate its full achievement in Sophist and its implementation in Repubic. iii) Being dominant in Sophist and Politicus and absent from Theatetus, the method of collection and division has a predominant role in the second part of Parmenides 39 while cannot be seen in the first part of this dialogue. This is fully consistent with OECD's arrangement. While the first part of Parmenides and the Theaetetus are dated as prior to the dialogues of the epistemological wave, all unaware of the method of collection and division, the second part of Parmenides, the Sophist and Politicusare engaged with this new method. iv) Almost all the stylometric evidences are pro the antecedent date of Parmenides regarding Republic. 'In sofar as stylometry suggests anything', Tarrant says,'it strongly suggests that both works [i.e. Theaetetus and Parmenides] were begun far earlier than the Republic was finished' (2000, 141). 6. Republic and Laws The place of the Republic is the most confusing in the arrangement of the dialogues 40 .We have the following evidences: a) Based on ontological features, it must be dated after SophistandParmenidesII. b) Because of its ontological solution of the problems of participation and TM, it must be dated after Parmenides I. 41 c) Based on Aristotle's testimony (Politics, II, 6), it is prior to Laws. d) Laws is unaware of philosopher-king theory of Repulic which implies that its place after the final version of Republic might be problematic. 42 e) Stylometric evidences strongly suggest that Sophist, Politicus, Timaieus, Critias and Philebus belong to the same period of Laws. While the ontological evidences, (a) and (b), ask us to consider Republic after Sophist and Parmenides, the political evidences, (c) 43 and (d), alongside the stylometric evidences (e), tells that it must be prior to the so called late dialogues.The only solution is what has been suggested by somescholars that Republic is not a simple dialogue but a later composition of some dialogues. Except RepublicIitsseparation and being early is a more accepted fact, the passage 473-571is alsoa later attachment. Our reasons for its attachment are as follows. 22 i) After first book'saporetic ending like a Socratic dialogue, being unable to find what justice is, the second book starts by Socrates'statement that: 'when I said this [referring to his last sentences in the first book, namely that he could not find what justice is and soon], I thought I had done with the discussion, but it turned out to have been only a prelude' (357a). The discussion continues with the goodness or badness of injustice pursuing the first book's discussion. The search of finding individual justice transfers to a search for justice in a city by Socrates' suggestion that they might be more successful to find it if they search it in a larger thing, a city (368d), which leads them to construct a city in order to find justice there. This is the directing line of the argument whichtends to be exclusively treating with many political issues about all the details of constructing a city. After more than 65 Stephanus pages, we are given the result of this investigation of justice in the city, the larger object of investigation,in the middle of the fourth book (433). The discussants then try to find the justice in the individual by applying the result they got fromtheir investigation of justice in the city (434e ff.). This leads to the tripartite structure ofthe soul based on the structure of the city and finally to the result that the justice in an individual is just the same as it was in a city, that is, when each of its parts does its own work (441d ff.). They then look for injustice (444a ff.) and try to answer if justice is profitable or not (444e ff.) which leads itself to the comparison between types of souls and types of political constitutions (448c ff.).This topic is, however, postponed because of Polemarchus'demand for the explanation of what was said before, namely the question that how possessions can be held in common, which is at the very beginning of the fifth Book (449a). This topic, then, runs the discussion and brings some marginal discussions by 471d where the question of possibility of such an ideal city arises. In his first answer to the problem, Plato points to the fact that what he had drawn out was only a theoretical model that does not need to be proved as a possible city (472).I think this can be the end of the story of the Ideal State that had been started from the beginning of the second Book. What is said from 473c on is completely a new project and, I think, is attached to the Ideal State (357-472). The cities we have, Socrates says, is able to make the ideal state possible if the 'greatest wave' can be passed. This greatest wave is nothing but the theory of philosopher-king. Socrates is afraid of being ridiculed and laughed because of the theory (473c7-9) which shows both its importance and Socrates'understandable hesitation about it. Socrates' own statement can approve this: Until philosophers rule as kings or those who are now called kings and leading men genuinely and adequately philosophize ...Glaucon!cities will have no rest from evils nor, I think, will the human race. And, until this happens, the constitution we have been describing in theory will never be born to the fullest extent possible or see the light of the sun. It is because I saw how very paradoxical this statement would be that I hesitated to make it for so long... (473c11-e4) 44 23 Although this long time hesitation may hint that what we are being said is something that had been doubted to be written or published, we are not going to rely only on this. What happens after this and its overall difference from Ideal State can be more decisive. The theory of philosopher-king brings forth the question that: who are the true philosophers? (475e3) This question turns the discussion to a discussion of the philosopher from 473c on. Besides the fact that all of these pages are discussing onto-epistemological issues thatare related to the subject of philosopher, \"philosopher\" is itself the subject of the discussions. The question of \"who are the philosophers?\" leads to the passage (476e-479e) that distinguishes knowledge as what is set over being from opinion as what is set over what both is and is not. As the lovers of the objects of knowledge, i.e., what is, philosophers are distinct from the lovers of sights and soundswho love the objects of opinion (479e-484a). Philosophers are those who are able to grasp what the lovers of sights and sounds are not able, namely, what is always the same (484b). It is the nature (φύσιν) of philosopher which is the subject of inquiry (485a5, at 485a10: φιλοσόφωνφύσεων) and is described at 492a1-5 and is again connected with things themselves at 493ef.. Socrates then says that the philosophic nature is altered in the constitutions of his time and thus links the discussion of philosopher to that of the Ideal State (497b ff.) and concludes that philosophers are the best guardians of the city (503b) andthey must exercise in many subjects (503e) most importantly the Form of the Good (504e505a). This leads to the allegories of Sun, Line and Cave in the sixth and seventh books. After a full discussion of the way guardians must be brought about with different sciences in their carears to become philosophers, those who survived all the tests and saw the Form of the Good can order the city and become the philosopherkings (540a f.). It is the end of the search for philolopherand the way the philosopher must be brought about in the city and also the end of the seventh book (541b). Therefore, it can be said that the passage from the last pages of book V to the end of book VII, i. e., 473c-541b, has the philosopher as its subject. In addition to the unity of this passage of which we tried to provide a very short and thus insufficient review, what makes its attachment to the Ideal State more probable is that this discussion of philosopher is in the middle of the discussion of common possession in the city; a discussion that had been started from the beginning of fifth book (449) and continued till 471d where the problem of the possibility of the ideal state directs the discussion to the topic of the philosopher at 473c. By the end of the discussion about philosopher, we immediately fall into the same discussion at the very beginning of book VIII, even without any introduction or a linking paragraph: Well, then, Glaucon, we've agreed to the following: If a city is to achieve the height of good government, wives must be in common, children and all their education must be in common... (453a1f.) 24 After his long diversion from the previous topic, Socrates needs the beginning topic to be recalled and Glaucon, reminding the topic, says: 'you were talking as you had completed the description of the city' (543c7-8). If I am right in my consideration of the part we distinguished as an attachment, having in mind its topic, philosopher, and its place in OECD, after Sophist and Politicus, the first probability will be that this later attachment is so similar in its topic as well as its order, to the unwritten third part of the trilogy of sophist, statesman and philosopher that though had been promised at Sophist 217a3, has never been published.This motivated me to suggest that this passage that I cut up from the Republic might be the Philosophos, the third part of the trilogy.Plato never published the third part maybe because he was afraid, as he himself says, of its theme, namely that philosophers must be the kings, besides the fact that hegot stuck in another project and thus tried to reshape what he had in mind, or maybe even had somehow written, as the third part of the trilogy and emplace it in the larger plan of Republic.In her book, Philosophos: Plato's Missing Dialogue (2012), Gill believes that based on the fact that it is not included in the ancient survived list of Plato's dialogues, 'we can be fairly sure that the dialogue was not written and lost' (p.1). She thinks that Plato left it on purpose and 'deliberately withholds' it to stimulate his audience to combine the pieces about the subject in the other dialogues. Focusing on Parmenides, Theaetetus and Sophist, she does not let, of course, Republic to take part in this combining because, based on SCD Republic must be prior toall of them. OECD's arrangement of the ontological and political waves can explain why Plato who was thinking of that trilogy fell into the political wave.Suppose that at the time of composing Sophist, Plato was thinking that after writing about it, he will write a dialogue about statesman and then another one about philosopher as the culmination of the trilogy. It is not strange to imagine that this path was deviated to a political inquiry when he became engaged with political issues in Politicus. Instead of continuing it with a dialogue about philosopher, he became thus busy with Ideal State and Laws. Maybe it was only after Timaeus and with the use of all the hierarchical models he had discovered from Ideal State onward that he decided to assemble what he had in mind, or maybe in his shelf (!), about philosopher with his search for the Ideal State and based on the question of 'what is justice?' in Republic I,which had been composed long time ago. 45 If I am right in this suggestion, both the posterior date of the Philosophosand its difference from Ideal State can be more acceptable. ii) The epistemological difference between the Philosophos and Ideal State also worths remarking. What is said in the third book at 402b, that to know the copy, knowledge of original is necessary, seems prior to and even inconsistent, though not necessarily, with what is said in the sixth book and in the theory of hypothesis by which one goes upside from copy to original without having the knowledge of the original. The difference of 473-571 from the other passages of Republicand specially Ideal Stateis also clear from its mostly metaphysicalcontent that is definitely 25 separable from its previous passage dealing exclusively with political issues. This content is the very one which we considered as the evidence of Republic's being later than Parmenides II, Sophist andTimaeus. Therefore, if we accept that Republic II-X has at least two assembled parts, we will become able to manage the confusion arisen from the arrangement of Republic and Laws. It is the political part of Republic, Ideal state, which is prior to Laws and is referred there and, probably, was in Aristotle's mind 46 when said that Lawsis after Republic.The later date of the Philosophos, the very passage the idea of philosopher-king is drawn out there can also suggest a solution to the problem of Law's negligence of the philosopher-king doctrine that had surprised commentators. iii) 'Before stylometry', as Prior asserts, 'almost all scholars would have placed the Republic after the Sophist' (1985, 168). This was due to the stylometric evidences that Republicis dated now in SCD as middle and prior to many dialogues. Nonetheless, the assembled character of Republic suggests a sound solution for the biggest problematic decision of OECD regarding stylometric evidences. Suppose that Plato who had composed the first book of Republic much earlier and most probably in his early period of writing and the Ideal State in another time, now decides to compose the Republic which includes not only those dialogues but what was in his mind or even written, the Philosophos, as the third part of the trilogy. It is not then of a shock to say that since he wanted to rewritethem as the continuation of Republic I, he tried to keep a unified style as for as possible.Lutoslavski also approves a later date for the books VI and VII of Republic. 47 7. Timaeus By the suggestion of the distinction of the Philosophos from the Ideal State, the date OECD considered for Timaeus becomes more acceptable. The passage in Timaeus (17a, 18b) which has always been taken as referring to Republic,is indeedreferring to Ideal State. This helps us consider it as a prior dialogue to Republic because it seems thatits ontological statusindicates its place between Sophistand Philosophos. 48 Owen's main reasons for dating Timaeus after Republic and before Politicus (1998, 260-261) are these: a) The opening of the dialogue (17a) refers to a dialogue that had occurred the previous day that most probably is Republic. b) At Timaeus 18b the idea that guardians must have no gold or silver or any private property refers to Republic417a and 547b-548b. c) The Politicus (at 292a, c and 293a, c-d) insists four times (?) that whether the ruler has any wealth is completely irrelevant to the quality of his governance. Owen thinks that this is said as a novel doctrine. d) The system of marriage of the guardians in Republic (457c-465c) echoed in Timaeus (18c-d) is abandoned in Politicus (310c-311c). These evidences can lead to another arrangement between the dialogues if we accept Republic II-Xas having two parts, the Ideal State and the Philosophos: (a) and 26 (b) are clearly referring to the Ideal State and not to the Philosophos.Moreover, not only (c) and (d) are not problematic regarding OECD's arrangement but they can even be supportive because the more elementary status of Politicus' political discussion 49 regarding Ideal State is thoroughly consistent with OECD's later date for Ideal State and Republic. Unlike Owen, I think what is said about the rulers' wealth(293c8-d2)can be more of an evidenceapproving the priority of Politicus'theory than presenting a new theory against the past theory.Unlike Owen who thinks that this is a novel doctrine, I think it might equally mean that Plato is not yet achieved to his more complicated theory of propertyless rulers. Moreover, that Plato does not speak in Politicus of the marriage of the guardians can similarlybeout of the fact thatPoliticus is still unaware of the idea. Owen, however, agrees that neither Timaeus nor Critias seem to know anything about Republic's doctrine that 'a state may be saved by the supremacy not of immutable laws but of an ἀνήρ φρόνιμος above the law' (1998, 264).Owen and Nicholas P. White (1976, 91) are right that Timaeus is closer to Republic than the late dialogues 50 but Cherniss is also right that it is later than Parmenides. Notes 1 Thesleff says that in spite of the fact that the only evidence from which we can infer the chronology is the internal evidence, 'the value of such evidence is open to the general criticism that many, if not all, may have been re-written' (1989, 7). 'There is no reason', he continues, 'to suppose that Plato left his writing in exactly the same state in which they were first composed'. (ibid) 2 There are some issues about Plato's life that can overally change any chronological order. What Grombie calls 'the most critical event' (1969, 363) in Plato's life, namely his probable being prosecuted for defamation and being forbidden to teach at 372 can be one of these issues. 3 E.g. Diognes Laertius (Lives, III, 37), Olympiodorus (Prol. VI, 24) 4 This kind of naming is also compatible with Plato's own way of theorizing as he always makes use of entangible things as models trying to explain complicated matters. 5 By Parmenides I, I mean the first part of the dialogue which is discussing the problems of Socrates' theory of Forms and lasts till 137. Parmenides II consists the part from 137 to the end of the dialogue where Parmenides' One is being discussed. 6 The mentions of the theory in Philebus (342b) and Laws (732b) appear to be, as Sayre (2005, 193) notes, 'entirely removed' from the sense it had before. I am not convinced with Kahn's (1996, 367) appealing to Politicus 277d and Timaeus 41e-42d as the passages in which the theory is alluded or implied. 7 Kahn (1996, 373) points to some evidences of Phaedrus' referring to Republic (cf. Hackforth (1952, 3-7). Irwin believes that Phaedrus must be considered as a 'revision' or 'development' of the views of both Republic and Symposium and not an anticipation of them (1995, 12). 27 8 Being certain about Symposium's posterior date, Moore asserts that while writing Symposium, Plato must have 'firmly' had Phaedrus in mind. Mostly based on Phaedrus' more sophisticated logic represented in its method of collection and division, Dillon (1973) argues against him. 9 By so calling them, I do not mean, of course, that they are the real dialogues of historical Socrates. 10 Cf. Fine, 2003, 29 11 The relation of Cratylus and Theaetetus is a Problem with which the current chronologies do not know what to do (cf. Runciman, 1962, 2). While Cratylus looks close to the early dialogues, it has some unignorable similarities to Theaetetus, which is considered far from the early and after the middle period dialogues. While OECD resolves this problem easily considering Theaetetus as early, about the order between Theaetetus and Cratylus I cannot be certain at all since there cannot be found any certain ontological or epistemological priority between them. All that can be said is that they are close to each other as some of their main themes, especially the problems of flux, Protagoras' relativism and false belief might bring to mind. Never holding a 'confident opinion', Runciman, however, dates Cratylus 'somewhere before' Theaetetus (ibid). 12 Gorgiasmentions the distinction of knowledge and true opinion without discussing it, a distinction proved in Theaetetus and used in Meno. While it is accepted that there can be false conviction besides true conviction (πίστις ψευδὴς καὶ ἀληθής) (454d5), false knowledge (ἐπιστήμη...ψευδὴς) (d6-7) is strongly prohibited. Gorgias accepts the first simply by saying Ναί and rejects the second strongly by saying Οὐδαμῶς.It shows, though not strongly, that they might have been composed after Theaetetusand before Meno. While, on the other hand, the problem of teachability of virtue seems to indicate that both Gorgias and Protagoras may belong to the period of Meno, there might be some indications of their priority. I found Jane M. Day's (1994 cf. 10) points about the priority ofProtagoras tenable though maybe I am not as certain as she appears to be. She dates Gorgias later than Protagoras and closer to Meno. 13 As it will be discussed in detail, what I call as an independent dialogue is nothing but Republic 473-541 where the philosopher is the subject of discussion. 14 The epistemological aspect of the problem had been resolved by the distinction of knowledge and true belief in the epistemological wave. 15 That the books II-V of the Republic is mostly the same as the famous Ideal State has been suggested before. Cf., e.g., Ryle (1966) 16 Prior (1985, 9) insists that the theory of Forms is 'as explicitly present' in Euthyphro as it is in Phaedo and Republic. 17 Cornford's suggestion that the aim of the dialogue is to examine and reject the experimental approach to knowledge is not compatible with the place he and others dedicate to Theaetetus. It is not a suitable time, to reject the experimental approach after Meno, Phaedo and Republic since they are already out of the approach and need no rejection. 18 That the first part of Parmenides has the appearance of a work complete in itself, is something can hardly be deniedeven by those scholars, like Meinwald, who do not believe it as distinct from the second part and written at a different time (1991, 5-6). 28 19 Referring to Euthyphro (5d) and Hippias Major (300a-b), Allen notes that the Forms in the early dialogues are universal, which is the same (ταὐτόν), common (κοινὸν) in them and something identical (τιτὸαὺτό) in all its cases (2013, 69-70). 20 In his second letter (314c3-4), Plato asserts that his written works are not the works of Plato but of a Socrates 'made fair and young (καλοῦκαὶ νέουγεγονότος)'. This younghood must of course be considered as compared to the reral Socrates who was adult and old and, thus, does not mean as young as is represented in Parmenides. 21 Thinking that there is a 'partial or relative' identification of universals and paradigms, Gerson (1998, 138) criticizes their complete distinction. 22 He even points that appealing to the model of original-copy cannot be helpful to avoid SP while there are some 'independent reasons' that Plato was committed to it (White, 1977, 211). 23 Allen (1997, 106) mentions Phaedo 74b-75d as an evidence for the theory of paradigm in this dialogue. About Republic V, which White thinks is not committed to the theory, I am not convinced since I think there are not enough about the case in this book. White brings the use of μετέχεινorκοινωνίαor the use of πράγματαandμετέχοντα as evidence (1977, 201-2) which, I think, prove nothing. 24 Annas mentions Phaedo 74e (besides Republic, Euthyphro and Theaetetus (176e ?)) as one of the places in which Forms are considered as paradigms (1974, 278, n.50). Although it might be close to paradigm-based understanding of Forms, I am not certain about taking it so. That Form is something that participants want to be like (βούλεται μὲν τουτο ... εἶναι οἷον) but fall short, cannot necessarily mean that the Form is a paradigm here. Though the relation of Forms and participants in Phaedo might be directed towards what it will be in Republic, I do not think that we are allowed to assume them the same.Regarding the mention of paradigm in Euthyphro 6e the best suggestion is, I think, that it is not, as Fujisawa (1974, 43) says, 'a case of genuine paradigmatism we find in later dialogues' (cf.Lutoslawski 1897, 199-200). 25 Listing the anamnesis in Meno, the method of hypothesis in Phaedo and the nonhypothetical principle in Republic as three answers to the question of the knowledge of the Forms, Sayre reasonably thinks that the first one is the simplest. (2005, 299) 26 It is generally agreed that some uses of εἴδος or ἰδέαin Theaetetus (e.g., 184d3, 203c6, 203e4, 204a1, 205d4-5) are not in the same technical sense. 27 Besides Meno 72b-c, 75a can also correctly be taken as a reference to the theory though the word εἶδος at 72c7 is not repeated here again. These do not, nonetheless, refuse Fine's correct assertion that the theory of Forms is 'muted' in Meno (2003, 44). 28 There are some other passages where Plato puts question mark in front of the existence of Forms. Cf. e.g. Phaedo 65d, 74a, 76e-77a, Protagoras 330c, Cratulus 439c-d, Timaeus 51b-c. 29 Nicholas P. White, on the contrary, thinks that in the early dialogues Plato talks 'as if' he believed in Forms (1976, 6). 30 Vlastos (1991, 58f.) points to this difference between so-called early and middle dialogues. 29 31 Kahn argues that we have no reason that Aristotle had any evidence for the development of Plato's thought in his early period (1996, 81) especially if we observe that the date of Aristotle's arriving at the Academy is when Plato was at least sixty years old. 32 In spite of all these points, Euthydemus' way of talking about dialecticians at 290c sounds surprisingly like Republic. 33 The allusions to the historical events that occur occasionally in some dialogues can be interpreted merely as dramatic or, as Mackey says, 'later interpolations' using past events (1928, 11). As Maccabe (2008, 96) points out, even the dialogues making vigorous claims to historicity 'bear the marks of fiction'. The writer of the dialogues, like a play writer, designs the scene, chooses the most suitable location and time and to make it appear more real, uses some real events of that time and location. It cannot be denied that the dramatic features of the dialogues are not negligible for Plato. We will not thus rely on the allusions to the historical events. 34 Thinking that the reappearance of Theaetetus in Sophist is a 'clear reminder of continuity' of the same project (2013, 94), Kahn accepts that 'a considerable lapse of time' might have occurred between their composition. 35 He thinks that the two dialogues were composed after the Parmenides 'as a whole' (1939, 316-317). 36 Gill's suggestion (2012, 1) of a tetralogy opening with Theaetetus is not tenable. Besides the cross references of which we discussed above, I cannot understand how she can take the similarity of characters as an evidence whereas the difference of Theaetetus with those two in this respect is obvious enough. The change of Socrates as the main speaker in Theaetetus to a visitor from Elea as the leading character in the other two dialogues does not let us agree with her. Suppose we accept that the change of Socrates with a visitor from Elea in Sophist might be related to the duty of the dialogue in criticizing Parmenides: to guarantee, as Kahn (2013, 94) suggest, 'an atmosphere of intellectual sympathy'. What then about Politicus? Gill thinks, however, that 'Plato substantially revised an earlier version of the Theaetetus to fit into a series with the Sophist and Statesman' (p.3, n. 8). 37 Ryle, for example, thinks that these two parts were composed at 'considerably' different dates (1966, 216). Also cf. Thesleff (1989, 19) and Tarrant (2000, 140-141) 38 There is an explicit shift from epistemology to ontology at 188c-d saying that perhaps the problem of false belief is better to be dealt with the notions of being and not being rather than knowing and not knowing which immediately leads to the problem of the impossibility of thinking about not being (188d ff.). 39 Cf. Turnball, 1998, especially pages 41 and 173. 40 Nails (1998, 174) notes: 'We have perhaps less hope of accurately dating the Republic than of any other dialogue in the corpus'. Cherniss' phrases like 'orthodox opinion' (1998, 293) about the place of Republic is interesting. 41 I am not convinced with Thesleff's note that the opening of the Parmenides suggests that the Republic was finished at the time. He accepts, however, that the book X and 'some passages' in the earlier books might have been added later (1989, 19). 42 Moreover, as Lane (2006, 185) mentions, the book IX of the Laws implicitly suggests that the city drawn out in this dialogue is a second-best city as comparing not to the city of Republic but to that of the Politicus. 30 43 That Aristotle's evidence is in a political text discussing political issues might allow us to take it more as political evidence though it is not a political evidence but a chronological one. 44 See also: 499a 45 Aristotle' statement in Politics II 1264b39 that Socrates filled upthe Republic with 'extraneous discourses' can be noteworthy. Reminding that the 'three résumés of the original Ideal State' shows that it contained nothing about justice, theological fables or the dispensability of Homer, dialectic and so on, Ryle adds that our version of the Republic was not assembled until Plato returned from Sicily (1966, 244-245). 46 That Aristotel tells this in a political passage (Politics II, 6) makes this more probable. However, the reason can simply be the date of Law's publication which is surely later than Republic. 47 There are some other reasons that might be taken as evidence for the lateness of the Philosophos like its Pythagorean spirit, its discussion of the Good that seems to be the closest passage among Plato's dialogues to his famous lecture 'On the Good' and also Philebus. 48 Ryle notes that the discussion of pleasure at Republic 583b 'presupposes' and advances 'a long way beyond' Timaeus (1966, 249). 49 Lane (2006, 180) speaks of two points in Politicus that went unnoticed in Republic; (1) the knowledge of the Good 'in time' (2) which must be made authoritative over the requirements of fixed laws. These, however, cannot prove anything about the order of the dialogues. 50 Rickless also prefers to agree with Owen mostly because of the theory of Forms in Timaeus which resembles that of Republic (2007, 8). Works Cited Allen, R. E., 1959, Anamnesis in Plato's \"Meno and Phaedo\", The Review of Metaphysics, Vol. 13, No. 1, pp. 165-174 --------, 1961, The Argument from Opposites in Republic V, the Review of Metaphysics, Vol. 15 , No. 2, pp. 325-335 --------, 1997, Plato's Parmenides, Yale University Press --------, 1998, Participation and Predication in Plato's Middle Diologues, in: Smith, Nicholas D. (ed.), Plato: Critical Assessment, V. I, Routledge, pp. 55-71 --------, 2013, Plato's Euthyphro and the Earlier Theory of Forms, Routledge Annas, Julia, 1974, Forms and First Principles, phronesis, V. 19, N. 3, pp. 257-283 Cherniss, Harold, 1998, The Relation of the Timaeus to Plato's Later Dialogues, in: Smith, Nicholas D. (ed.), PLATO: Critical Assessment, V. iv, Routledge, pp. 273-305 Cornford, Francis MacDonald, 1935, Plato's Theory of Knowledge, Routledge and Kegan Paul Ltd. --------, 1939, Plato and Parmenides, Parmenides' Way of Truth and Plato's Parmenides, Routledge and Kegan Paul Ltd. Day, Jane M., 1994, Plato's Meno in Focus, Routledge 31 Dillon, John, 1973, Comments on John Moore's Paper, in: Moravcsik, J.M.E. (ed.), Patterns in Plato's thoughts, Papers out of the 1971 West Coast Greek Philosophy Conference, D. Reidel Publishing Company, pp. 72-77 Dionysius of Halicarnassus, Schaefer, G.H. (ed.),1808, De Compositione Verborum, Lipsiae Dorter, Kenneth, 1989, The Theory of Forms and Parmenides I, in: Anton, Jhon, Preus, Anthony (eds.), Essays in Ancient Greek Philosophy III, State University of New York Press, pp. 183202 -------, 1994, Formand Good in Plato's Eleatic Dialogues: the Parmenides, Sophist and Statesman, University of California Press Fine, Gail, 2003, Plato on knowledge and Forms, Oxford University Press Fujisawa, Norio, 1974, Ἔχειν, Μετέχειν, and idioms of 'Paradigmatism' in Plato, Phronesis, V. 19, N. 1, pp. 30-58 Gerson, Lloyd, 1998, A Distinction in Plato's Sophist, in: Smith, Nicholas D. (ed.), PLATO: Critical Assessment, V. IV, Routledge, pp. 125-141 Gill, Mary Louise, 2012, Phiolosophos: Plato's Missing Dialogue, Oxford University Press, UK Gormbie, I. M., 1969, Ryle's New Portrait of Plato, The Philosophical Review, V. 78, N. 3, pp. 362-373 Hackforth, R., 1952, Plato's Phaedrus, Cambridge University Press Irwin, Terence, 1995, Plato's Ethics, Oxford University press Kahn, Charles H., 1996, Plato and the Socratic Dialogues, Cambridge University Press -------, 2006, Plato on Recollection, in: Benson, Hugh H. (ed.), A Companion to Plato, Blackwell Publishing Ltd., pp. 119-132 -------, 2013, Plato and the Post-Socratic Dialogues: The Return to the philosophy of Nature, Cambridge University Press Lane, Mellisa, 2006, Plato's Political Philosophy: the Republic, the Statesman and the Laws, in: Gill, Mary Louise, Pellegrin, Pierre (eds.), Blackwell Companion to Ancient Philosophy, Blackwell Publishing Ltd. Lutoslawski, Wincenty, 1897, The Origin and Growth of Plato's Logic, George OlmsVerlag Meinwald, Constance C., 1991, Plato's Parmenides, Oxford University Press Nails, Debra, 1998, The Earty Middle Late consensus: How Deep? How Broad?, In: Smith, Nicholas D. (ed.), PLATO: Critical Assessment, Vollume I, Routledge, pp. 164-179 Maccabe, Mary Margaret, 2008, Plato's Ways of Writing, in: : Fine, Gail (ed.), The Oxford Handbook of Plato, Oxford New York, pp. 88-113 Mackey, D. S., 1928, On the order of Plato's Writings, The Journal of Philosophy, V. 25, N. 1, pp. 5-18 Meinwald, Constance C., 1992, Good-bye to the Third Man, in: Kraut, Richard (ed.), The Cambridge Companion to Plato, Cambridge University Press, pp. 365-396 Moore, Hohn D., 1973, The Relation Between Plato's Symposium and Phaedrus, in: Moravcsik, J.M.E. (ed.), Patterns in Plato's thoughts, Papers out of the 1971 West Coast Greek Philosophy Conference, D. Reidel Publishing Company, pp. 52-71 Owen. G. E. L., 1998, The Place of the Timaeus in Plato's Dialogues, in: Smith, Nicholas D. (ed.), PLATO: Critical Assessment, V. iv, Routledge, pp. 253-272 Palmer, John A., 1999, Plato's Reception of Parmenides, Oxford: Clarendon Press Prior, William J., 1985, Unity and Development in Plato's Metaphysics, Routledge 32 Rickless, Samuel C., 2007, Plato's Forms in Transition, A reading of the Parmenides, Cambridge University Press Runciman, W.G., 1962, Plato's Later Epistemology, Cambridge University Press Ryle, Gilbert, 1939, Plato's Parmenides (II), Mind, new series, V. 48, N. 191, pp. 129-151 --------, 1966, Plato's Progress, Cambridge University Press Sayre, Kenneth M., 2005, Plato's Late Ontology: A Riddle Resolved, Parmenides Publishing Tarrant, Harold, 2000, Plato's First Interpreters, Cornell University Press Thesleff, Holger, 1989, Platonic Chronology, Phronesis, V. 134, N. 1, pp. 1-26 Turnball, Robert G., 1998, The Parmenides and Plato's Late Philosophy, University of Toronto Press Vlastos, Gregory, 1991, Socrates Ironist and Moral Philosopher, Cambridge University Press White, F. C., 1977, Plato's Middle Diologues and the Indepedence of Particulars, The philosophical Quarterly, V. 27, N. 108, pp. 193-213 White, Nicholas P., 1976, Plato on Knowledge and Reality, Hackett Publishing Company"}
{"meta": {"title": "Analogy", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Davies, Todd", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "This essay (a revised version of my undergraduate honors thesis at Stanford) constructs a theory of analogy as it applies to argumentation and reasoning, especially as used in fields such as philosophy and law. The word analogy has been used in different senses, which the essay defines. The theory developed herein applies to analogia rationis, or analogical reasoning. Building on the framework of situation theory, a type of logical relation called determination is defined. This determination relation solves a puzzle about analogy in the context of logical argument, namely, whether an analogous situation contributes anything logically over and above what could be inferred from the application of prior knowledge to a present situation. Scholars of reasoning have often claimed that analogical arguments are never logically valid, and that they therefore lack cogency. However, when the right type of determination structure exists, it is possible to prove that projecting a conclusion inferred by analogy onto the situation about which one is reasoning is both valid and non-redundant. Various other properties and consequences of the determination relation are also proven. Some analogical arguments are based on principles such as similarity, which are not logically valid. The theory therefore provides us with a way to distinguish between legitimate and illegitimate arguments. It also provides an alternative to procedures based on the assessment of similarity for constructing analogies in artificial intelligence systems.", "date": "1985", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/DAVA-14", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2019-07-09T09:53:54Z"}, "text": "Informal Notes No . IN-CSLI-85-4 Analogy Todd Davies CENTER FOR THE STUDY OF LANGUAGE AND INFORMATION Ventura Hall • Stanford University • Stimford. CA\n\nInformal Notes No. IN-CSLI-85-4 Analogy Todd Davies eSLI was founded early in 1983 by researchers from Stanford University, SRI International, and Xerox PARC to furt.her research and development of int.egrated theories of language, information, and computat.ion. eSLI headquarters and the publication offices are located at t.he Stanford sHe. CSLI/SRI International 333 Ravenswood A venue Menlo Park, CA 94025 CSLI/Stanford Ventura Hall Stanford, CA 94305 eSLI/Xerox PARe 3333 Coyot.e Hill Road Palo Alto, CA 94304 The preparat.ion and publicat.ion of t.his paper have been made possible III part. t.hrough a award frolll t.h e Syst.elll Developlllent. Foundat.ion. Copyright. ©H)S5 Todd Davies Preface This essay is a revised version of my senior thesis, which was submitted to Stanford University for the bachelor of science degree in the spring of H185. In early 1984, I was exploring possible topics for an essay in the humanities honors program, which is open to undergraduates in any department at Stanford who wish to do a thesis incorporating disciplines outside their majors. I narrowed down the project to one that would incorporate ideas from logic and the study of language in an empirical analysis of arguments, and I applied through the Stanford Overseas Studies program to spend the autumn quarter of that year in Oxford, on the idea that debates at the Oxford Union Society and the philosophical traditions of Oxford would provide good fodder for my research. I cajoled Professor John Perry in the Philosophy Department, whom I had known from a course in 1982, to be my advisor for the project. His laboratory, the Center for the Study of Language and Information, was an attractively interdisciplinary environment for a statistics major with interests in data analysis and artificial intelligence trying to tackle issues in linguistics, philosophy and logic. The spring and summer months of 1984 provided my first introduction to some of the diverse fields I was attempting to cross. Mary Pratt's class on \"Discourse and Ideology\" introduced me to some issues in language, and a directed reading under Marsh McCall that same spring provided me with some background in classical rhetoric and traditional logic. A summer internship at NCR Corporation in Colorado gave me the chance to learn quite broadly about issues and techniques in artificial intelligence, including the problems involved in getting a computer to reason by analogy. Yet I set off to Europe late in the summer without a clearly defined topic for my thesis. Professor Perry had set me up to meet with Professor J. O. Urmson in Oxford, who welcomed me into his home during several autumn afternoons for some tutoring in linguistic philosophy and discussion of my essay. The staffs of the Stanford Program in Oxford, the Oxford Union, BaHiol College, and the Bodleian and British Libraries also helped to make my three months in Britain a productive time. After attending some debates, philosophy society meetings and lectures during the Michaelmas term and spending long hours in Oxford's many bookstores, I decided on the problem of analogy in late October. I returned to Stanford in January, 1985, and began working through ideas about analogical reasoning on a weekly basis with John Perry. A small amount of funding from the System Development Foundation grant to CSLI helped to tide me over during the remaining two quarters over which this project ranged, supplementing the generous support from my parents, Berwyn and Gail Davies, and the moral support of my sister, Lyn. After my graduation I presented the CSLI Talk, \"A Situational Theory of Analogy\", based on my thesis, and received helpful feedback over the summer as a result of the seminar and follow-up talks given at NCR in Colorado and MCC in Texas. The revised version reflects that feedback and the help I received from many who were willing to discuss the thesis with me at CSLI *and later during the fall when I began work at SRI. Todd Davies November 6, 1985 Menlo Park, California\n\nArguments that make their point by means of similarities are imposters, and unless you are on your guard, will quite readily deceive you . Simmias in Plato's Phaedo All perception of truth is the detection of an analogy. We reason from our hands to our head . Henry David Thoreau Journal September 5, 1851 • I. Analogy and 'Analogy' In an analogy, we suppose, there is something of value. It may compel a new conclusion, or merely hint at one; in the absence of direct evidence it seems to allow us to infer what we are unable to know with certainty. I cannot really know, for instance, that other people have minds which give them the kinds of experiences my mind gives me, but an inference from analogy, perhaps exclusively, gives me the feeling that they do. Many philosophical problems are in fact questions about the soundness of some analogical argument. The existence of God has not been proven to the satisfaction of science, but arguments by analogy allow one to conclude that God exists, or perhaps that no God exists. So these • conclusions* are strangely inconclusive. Perhaps conclusions are not what we get from analogy at all; indeed perhaps analogy is a fraud and our intuition that it is useful rests on a mistake. In any case, the status of what we infer by analogy has proven surprisingly difficult to characterize. J. L. Austin pointed out that we do not ordinarily claim to know by analogy, only to argue by it. l If we are convinced by an analogy, then, our inference is a kind of belief, the grounding for which is the subject of this essay. In beginning a study of analogy one might well ask the simple question, *What is m* Following the tradition of linguistic philosophy, I would like firstly to explore the uses of the word 'analogy', being mindful that the concept I wish to analyze may be only one among a collection of its possible meanings. In his writings, John Stuart Mill gave the term a dubious distinction: *There is no word ... ,* he wrote, *which is used more loosely or in a greater variety of senses, than Analogy .• 2 Still the word does seem to have a general meaning, being roughly • likeness, not including identity*. What proves more difficult to state is just what *an analogy* is, or rather what sort of thing it is. We speak of an analogy being • invoked* or being • good or bad*, but what other things might we speak this way about? • Analogy* may variously be the basis for a mode of reasoning, or a relation between uses of words, or a type of relation that can exist between objects, but • the analogy* seems to refer to something other than just single instances of these. For example, we may say with equal confidence that *similarity* is a basis for reasoning or is a relation between senses or things; but we would not, I think, say • the similarity between A and B is good* or • he invoked a likeness* or *let me try this similarity out on you*. 'Analogy' basically means • similarity. 3, but 'an analogy' often means something close to • an idea that there is a similarity* rather than • a similarity*. All of this is just a way to say that the word 'analogy' functions analogously, not identically, in different types of sentences. Furthermore, the modern uses of 'analogy' have been derived by analogy from older uses. Since the word's evolution and its different modern uses are a barrier to *deciphering the literature on analogy, sorting these out is an important first lAustin,\"Other Minds\" ,Philosophical Papers,p. 77 2Mill,\"Of Analogy \"(Ch. 20),A System of Logic,p. 393 30f course, the language is ever changing and recently analogy has orten been rererred to as a mode of reasoning itself ratber than the basis for one 2 step in researching how others have approached the particular problems oC analogy with which I am concerned. The concept oC analogy is as old as philosophy itselC. Ironically, the general modern sense oC 'analogy' (-likeness in non-identity-) derives not Crom a single Greek word but, apparently, Crom two words which had certain similarities oC meaning.4 The word ava)..O\"(ul, or -proportion -, was imported Crom mathematics by Plato to characterize a resemblance oC relation between two pairs of terms in the general form a is to b as c is to d or, symbolically, a:b::c:d. Meanwhile, Plato was also developing the notion oC 1rapa6fvwa, or example cases Cor use by comparison with a lesser-known case -in order to discover the true nature of both-.5 The meaning oC 1rapa6u'Ypa was Curther deCined by Aristotle to be a method oC rhetorical induction or argument by example.6 This resemblance of particular to particular7 was kept distinct from four-term relational resemblance in Greek texts, but ava)..O\"(ta and the Aristotelian sense of 1rapa6u'Ypa seemed in Latin works to collapse into the term ana/ogia while the Latin paradigma came to mean something close to -paradigm-.8 Thus could Seneca the Younger say that concepts are -comprehended by analogy-,9 although, despite Quintilian's objections,10 there remained those who kept the word ana/ogia exclusively to mean ava)..O\"(ta. In ordinary language we now use 'analogy' to reCer generally to likeness between different situations. We do not say argument by paradigm - , and argument by exampleusually refers to reasoning Crom single examples, used without a target situation, to yield a generalization. What Aristotle analyzed in the Rhetoric and in the Organon (see section IT oC this essay) has become the modern concept oC analogy. How this happened has been the subject of research by fine scholars in theology, rhetoric, and the 4Measell,\" Classical Bases or the Concept or Analogy\" ,Journal oJ the American Forensic A880ciation,!Q,p. 1 5Ibid.,p.2 6Ibid .,pp. 3-5 7Lloyd,Poiarity and Analogy: Two Types oJ Argumentation in Early Greek Thought,p. 408 80p. Cit.,Measell,p. 8; Liddell and Scott A Greek-English Lexicon; Lewis and Schort, A Latin Dictionary; Hesse,\" Aristotle's Logic or Analogy\" ,Models and Analogies in Science,pp. 130-156 argues that the origin or the modern sense or 'analogy' comes during Aristotle's discussion or likeness in Topics . 9Seneca the Younger,Ad Lucilium Epistulae Morale8,LXX,tr. R. M. Grummere,Loeb Classical Library (3 vols: Cambridge,Massachusetts: Harvard University Press, 1925) cited in Op. Cit.,Measell,p. 9 10Quintilian,lnatitutio Oratoria,!,ti&,tr. H. E. Butler,Loeb Classical Lib., 1920, cited in Ibid .,p. 9; I disagree with Measell that ava)..O\"(ta maps onto the modern notion or \"rigurative analogy \"-Aristotle,The \"Art\" oJ Rhetoric,!!,~,pp. 273-279, speaks or paradigms which are historical parallels, close comparisons, and Cables, so it seems to me that figurative analogy, as well as literal, derives rrom 1rapa6u'1PO: since fables are metaphorical analogies. 3 classics, whom I have merely been summarizing. l1 Of course, the story is not so simple because in addition to the general modern meaning of 'analogy' there is a host of more specialized definitions which might apply depending on who is writing about it. The Miller Analogies Test, for example, involves solving for the fourth term in classical analogies. Research on -analogyin psychology and education has orten focused on this type.12 Thomists and philosophers of theology use 'analogy' to refer to the analogy of names as delineated by Aquinas and Cajetan.13 Natural language semanticists and philosophers of language concern themselves, for the most part, with analogous word usage.14 Biologists writing about 'analogy' are usually referring to functionally similar physical features of different species (as opposed to 'homology,).15 Language acquisition theorists study analogy as a process for learning morphology and syntax.16 'Analogy' in mathematics refers to similarities between different operations,17 while in literature it may refer to a • figure of speech* as do 'hyperbole', 'metaphor', and 'simile' .18 Finally, in cognitive science there is a growing literature on analogy as a form of mental or knowledge representation, in which the representation resembles in some way the object of one's thought (e.g., a diagram) as opposed to thoughts being about things symbolically or applicatively.IO But I am not going to examine any of the issues on the foregoing list, at least not specifically. What I propose to discuss is 'analogy' in its general, ordinary language sense, which I construe as analogy, or similarity, between situations. Philosophical inquiries about and attempts to account for analogy have roughly Callen into three categories since classical times, according to James Ross. 20 There is analogia nominum (the analogy of meaning or of names), about which Ross writes, analogia rationis (analogy of reason), and analogia entis (analogy of being, or among things). llln addition to Measell and Lloyd, see also the history of the Thomistic concept of analogy in Lyttkens,The Analogy Between God and the World; The speculations of Joseph in Introduction to Logic,p. 537, seem to be supplanted by Measell's findings. 12See, for example, Sternberg,lntelligence, In/ormation Proce~~ing, and Analogical Reaaoning 13See Op. Cit.,Lyttkens; Burrell,Analogy and Philosophical Language; Mcinerny ,Studies in Analogy; and Bochenski, \"On Analogy\" ,The Thomist,ll,pp. 425-447 l4See Ross,Portraying Analogy (which also discusses analogy in religion and in law); MacDonald, \"The Philosopher's Use of Analogy\" ,Logic and Language; Hofstadter,\"Metamagical Themas\"(on Analogy),Scienti/ic American,Sept. 1081,pp. 18-30; Anttila,Analogy and Anttila and Brewer,Analogy: A Basic Bibliography 15Curtis,Biology,pp. 377-378 16See Esper,Analogy and Association in LinguiaticB and Psychology; and Op. Cit.,Anttila 17 See Polya,lnduction and Analogy in Mathematics 18perrin,Writer's Guide and Index to English,pp. 235-238 10Sloman, \"Intuition and Analogical Reasoning\" ,The Computer Revolution in Philosophy,pp. 144-176 200p. Cit.,Ross,pp. 17-19 4 Analogia nominum is a linguistic problem concerning the extent to which a word, used in different sentences and which cannot really be said to be used equivocally, is used by analogy in the different sentences. Ross's hypothesis is that the meaning of a word always depends somewhat on the words it is used with, so that univocity in practice never occurs and word usage is always seen as either equivocal or analogous, the latter of which includes metaphor.21 This theory, Ross feels, does not bode well for truthconditional semantics,22 or, as the saying goes, a cat can only be called a cat by metaphor. His view generalizes Wittgenstein's ideas about -family resemblancewords like 'game', which, Wittgenstein contended, have no unique biconditional to determine their appropriateness in a given context. 23 Analogia rationis is the problem I am primarily considering. It concerns the question of how an analogy (and here again I am referring to its general meaning) achieves its appropriateness. This problem seems more general than that of analogia nominum because if one could determine theoretically what the use of analogy requires then the answer could presumably be specialized to cover analogous word usage as well as perceptual recognition and decisionmaking about new situations. It is for this reason that so much recent attention has focused on analogical reasoning in artificial intelligence research. Analogia entis gives analogy the status of a phenomenon that exists between real objects or situations. The question of univocal predication, as a problem in the analogy of being,24 is not one about whether our words can ever be assigned the same meaning in two sentences but is rather a question about whether relations and properties are language-independent conceptual identities. A central question, and one that is directly relevant to the implementation of analogical reasoning in computers, is whether things which we call similar always have a list of common properties which account for the similarity or whether their similarity, beyond some point, can no longer be analyzed and must itself be expressed as a primitive relation between the items. In my theory of analogy I will assume that similarity can always be explicated without having just to say, -A is similar to B. It is not obvious that this is justified, however, and this problem in the analogy of being, which is perhaps the deepest philosophical issue of the three traditional problems of analogy, is discussed further in the conclusion of this essay. By understanding analogy as just similarity between non-identical situations, I think it should be clear that we have a general notion, of which the various restricted definitions of 'analogy' and of some other words are special cases. This, I suggest, can eliminate much confusion about the relation of the ordinary language 'analogy' to the ava),O\"f,a sense of the word, as well as to 'metaphor', 'simile', and 'model'. All are example types for the analogy of situation. Classical, four-term analogies like Sun:Earth::Saturn:Titan are analogies in which there are no more than four different objects in two pairs, but in which there is an equivalent relation between each pair (as opposed to non-classical analogies which may have many objects, more than one resemblance of relation, or property equiv21 Ibid.,p. 8 22Ibid.,p .2 23Wittgenstein,Phil080phical Investigation8,pp. 31-35 24See Anderson,Reflection8 on the Analogy of Being 5 alences on the parts of some objects). Metaphors are special cases in the analogy of meaning, since there is some analogous word usage we would not reCer to as metaphorical (like 'plow' as a tool versus 'plow' as an activity25), but all metaphorical usage of words is analogous. Likewise, 'simile' and 'model' can be defined using 'analogy', the former being a case in which A is explicitly likened to B in a sentence and the latter being a representation which bears a close and useful analogy to the situation that it models. The following words also appear to be definable as sub-classes of 'analogy': 'equivalence', 'equality', 'isomorphism', 'homomorphism', and 'association'. The following words might be used as synonyms lor 'analogy': 'likeness', 'comparison', 'similarity', 'resemblance', 'correspondence', 'closeness', 'parallel', 'relatedness', 'nearness', and 'proximity'. The objective of all this discussion about 'analogy' (the word) has been to set the right tone for the analysis of analogy (the concept). The conclusions that I hope have emerged are: 1. Analogy is a very basic concept; its ordinary language meaning is fairly easy to define and that deCinition reveals that analogy is what is going on in many processes with more specialized names (including metaphor and the paronymous 'analog' and 'analogue'). And, 2. The original meaning of analogy, A:B::C:D, is outdated except for its use on standardized tests. Someone is always trying to revive it26 as the \"proper\" meaning of 'analogy' and even suggest that other uses of 'analogy' are reducible to it. But this ignores the fact that 'analogy' derives from analogia which developed by analogy between cr/lcr>'O'1~cr and 1(crpcr6~vwcr. The result of that ancient analogy between two concepts was the formation of a very slippery but powerful idea. ll. AnaloQia Rationi. and the Problem of the Cogent Quality There are three modes of inference which might be considered basic. Of these, one (deduction) is sound in that its conclusions are always true given the truth of its premises. Another (induction) produces plausible, but not sound, conclusions. And finally, a third (abduction) produces conclusions which are hypothetical, suggesting new possibilities.27 This last (abduction) is not ordinarily admitted as a part of \"logic*, but interest in its role in learning and discovery has increased during this century because of the work of philosophers of method like Charles Peirce.28 Abduction, in fact, appears to be the main rule of inCerence in hypothetico-deductive reasoning, in which the hypothesis does not necessarily follow from known inCormation but would help to explain that inCormation.29 25Example from Op. Cit.,Ross,p. 7 26Se~, Cor example, discussion oC the argument by analogy in Perelman and OlbrechtsTyteca,The New Rhetoric: A Treatise on Argumentation,pp. 371-398 270p. Cit.,Anttila,pp. 13-16 28See Peirce,Charles,Philosophical Writings,ed. by Justus Buchler (New York: Dover, 1955), pp. 129-134 Nt 150-156, cited in Op. Cit.,Anttila,p. 13 29See Churchland,Matter and Consciousness, p. 71 6 The exhaustiveness of deduction, induction, and abduction as basic rules of inference can be established in the traditional domain of the syllogism. In that domain, a re8ult (. Socrates is a mortal*) is inferred from that which is the known ca8e (. Socrates is a man*) by means of a rule (. All men are mortals*) which relates the case and result. Symbolically, a property Q holds for an individual object A if (a) there is a property P such that A has P and (b) Q holds for all individuals x which have P. Formally, we have the following: Deductive Rule of Inference (The Syllogism) Rule P(x)~Q(x) Case P{A} Result :.Q(A) The statements above the line in the syllogism are the premi8e8 and that below is the conclu8ion. The syllogism can be generalized to modus ponens and ultimately to resolution in order to characterize deduction completely.30 Induction and abduction can be given this symbolic form when one notices that, given the above set of domain objects, there are exactly two other possibilities for assigning statements to the premises and the conclusion, namely: Induction Case P(A) Result Q1Al Rule :.P(x)~Q(x) and ABDUCTION Result Q(A) Rule P(x)~Q(x) Case :.P(A) Now the question remains, given that conclusions based on deduction are always logically valid and those of the other two modes never are, under what circumstances, if any, should we believe conclusions based on induction or abduction? The conventional answer for the case of induction is that the inference of the rule is more powerful the more sets of individuals there are, without any counterexamples, for which the case and result hold true. Thus if n individuals A1, ... ,An are confirming instances of P(x)~Q(x) where P(Ai) and Q(Ai) are the case and result, respectively, then we have the enumerative induction, premises P (Ai) I\\Q(A 1 ) P (A 2 ) I\\Q (A 2 ) P (An) I\\Q (An) conclusion :.P (x) ~Q ex) 30Geneseretb and Nilsson,Fundamentals or Artificial Intelligence,Cb. 6,pp. 3-5 7 The conclusion thus becomes more probable as n approaches the number of values which x could take on. There are problems with this criterion as a test for any given induction. Our judgment about whether the conclusion holds depends on background knowledge about the projectibility of the property Q for which we are trying to make a rule. Nelson Goodman's famous example of a nonprojectible property is 'grue', which is defined as applying to all emeralds examined thus far which are green, as well as to all thus far unexamined emeralds which are blue. Since, in reality, emeralds are green, all examined emeralds (a large number) are *grue M also. So if, by induction, we conclude that all emeralds are grue then we expect emeralds examined tomorrow to be blue.31 Clearly this makes no sense. Grue is not a projectible property. I introduce this example now because I will refer to it in section N in considering the difference between analogy and enumerative induction. Abduction, one might say, is made more believable the more properties of the individual A are explained by the inferred property. So in the more general form for abduction, Q1 (A) AQ2 (A) A ... Ã (A) premises P ex) ::::}Ql (x) A ... AQ. (x) .'.P (A). attributing property P to A might be more acceptable as the number m of properties explained by the conclusion approaches the total number of A's properties. This seems to me highly suspect as a general rule, since one can always invent an infinite number of properties for any object which are entailed by P(x), but the notion has some intuitive value, perhaps. The question of its justification is related to the M strength of similarity* justification for analogical inference discussed later in this section. Having discussed these three modes of inference, we might well ask how analogical reasoning fits into this framework. As a first stab, one might assert that analogy is represented by the following, where A and Bare separate individuals: P (A) AQ (A) premises P (B) conclusion ... Q(B) It should be noticed that this reduces to a two-step process in our framework, namely peA) QJ& (l)induction P(x)::::}Q(x) PCB) (2)deduction Q(B) 31Goodmsn,Fact, Fiction, and Forecaat,pp. 72-83 8 But this simple conception of annlogy as the inference of a property for an ind ividual by syllogism from a single-instance generalization seems inadequate when we apply the induction criterion. Suppose that Q is projectible and that we use the number of confi rmi ng instances, given tbat no contra.diding ones are known , as a guide to the plausibili ty of the analogy. Well , there is only olle con firming instance out of perh aps many possible individuals over wbich x could range, so the criteria for inductive plausibility seem to give us a rather low probability for O Uf genera1itatioll-syllogism. The problem with this verdict on the plausibility of Q(B) is that it does not jibe with the high degree of plausibility that is attached by humans to some arguments from analogy. Such &rgumeni.lJ have & qualit.y 01 cogency which goes heyond the plausibilit.y ot a single instance induction. An example should help to illustrate this. Suppose you are an American student in Berlin. Yesterday, you went into East Berlin for some touring, and when you entered at Checkpoint C harlie, the border guard stamped your passport with a day visa. Now here you are tbe next day , at Cbeckpoint Charlie, getting ready to enter East Germany again and the border guard asks for your passport. You reason by analogy that she too will stamp your passport, just as the border guard did yesterday. Th is seems like a cogent analogy--you r prediction is likely to be accurate. But now suppose you are that same student traveler boarding a bus in Patras bound for Athens. T he first people you notice on the bus are two girls speaking to each ot.her in Italian. You spot two more people as you meander down the aisle, so perhaps you should infer by analogy that they too are Italian. This seems not to be a cogent inference by analogy. You are, arter all, in Greece, not Italy , so you would expect most of those on the bus to be Greeks, or perhaps, Crom your experiences elsewhere in Europe, Americans. But according to the induction criteria, it should be at least as plausible that the next people you see on the bus will be Ilalians as that today's East German border guard will stamp your passport like yesterday 's did . In the bus example you have not j ust one but two confirming instances, and the properties 01 being ItaliAn Md of stamping passports are bot.h projectible proper ties. H, for instance, in Greeee you go on to find that the next fi ve or ten people you see on the bus are Italian then induct.ion starts doing its work , and when two teenagers on the bus begin pointing at you and laughing as more Italians board t.he bus, you are not. surprised when an Italian woman comes over to you and says that you have mistakenly board ed a private, It.alian tou r bus. So an en umerative induction leads one to conclude, as the number of Italians gets larger, that all others on the bus arc Italian just as An increased number of experiences at Checkpoint Cbarlie wou ld engrain the belief that all East German border guards stamp passports. Clearly there is a Ia.ctor in our cogency evaluation tor analogies with a small number of connrming instances which goes beyond both that number and whether or not the properties being inferred are non-projectible like -grue* . Furtbermore, it is this factor which must account for the difference between good analogies and bad ones when both cite only a single instance 'to support the conclusion. One cand idate that has been proposed for this extra ractor is the degree-ofsimilarity between the con firming individual and the one for which we are trying to infer a property by analogy. If two individuo.Js A and B share properties P I'\" .,P p and A also has property Q then by analogy we inler, in t.his formulation , that B also has Q. The rule of inference now looks like: g P 1 (A) I\\P 2 (A) 1\\ . .. I\\P p (A) I\\Q (A) premises P 1 (B) I\\P Q (B) 1\\ . .. I\\F p (B) conclusion ... Q (B) But if our method for evaluating cogency involves asking how similar A and B are then we have moved away from enumerative induction, for whether Q(B) can be concluded does not just depend on how probable the generalization -P l(x)I\\ ... I\\P p(x)=}Q(x)is from a single example but really depends on how many properties are shared by A and B and on whether any dissimilarities between A and B make the analogy a poor one. In this formulation, analogy is possibly a separate type of inference from enumerative induction. Jennifer Trusted posits that induction involves the citing of a large number of confirming in8tance8 to support the inference that new cases will resemble these confirming instances. But analogy, for Trusted, cites a large number of 8imilaritie8 of a case with one or a few other instances in order to infer that the case is also similar to the analogous instance(s) in other respects.32 There a,re problems with this view of analogy also. A given individual may havll virtually an infinite number of properties, loosely defined, in common with another. We want to say that some similarities are more important than others and that cogent analogy requires a large number of essential similarities, and no essential dissimilarities, between individuals.33 To go a step further, we might say that it doesn't really matter how many similarities two individuals have, only that the similarities they do have should be enough to imply the existence of the inferred property. So perhaps cogent analogies are really deductive in character rather than inductive: the analogy helps us to verify that a set E of B's properties do in fact imply that B has property Q. Since we find E to be held by A also and that A has property Q we hypothesize that B has Q, and the conclusion is valid if Q follows from E combined with one's beliefs. This deductive explanation seems to reduce the analogous case to the role of generating hypotheses. One may agree with this but hold that what people really do in accepting conclusions by analogy is to take a leap of faith; that analogies can be cogent without their conclusions logically following from one's beliefs. Such a person might hold that analogies are primarily abductive: their conclusions are accepted (a) if the conclusions are consistent with the properties of the individual or situation which they are about, and (b) if the conclusions help to explain those properties. But if analogy is abductive then we have no method for weighing its hypotheses against other hypotheses which would also explain an individual's properties. We can take the argument by analogy for other minds as an example. 1 have privileged access to only one mind -my own. 1 know to what 1 am referring when 1 say that I see green or that 1 have a pain in my leg. For . any given person I can infer by analogy when that person says -I see greenor -I have a pain in my legthat it is for him or her the same sensation that I have when 1 say those things. But these statements on the part of another are also explained by all kinds of alternative hypotheses ranging from solipsism to inverted spectrums and wicked conspirators. These alternative 32Trusted,The Logic of Scientific Inference,pp. 8-14 33Fearnside,About 1'hinking,p. 266, takes this view 10 hypotheses all have one thing in common: they each posit some Cundamental difference between what it is like to have privileged access to another mind and what my own mental experience is. The argument that other minds a.re like mine is based on a real case -my mind , and I thereby put more probabili ty on the conclusion based on analogy tha.n I do Cor any other randomly chosen, though equally explanatory , hypot.hesis. But the abduction principles just do not a.ccount for this difference between the plausibility of the analogy versus the plausibility of, say, an inverted spectrum hypothesis. One way to account for the greater plausibility of the argument based on analogy would be to say that there is no logical explanation ;for why people choose to believe the conclusion by analogy -logically, it is lio better than any of the other hypotheses. Instead, such a person would argue, the cogency of the argument by analogy can only be accounted Cor by a psychological explanation. What causes people to accept analogies, by such a theory, is an irreducible habit of associating ideas in a way which, through instinct or motivation, helps people to interact with their environment and to fulfill their human drives. On the other hand, analogies seem to function . well even at the highest level of rational debate. Extremely intelligent people use analogies and are convinced by them, and the position that analogies which are considered by a person to be cogent do not have a logical fonn that incorporates that person's beliefs, is probably question-begging. So I propose that psychological explanation should be considered only as a last re~ol\"L if no logical form adequate to describe analogy can be found. The argument that inspired me to write this essay was Judith Thomson's Camous analogy for abortion in cases of rape. She assumes, for this argument, that a fetus is in fact a person and therefore has a \"right to life\" equivalent to that of an adult. The argument concerns whether it is morally permissible for a woman to abort the fetus given that she has become pregnant despite having no intention to risk pregnancy, i.e. when she has been raped. I want to call this situation the central case since it is the one about which we are trying to decide. Thomson wants to argue that the woman should be allowed to abort in this case. Her argument cites the following analogous case: \"You wake up in the morning and find yourself back to back in bed with an unconscious violinist. A famous unconscious violinist. He has been found to have a kidney ailment, and the Society oC Music Lovers has canvassed all the available medical records and found that you alone have the right blood type to help. They have therefore kidnapped you, and last night the violinist's circulatory system was plugged into yours, so that your kidneys can be used to extract poisons from his blood as well as your own. The director of the hospital now tells you, 'Look, we're sorry the Society of Music Lovers did this to you -we would never have permitted it if we had known. But still, they did it, and the violinist now is plugged into you. To unplug you would be to kill him. But never mind, it's only for nine months. By then he will have recovered from his ailment, and can safely be unplugged from you .,*34 Thomson asserts that most people would find it outrageous to require anyone to remain hooked up to the violinist, particularly for a long period. 34Thomson,\" A Derense or Abortion* ,Philosophy and Public Affairs,!,pp. 48-49; This was discussed in Jean Roherts' rail 1983 course at Stanrord on \"Ethical Theories\", in which I was enrolled . 11 She uses this intuition to argue that, even granting that the fetus has right to life, that right does not supersede a woman's right to decide what happens in and to her body. Prior to reading the argument I was sure that whether abortion is permissible hinges on whether the fetus has a right to life. After reading it I brooded about how the analogous case could possibly be relevant in helping one to decide whether abortion is permissible in the central case, given that the fetus has a right to life. Although I felt that the right to abortion could be justified Cor other reasons, my intuition before the analogy told me that abortion just cannot be permitted if the right to life is granted to the fetus. Yet I agreed with Thomson that a person should be allowed to be disconnected from the violinist, and my intuition aCter the analogy was confused. I wanted to know, before buying the argument, whether there could be any logical basis for changing my position based on the analogy, or whether in succumbing I would merely be falling prey to a clever trick of intuition. Would agreeing that the analogy is apt mean that my view of the central case had been blurred or poorly thought through? Or would it mean that I had bought a straw man which jettisoned exactly those parts of the central case that would make direct argument for abortion hard to support given the right to life? If I analyzed those aspects of the analogous case which were unparallel to the central case, would I find therein the crucial difference which would account for why the analogous conclusion seemed easy to support while the central one did not? If I could not find the relevant disanalogy would I have enough reason to buy the argument? And finally, would analogies have any use at all if people were completely logical, like computers, or would analogies then be unnecessary because all the right conclusions could be reached by implication? I cannot claim to have found complete answers to all of these questions in the past year and a half. They have been reformulated and I have learned some fairly interesting facts about logic. But I have concentrated on answering one question in particular which the other questions all seem to be circling around, namely, why would any rational person ever be convinced by an argument from analogy? Perhaps no one should be convinced by them, but then how do I account for the fact that people have this intuitive abiliti5 to tell the diCCerence between what they regard as good and bad analogies?36 Relative to other philosophical problems like induction and the analogy of meaning there have been few theories proposed to answer this question. Despite finding a fair number of journal articles on the subject I am aware of no Cull-length books in English devoted to this problem as a general phenomenon, and only a few which focus on analogy in limited domains like theology or science. The recent upsurge in artificial intelligence research into analogical reasoning37 makes examination of the basic issues important, especially if a reappraisal of the assumptions underlying current formalisms suggests new approaches to the unsolved problems. 351 don't mean by \"intuitive ability\" that the ability cannot involve reason, only that how this reasoning or judgment works does not have to be explainable by those who use it 36This formulation of the question is due to my thesis advisor at Stanford, John Perry 37 Russ Greiner and Stuart Russell at Stanford were both writing doctoral theses on analogical reasoning as 1 worked on this essay; and Keith Bellairs at Minnesota, Smadar Kedar-Cabelli at Rutgers, and Kevin Ashley at Massachusetts were all graduate students working on analogical reasoning formalisms for legal expert systems 12 In searching for a theory of analogy, it makes sense to ask what we are looking for. More specifically, what should one require of a theory of analogy? I suggest that a complete theory would give solid answers to questions about. analogy's form, its place in logic, its justification, soundness, limitations, purpose, methods for its use, and its nature as a mental activity. What follows is an outline oC these questions: 1. Form. A theory of analogy should first tell us what analogy i8 and whether the sense of 'analogy' as a type of reasoning really denotes a clear set of phenomena. So one might ask: What is analogy? Is it one type of inference or more than one distinct type? How can its structure be expressed symbolically? Is there a real diCCerence between traditional rhetoric's literal (direct resemblance) analogies and figurative (more metaphorical) analogies, or is it just a matter of degree? 2. Logic. The theory should indicate the place of analogy among types of inference. Some questions would be: What relationships does analogy have to deduction, induction, and abduction! Is it reducible to any or a combination of them? What is analogy's inferential power relative to that of other modes of reasoning? 3. Justification. A theory of analogy should answer whether one ought to believe arguments by analogy, and if so under what circumstances. Questions connected with this are: What, if anything, makes a cogent analogy? What are the roles of considerations like the degree of similarity between cases, the degree of dissimilarity, number of analogous cases called on for support, strength and amount of detail in the conclusion, explanatory power of the conclusion, and background information! 4. Soundness. The theory should take a position on whether conclusions reached by analogy can ever be logically valid, or, if not, what their logical status is. Questions include: Do analogies have any place in sound reasoning? Are they always dispensable and redundant in making deductive conclusions! Can the analogous case ever be said to prove anything? Or is analogy never more than plausible? Never more than suggestive! A complete sham? 5. Limitations. The theory should give us a way to critically evaluate analogical inferences and to detect bad ones. Some questions would be: What makes a poor analogy? A misleading one? In bad analogies is the disanalogy always what makes the analogy fail? Or can it fail for other reasons!38 6. Purpose. Related to answering why and whether people should be convinced by analogies, one would want to know why an arguer would want to use them. One might ask: Why do people invoke analogies in arguments instead of applying reasoning to the central case? Would any valid conclusions not always emerge if they just did the latter? Does analogical argument always contain an implicit generalization? Is it always either a straw man argument or unnecessary? 7. Methods. A theory of analogy, to be useful, should indicate how 38professor Urmson suggested to me that if one is unconvinced by an analogy, it may not be that one's reasoning is clouded or that the disanalogy is to blame, but may instead sometimes be that the similarities are just unimpressive 13 one should go about finding good analogies, if such exist. Questions include: Is it best, in drawing an analogy, to make the analogous case as similar as possible to the central case? What types of situation, given a central case, make good analogous cases? Which don't? And, finally, 8. Nature. The theory should take a position on the status of analogy in the Kantian debate over whether certain modes of reasoning are intuitive and non-logical or whether any useful inference must have a logical structure.39 Analogy would seem to be a good candidate for an intuitive mode, so if it can be shown to be logical then that should have some impact on the debate. Some questions are: Can analogies that are cogent to humans all be evaluated computationally? Symbolically (digitally)? Is analogy an intuitive mode of inference that cannot be fully explained in logic? How do we account for genuine differences of opinion between people concerning the cogency of a given analogy? Is there an element of randomness in the evaluation? In reviewing the literature on analogy as a logical problem I have discovered that the first four of the above considerations seem to be of prime importance for distinguishing different theories, while the latter four are very roughly dictated by the positions that a theory takes on the first four. The way in which theories of analogy work appears to be the following: a characteristic logical form for analogy is postulated and is seen to correspond either with one of the three basic modes of inference or with none of them. The standards for what make that form or mode a cogent form of argument are then assumed to hold for analogy, and the theory states under what conditions analogies are sound, or plausible, or suggestive. The status of analogy as intuition or reason usually follows from the above considerations, and the theorist may make comments about when, how, and why analogy should be invoked. Most theories of analogy are in the spirit of one out of five possible accounts for analogical inference which I want to label: logical necessity, inductive generalization, abductive hypothesis, strength of similarity, and psychological explanation. In reviewing and testing ideas about analogy that have cropped up at various points in the history of thought, it is good to bear in mind that those who have written about analogy have sometimes envisaged fields of application more narrow, and uses of analogy more specific, than I am considering in this essay. What follows is an analysis of the sides which philosophers and others seem to have taken in this debate, but there is no reference list of *-isms* onto which writers about the analogy of reason have projected their ideas. People have explored various aspects of analogy and have often considered only arguments used in science or ethics, or religion or oratory; full articulations of general theories about what makes a good analogy are scarce relative to theories about what types of analogies there are. Nonetheless, each of those who have written about analogy seems to have chosen a set of assumptions which characterize one of the theories presented here. I will therefore be careful not to misrepresent ideas espoused by a given writer on, say, science analogies, as constituting that writer's view about analogy in general. I am aware that people often dislike having someone else put their ideas into categories, but hope that the following classification reveals, with some benefit, the traditions within which philosophers and others who study cognitive activity have been working. 390p. Cit.,Sloman,p. 144 14 Theories Based on Logical Necessity The first inclination one might have in trying to explain why we judge conclusions based on analogy to be good or bad might be to conjecture that cogent analogy must entail some form of deduction. Under strong logical necessity theories, an analogical argument or inference is judged cogent if and only if the conclusion is provable from one's knowledge and beliefs. In weaker forms of this position, the conclusion may be judged as cogent to the extent that it is either given a specific, nOD-zero probability or implied by default rules. So a deductivist might .hold, Cor instance, that what has happened when we are convinced by an analogy is that a set of inferences rapidly calculated in our heads has confirmed the truth of the conclusion, and the function of the analogous case has just been to let us identify a possible theorem or default inference before we prove it to ourselves. This descriptive view would hold that logical deduction adequately describes how people really, actually are convinced. But I know of no author who has sincerely advocated it. Instead, one might hold the deductivist viewpoint only normatively, proposing that a conclusion Q from analogy should be accepted only when it is logically implied from (a) the data base 4 of believed propositions and (b) the set of facts e which are shared by the central and analogous cases, B and A Actually, no philosopher r know of has quite embraced this normative view either, but a few have suggested a validity demarcation for analogies in science. Ernest Nagel gives examples from science in which certain physical problems of one type, like heat conduction, can be solved in lieu of analogous problems in another domain, like gravitation, to yield perfect predictions.40 Although Nagel feels it is impossible to know in advance whether a model (and hence an analogy) will work for a given domain,41 he suggests that if identity of logical structure is shown to hold then its predictions are valid, and this is the criterion for a useful analogy as opposed to an analogy which is an *obstacle to fruitful development .• 42 Nagel's more general view in his writing with Morris R. Cohen is that the validity of a conclusion from analogy depends on a generalization being true, and as such requires fair sampling and an absence of counter-examples.43 This is the view that I will call analogy as *inductive generalization* (see *Theories Based on Inductive Generalization*). R. O. Anderson argues that one should distinguish between *conclusive* analogical arguments and those which are merely plausible.44 In particular, conclusive results are obtained when there is a logical isomorphism between two *different representations of a field-. By this is meant, for instance, using predicate calculus as an • analogy* to electronic circuits. So on this view, the conclusion Q is either logically implied by the shared formal structure between B and A or it is not • conclusive* . But if this is 40Nagel,The Structure of Science,p. 109 4IIbid ., pp. 11&-116 42Ibid .,p. 116; Nagel is cited and interpreted in Achinstein, \"Models, Analogies and Theories\" ,Philosophy of Science,31,pp . 329-330. 43Cohen and Nagel,An Introduction to Logic and Scientific Method,pp. 286-288 44 Anderson,\" Conclusive Phil080phie,23,pp. 44-57 Analogical Argument\" ,Revue Internationale de 15 the logical foundation for reasoning by analogy then sound analogical reasoning seems to require that the analogous case A be redundant in determining whether Q should be inferred for the central case B. For if one's set of beliefs ..1 and the set of shared properties E logically imply Q then ..1 and all of the propositions true about B also logically imply Q, given consistency, and one does not need to examine A or construct the set E. One who holds to the view that convincing (as opposed to merely plausible) analogies are verified by deductions independent of knowledge about A could point out that this would not make analogy useless. Descriptively, such a person might argue that logical implication is just a check for validity and that it may be more efficient or convenient for people to look at the analogous case A to see whether Q is true of B. But if a validity check is the only way in which one can conclude Q(B) with confidence then one is limited to what can be derived from present knowledge and can never infer Q(B) if it is not decidable from..1. This seems to undercut the whole purpose for using analogy which should be to give one a way to infer Q(B) when ..1 and the known facts about B are logically incomplete. For analogy to have this useful place in logic, it needs to be shown that analogical inferences can be valid when the conclusion is not decidable from ..1 and E. This requires (a) that Q(B) be a sound conclusion given ..1, the facts E shared by A and B, and the fact that Q is true of A, and (b) that A should not be logically unnecessary to the proof. Such a set of circumstances can in fact exist. This is proven in part ill of this essay for two types of premises, one of which was suggested last year by Julian S. Weitzenfeld45 and the other of which supports the need for clauses having truth value variables. In general, conclusions by analogy follow soundly from the belief that two or more cases share properties which are adequate to determine whether or not Q obtains. So if A has Q being true, and !2 is such a -determining structure46 and is a subset of the conjunction of shared predicates E, then by analogy one can infer Q(B). However, there are substantial reasons to doubt that this is the end of the story about analogy. Weitzenfeld asserts that, since the schema for reasoning by analogy is valid -, the uncertainty in analogy is accounted for by uncertainties in the -tacit premisethat Q belongs to a determining structure.47 But this does not seem to account for how people often use analogies. In particular, the argument for other minds is not explained under such a theory because the whole problem is that a person's actions are not enough to tell whether she or he has a mind. The analogy seems very convincing nonetheless. 48 It is not just that determination is uncertain in this case I know that the similarities between others and myself do not determine the presence of a mind in others. So it looks like we will have to continue searching for justifications for analogy, turning now to a very old form of account. 45Weitzenreld, *Valid Reasoning by Analogy* ,Philosophy of Science,51,pp. 137-149 46Th is is Weitzenfeld's term, Ibid.,p. 141 47Ibid .,p.139 481n Human Knowledge and Its LimitB,p. 482, Bertrand Russell asserts that skepticism on the part of philosophers* is proressional rather than sincere.* 16 Theorie8 Ba8ed on Inductive Generalization It is orteu asserted that analogical arguments ill practice are Dot deductively valid but are at most a form of plausible inJerence. One way to make this point is to note that. the logical form of analogy col1a,pses into single-instance, enumerative induction. Aristotle, in the first analysis of arguments by analogy, saw -rhetorica.l induction- (or -argument by paradigm-) as the two-step inductive/deductive process discussed earlier in this sectioD.49 Its truth, then, depends on an -incompleteinduction50 -a universal sta.tement made, in Aristotle's terms, without examining aU the hown cases in which it could apply. The assumption, then, is that analogy involves a generalization based on one or a few instances, and it should be cogent if and only it the generaliza.tion is true, i.e. if the exa:mination of other known cases (perhaps every other known case) sharing the antecedent does not produce a counter-example, and the consequent is a projectible property. This is a popular position for those who are very skeptical about the value of analogy since, in this account, ana.logy is a weakly-supported induction and the conclusion is therefore assumed to be less probable than one based on many instances. For example, M. C. Beardsley contends tha.t there is always a hidden generaliza.tion in an analogy and that the analogy can be thrown away when that generalization is made explicit.51 His position that analogy can never be a cogent form of argument but is merely a plausible one52 takes the hard-nosed Aristotelian view63 and is like other analogy is bogus* theories of analogy which dismiss this form of reasoning from any place in logic. The briefly sketched theory or Henry KyburgS4 claims that analogy is not a primitive but is instead always reducible, oddly enough, to 8tati8ticai induction witb a single sample, a view similar to that of Cohen and Nagel who hold that inferring the generalization requires fair sampling and no counter-examples and is probable, if it passes these tests, in proportion to the number of analogues examined.55 Joseph Agassi argues that analogies which turn out to be right in scientific prediction are eventually turned into generalizations. On his view, ad hoc analogies, like -Nerves probably conduct electricity because, like telegraphs, they transmit informa.tion -, 0nly suggest possible inferences and would not be judged CODvincing by a scientist until the underlying principle finds other support. 56 49 Aristotle, \"Prior Analytics\" ,Organon I,ll,xxiv,pp. 515-517 500p. Cit.,Lloyd,p. 408 51Beardsley,Thinking Straight,p. 113 52lbid . 53 As opposed to Aristotle's more sympathetic view oC analogy in his ruminations about likencs~ ill ttll! Topic8--&(!C \"Theories Based on Abductive Hypothesis\" for accounts in that tradition 54Kyburg,Probability and the Logic 0/ Rational Belie/,pp. 278-279 550p. Cit.,Cohen and Nagel,pp. 286-288 56 Agassi, \"Discussion: Analogies as Generalizations- ,Phil080phy 0/ Science,ll,pp. 351-356 17 So the accounts which follow what, as we saw earlier, is a very obvious two-step breakdown of analogical inference, have generally asserted that since analogy is just a weak form of induction, the logical justification for it must also be weak, and that when analogies are cogent there must be some additional investigation or introspection which bears out the conclusion. As was illustrated earlier with the Italian tourist bus and Berlin border guard examples, the view that analogy can be explained as enumerative induction falls into problems in trying to account for how two separate projectible conclusions, confirmed by an equally small number of instances, can differ so widely in their apparent levels of cogency. An inductivist might try to answer this within the theory of inductive justification by suggesting that in evaluating cogency one really is reminded of other generalizations based perhaps on stronger inductions, and the consistency of these generalizations with the analogical conclusion is really what tells one whether to believe it. This works as a way to explain why, say, a close physical resemblance in size and features between two youngsters does not warrant that, if one is known to be named Skippy -, the other one should be also. 57 Past induction has lead us to generalize that similar looking kids probably do not have the same first name, so this analogy is rejected. Experience does allow us the conclusion that if one is in grammar school then the other probably is also, since generalizations like -Kids of similar sizes are around the same agesupport the induction. But the theory has a more difficult time explaining the cogency of some other arguments. Suppose you are the world's first interplanetary traveler, and while in some distant solar system you spot that staple of modern philosophy, Putnam's twin earth. Orbiting the planet, you are struck by the uncanny resemblance to home -that same climate, the oceans, the mountains, deserts; but you know that you are light years from the earth. You reason that there must be living things on this planet, even though you cannot see them or any direct evidence that they exist. I suggest that there is no past experience to appeal to here. The conclusion seems very plausible, but it just is not founded on any generalizations from induction based on more than just the earth.58 Actually, I do not think that making the planet an exact twin earth adds to the intuitiveness of this example. The example works as well if one imagines spotting a planet with oceans and continents and clouds like the earth but with a different geography - -this is imaginable. Most of us would still conclude some probability that the planet has life on it, and the probability would be higher than for a planet very dissimilar to the earth. The point about this example is that it is a pure analogy, like the argument for other minds and the existence of God; in each of these only one instance gives us any positive reason for our conclusion (although the other planets in our own solar system give us a number of reasons for a negative conclusion in the similarplanet example). In short, while some analogies do seem to be inductive in character as opposed to deductive or abductive, if the principle of induction is roughly defined to be that confirming instances increase one's confidence in a .generalization then this does not seem to be the principle at work in explaining why a single known example can give great confidence in its prediction. In induction, one's goal is to seek a large number of confirming instances, 57 This is based 00 ao example from Professor UrmsoD 5~xcept, perhaps, for the similarity priociple, whicb I ioveigh agaiost io \"Theories Based 00 Strength of Similarity\" 18 and one sacrifices specificity in the reference class common to the instances because Olle is looking for a law with a simple antecedent. In analogy, the goal is to minimize the :;Icope of the reference class, thereby gaining a power which enumerative induction gives up because one is not seeking, in analogy, a concise generalization -the whole point of using analogy may be that a generalization would be too bard t.o stat.e. So analogy seems to have its own set of problems and advantages which are, respectively, not solved and not justified by single-instanc~ induction accounts. Theories Ba8ed on Abductive Hypothe8i8 If an analogy is not primarily based on deduction or induction, perhaps it is based on abduction. One might hold that the real function oC most analogies is not to prove things, or even to establish their probabilities, but instead to suggest possible explanations and propositions which are consistent with the known facts about the central case. In like manner does Raimo Anttila take the opinion, in his book on linguistic analogies, that analogy • is weaker than induction* and rather • feeds on abduction •. 59 A similar position underlies both Mary Hesse's t,reatment of *the logical problem of analogy*60 and Bertrand Russell's attempt to justiry analogical arguments.51 Hesse trea.ts the problem of justifying analogies as models for suggesting possibilities in science and rejects the idea. that validity or even plausibility are required of conclusions based on analogy. Accounting for the cogent quality of an allalogy thus requires Olle to show that • given the choice between a hypothetical elCplanation based on a model and one which is not, it is more reasonable to select the Cormer .• 62 This is the task facing an abductivist. For if one's view is that analogies generate scientific hypotheses which merely have to be consistent with and to explain the observed facts about a situation then it is not obvious on what grounds such a hypothesis should be preferred over others. I discussed this problem for the other minds argument earlier in this section. Russell's theory for how analogy works, which, I think, is clearly an abductive theory, tries to justily the analogical argument for other minds by citing the fact that since particular thoughts of mine ca.use particular behaviors and that other conceivable causal relationships are not in my experience, the type I have seem likely to be the only kind which actually exist.63 This is equivalent to Hesse's Cirst justification for conclusions based on analogy, namely • inductive support.- . According to such attempts at justification, not only is the rule tha.t my type of thoughts cause behavior valid, but also there is at least one iMtance to support the converse, that behavior implies that thoughts like the ODes that would explain it in me are its cause in another. Ergo, this latter rule is preferable to any other hypothesis which may be consistent with a different causal rule but which is not instantiated 590p. Cit.,Anttila,p. 18 600p. Cit.,Hesse,pp. 101-129 610p. Cit.,Russell,pp. 482-486 620p. Cit.,Hesse,p. 101 630p. Cit.,Ru88ell,pp. 485-486 HI even once in one's experience.54 This seems like a dubious argument to me. If I can concoct a model in my imagination which supports the hypothesis that it is some other thing (like a wicked conspirator) which causes the behavior of others then I see no reason why this could not count as an instance in support of the rule that behavior in others implies that a conspirator caused it. Likewise, I see no reason to think that falsiCiability is a positive reason, as Hesse claims it is,65 to prefer the hypothesis based on analogy with my own mind, for the problem brought on by skeptical arguments is that there seems to be no way to check the different hypotheses they are all equally unfalsifiable. The criterion of simplicity, which is the last one suggested by Hesse,66 might give one reason to prefer the model of one's own case to one dreamed up because it asks us to believe nothing of others more than what we believe of ourselves. However, why one should prefer simple theories is not a question as yet answered in logic, and also that criterion may be a double-edged sword for supporters of the argument by analogy for other minds since the analogy asks one to believe that others have minds, whereas many forms of skepticism do not ask that one believe anything about others and suggest that what we see is an illusion, a phenomenon for which there are other examples in our experience. So if one holds that analogies are abductive in character then their cogency appe:us hard to justify with the tools we have. One can say that conclusions are more believable the more aspects of a situation they explain, or the fewer there are of other hypotheses which are alternatives to the conclusion, but preferring a conclusion based on analogy to another based on an alternative view seems unjustified if both conclusions do equally well at explaining the known facts. The problem is that alternative explanations are almost always imaginable, so perhaps abduction is too weak to account Cor the cogent quality of some analogies. Theories Ba8ed on Strength of Similarity If analogy is not Cundamentally based on principles of deduction, induction, or abduction then perhaps its justification is simply a principle of analogy itself. The most popular traditional account of analogy treats the analogical inference as a primitive, axiomatizing the notion that the greater the similarity one sees between the analogous and central cases, the more one should expect unexamined aspects of the central case to resemble corresponding aspects of the analogous case. Under such theories, analogies are judged cogent if and only if they pass some threshold test for similarity between two cases. This test is usually seen as a separate criterion from that of enumerative induction, because the latter requires a large number of instances of a similarity (as opposed to a large number of similarities) relative to the number possible. The idea that similarity is a logical justification for analogy seems to have originated in the philosophy of John Stuart Mill. It was he who 'launched a tradition by declaring what I want to call the • Similarity Principle* : 540p. Cit.,Hesse,pp. 104-106 65Ibid .,p. 127 66Ibid . 20 • ... we conclude (and that is all which the argument of analogy amounts to) that a fact m, known to be true of A, is more likely to be true or B if B agrees with A in some of its properties (even though no connection is known to exist between m and those properties), than if no resemblance at all could be traced between B and any other thing known to possess the attribute m .... There can be no doubt that every such resemblance which can be pointed out between B and A, affords some degree of probability, beyond what would otherwise exist, in favor of the conclusion drawn from it. II B resembled A in all its ultimate properties, its possessing the attribute m would be a certain y, not a probabilitYi 8Jld every resemblance which can be shown to exist between them, places it by so much nearer to that point .• 67 The Similarity Principle sounds plausible on first reading (perhaps I should call this the seductive theory of analogy) but I think tha.t one oan almost completely reject it after close examination. To begin with, the basic idea what John Maynard Keynes calls *our instinctive principle that likeness breeds the expectation of likeness* 58 is extremely dillicult to justify logically. Weitzenfeld writes that *not.hi.p.g, not even an increase in likelihood, follows from mere similarity , .69 and 1 am inclined to agree. One could attempt to give a justjfi r,ation based on statistical induction, but it is not clear at all that even a majority of cases one encounters would support the principle. The main problem for such attempts is an abundance of example analogies which violate the Similarity Principle. In some analogies, the analogues appear to be. extremely similar and yet we have no confidence in the analogy. Furthermore, such situations may exhibit more a priori similarity than another pair of situations whose analogy provides a very convincing conclusion. Here is an example of such situations. Suppose you are in Palo Alto on the day of the annual Big Game between Stanford and Cal. .As a new resident in town II.nd not quite sure where the game is being pla.yed, you emerge !rom buying some kitchenware at the Town and Country Shopping Center. Standing in the parking lot, you notice a gold Honda Civic on EI Camino Real with a blond-haired WOlD an in it. She turns toward the Bayshore at Embarcadero. Seeing another blond-haired Woman in a gold Honda Civic, heading toward you on EI Camino, you reason that she too will turD toward the Bayshore. Now this is not a cogent conclusion because what type of car one is driving and one's hair and sex are just irrelevant to th e direction in which one is going. But there is more similarity between the two car-approach situations than there is between two very dissimilar objects, a. walking man with a ua Berkeley sweatshirt, say, and a. tacky looking car with a 'Go Bears* bumper sticker on it, which also approach the intersection at different times. II the first object turns onto Galvez toward Stanford, it is a good bet the second one will. Clearly background knowledge is coming into the evaluation despite Mill's assertion that the connection between the similar properties and the inferred property is not a necessary part of the justification. A defender of similarity-based accounts could argue that the man and the tacky looking car are in fact more similar 670p. Cit.,MilI,p. 394 68Keynes,A Treatise on Probability,p. 222 690p. Cit.,Weitzenreld,pp. 137-138 21 than the two Honda Civics with blond women in them because the similarity between a UC Berkeley sweatshirt and a *Go Bears* bumper sticker has a very high weight in measuring similarity. But the difference between the two analogies appears not to be one merely of degree of similarity but of qualitative significance however many properties the man and the car share we can only conclude that they will turn in the same direction because we know that Berkeley people would be traveling to the game on this day, and people traveling to the same destination tend to turn at the same places. Most people would judge the two approaching Civics to be more similar than the man and the tacky looking car, even on Big Game day, given no information about what purpose the similarity judgment is to serve. The evaluation must not only be made relative to the conclusion but must also involve some questioning of what real reason one has, beyond their a priori similarity, for deciding that two objects will turn at the same place. There are also examples to count against the Similarity Principle in which two arguments by analogy share the same central and analogous cases. For instance, suppose you happen to be in a parking lot full of brand new cars -all the same model, body and color, outside the Ford plant in Dearborn, Michigan.70 If you look under the hood of one and find a 2.3 liter engine, you might conclude by analogy that the car next to it also has a 2.3 liter engine. But if you see a wadded up piece of paper in the back seat, you probably would not conclude that the next car also has a wadded up piece of paper in its back seat. The two analogies rest on the same degree of similarity because they are based on the same situations; yet one analogy is cogent and the other is not. Strength of similarity just cannot account for the difference in cogency because there is no difference in similarity. A remarkably large number of writers, though, have followed Mill in assuming that strength of similarity and an absence of strong dissimilarity must be the keys in determining whether an analogy is any good. Theories which express the probability increase for the conclusion based on a specific number of known similarities have been developed by Keynes, who argues for such a theory based on the uniformity of nature,7l and also by P. R. Wilson,72 Hugues Leblanc,73 G. H. von Wright,74 H. W. B. Joseph,75 and a host of others working in the tradition of Rudolf Carnap.16 All of this work is an attempt to give formulas for how probable an inference is based on the number of similarities between the cases and the total number of features each one has. The problem is that one can make up an infinite number of shared properties for any pair of cases. A property can be anything -distance from a given point in space, having a different number of letters than the word 'green', not having another property, and so forth ; and the 70Tbis example is due to ProCessor Perry 7l0p. Cit.,Keynes,pp . 222-232 72Wilson, \"On tbe Argument by Analogy\" ,Phil080phy 0/ Science,;rr,pp. 34-39 73Leblanc,\" A Rationale Cor Analogical Inference\" ,Philosophical Studies,20,pp . 29-31 74\\ion Wdght\"A Treatise on Induction and Probability,pp. 264-272 750p. Cit.,Josepb,pp. 532-542 76See discussion under \"Other Tbeories and Hybrid Tbeories\" on confirmation tbeory approacbes to analogy 22 hope that this can all be reduced to a finite, let alone a manageable, number of primitive, realproperties seems to be wistful. It should follow then that attempts to define a threshold test for whether two situations are similar enough to project any properties one may hold onto the other is just not a productive approach to automating the kind of analogical reasoning done by humans. However, early work on analogy in artificial intelligence has for the most part rested on some form of the Similarity Principle. Efforts to measure how similar two things are by counting equivalent corresponding attributes in a frame (e.g., by Patrick Winston77) and at requiring situations to match at a preset threshold (e.g. by Jaime Carbone1l7S) were useful investigations that have spawned much work, but my feeling is that the way forward is to reject the Similarity Principle as a guide to good inference and to use similarity only as a first pass indicator of whether two situations might be analogous for the purposes of drawing a particular conclusion. Theories Ba8ed on Psychological Explanation Against theories which see the cogency of analogy as reflecting itself in logic, many would argue that convincing analogies can only be explained in terms of some extra-logical persuasive factors. For instance, a cognitive dissonance theory of analogy might state that cogent analogies are ones which minimize, against the rejection of the analogical inference, the unhappy contradictions in one's beliefs. A behaviorist, on the other hand, might say that analogy is a conditioned response made more likely by greater neural association between concepts.79 Psychological explanation does not seem to be needed in order to explain every analogy, since valid analogies are possible. Nor would one want to say that one's being convinced by an analogy can never be the result of motivational or non-logical factors, particularly in arguments about ethics or God. So the type of account, based on psychology, that would be useful is probably one which would demonstrate not only that analogies can be psychologically compelling beyond their logical justification (as J. Hospers, for one, has claimedso) but that the habit of analogizing is a necessary component of intelligence despite the failure of logic to justify such analogies. If a psychological account is primarily what is needed in order to explain why we judge some analogies as good and others as bad then there are important consequences for artificial intelligence and cognitive science. The debate over whether logic programming and symbol processing are adequate approaches both in describing and in creating intelligence is surely a Cas77 Winston, \"Learning and Reasoning by Analogy\" ,communicationB of the Association ' for Computing Machinery,23,pp. 6S~703 7SCarbonell,\"Derivational Analogy and Its Role in Problem Solving\",Proceedings of the National Conference on Artificial Intelligence (AAAI-S3),pp. 64-69 79For a discussion of psychological theories of persuasion, see Ross,PerBuaBion: Communication and Interper80nal Relations 80Hospers,.J\"An Introduction to Philosophical Analysi8 (Routlege and Kegan Paul),1960,p. 355, cited in Op. Cit.,Wilson,p. 34 23 cinating one,81 and I would like to discuss the analogy between computers and brains, with which it is connected, in part N of this essay. But for now, we can say that it is not known at what level (if any) cognitive processes are isomorphic with those governed by the rules of presently-deCined logic, and so it may be a mistake to assume that analogies are more than just neural phenomena which, like seeing and hearing, have proven beneficial in the evolution of humans. One who held that the human inclination to accept analogies is just a habit of the brain was David Hume. In the Treatise of Human Nature, Hume argued that people have a • propension* to be led to opinions like those they have formed about other situations when their perceptions of the two situations resemble each other.82 Hume seems to be advocating that the strength of such resemblance is what accounts for our judgment about analogy,83 but of course his associationist account does not attempt to justify this principle. Instead, what we regard as similar objects of thought are just plain, unconnected objects for Hume. That people believe they have anything to do with each other is therefore just an *inexplicable fact* 84 about how our minds work; it has no justification. Hume's idea that people apply analogies to new instances out of the force of habit is shared and extended by W. V. Quine and J. S. Ullian, who argue that in reasoning by analogy we *slur over* any generalization and that plausibility is achieved by the virtue8 that a belief can have: conservatism, generality, simplicity, refutability, and modesty. They see our ability to make good analogical inferences as determined in part by natural selection.85 Quine and Ullian do not assert that analogy is a phenomenon outside of logical justification and in fact their view has also been likened to theories based on inductive generalization.86 There are some criticisms to be made of those who hold that an extralogical explanation for the cogency of analogy is necessary. Firstly, it can be pointed out that most such *theories* are Dot really accounts of analogy at all -many just point in the direction of an account and malign analogical arguments for their supposed lack of validity. While one can condemn the use of analogy as an *intuition pump* ,87 the leap to assuming that analogy cannot have a justification seems itself unjustified. For instance, one may admit that association occurs in some way prior to logic in the mind, but this does not mean that a logical account cannot be given for cogent analogies. In short, if a theory can be constructed Cor how analogy can be jus81See Israel,\"The Role of Logic in Knowledge Representation\",lEEE Computer,October 1983,pp. 37-41 82Hume,Treati3e 0/ Human Nature,p. 142 8/; 208-209 83Laing,David Hume,p. 137, shares this interpretation 84Laird,Hume'8 Philosophy 0/ Human Nature,pp. 94-95 85Quine and Ullian,The Web 0/ Belie/,pp. 42-62 86See Shaw and Ashley,\" Analogy and Inference\" ,Dialogue: Canadian Phil080phical Review,XXIl ,p. 423 87Dennett and Hofstadter,The Mind's J,p. 375 24 tined in logic then it will be useful independent of whether it represents exactly how the mind works. II there are cogent conclusions from analogy that cannot be explained by such a theory then demonstrating this with examples is something the advocates of psychological explanation can shoot for . Other Theories and Hybrid Theories Some recent theories of analogy incorporate aspects of more than one of the above types of account and may offer alternative explanations for what makes a good analogy. In particular, a major philosophical effort in t his century, which is apparently still going on, has been the attempt to incorporate analogical infer ence into confirmation theory, following on the -inductive logic* of Rudolf Ca.rnap. In Logical Foundatt:ons of Probability, Carnap defined a confirmation function which could give the increase in the probability that a conclusion holds for the central case B, given that it holds in the aIlAlogous case A.88 This seems to require one to count t he number of properties which characterize A, B, and their intersection as well as the number of properties which logically entail these sets. I have already remarked that the idea of using mellS UIes of similarity based on numbers of properties is a highly questionable one.SIl Nonetheless, there have been many who have worked on this approach, in cluding Peter Achinstein (H)63),90 Carnap (lQ63),gl Hesse (1964),g2 Acbinstein again (lQ64),g3 Ilkka Niiniluoto,g4 Wolfgang Spohn,g5 Domenico Constantini,OO and T. A. F. Kuipers.g7 The basic idea in the confirmation theory approach is that individuals or situations A and B are characterized by conjunctions oC predica.tes applied to them and tha.t cogency corresponds roughly to confirmation. Confirmation in turn corresponds to the probability of the conclusion increasing given the analogous case, so that if F 1 is the conjunction of shared predi88Carnap,Logical FoundatioM 0/ Probability,pp. 56Q-570 890p. Cit.,Leblanc,p. 30, says that the issue of how much likelihood increases due to shared properties 'is academic, since rules for reckoning how many features a thing has, and how many of those features another thing doesn't have, are (to say the least) still wanting.' 9OAchinstein,*Variety and Analogy in Confirmation Theory* ,Philosophy 0/ Science,30,pp. 207-221 glCarnap, 'Discussion: Variety, Analogy, and Periodicity in Inductive Logic' ,Philosophy 0/ Science,30,pp. 222-227 92Hesse,' Analogy and Confirmation Theory' ,Philosophy 0/ Science,31,pp. 31Q-327 g3 Achinstein, 'Models, Analogies, and Theories' ,Philosophy 0/ Science,:ll\"pp. 328-350 94Niiniluoto,'Analogy, Transitivity, and the Confirmation of Tbeories',Application8 0/ Inductive Logic,pp. 218-234; and • Analogy and Inductive Logic' ,Erkenntnis,~,pp. 1-34 95Spohn,' Analogy and Inductive Logic: A Note on Niiniluoto* ,ErkenntniB,~,pp. 35-52 OOConstantini,' Analogy by Similarity' ,ErkenntniB,20,pp. 103-114 g7 Kuipers,' Two Types of Inductive Analogy by Similarity' ,ErkenntniB,g,pp. 63-88 25 cates and F 2 is that conjunction conjoined with m other predicates also true of A, then Pr[F 2(B) I F l(B)/\\F 2(A)] > Pr[F 2(B) I F l(B)],IIS where the increase in probability comes from some variant of the Similarity Principle. In fact, the confirmation theories of analogy are very much like traditional strength of similarity theories except that they are part of an elaborate inductive calculus. In addition to the objections to similarity criteria which I have already stated, I would argue that the above formula is violated too often to be a good assumption. One could certainly imagine situations in which F 2(A) would give no useful information (recall the two similar looking children, one of whom is named *Skippy*) so that the two probabilities would really be equal, but I also think the inequality could go the other way -that the probability of the conclusion given the analogous case could be less than its a priori probability. For instance, suppose m=l and the property conjoined to F 1 to form F 2 is the property of being ga million miles from the sun. Now if A ~ B and A and B are both planets then we know that the probability is now zero that B is ga million miles from the sun because A has that property and there is only one planet for which it holds true. Similarly, suppose two of the people in the crowd at a Stanford Debate Club public forum are named • Jones* and the other is named • Smith*, and all three of those in the crowd have brown hair. Now given that A in the crowd is a Jones and has brown hair and B(~A) in the crowd has brown hair, Pr[Jones(B)] is less than it was before we knew that A's name was Jones (down to one-half from two-thirds). Spohn recently sounded the toll of skepticism about the usefulness of inductive logic in exploring analogy.1I9 The problem is that it requires too many assumptions (including the Similarity Principle) which are just blatantly violated in practice. Some of the work on analogy which has appeared in the last few years has been an attempt to do away with such assumptions and to concentrate on how the projection of properties from the analogous case (sometimes called the *base* or *source*) to the central case (or the • target*) are constrained. Cognitive psychology and artificial intelligence have produced theories based on *structure mapping* in which the projection of properties is often constrained by rules. 1OO Theorists of argumentation logic have sometimes adverted to relevance as the crucial criterion for inferring a conclusion from similarities with an analogous case. That such similarities should be relevant to the conclusion has often been stated in logic texts,101 and recently W. H. Shaw and L. R. Ashley have suggested that analogical arguments do not rely so much on resemblances as on background information about the conditions of 1180p. Cit.,Niiniluoto,* Analogy and Inductive Logic* ,pp. 6-7; The vertical bar in the probability expression means • given that ... •. 1190p. Cit.,Spohn 100See Burstein,* A Model of Learning by Incremental Analogical Reasoning and Debugging* ,Proceedings of the National Conference on Artificial Intelligence (AAAI-83),pp. 45-48; Gentner,*Structure Mapping: A Theoretical Framework for Analogy and Similarity* ,Proceedings of the Fourth Annual Conference of the Cognitive Science Society,pp. 13-15, cited in Burstein above; Gick and Holyoak,* Schema Induction and Analogical Transfer* .cognitive Psychology,!§.,PP. 1-38 101See, for example, Copi,lntroduction to Logic,p. 360 26 relevance.102 I think this is the right direction in which to traveJ if one is seeking a workable theory of analogy, but there are problems with the picture of analogy painted by Shaw and Ashley. The disanalogy ca.n be relevant to the conclusion, too, and so can fac ts about the central case which are not known. Furthermore, Sha.w and Ashley do not define reJevance. Perhaps it really jus mea.ns tha.t the conclusion follows from the similarities, in which case we are back where we started -at logical necessity and the analogy looks redundant aga'in. I shall attempt to solve these and other problems in the account which follows. m. A Situational Theory of Analogy Language tells us what there is: Individuals 103 are the subjects and objects of our discourse. Relations and properties are what predicate upon them. Sentences refer to locations in space and time. They describe situations and events which mayor may not be real. The theory of situations developed by Jon Barwise and John P erryl04 suggests that these facts about language are not incidentally related to the universe that language is about -they are a natural ontology for it. And if we really do see the world the way our language indicates we do, then situation theory seems like a good framework within which to build a theory of analogy because analogies, as nearly as I can tell, are just similarities between different situations. A Summary of the Theory of Situations Situation theory provides a convenient, precisely defined terminology for describing analogy and similarity. lOS My own experience indicates that, once the terms of situation theory are understood, the concepts essential to analogical inference are more intuitively understandable in the vocabulary of situation theory than are the corresponding concepts in the first order logic associated with it. This should become clearer as the presentation unfolds, since I will use both situation theory and predicate calculus definitions. But because situation theory is relatively new, I need to summarize its basic terminology before proceeding with the theory of analogy. The primitives of situation theory are individuals, relations, locations, and polaritie8. Individuals are real things, like people and bicycles, and are represented symbolically by a,b,c, ... . Relations, rn, are n-place predicates, with O-ary (situational states), l-ary (properties), and 2-ary (binary relations, n=2) being the most important kinds. Locations, I, are 1020p. Cit.,Shaw and Ashley,p. 430 103The term 'individuals' as used in philosophy means \"individual objects\" as opposed to . \"individual persons\" l04Barwise and Perry,\"A Theory of Situations\" (Part B),Situation8 and AttitudeB,pp. 47-116 10SI will for the most part stick to the vocabulary of Ibid . (Part B of Situations and Attitudes). Perry, Barwise, and a host of others in a working group at the Center for the Study of Language and Information at Stanford have revised the theory quite a bit since the book came out in lQ83, but the older, more familiar theory seems adequate for my purposes. 27 regions of space-time, with the universal location I containing every other u location. Polarities, i, are Boolean values, 0 or 1. A situation-type, s, is an assignment of polarities to a conjunction of constituent sequences, 1/, where each 1/ consists of a relation predicating on a different number n of individuals, viz: rn,a 1, ... ,an. So an atomic proposition, for instance, is a constituent sequence assigned polarity 1 (=\"yes\" or \"is the case*). For example, a clumsy student having lunch with a professor and his wife would be represented as the situation-type s:=professor,a;yes student-of,~a;yes husband-of, a,c; yes lating-with, b,a,c; yes graceful,b;no. A state of affairs or event is a situation-type occurring at a location, and a course of events or coe, e, is a set of events occurring in a spaciotemporal sequence having certain relations between the locations. The coe is factual if it accurately describes an actual coe as far as it goes, and is nonfactual if it gets something wrong.106 For example, a factual, though probably not a complete, description of an actual coe might be in e: at I: s at I': s' temporally-precedes, 1,1'; yes where sand s' are situation-types, and I at I: s I is an event. An event-type, E, is an abstraction of a coe in which any of the primitives for any event in the coe may be indeterminate. Indeterminates are represented by r, II, I, and i where these refer, respectively, to any relation, individual, location, or polarity instead of denoting a particular one. So, for example, if E:=at I: professor,lI;yes student-of,b,lI;i then e would be of type E and a, b, I, and 1 (=\"yes\") would be anchors for II, b, I, and i. Furthermore, E could be viewed as abstracting a coe in which II, b, I, and i are replaced (anchored) by a, b, I, and 1. Event-types can be and-ed together to form more descriptive event-types (e.g., the event-type E and E1 as long as the combined event-type is consistent. The component event-types are then each part of the combined one. A schema, S, is an inclusive disjunction of event-types {E1, ... ,En }. In situation theory, facts about particular objects are represented by coes, while events of different types are related by constraints, C. A constraint is a rule which tells what one may logically conclude about two schemata, e.g. having lunch involves eating it, spilling it , or both: E1:=at I: person,II;Yes having,a,b;yes lunch,b;yes 1061n Ibid.,pp. 49-51, Barwise and Perry distinguish between ab~tract coes e and real coes I, where the former are descriptions within the theory and the latter are the parts of tbe world whicb correspond to actual coes; For my purposes, all discussion or situations is entirely descriptive. 28 ~£:=at I: spilling.b;yes ~9:=at I: eating.b;yes C:=at I\",: involves'~l,S;y88 where C is the constraint.107 The Definition of Analogy Having reviewed the parts of situation theory of which I will make use, the first task in describing my theory of analogy should probably be to say just what analogy corresponds to in situation theory. Two coes, which I will henceforth just call *situations* or *cases*, are similar if they have a shared event-type (i.e., if there is an event-type of which they are both type) with determined (all anchored) polarities. I will assume that the event-type under discussion contains no relation indeterminates, so the requirement that it also have no polarity indeterminates means that it will contain at least one literal. l08 The representations of our knowledge about the two situations will always fall short of describing everything there is to know about the situation, if it is real, so when I write of a similarity existing between two cases, I mean a known, or encoded, similarity, which is only part of the total similarity between the two real situations. Analogy also requires that the situations be non-identical, so they must either differ in location or there must be an abstracted situation-type which is known to be part of one situation and known not to be part of the other. The known disanalogy will therefore be a single event-type with indeterminate polarities assigned to each constituent sequence which is a *yes* (1) in one situation and a *no* (0) in the other. If we assume that the real situations are correctly described, then these are the abstracted facts which are anchored to true in one situation only. Furthermore, if the analogy is to be useful to us then there should be another event-type which is anchored in the analogous case and undetermined in the central case, onto which we want to project at least part of the anchored event-type (the conclusion). In the definitions below, the analogous and central cases should be taken to mean what is known about the two situations both from their initial descriptions and from any constraints that have been • fired • (invoked) to yield new facts about them. Definition 1: An analogy exists between a central case ec and an analogous case e A iff (i) there is an event-type ~S (the similarity), with anchored polarities for all of its constituent sequences, such that e A and ec are both of type ~S' and (ii) there is an ev('nt typ(' ED (the disanalogy), with indeterminate polarities, such that e A and ec anchor ED to opposite polarities for each constituent sequence in ED' 107Ibid . 108 A literal is a term from predicate calculus which corresponds to a constituent sequence with a specific truth polarity (0 or 1) assigned 2Q The non-identity requirement (ii) may be fulfilled by differences in location or individuals, or both , in addition to explicit polari ty differences, when an opposite polarity is deducible for some anchoring. Thus if Mimi is Syd's mother and Bibi is Gus's mother and we know that the two are not equal and that each person has only one mother, we can conclude a dissimilarity for analogue individuals Syd and Gus which says that Mimi is the mother in one situation and Bibi is the mother in the other. Merely having an analogy does not make an analogical inference possible. For that, we need to be able to project at least some abstracted facts about e A onto ec' Therefore, we have, Definition 2: An argument may be made by analogy between e A and ec iff (i) there is an analogy between e A and ec' and (ii) there is an event-type EU (the unknown) such that Eu is completely anchored in e A (no indeterminates) and is undetermined for eC (not completely anchored). The unknown, E(Jl must be of type E' (the conclusion), which is the event-type whose anchoring in e A is projected onto its undetermined portion in ec' i.e. the indeterminates in E' which are unanchored in ec prior to the argument become anchored in eC as they are in eA' Determination Constraints I should now be in a position to tackle the fundamental problem of analogy with which this essay is concerned. It may be stated thusly: Given an analogy {ec,eA,Es,ED } , a data base A of constraints, and an unknown Eu' under what conditions might any part E' of EU be anchored in ec for its undetermined parts as it is anchored in e A7 The problems which need to be solved in answering this question are those which arise from the theories considered in part II. Firstly, it should not be the case that the justification condition is that the anchored conclusion for ec is provable from A and Es or from A and ec' or even that Es is provable from the anchored E' and A, for then one would not need e A except perhaps to identify a possible E'. Yet it is not that the conclusion E' should be based just on the Cact that it occurs in e A' Cor then any conclusion by analogy would be equally good. There should be some test condition, other than logical implication, for deciding whether or not the conclusion is cogent, and the degree of similarity between e A and eC does not appear, from earlier investigations, to be a good candidate. Human judgments about the cogency of an analogy seem to center around how -relevantthe similarity Es is in deciding whether the conclusion E' holds. Moreover, we may require that Es contain a set oC conditions which are more or less exhaustively relevant, or sufficient to decide the ques- .tion. But how does one test for relevance or whether Es is sufficient to determine E'? I propose that we should simply add the relation 'determines' as a constraint verb like 'involves', and deCine it as follows: Definition 3: An event-type E determines an event-type E' iff Cor every complete anchoring of the set Jl of unshared indeterminates in E (those indeterminates which do not appear in E, there is a unique complete anchoring oC the set! of unshared indeterminates in E' which holds Cor all complete anchorings of the set !: of indeterminates which are shared by the two 30 event-types.109 I think that this definition is correct, but it certainly requires some explaining. Perhaps the easiest way is with a.n example. Let us assume that the make and design of a car and whether or not it is American-made are jointly sufficient to determine that car's engine-type and whether or not it is fuel efficient. Specifically, we have C:=at 'u: determines,E,E';1 where E:=at I: car,lI;1 make,G,b;1 design, G, c; 1 American,lI; i 1 and E':=at I: car,G;1 engine-type,G,d;1 fuel-efficient,G;i •. In this example, the set ~ of shared indeterminates is {I,G}. The set Jl of other indeterminates in E is {b,c,i1}, and the set! of other indeterminates in E'is {d,'.t}. A complete anchoring for {~,Jl} is a set of values for these indeterminates, so the definition above simply says that if the determination constraint holds and one knows the anchoring for {~,Jl} in a situation, then there is only one possible anchoring for ! even though we might not know what that anchoring is. A corollary to the definition would be that if E involves E' then E determines E', so the set of ordered pairs of event-types in the extension of 'involves' is a subset of those which stand in the relation of determination. Detail of an Argument by Analogy Before defin ing the theory more rigorously, it is probably worthwhile to demonstrate exactly how a particular (simple) argument by analogy can be constructed using determination. The argument concerns two Frenchmen, Pierre and Francois. Last year, Pierre came to the United States to become a research associate at Stanford. He was required to get a visa from the U.S. Government before he came. This year, his friend Francois is coming from France to attend Berkeley as a graduate student. Francois concludes, by analogy, that he too will need a visa. Francois's situation is the central ca8e: in eC: at France-1986: nationality,Francois,French;1 visiting,Francois,U.S.;1 8tudent,Francois;1 school,Francois,Berkeley;1 The unknown is whether Francois needs a visa: EU:=at France-1986 : needvisa,Francoi8;'1 The analogou8 case is his friend Pierre's, last year: 109Tbe 'determines' constraint requires tbat no constituent sequence in E' both contain an indeterminate individual and be assigned an indeterminate polarity. Tbis is a tecbnical decision wbicb is too complicated to discuss bere but which should not hamper us very much if at all. I bave yet to decide whether this assumption is necessary . 31 in eA : at France-19B4: nationality,Pierre,French;1 visiting,Pierre,U.S.;1 student,Pierre;O school,Pierre,Stanford;1 needvis&,Pierre;1 So, between them, the strongest 8imilarity we can state (without firing constraints on their respective situations) is: ~s:=at I: nationality,a,French;1 visiting,a,U.S.;1 school,a,\";1 The dis analogy is the set of facts which are true in one situation but not in the other: ~D:=at I: student,a;i~ Of course, the actual disanalogy will be virtually infinite, but in the absence of further knowledge or information provided by constraints, ED is the full provable dissimilarity. The disanalogy only plays a role if the argument is not sound, in which case it needs to be enumerated more completely than in this exa.mple. Now bllppose we know that whether you will need a visa is determined, in general, by which country you are from and which one you are going to. We know the determination con8traint: C:=at lu: determinu,E,E'; 1 where the determinant is: E:=at I: nationality,a,c;1 visiting, a, II; 1 and the conclu8ion is: E':=at I: needvisa,a;i1 . To make the argument, we verify that Eu is of type E' and that Es is of type E. The sets of shared indeterminates (!:), of unshared indeterminates in E (Ji), and of unshared indeterminates in E' (!:), are !:={l,a}, Jt={c,II}, and ~{i1}' Anchoring the determinant's set Ji to {French,U.S.} as it is anchored in E s gives the antecedent: E\":=at I: nationality, a,French; 1 visiting,a,U.S.;1 and anchoring the conclusion event-type's set!: to {I}, as dictated by e A' gives the con8equent (or anchored conclusion): E\"':=at I: needviBa,a;1 which sets up a new \"involves* constraint (the generalization): C':=at lu: involveB,E\",E\"';1 Since ec is of type Es' and therefore of type E\", it must by C' be of type E''', so !:, the indeterminates in E\"', can be anchored for ec to {France-I985,Francois} and we can say 32 in ec: at France-19S6 : ne.dvisa,Francois;y ••. This example illustrates the general mechanism of analogical inference when determination constraints are known for given similarity and conclusion event-types. One possible criticism of the approach is that we may not know any such constraint for a particular analogy. I do not assume that all reasoning by analogy entails a deductive application of a determination rule. Other forms are discussed later in this section. But it seems to me that determination is a very useful form of constraint to be aware of, because it is more general than involvement and is often the kind of information we have, or ask whether we have. I do not know, for instance, whether Turkish people need visas to go to Greece, but I have a feeling that they either all need visas or none of them do. Let me talk to a Turk who has been to Greece, and I will tell you which one it is. So determinative knowledge facilitates learning. From a general rule I can collect new, more specific rules as I examine, in the theory's terms, new anchorings for the unshared indeterminates in E and E'. Reasoning by analogy in such cases is both valid and indispensable. Semantics in First Order Logie Although situa.tion theory is intended as a framework for a semantics of nat*ural n.nd artifi cia.l languages, in this case it seems appropriate to reverse roles and give an interpretation of situation theory and determination constraints in terms of the first order predicate calculus. This will facili ta.te the proof of soundness and should help to clarify the exact meanings of some terms. The translation initially requires a few more definitions. To set up the interpretation of event-types and coes in first order logic, I first define a weak notion of truth: Definition 4: A set A of anchors (-values-) for each of the indeterminates in an event-type E is a factual complete anchoring of E iff E is anchored to A (instantiated -) in some actual coe. Event-types and coes can be defined in terms of first order predicate schemata: Definition 6: A predicate schema110 P(x1, ... ,xn) is an associated first order expression, or afoe, for an event-type E having n indeterminates iff the extension of P is equal to the set of all factual complete anchorings of E. With the afoe, a predicate calculus interpretation for definition 4 may be given: Axiom 6: An event-type E with n indeterminates is anchored by some actual course of events e (there is an e of type E) irf 3x1'''''Xn P(x1, .. . ,xn), where P(x1, ... ,xn) is an aCoe for E. Similarly, an event type E' is of type E iff an afoe or E' is coextensive with an afoe of E anchored for its unshared indeterminates as in E'. Intuitively, P can be thought of as the scaffolding of the event-type: all the determined relations, locations, individuals, and polarities which appear in it, together with their structure. The free variables xl, ... ,xn are the 110 A predicate schema (not to be conrused with a situation theory schema, as defined earlier) is, ror my purposes, a predicate on free variables 33 spaces between scaffolding, and anchors Cor these are the boards and poles which are placed in the spaces and thereby become part of the structure. The relation of involvement between event-types corresponds to a kind of implication: Axiom 7: For event-types E and E' with n and m(~n) indeterminates, respectively, E involves E' iCC \\:Ix1,***,x \\:IYl' ... 'y m nom P(xp ... ,xm,y p ... ,y o-m) =* Q(xp ... ,xm), where P(xl' ... ,y o-m) and Q(xl' ... 'xm) are afoes Cor E and E', respectively, and the set {xl' ... 'xm} corresponds to the shared indeterminates. The relation oC determination may be seen to correspond to a somewhat more complicated expression in logic: Axiom 8: For event-types E and E' with np and nQ indeterminates, respectively, E determines E' iff \\:Ix1,* .. ,x \\:IYl' ... 'y m 0p-m \\:Izl' ... ,zoQ_m P(xl'x2,***,xm,y Py 2'***'y np-m) A Q(Xl'X2,***,xm ,zpz2,***,ZoQ_m) =* [V'wl' ... ,wm P(w1,***,w 'Yl'***'y ) =* Q(w1,***,w ,zl'***'z )J for afoes m 0p-m m 0Q-m P(x1, ... ,y ) and Q(x1,. .. ,z ) of E and E'. op-m* nQ-m That involvement is just a special case oC determination may now be proven: Theorem 0: If E involves E' then E determines E'. Proof: Let the number of indeterminates in E and E' equal nand m, respectively. Map the set of values xp ... ,xm one-to-one onto a range for a new variable x and do a similar mapping Cor y l' ... 'y nom onto y. By axiom 7 and the hypothesis, \\:Ix,y P(x,y) =* Q(x), where P(x,y) and Q(x) are afoes for E and E' and thereCore there are no unshared indeterminates in E'. A substitution gives \\:Iw \\:Iy P(w,y) =* Q(w), and by quantifier reversal and implication introduction, \\:Iy \\:Ix P(x,y)AQ(x) =* [V'w P(w,y) =* Q(w)J, which, by axiom 8, is the condition Cor determination of event-types Cor nQ=O. Proof of Soundness To prove the soundness of analogical inference under determination, I will first prove the situation theory analogue of the rule of the syllogism and then prove that an *involves* constraint can be inferred from a determination constraint combined with a single coe. The validity of the argument by analogy as defined in definition 2 follows Crom the two lemmas. Lemma 10: If E involves E' then any actual coe e oC type E must also be of type E'. Proof: If e is of type E then by axiom 6, 3x,y P(x,y) where P(x,y) is an afoe of E with n indeterminates and x and yare collapsed variables with ranges equivalent to those of {xl' ... 'xm} and {Yl' ... 'Yn-l}' respectively. By axiom 7, \\:Ix,y P(x,y) =* Q(x), where Q(x) is an afoe for E', so by universal instantiation and modus ponens, Q(A) is an afoe Cor e where A is the complex object corresponding to the factual complete anchoring of .!. in e and where e is treated as an event-type. Therefore e is of type E'. The byproduct of determined arguments by analogy is a new rule inferred as a generalization from a single instance: 34 Lemma 11: If E determines E' and e is of type E and E', then there is a pair of event-types E\" of type E, and E'\" of type E', with anchors for each of the np-m and nQ-m indeterminates unshared in E and E' and with the same set oC shared indeterminates as E and E', respectively, such that e is oC type E\" and E\"', and E\" involves E\"'. Proof: By axiom 8 and the hypothesis, for afoes P(x,y) and Q(x,z) of E and E', respectively, where x, y, and z are collapsed as before, Vx,y,z P(x,y)/\\Q(x,z) =} [Vw P(w,y) =} Q(w,z)J. Let A be the anchoring for x, B be the anchoring for y, and C be the anchoring for z in e. Then by universal instantiation and modus ponens, Vw P(w,B) =} Q(w,C), which may be rewritten as Vw P'(w) =} Q'(w), where P and Q have been replaced by primed predicates which have extensions equal to the range of w. The implication is a sufficient condition for E\" to involve E\"', where these two event-types have afoes P'(w) and Q'(w). By axiom 6, since these are coextensive with P(w,B) and Q(w,C), respectively, E\" and Em are of types E and E', respectively, and since for e, 3w P'(w)/\\Q'(w), e is of type E\" and E'''. Finally, the validity of analogical inference can be proven Cormally under the constra.int of determination: Theorem 12: Given an analogy {eC,eA,Es,ED } with an unknown, Ell' which is completely anchored in e A and is oC type E' (the conclusion event-type): if there is an event-type E such that Es is of type E and E determines E', then the argument by analogy is sound. Proof: From lemma 11, since E determines E' and e A is of type Es and EU and thereCore oC type E and E', there are eventtypes E\" (the antecedent) and E'\" (the consequent) which anchor the unshared indeterminates in E and E', respectively, as they are anchored in e A such that E\" involves E\"'. E\" anchors the unshared indeterminates in E to values in ES' which is of type E, so Es must also be of type E\". Since eC is of type ES' eC is also of type E\", so by lemma 10, eC must be of type E\"'. The anchoring of indeterminates as prescribed in definition 2 has been accomplished by a deductive procedure. Having given a general account of analogy in situation theory, we might want to ask how determination rules could be expressed in logic for arbitrarily complex expressions, viz when the predicates, constants, and variables are not collapsed representations of event-types but direct representations of properties holding or not holding for objects. It is this task to which I now turn. Solution and Decision The determination relation as I have presented it allows assignment of location, individual, and polarity indeterminates based on a single constraint verb, 'determines'. In traditional predicate logic, however, the fact that clauses cannot have variable truth values (there is no argument place Cor polarity) means that the effect oC having polarity variables must be achieved without actually having them. The allowance for indeterminate polarities seems to be an advantage for situation theory in addition to its perspicuous 35 ontology for the various combinations of facts and schemata and for the relations between the different forms. But situation theory is a more complicated framework for representing propositions in a data base, and it has not yet been fully axiomatized in the manner of first order logic. So it is probably worthwhile to try to experiment with determination in the more familiar formal language of the predicate calculus, in which it is possible to deCine a pair of logical connectives to correspond to individual determination, in one case, and to polarity determination in the other. Individual determination corresponds to what I want to call functional determination or solution in predicate calculus. It is this type of determination which was anticipated by Weitzenfeld111 although he did not define it in terms of logical connectives. A new logical operator for functional determination may be defined as follows: Definition 13: A function F solves another function G for all x iff'rlx [F(x)=y\"G(x)=z] =} ['rIw F(w)=y =} G(w)=z], which can also be written as 'rIx 'rIy 'rIz [P(x,y)\"Q(x,z)] =} ('rIw P(w,y) =} Q(w,z)).1l2 This, of course, looks very much like the definition of determination using afoes, but in this case the variables to be determined are restricted to object variables. Suppose, for instance, that we wanted to split up the determination constraint defined in the example after definition 3 into two parts, namely (a) the make and design of a car determine its engine-type, and (b) whether or not a car is American-made determines whether it is fuelefficient. The first constraint is a case of functional determination: make and design solve for engine-type. The second is an example of what I call truth value determination or decision. Its realization in predicate logic is Definition 14: A clause with an unknown truth value P1(x) decide8 the truth value of another clause Q1(x) iff (['rIx P(x) =} Q(x)) V ('rIx P(x) =} -,Q(x)]} \" {('rIx -,P(x) =} Q(x)) V [Vx -,P(x) =} -,Q(x)]}. I write this as P?(x):>-Q?(x). In traditional first order logic, the truth value of a clause (which I will henceforth assume to be synonymous with its polarity) cannot itself be a variable. Given the set of logical operators in predicate calculus, this makes sense because any variable attachment to a predicate's polarity would simply make it a tautology (P or not P). Having polarity variables becomes useful, however, when we define connectives like 'decides' which allow statements about what one needs to know in order to know other things. A number of little theorems can now be proven which make clear how these connectives operate. Some of these have been pointed out to me by others, as noted. Theorem 15: If P(x,y) solves Q(x,y) and there are objects A, B, and C such that P(A,B) and Q(A,C), then we can infer the functional generalization: 'rIw P(w,B) =} Q(w,C). Proof: Follows by syllogism (universal instantiation and modus ponens) from definition 13. 11lOp. Cit.,Weitzenreld,p. 141 112Tbis formula may look more complicated than one would expect. Unfortunately, simpler formulas like \"\"Ix '!Iy 3z P(x,y) \"* Q(x,z)\" break down in proors of tbe validity of functionally determined conclusions. The conjunctive normal form clause for tbe solution sentence is \" ..... P(x,y )V ..... Q(x,z )V ..... P(w ,y )VQ(w ,z)\" . 36 The above theorem allows inferences like • All Spaniards speak Spanish* ITom, for example, the premise that nationality solves Cor native language, together with an observed case of a Spaniard whose native language is Spanish. 113 Theorem 161 If P(x) decides whether Q(x) or -,Q(x}, and there is a case A such that P(A} and Q(A), then. we can infer the truth value generalization: Vx P(x) ~ Q(x). Proof: Assume 3x P(x)I\\-.Q(x). Definition 14 can be Andsimplifled to IVx P(x) ~ Q(x)]v[Vx P(x) ~ ..... Q(xl] . The assumption eliminates the first disjunct, and the hypothesis that P and Q both hold for A eliminates the second disjunct, so by reductio ad absurdum the t.heorem is proven. This justifies the first step (the generalization) in the two-step Aristotelian model of analogy given earlier. The analogous case A serves to eliminate one of two possibHities: that. aU P's are Q's or that they are aU not Q's. We have this kind of djsjunctive knowledge often. For example, I do not know whether history majors at tbe University of Texas are reqillred to take. a foreign language, but it seems likely that being a history major at that Universi ty determines which it js. Theorem 17: P(x,y) solves Q(x,z) iff Vw,x,y,z P(x,y) 1\\ Q(x,z) 1\\ P(w,y) ~ Q(w,z). (Paul Rosenbloom, Stuart Russell) Proof: From definition 13, VX,y,z P(x,y) 1\\ Q(x,z) ~ IVw P(w,y) ~ Q(w,z)l, so taking the *Vw* outside, Vw,x,y,z P(x,y) 1\\ Q(x,z) ~ P(w,y) ~ Q(w,z), which can be rewritten as above. The above theorem suggests an alternative way to prove the validity oc analogy, by instantiating w, x, y, and z to the values in the analogues and performing a syllogism. Theorem 18: P?(x):>-Q?(x) ~ P(x):>-Q?(x). Proof: Follows Crom definition 14 by And-simplification. In practice, the test condition Cor analogy will be the consequent in this (the above) theorem rather than being the antecedent, since it is known prior to the analogy whether P holds for the two analogues. Theorem lU: P?(x):>-Q?(x) ¢::> P?(x)-<Q?(x). (Jerry Hobbs) Proof: By definition 14., P?(x):>-Q?(x) iff {[Vx P(x) ~ Q(x)] V [Vx P(x) ~ ..... Q{x)J} 1\\ ([Vx ..... P(x) ~ Q(x)1 V IVx ..... P(x) ~ ., Q(x)J} , where the implication.s can be written truth functionally as {[Vx ..... P(x) V Q(x)] V [Vx -,P(x) V -,Q(x)J} 1\\ {[Vx P(x) V Q(x)] V IVA P( ) V -,Q(x)j}, which is the same as the truth func tional fOfm for the definition of Q?(x):>-P?(x). This points out that definition 14 Cor P?(x):>-Q?(x) would serve equally well as a definition Cor Q?(x):>-P?(x). I wrote the definition as a conjunction of disjunctions to show the form that oC the general case logical equivalence 113This example was suggested to me by Stuart Russell 37 when the determinant is a conjunction of predicates. If some, but not all, of the predicates have determined polarities then the biconditional (mutual) determination will not hold -it is only valid in the simple case in which a.ll of the predicates are of variable truth value. Theorem 20: F(x) solves G(x) iff Yw,x F(x)=F(w) ~ G(x)=G(w). (Stan Rosenschein) Proof: By theorem 17, F(x) solves G(x) iff F(x)=y 1\\ G(x)=z 1\\ F(w)=y ~ G(w)=z, which is equivalent to F(x)=F(w)I\\G(x)=z ~ G(w)=z. Rewriting, F(x)=F(w) ~ [G(x)=z ~ G(w)=z], which is true if a.nd only if F(x)=F(w) ~ G(x)=G(w). In the special case in which the object variables (x and y) range over instants in time, the function F is the state of a system (e.g., a collection of particles in space) for one possible history, and the function G is the state for another possible history, the above theorem expresses Montague's condition for theories to allow one to deduce, given the instantaneous state of a system, its state at any time thereafterY4 Theorem 21: P(x):>-Q?(x) iff YX,y P(x)I\\P(y) ~ [Q(x)<=* Q(y)]. (Stan Rosenschein) Proof: By definition 14 and And-simplification, P(x):>-Q?(x) iff [Yx P(x) ~ Q(x)]V[Yx P(x) ~ -,Q(x)], which has the same conjunctive normal form as the above expansion: -,P(x) V Q(x) V -, P(y) V -,Q(y). Theorem 21 provides another definition for decision which is particularly well suited to analogical inference. Finally, Theorem 22: If P(x):>-Q?(x) and P(A)I\\Q(A)I\\P(B), then Q(B). Proof: The premises fulfill the requirement for theorem 16, from the consequent of which Q(B) follows by syllogism. Theorem 22 completes the proof of soundness for Aristotle's two-step process of analogy when P(x) decides Q?(x). The connectives 'solves' and 'decides' are useful for describing analogy in the simplified domain of the syllogism. It is also possible to reconstruct the notion of 'determines' in predicate calculus based on solution and decision. An event-type may be represented as a conjunction of m clauses (m=the number of clauses) where each clause is either a literal (anchored polarity) or a. two-proposition disjunction (indeterminate polarity) and in which the nth argument of each n-place predicate is the loca.tion referred to by the clause. Thus the event-type E defined above would be written thusly: 114Montague,\"Deterministic Theories\"(Ch. ll),Formal Philo30phll,pp . 303-359; See especially Montague's discussion of why this sentence \"cannot be taken quite literally\", pp. 303-304; There is a large philosophical literature on determinism wbicb I bave not attempted to review, but whicb is not directly relevant to tbis essay. Car(a,l) I\\Make(a,b,l) I\\Design(a,c,l) 38 1\\ [American( a,I)V-.American( a,I)I. In general, an event-type with m constituent sequences, of which t have positive polarities and v have indeterminate polarities, can be represented as I\\~ 1 P .(a.,11*) 1= 1-1 I where !:p hj' and £k are the parametric vectors of individuals predicated upon, respectively, by the ith true relation Pp the jth false relation Q j , and the kth relation with an undetermined truth value, Rk, and where lIP 12j' and 13k are the location pa.rameters for each of these predica.tes.115 The connectives 'solves' and 'decides' ca.n now be combined in predica.te logic to form a definition for 'determines': Definition 23: A conjunction E116 with m clauses, t of which have polarity one and v of which have indeterminate polarities, determines a conjunction E' with corresponding parameters m' ,t', and v' iff (i) For every possible vector of truth value assignments to the undetermined clauses R\\: solves each conjunct in and (ii) For every clause R?'k of indeterminate polarity in E', Essentially, then, the general case of determination is somewhat awkward to express using our new connectives. It might be noted that location determination becomes just a special case of functional determination in this definition, as long as the location parameter is simply added to each predicate in the translation. Furthermore, the predicate calculus represen- \"tation of -E determines E'is exponential in v and v', and depends on the exact form of the definition chosen for 'decides' (i.e., definition 14 or theorem 21) 115Tbe vectors or location parameter may contain constant or variable objects 116Tbe E without italics means that I am referring to the conjunction whicb represents the event-type E 3Q The types of determination that have been defined here (location, individual, and polarity) do not exhaust the possibilities. A determinative operator can be defined for anything which can be variable. While I do not see any benefit to relation indeterminates, other logical objects normally taken to be absolute could be made into variables. What type oC quantifier a variable is bound to could itself be a variable, as could numerical functions and entire situations, event-types, or schemata, e.g. in a constraint. Even whether-or-not-a-thing-is-a-variable can be a variable. I have especially thought about punctuation indeterminates, which might be useful Cor describing the chalkboard writing of some professors. Types of Situation Similarity The similarity event-type Es can range from highly determined and specific to very abstract and general. I wish to discuss briefly the different types of similarity abstraction and the different levels of event-type involvement. Any situation description of the form invented by Barwise and Perry can be represented as a conjunction of constituent sequences each assigned to a pCllarity and a locat.ion. I want to call these conjuncts situation conjuncts. They have the general form, rn(a 1, ... ,an,lji). In the strictest terms, more than one location might be specified (for instance in relations between locations), and n may be zero (when r is a locational relation or situational state). The abstracted situation conjuncts (which I call event-type conjuncts) of the similarity event-type Es may thus have different types of indeterminates among the parameters of the predicate rn, as long as all the i's are anchored. For instance, a conjunct in Es may be a property anchored to an individual and to a polarity but with an indeterminate in the location parameter. This type oC abstraction I call -individual equivalence-. In general, two situation conjuncts can have the following types of similarity, in roughly descending order of strength: individual equivalence, locational equivalence, state equivalence, property equivalence, and n-ary relational equivalence. Individual Equivalence: Two situation conjuncts have individual equivalence if the event-type conjunct they share contains no individual indeterminates. The event-type conjunct in question mayor may not have locational equivalence, but in either case individual equivalence is a strong type of similarity: a conjunct in Es with this type of similarity indicates that a relation is true of the same individual(s) in two different situations. Locational Equivalence: Two situation conjuncts have this type of similarity if their shared event-type conjunct is anchored to a spaciatemporal location. At a given place and time, a relation may be true of *more than one set of individuals. For instance, here and now, five is greater than threl;! and four is greater than two. These two situation conjuncts are equivalent relations true at the same location but of different individuals. The remaining types of similarity classify abstraction according to the arity of the relation predicate in the situation conjuncts. Any similar situation conjuncts will fulfill exactly one type from among these: State Equivalence: Two situation conjuncts have state equivalence if they share an event-type conjunct with a O-ary relation predicate. This occurs, for example, when it is raining in both situations, regardless of whether the rain is falling at the same location in each situation. 40 Property Equivalence: In this case, the shared event-type conjunct has a I-ary relation predicate. The property may hold for different individuals at different locations. For example, a red block here has a property equivalence with a red sock there. N-ary Rela tional E quivalence: Similarly, two situation conjuncts may share a* predicate of arity n, greater than one. Classical analogies are cases of binary relational equivalence, for example beak:bird::mouth:human. A bird 's beak and a human's mouth .are both food intake features, so a situation in which a bird has a beak is similar to one in which a human has a mouth because the two situations share the binary predicate 'is the food intake feature of'. It should be noticed that the situation conjuncts retain their relational (state, property, or n-ary) equivalence even if they have locational and/or individual equivalence as well. These, then, are the types of equivalence which two situation conjuncts can have. The event-type conjuncts in Es' which are shared by situation conjuncts in eo and e A' are each anchored to a specific relation and polarity. Some of them may also be anchored to individuals and locations. We may define three grades of similarity for each type of equivalence: total-, -partial-, and -no - . Total (type) Equivalence: The similarity Es has the total grade of a type of equivalence (location ai, individual, etc.) if every event-type conjunct in Es has that type of equivalence. Partial (type) Equivalence: If only some of the conjuncts in Es have a particular type of equivalence, then the situations have that type only partially. No (type) Equivalence: Two situations (or the shared event-type) have a type of equivalence not at all if none of their shared event-type conjuncts have that type. Some pairs of situations, then, will be similar only by relational equivalence and will have no similarities for individuals. Other analogies may relate situations at the same locations, and so forth. There are many possible combinations that can arise in a similarity event-type Es' For instance, two situation conjuncts might share one individual out of two in a binary relation -they would not have individual equivalence. Two conjuncts with different predicates or polarities also cannot have individual or locational equivalence because they do not share an event-type conjunct with an anchored relation and polarity. One might ask, -For what is all this useful?I doubt that knowing whether two situations have total locational equivalence, for example, can assist in doing infere'llCe or in telling how similar two situations are relative to two others. But knowing the many forms that the similarity event-type can take does seem, nonetheless, to be helpful in creating the general case algorithms for reasoning by analogy. It also reminds us that analogy can mean any type of similarity in the theory as constructed. A space probe on Mars and a candy bar are analogous in their not being Bob Hope. This may seem a ludicrous case to allow, but we want to take advantage of any explicit knowledge one way or the other, so if a data base of constraints specifically implies that the probe and the candy bar are both not Bob Hope, then thi~ should be honored as a similarity. The probe and candy bar have a proper ty equivalence, however weak. Analogy extends also to situations like my playing the eighteenth hole at Fort Collins today with the same golf ball and clubs that I used yesterday. Descriptions of these two situations might have total individual equivalence, although the time difference between yesterday and today means that they have no locational equivalence. 41 The similarity between two situations may also be classified according to the levels of involvement at which they have some abstracted type of equivalence. This refers to how many implication constraints need to be invoked on the descriptions of two situations before the shared relation in question is found. It may be known, for instance, that individual a in situation ec is a firetruck and that individual b in e A is also a firetruck. And further, it may be that there is no event-type which is part of either ec or e A (and which does not include a conjunct with the predicate 'firetruck') such that the event-type implies that a or b is a firetruck. If there is in fact no such event-type then the property of being a firetruck is information as specific as any we know about the individuals a and b. This is a case of 0level equivalence. Suppose instead that a and b are equivalent only in that they are both vehicles, and that while a is a firetruck as before, b is a family car. In this case, firing constraints on the two situations, in eO: at I: firetruck,a;1 and in eA: at I': car,b;l, reveals that a and b are both vehicles, and that the resulting event-type conjunct in E,,: in Es: at I: vehicle,a;l, represents n-Ievel equivalence, where n=the maxi-min number of constraints required to be invoked to tell that a and b are both vehicles. If (a) Firetruck '\"'* Truck '\"'* Vehicle, and (b) Car '\"'* Vehicle, then the maximum of the two minimum constraint firings is two (invoked in the case of a), so the situations have 2-level equivalence. If there were, in the description of ec' no more specific information about a than that it is a vehicle, then if b is a car and Car '\"'* Vehicle, the event-type conjunct in Es would have I-level equivalence because one constraint is fired in e A' zero are fired in ec' and one is greater than zero. Given a data base of constraints which have several levels of entailment possible in them, this might be useful as a way of describing why, say, two Mars bars are equivalent at a more basic level than are a candy-bar and a space probe. In the latter pair, constraint firings might eventually tell us that the bar and the probe are both • things*, but this level of similarity is clearly less impressive than a O-level equivalence. Otherwise, I really have worked out no theories about levels of equivalence and I doubt that they can be useful in formulating rules about inference. If two objects are similar, we might ask whether this implies that they are n-Ievel equivalent for some finite n. The assumption in my theory is that the answer is yes, but we might imagine cases in which oo-level equivalence would destroy this assumption. That is, it may be that two things can seem to be similar even though they share no explicable properties which account -for our intuitive grasp of their similarity. This possibility has been called • dyadic similariiy*117 and its importance for analogy will be discussed later in this essay. 117 Myers,. Inexplicable Analogies* ,Philosophy and Phenomenological Reaearch,22,p. 327 42 ClassifYing the Forms of Analogical Justification In part n of this essay, the form of analogy was given as follows: P(A)AQ(A) PCB) Q(B) where P(A), Q(A), and P(B) are the premises and Q(B) is the conclusion. It was shown that this reduces to an induction followed by a deduction: peA) ~ P (x) =*Q(x) PCB) Q(B) . This two-step formulation was discovered by Aristotle, as I mentioned in part n of this essay, but there is another way of arriving at Q(B). Specifically, analogy may also consist of an induction followed by an abduction, as follows: peA) 9..~1 Q(x) =*P (x) P (B) Q(B) . The problem of analogy is traditionally that of justifying the first step -what Aristotle called the -incomplete induction -. Theorem 16 established that a sufficient condition for concluding P(x)=*Q(x) from P(A)AQ(A) is that P(x) decides whether Q?(x), which I write -P(x}>-Q?(x)-. H the second step is a syllogism, then the inference from analogy is logically necessary given the premises and that P(x)>-Q?(x). But this is not the only type of analogical reasoning that is possible. It may be, for instance, that the conclusion of the first step is merely plausible instead of being valid, and it may be that the second step is abductive instead of deductive. I contend that there are four types of analogical inference that have any kind of logical justification. The four kinds are presented initially in the table below, in which -the generalizationrefers to the conclusion of the first step in the analogy and the rule application refers to the mode of inference whereby the second step's conclusion is reached: Form of Justification Pure Deductive Pure Abductive Strong Inductive Weak Inductive 43 Status of the Generalization Valid Valid Plausible Plausible Rule Application Deduction Abduction Deduction Abduction In the table above, a valid generalization means that the rule (e.g. P(x)~Q(x» is inferred from both P(A)I\\Q(A) and a determinative test condition (e.g. P(x)>-Q?(x)). This is the Cirst inference step in the analogy. The second st.ep is the application of a rule of inference. If the generalization is P(x)~Q(x), and P(B) is observed, then Q(B) is concluded by application of t.he syllogism, a. deductive rule of inference. If the generalization is Q(x)~P(x), then Q(B) is concluded by abduction. The question that remains, then, is what it means for the generalization to be merely plausible. When the generalization from P(A)I\\Q(A) is valid, it follows soundly, but we may sometimes wish to conclude the generalization even when it is not strictly valid, in which case the first step in the analogy is inductive instead of deductive. We can get into trouble, as was demonstrated in part fl, if we allow the generalization to be concluded automatically from just one instance (A). For one thing, merely knowing P(A)I\\Q(A) does not indicate that we should prefer P(x)~Q(x) over Q(x)~P(x). In addition, Q may not be a projectible property in Goodman's terms, or there may be abundant counter-examples to either generalization. Finally, there may simply be no reason to think that the occurrence of P has anything to say about whether Q occurs with it, as in the example of the car with a wadded up piece of paper in the back seat. We would not want to conclude that all the other cars in Ford's lot have wadded up pieces of paper in their back seats. A test condition which is less demanding than determination but which should make the induction step have some plausibility is the condition that P(x) be relevant to whether Q7(x), which I write as *P(x)tQ?(x)*. In the example above, then, the generalization that all the Ford cars in the lot have wadded up pieces of paper in them would not be concluded because the fact that a car is a Ford in a given lot is irrelevant to whether or ilOt it has a wadded up piece of paper in it. In order to test for releva.nce, one might just include facts like *P(x) is relevant to Q?(x)* in the data. base of con- .straints, but I think that relevance can be defined in terms of determination. The type of relevance I have been discussing so far is relevance in deciding the truth value of Q?(x), so let's deCine that Cirst. Definition 24: P?(x) is relevant to deciding Q?(x) iff there is a minimally sufficient1l8 conjunction 1\\::1 D?i(x) such that (i) the USBy minimally sufficient, I mean that it should not be possible to remove any conjunct or conjuncts and have the remaining conjunction still be a determinant 44 conjunction decides Q?(x), (ii) there is no i in {I, ... m} for which Q=Dj> and (iii) P=D i for some i. This definition says that P?(x)tQ?(x) if and only if P?(x) is part of a determinant oC Q?(x). It can be generalized in situation theory to cover Cunctional as well as truth value relevance as follows: Definition 25: An event-type E is relevant to the determination of a conclusion event-type E' iff there is an event-type E* such that (i) E* determines E' and is minimal (viz, there is no event-type E: such that la] E: determines E', Ib] E:\"\"'E*, and Ic] E* is of type E:), (ii) E' is not part of E\"119, and (iii) E is part of E*.120 The four varieties of analogical justification may now be expounded more completely: Pure Deductive Analogy This is the only type of sound inference by analogy. Given an analogy {eO,eA,Es,ED }, an unknown ElJ' and a conclusion E' of which Eu is type, the conclusion follows by pure deduction if there is an E (with Es of type E) such that E determines E' (the test condition). The test condition is fulfilled if E involves E', in which case the analogous case is redundant, although it might be useful in identifying the determinant and/or the conclusion. If, on the other hand, the anchoring of unshared indeterminates in E' by the consequent event-type E'\" cannot be completely discovered without examining e A' then the analogous case is informative. It may also be true that a conclusion about e A can be reached by examining eO as an analogous case, so that the situations are analogically interactive. And finally, the mere fact that an analogy exists between eO and e A may give us some more information about the central case, so that the two situations are actually synergistic. For instance, I dropped my backpack on an OxCord don's feet while leaving the Old Library one day. He reacted kindly, but if I had done it again the next day his reaction might have been different just because I had inflicted this unpleasantness on him a second time. Inertia effects may also be examples of synergy, e.g. Congress will pass more readily what it has passed before. Pure Abductive Analogy If the conclusion E' determines E (with Es of type E), then the inference that the conclusion event-type is anchored in eo by analogy with e A is not sound but is instead hypothetical. Such analogies a.re a.bductive because they provide us with an explanation, though not necessarily the only 119This requirement was pointed out to me by Stuart Russell 12°It may be challenged that being part of a determinant is not a necessary, while it may be a sufficient, condition for relevance in determining. Such a challenge might run as follows: A person's sex is relevant to determining his or her name, yet it is dirficult to think of a minimally sufficient determinant for name which would include sex. My present answer to this is that the relevance which I have deCined may not match exactly with an ordinary language definition of 'relevance' but may be closer to the condition for plausible generalization. I cannot see how knowing that a person is male helps one to decide plau8ibly whether or not his name is 'Ray'. It only tells us that it is possible. 45 possible one, (or at least part o( the central case. It is ditricult to say what constitutes a cogent abductive conclusion by analogy. One might regard the conclusion as a hypothesis to be tested. If one provisionally concludes E''', then other constraints may allow one to conclude additional facts about ec' These may be tested against conclusions about ec which are drawn soundly without assuming E', such as conclusions implied by the data base and sound conclusions by analogy with other situations. Strong Inductive Analogy If E is relevant to E' but is not sufficient to determine E' then the conclusion by analogy is merely plausible, or inductive. For instance, in an earlier example, the make and design of a car were said to determine the car's engine-type. If two cars are only known to have the same de8ign, then it is not certain that they have the same type of engine, but there is at least some grounding for this conclusion. By an induction it is assumed that all cars with the design of the car in e A have its type of engine, and then the rule is applied to the car in ec' As one would expect, this is a very unstable form of inference. Its cogency clearly depends on how close E is to being a determinant of E', Le. how relevant E is. I have not come up with a good way to mea*S1)r~ t.his . The conclusion may also be tested using certain adjunct condition8 (such as whether the generalization has any known counter-examples) which are discussed in the next section. Weak Inductive Analogy The final form of analogical justification occurs when the conclusion E' is relevant to E. In this case, the inductive generalization that the E'\" anchoring of E' involves the abstracted similarity portion E\" is not a sound inference but has some grounding, and the projection of E' onto ec is an abduction. The net result is a conclusion that is p088ibly an explanation for the abstracted portion E of Es' This form of inference is weaker than strong inductive analogy because it not only involves an unstable generalization but also generates a mere hypothesis even given that the generalization holds. Thus, it must pass all the adjunct tests for both inductive and abductive analogy, to be discussed shortly. Obviously, a particular weak inductive analogy may be more cogent than a particular strong inductive analogy, the difference in terminology just reflects differences in the number of steps which are not sound, which is one in the strong case and is two in the weak case. The four forms of legitimate analogy may be summarized using simple predicate symbols as follows: 46 Pure Deductive Analogy Pure Abductive Analogy P (x) ;>Q? (x) P? (x) ~Q(x) P (A) I:Q(A) P (A)I:Q(A) PCB) P (B) Q(B) Q(B) Strong Inductive Analogy Weak Inductive Analogy P (x) rQ? (x) P?(x)~Q(x) P (A) I:Q(A) P (A) I:Q (A) PCB) PCB) Q(B) Q(B) Inference Using Situations and Adjunct Conditions The theory of analogy as I have outlined it suggests a means by which a comput.er could infer constraints based on examination of one or more situation descript.ions. For purely deductive analogies, the new rule is inferred with certainty, but if the form of justification is one of the other three varieties, then there is a lot of ways in which the conclusion might be contradicted by other knowledge and beliefs. I wish to discuss some computational methods for both sound and non-sound reasoning by analogy. Consider first t.he case of pure deductive analogy. I imagine that the knowledge base of a situation-based system might contain a large set of separate situa.tion descript.ions (coes), aU entirely anchored. I further suppose that the knowledge base would contain a set of constraints relating event-types in varying degrees of abstraction, and that some constraints would be • involves* constraints and some would be *determines* constraints, with perhaps some *is relevant to* constraints and any other desired kind thrown in. Let us say that the system is working on a situation in which a 22-year-old American student is entering East Berlin at Checkpoint Charlie. A similar situation at a different time (yesterday) is retrieved from the knowledge base, and in that situation, the student had his passport stamped. Should the computer conclude that the student will have his passport stamped in the present situation? The test condition to be applied is whether or not there is a subset of the similarities between the two situations which determines whether or not the passport will be stamped. By firing constraints on the similarity , it may be learned that. Checkpoint Charlie is a border entrance for East Germany, that East Germany is a country, and that passport stamping is a border control procedure. Another constraint may tell the computer that which country a border entrance is in determines its control procedures, and hence the conclusion that the . passport will be stamped again is valid by application of a new • involves* constraint formed from the determinative one. The key maneuver in finding out whether the similarity contains a determinant Cor the conclusion is to fire constraints on the event-types in the proposed test condition. In this example, the similarity contains much extraneous information -that the person is a student, American, 22, etc. This information is a hindrance to deciding which test condition should be tried because there are so many possible ones. In this observation I think we have a clue to what 47 makes a good analogous case, namely, that its similarity with the central case should be close to the determinant in the test condition. A second thing to notice about this example is that the determination constraint is a default rule. Clearly, it would be violated if the student forgot his passport. The rule is probably useful nonetheless because it applies most of the time. An extension of this theory would be to allow -multi-valued-truth assignments (or probabilities) for constraints, instead of just 0 or 1. Finally, it should be pointed out that a by-product of the inference by analogy is the addition of a new -involvesconstraint to the knowledge base, namely that East German border guards always stamp passports. If the form of the justification is purely abductive then the same considerations as above apply but for discovering that the conclusion implies some portion of the observed similarity instead of the other way around. However, since the conclusion is no longer guaranteed to hold even by default, the system will need to do some checking of adjunct conditions, or tests for the consistency and reasonableness of the conclusion. For abductive analogy, these criteria include the following: 1. The conclusion should predict no results which are contradicted by those facts about the central case which are not part of the explained event-type. 2. Thtlre should either be no contradicting alternative conclusion which implies the same subset of the facts about ee' or else any such alternatives should be able to be judged less likely than the conclusion, by some means. 3. There should be no counter-analogy with some other situation which predicts a conclusion at odds with the present conclusion. 4. There should either be no counter-example situations in which E\" occurs without E\"', or else any such examples should be judged dis analogous in some significant way. 5. If heuristic risk values can be assigned to rejecting and accepting the conclusion, then the risk involved in accepting should be less than the risk involved in rejecting. And, 6. In general, the a priori probability of the conclusion should compare favorably with those of other hypotheses which are not inconsistent with the known situation and are therefore competing hypotheses. This is not a complete, rigorous list, but merely an indication of the types of tests one should do. The second disjuncts in criteria 2 and 4 are obviously very fuzzy. For inductive analogy, the adjunct conditions are safeguards against concluding an -involvesconstraint which is contradicted in the knowledge base or which would otherwise be ill-founded: 1. The conclusion E' should be projectible, unlike -grue-. 2. The inferred constraint that E\" involves E'\" (or that E'\" involves E\", in the case of weak inductive analogy) should have no counter-examples in the knowledge base of situations. 3. There should be no counter-analogy which would result in a sound or very plausible conclusion contradicting the original conclusion E'. This would be any situation sharing some set of conjuncts other than E (though possibly with overlap) which would determine or be relevant to part of E' and result in a different polarity for at least one conjunct in E'. And, 48 4. There should be no part of the determinant E* of type E (or E', in the case of weak inductive analogy) which is unknown or contained in the dis analogy and is *crucial* (whatever that means) to determining E' (or E). (Of course even a fully determinative disanalogy does not disprove the conclusion since both an antecedent and its complement can imply a consequent, but finding such a disanalogy mandates some counter-checking to see if a disproof of the conclusion is possible.) This is probably not a complete list either, although I think it captures most of what can go wrong. The adjunct conditions must be fulfilled in inductive analogies in addition to the test condition, which is either that E be relevant to E' (strong) or that E' be relevant to E (weak). Strong inductive analogies need to satisfy the inductive adjunct criteria (for plausible generalization), while weak inductive analogies must fulfill both the inductive and the abductive adjunct conditions. IV. Tests of the Theory and the Analysis of Analogies Theories are usually evaluated according to their explanatory power, so it seems proper to try applying this theory oC analogy to a mix of problems. In particular, the theory should be able to answer some, iC not all, oC the questions about analogy which motivated its study. I think, as it happens, that the theory can also explain some of what we already knew about analogy, but in a more precise way, and it may now be clearer just where other accounts of analogy either work or fall short in this regard. Finally, I will try to put the theory and my perspective on analogy to work in analyzing some example analogies. Answering the Requirements for an Analogy Theory I would like firstly to consider the eight categories of questions for theories oC analogy which were proposed in part II oC this essay. I do not wish to go through the questions one by one, since some of them have obvious answers already set forth in the theory and others are presently unanswerable from it. Rather, I would like to point out implications oC the situational theory of analogy which might not be obvious and which appear to answer some of the questions. One question about the form of analogy concerned how and whether one should distinguish between figurative and literal analogies. An example oC a figurative analogy is one of the Reagan/Bush Committee's political commercials Crom Ronald Reagan's lQ84 re-election campaign. The commercial depicted a situation in which a human is trapped in a woods with a hungry bear on the prowl. By analogy, the argument appears to be that, just as the woods dweller should be armed with a gun to defend against the bear, the United States should have a strong defense against the Soviet . Union. In a figurative analogy, property equivalences between analogues do not seem to form the determinant; thus it is not that a woods dweller is much like the U.S. or that the bear is much like the U.S.S.R., or even that the woods a,re like the world. Instead, the relations between these individuals seem to be the salient similarity, namely the relation of one individual posing a threat to another. Literal analogies, in general, seem to be those in which there is a great deal of O-level property equivalence in the determinant event-type. As properties get less specifically similar and as nlevel relational equivalences predominate in the determinant, the analogy gets more figurative, but the theory seems to indicate that there is no way to draw a line between the two since any combination of types of similarity is possible. I think the theory can also shed some light on questions about analogy's place among modes of inference. The second step in analogy as I construe it is a straightforward application of either deduction or abduction. The first step -concluding the rule -is either deductive or what I have termed, by default, inductive. This latter covers cases in which the generalization is merely plausible, not valid, but the requirement for plausibility (namely, relevance) is more stringent than inductive criteria which guard against contradictions in the knowledge base and against nonprojectibility. The problem of justifying induction as the number n of instances approaches infinity is different from the problem of justifying analogies. The difference is that questions about relevance and determinability go away as n gets very large, whereas whether or not the conclusion is projectible continues to be a problem even when, say, a thousand green emeralds have been observed before midnight and thus been called • grue-, for one would not want to say that emeralds observed tomorrow will be blue. In the case of the wadded up piece of paper in the back seat of a car in Ford's lot, the conclusion that all these cars have this property is a projectible conclusion because as one observes more and more cars with pieces of paper in them one eventually believes that all cars in the lot have the property. One would expect that for inferences based on some number of instances neither large nor small, a mix of principles of good analogy (determinability or relevance) and for believable induction (number of confirming instances, projectibility, consistency) would be applied. The theory demonstrates, in response to questions about the justification and soundness of reasoning by analogy, that inferences from parallel cases can, under certain circumstances, be both valid and necessary for concluding new constraints. Whether a substantial number of explicit analogies in real life are of this type is unclear, but it does seem to be a mechanism for everyday conclusions by analogy which we make without labelling them as such. What is really lacking in the theory is a way to evaluate the cogency of non-sound arguments by analogy. It does, however, indicate how an analogy might go wrong. If no part of the similarity is relevant to determining the conclusion and vice versa, then the argument has no legitimacy, as I see it. Furthermore, inferences by analogy that are not sound need to pass the adjunct conditions, precluding conclusions which are inconsistent with sound predictions or other examples, or which are of ludicrous probability versus the alternatives, are non-projectible, or are realistically undecidable given the unknown or disanalogous status of crucially relevant factors. Some hints are given in the theory regarding the purposes and methods of analogy. Even redundant analogues can be useful in identifying possible conclusions which can then be verified or in pruning the set of facts from which one attempts to prove the conclusion, and when a relevant or determining similarity can be demonstrated to exist between two cases, a *conclusion may be reached which would not otherwise be possible to infer. I think the theory also argues strongly that similarity should not be the criterion which is optimized in seeking good analogues. Salient similarities seem to be just those which either determine or are determined by a conclusion from the unknown. 50 Explaining Some Introspective Data Questions about the cognitive nature of analogical inference, which formed the last category of requirements set forth in part IT, are very difficult to answer. I am not sure to what extent human analogizing can be mapped onto the logical structure which I have proposed, but I would like to cite three applications of parts of the theory which have occurred to me since I began working on this subject. The three *case studies* involve observations about how analogy functions in arguments, in thinking, and in learning. Counter-examples and Counter-analogies It struck me, as I thought about analogies I had collected from arguments and debates, that the function of analogy in arguments is often two-tiered. In arguing about what is the right conclusion for the central case at issue, a. wa.y of opposing someone else's conclusion is to argue that the central case has an analogous case, and that the analogous case (a) disproves the opponent's conclusion and (b) establishes either a hypothetical or a plausib le or even a valid counter-conclusion. It accomplishes (a) in one of two ways: either by counter-example or by counter-analogy. In the former method the analogous case is an attempt to capture the antecedent conditions in the generalization which one's opponent is assumed to be making, either because the opponent has explicitly stated the generalization or because it is marginally inferable from his or her position on the central issue. If the antecedent (or determinant or relevant event-type) describes the analogous case and this case contradicts what the other is concluding, then the effect of the analogy is to disprove the generalization by counterexample. A counter-analogy disproves the generalization in a slightly different way, by finding a determinant or relevant similarity (for the conclusion) which is not the antecedent of the generalization but which is nonetheless shared by the central and analogous cases such that the analogous case contradicts the conclusion. Clearly, if two determinants lead to different conclusions or if the same determinant has different consequences in two analogies then one's data base is inconsistent, but if the generalizations being made are merely plausible then it is easy to see how counter-examples and counter-analogies could be found in a consistent system of beliefs. This, I propose, is a lot of what is going on in arguments. Thomson's violinist analogy, for instance, is a counter-example to the generalization that any person with a right to life cannot be disconnected from a solely-capable life-sustainer at the sustainer's request. I am now satisfied that I had just been taking the generalization for granted before I read Thomson's article and that she provides good reason to reject it. Usually, one's opponent does not state a precise generalization, so one picks a generalization whose scope appears to be wide enough to be covered by the analogy and hopes that this will force a retreat. The situa- 'tional theory seems to be a help in analyzing these arguments, about which I will have more to say in the example analyses. Analogy and Memory in Thinking Because the topic of analogy has pre-occupied me for the past seven or eight months, I have often stopped myself in mid-thought realizing that I am thinking analogically . What my theory is not equipped to explain is the rapidity with which the human mind is able to call up an appropriate 51 analogous case given a new situation. A student thinks about which of his week's worth o( ideas he might tell to his advisor. Immedia.tely the student is reminded of an old saying he heard back in his photography days: • A good pbotographer is one who never shows his ba.d pictures.* A good student, then, should never reveal his bad ideas. The thought is momentary; the analogy clicks, or it does not. How the saying a.bout photographers just popped into my head, I do not know. This is the problem of searching for and matching an analogue, and it may well be that. Hume was right in holding that tbe recognition of resembling ideas is just a. case of association. My theory is aimed at explaining one's eva.luation of the analogue after it is retrieved from memory, which seems to be a separate process, taking place after matching. H, say, I have a.n overdue book at the mathematical sciences libra.ry, I tend automatically to think that I can avoid a fine up to a. week after it is due because, although I have not tested this at that parti.cular Ijbrary, I know that at Green and Meyer Libraries the overdue notices do 1l0t come out right away. Once this thought occurs to mc, I eva*luate the analogy and its conclusion. Is it reasonable to assume in this case that what holds for Meyer and Green will hold for the math library? I ponder the likelihood that the math folks send out notices by tbe same procedure as th.e other libra.ries do. My inquiry has turned to the test condition: Does the library's being a Stanford University Library determine its billing procedures? Cautiously, plausibly, I think yes. I returned the book and was not fined. Dreyfus' Theory of Skill Acquisition In a well attended lecture at the Stanford Center for the Study of Language and Information this year, Hubert Dreyfus argued that lists of if-then rules are not sufficient (or constructing systems that are truly \"expert*. 121 Instead, Dreyfus says, experts are experts in virtue of their vast accumulated experience with speci(ic examples, a.nd skill acquisition moves away from applying a.bstract rules and toward recalling particular cases. Dreyfus' example domain is chess-playing. A novice chess player, he says, knows a Cew general rules like the rules or the g9.ITle and heuristics like \"Get control of the center.* At this stage, the pla.yer has to think about what moves are possible under the rules and calculates which move to make. At the advanced beginner and intermediate levels, a.ccording to Dreyfus j the player can draw on his own rules which have been formed from experience and, more importantly, recognize playing positions similar to those that have been encountered in the past and try to apply them. By the time a player is an expert, D.reyfus says that he or she just \"sees* the right move or a very goo.d one almost ins tan tJy, based on his or her • holistic memory\" of common configurations and on some intuitive mechanism for grasping the relevant position and applying it. This theory , based partly on empirical studies of chess experts, is Dreyfus' alternative to the old idea that a true expert has evolved a set of rules wbich only need to be articulat.ed and programmed by computer scientists in order for the expertise to be duplicated. 1 suggest that one does not .have to throwaway the concept of rules in order to represent such an expert's knowledge, for the rules appear just to be getf',ing more situation-specific. Whether the specific rules are actually represented and calculaLed upon as such or just acted in accordance with in 121Dreyrus, \"From Socrates to Expert Systems: The Limits or Calculative Rationality\" (CSLI Colloquium), March 14, 1985 52 some more basic mental process is a question I cannot answer. What seems to me interesting is how the situational theory can explain the process of forming this large and specific set of rules. Perhaps a novice knows or believes a set of constraints, some determinative and some implicative. To one who is inexperienced in chess, each new situation will probably have to be calculated upon by applying constraints. But as she or he gains a wider memory of chess situations, the advanced beginner and intermediate player can make moves by analogy with past positions, using determination and relevance rules as justification. Finally, at an expert level, the player can apply a constraint to an impending move immediately because so many have been formed from earlier analogies. Determination considerations are no longer needed at this point; the player zooms in parallel on the *involves* constraint with the appropriate antecedent event-type and applies the consequent to the situation at hand. This might work for a chess program, but Dreyfus would probably argue that it is hopeless as a model of how human chess players become experts. People usually cannot recall very many specific positions from past games or articulate the antecedent conditions in the highly specific constraints I am construing. Still, I think this exercise at least demonstrates that one needn't posit some holistic mechanism to model expertise -it may just be a matter of explaining how the mind could form new, more specific rules, and the fact that past situations or rules often cannot be articulated may just be because they are known at some subconscious level. Dreyfus cites as support for his theory the fact that chess grandmasters who can usually make a good move instantly in real games must nonetheless calculate like everyone else when solving chess *puzzles\", presumably because these are problems which would rarely have occurred in the expert's past experience. This phenomenon would be expected under the situational theory because there would presumably be no constraints in one's knowledge base to cover such \"puzzle* situations as there would be for more common positions. Comparisons and Contrasts with Other Theories In part n of this essay I reviewed the types of account of ana.logy that I ha;ve identified in the literature. These included deductive, inductive, abductive, similarit.y-based, and associationist theories plus some hybrids. I see my t heory as incorporating the first three, for the most part rejecting the four th and leaving the psychological association theories as possible explanations for how an alogies are found. Since my theory allows for analogies which are either valid , hypothetical, plausible, or plausibly hypothetical, this helps to explain why cogent analogy has been looked upon variously as logically necessary, inductively plausible, or just abductively suggestive. W eitzenfeld 122 demonstrated validity for cases in which the conclusion is what I call *functionally determined\" (solved) by the similarity, but I think that this does not ac- . count for an analogies. Firstly, truth value determination (decision) also seems to be necessary, especially for test conditions. Secondly, sometimes we know that the conclusion is not fully determined by the similarity rat her than just being uIl certain about it and yet we still believe the conclusion. And thirdly, sometimes the conclusion is merely hypothetical and determines or is relevant to the similarity as opposed to the reverse. My strongest dis1220p. Cit.,Weitzenfeld,pp. 137-149 53 agreement with Weitzenfeld is that I think there is no reason to assume, as he appears to, that the determining structure for any given function is unique. 123 A Cootball player's uniform or the coach he or she plays for can either of them determine the player's team membership; neither is unique in this respect. Although my theory allows for analogies whose generalizations are merely plausible, there are some differences between my inductive Corms of analogy and inductive forms proposed by others. I hold that the relevance test condition exists in addition to projectibility in cogent analogies, so they are somewhat more justified than arbitrary single-instance inductions. Also, other theories do not admit an abductive application, as an alternative to syllogism, of the plausible generalization. Perhaps the most important thing to notice about the condition for plausible rule formation in my theory is that it merely stipulates that Borne relevant event-type must exist in the similarity or conclusion. For inductive analogy, one has the option not to infer a specific constraint but to allow the anchored conclusion to be projected to the central case based on the belief that there is a relevant event-type Bomewhere in the similarity (or conclusion, in the weak case). I therefore do not feel that the generalization step needs to be explicit, only that it be known that one is possible. I disagree with Hesse and Russell that explanatory hypotheses Crom analogies are intrinsically more believable than other hypotheses.124 For it seems to me that there is no logical reason to prefer a conclusion based on analogy to another hypothesis which is equally explanatory if the analogized conclusion is not determined either totally or plausibly by the similarity. In making it clear how such analogies entail abduction, I think my theory can explain why the analogical argument for other minds, for instance, is so logically problematic however intuitively appealing it may be. My theory does not use any similarity measure as a condition for analogical inference. A determinant or relevant similarity event-type may be very weak in the degree of similarity it represents, which is consistent with my position that strength of similarity has no direct bearing on the legitimate cogency of an analogy. Heuristically, the amount of similarity may be a good way to match initial analogues, but it does not work as a justification for conclusions. Theories based on psychological explanation may yet be necessary to account for how analogies occur to us and for the cogency of some analogies like the other minds argument, but I think the situational theory at least shows that there is a broad range of analogies whose logical justifications can be identified. The relevance-based theory of Shaw and Ashleyl2& is a relatively new type of theory, odd as that fact seems, in the game of justifying analogy. Shaw and Ashley do not give a definition of relevance in their paper or make it clear that relevance is not enough if the disanalogy is relevant also and can lead to a different conclusion by counter-analogy. But I think they had the right idea in emphasizing relevance, and now it seems that the ques- . tion is, -How much relevance is enough?123Ibid .,pp. 139-141 124See discussion under \"Theories Based on Abductive Hypothesis\" in part II or this essay 1250p. Cit.,Shaw and Ashley,pp. 415-432 54 Analyzing Analogies Philosophers of argument have often condemned the use of analogies. William Sacksteder, who does not condemn analogy, asserts that many philosophers and rhetoricians • suppose analogies to be notoriously 'illogical',* belonging • to realms in which validity is not in question: to inventive inquiry, to rerinement of exposition and teaching, or to literary grace .• 126 Irving Copi says that • no argument by analogy is ever valid* though some are very cogent,127 and M. C. Beardsley, as I noted earlier, maintains that analogy is not cogent at all. 128 I have proven that Copi was mistaken -analogies can be valid, but there is also this feeling in many, including me, that analogies can be extremely misleading despite their power to convince people. I can explain the existence oC analogies that are illegitimate; namely, they are ones in which the similarity event-type neither determines nor is relevant to the conclusion and vice versa. The question is, why would people be convinced by illegitimate analogical arguments or attach greater cogency to them than is theoretically justified? Put another way, under what circumstances can an argument by analogy be misleading! Here I believe that strength of similarity and psychological explanation can rind their rightful places in my theory. My experience indicates that, however fallacious I think it is, human beings are in fact inclined to act in accordance with the Similarity Principle, expecting further likeness when some likeness is observed. It is this tendency in human behavior which, if I would stop short of calling it the source oC all evil in the world, nonetheless seems to be responsible Cor the bad analogizing that goes on. An analogy is misleading, in short, iC the Similarity Principle predicts a conclusion which would fail the test condition or adjunct criteria for that type of analogy. Humans are endowed with two gifts. One is the ability to perceive analogies, which is intuitive, psychological, associative at a deep level and hard to explain. The other is the ability to test analogies, which is analytical, logical, and argumentative and the methods for which I have discussed. The problem is that it is too easy, without an opposition debating us, to exercise our first ability without exercising the second: mental laziness allows one to draw analogical conclusions without testing them. The Rt. Hon. Lord Wilson of Rievaulx, former Prime Minister of the United Kingdom, said last year that one of the reasons for his resignation in IQ76 was that he was *afraid of getting stale*. What he meant, he said, was that after you have been in charge for a while, 'you see new problems which look like something you've encountered before, so you do what you did then, only the new situation may be different in some way that calls for a diCferent approach.' Furthermore, he said that a fresh prime minister would handle such situations with more sensitivity to their nuances.129 However important it was to Wilson's decision, this is an interesting comment because we often think that the more experiences one has to draw upon, the better will be the decisions that emerge. Maybe the key to avoiding staleness is to remain wary of the temptation to project unjustified conclusions by analogy. 126Sacksteder, \"The Logic or Analogy \" ,Philo8ophy and Rhetoric,I,p. 234 1270p. Cit.,Copi,p. 358 1280p. Cit.,Beardsley,p. 113 129Wilson,\"The Kennedy Memorial Lecture\" (Oxford Union Society), November 30, 1984; The passage in single quotes is paraphrased. 55 Sometimes analogical thinking gives us the right answer even when we do not examine the test criteria. The alternative to concluding based on something we know may be to conclude nothing at all, that we just DON'T KNOW. This non-conclusion seems to be repugnant to humans when we have a question; it runs against our grain. So we draw an analogy, assume the conclusion it generates is right, and sometimes, perhaps often, we get lucky. The habit of leaping to analogized conclusions becomes a bit more dangerous, however, when we are judging on matters of great importance and thus are prey to arguments contrived by those who are biased. That people have the capacity to be misled by analogies, combined with the fact that arguments in favor of one or another position may cite seductive but illegitimate analogies, implies that philosophy should be of some benefit in separating good analogies from bad ones if the logical criteria are well defined. A comfortable seat in a debating chamber or in front of one's television set makes one vulnerable to arguments based on the Similarity Principle. Since I have sought to replace this common sense, but invalid, standard for drawing analogica.l inferences, I should try to apply my theory as well as the ideas about analogy that come out of it to some specific analogical arguments and to say what philosophy can tell us about these arguments. In argument, most analogies play a dual role. Prior to their role in suggesting new conclusions, they are attempts to refute some other conclusion which the arguer is opposing. Such an analogy was invoked during the famous -King and Country* debate at the Oxford Union Society in IQaa by Quinton Hogg. Speaking against the motion *That this House will in no circumstances fight for its King and Country*, 130 Hogg asked his opponents, *What would you do if you saw a man raping your wife? Would you interfere, or would you confine yourself to a polite invitation to desist? .131 Hogg had generalized the motion to something like -Pacifism is always the best policy one should never defend with force, and he had given what he saw as the most intuitively clear counter-example possible in attempting to refute it. But the analogy really suggested its own conclusion, which was that Britain's young men should be willing to fight for Britain when it is threatened. Notice that the conclusion about the central case (Britain's defense) does not follow even if one agrees that the broader generalization chosen by Hogg is refuted by the rape example. For this, Hogg would have had to show that there is a national defense situation which shares those aspects of having one's wife raped which merit force. One can imagine that the bombing of Britain by Nazi Germany would have been such an example, though perhaps an invasion of Poland would not have. In general, I think it is very important to distinguish (a) whether the generalization refuted by a given analogy is crucial to the scope of one's opposition from (b) whether the analogy establishes the conclusion being argued for in the central case. An analogy is always a counter-example to some generalization. For instance, Stephen Hellma.n of Hertford argued in a IQ84 Oxford Union debate against having nuclear weapons in Britain by as- . serting that the empirical argument that nuclear weapons have kept the peace for forty years and are therefore likely to continue doing so is *like the young man who, having fallen off the edge of the cliff, says halfway 130The motion passed, 275 to 153, which sent a shock wave throughout Britain in February or that year Hollis,The Oxford Union,pp. 186-193 131Walter,The Oxford Union: Playground of Power,p. 82 56 down, 'Well, I'm all right so far.' .132 This analogy really only shows that positive experience when one initially ha.d assumed danger does not nece&sarily prove that the experience will not wind up dangerous after all. That is thecounter-example aspect of the argument. A stronger conclusion by analogy would be that Britain under the nllclear umbrella. is deceived by its apparent success while disaster remains inevitable. As a counter-example, the a.rgument serves quite nicely, but as an analogy to nuclear defense it appears to beg the question, {OJ' the whole problem is that we just don't know whether committing to nuclear weapons is like jumping oc! a cliff or not. Furthermore, the opposition could argue that the rea.l generalization they advocate is not that results thus far are always a good predictor of results to come but that prolonged peace under a weapons system is a good indication that it prevents war. Thescope thus reduced, a new analogy would be needed in order to refute the generalization deemed crucial by the opposition. An example of a counter-analogy was provided by a speaker in the fll'st Oxford Union debat.e I attended. Nicholas Prettejohn, arguing against -This House believes that sexual freedom leads to ruin*, responded to claims that such freedom is responsible for violence and disease by saying that one seldom hears, in Britain, arguments that other freedoms, like political freedom and the ffa dom of movement, which are also demonstrably linked to violence and the spread of disease, but are not themselves the causes of these, should therefore be abridged.133 That freedom of movement, say, shares with sexual freedom the properties of leading to violence and disease, and is not considered abrldgea.ble, provides a case analogous to the central case in which the conclusion thal freedom should be held responsible is refuted. This is a counter-example to the generalization that freedoms which allow violence and disease are therefore responsible (or these, but if the generalization is just that sexual freedom which allows violence and disease is responsible for them then the argument is a counter-analogy -it assumes that a freedom which does not specifically protect against the spread o( violence and disease but also does not cause these is a determinant for whether or not the freedom is responsible, and it concludes that the cases of freedom of movement and political freedom anchor the polarity of -is responsible forto *nofor the central case. In the above example, the conclusion by analogy and the conclusion it attempts to refute are polar opposites. This should be the case whenever the issue (or debate is a yes or no question. Thus Thomson's violinist analogy argues, for instance, not only that disconnecting another person is not always impermissible but also that abortion is permissible in the case of rape. The stronger conclusion succeeds if the antecedent of the generalization being refuted is a determinant in that case the analogous case is both a counter-example (counter-analogy) and a way to establish a definite result, that not only does the conclusion not necessarily hold for all such cases but that it specifically does not hold in the central case. In other counter- . examples, the analogous case may establish that a generalization is false without establishing the specific conclusion being argued, as in the analogy from the King and Country debate cited earlier. 132Hellman proposing the motion \"This house calls for a non-nuclear defence policy for Britain\" (Oxford Union Society), November 27, 1984 133prettejohn speaking sixth in opposition to \"This House believes that sexual heedom leads to ruin\" (Oxford Union Society), October 12, 1984 57 Analogies in political and ethical debates tend to have this refutational character. But in some types of analogical argument, the generalization being argued for is much more difficult to identify. These arguments rely on a perceived isomorphism between the analogues which is very complex. For instance, if one were to ask what it is about the similarity between rats a.nd people that allows substances which cause cancer in rats to be assumed carcinogenic for humans, one would probably have a difficult time enumerating the determinant. Thomas Reid argued that because of the similarities between the earth and other planets like Mars and Venus (each gets its light from the sun, rotates on its axis, etc.), one might assume that the other planets could have -living creatures like the earth does.134 We know now that they probably do not (largely from having visited the moon and having probed Mars and Venus) and that the similarity between this world and the others does not seem to include a determinant for life as we know it. For other analogies, the verdict is not in yet. One of the most interesting posited isomorphisms in recent years is the analogy between computers and brains, which may allow us to conclude that digital silicon machines can have intentionality. I do not plan to resolve this debate here, but only to formula.te it somewhat within my theory of analogy. Human beings can understand discourse at a. very deep level we know what the words mean. I would like to bypass distinctions like that between external and internal meaning and to assume that for a computer to have intent ionaljty means that it would have essentially the same understanding capabilities that I ha,ve. The test condition for concluding that this is possible in computers is whether the similarjty between brains and computers could ever contain a sufficient condition for human-type understanding. It seems to me that there are t hree possibilities for the determinant. At its most portable level, the requirement for thought would be a software requirement: a. thing understands iC it demonstrates enough flexibility in manipUlating symbols, attaching them to objects, and so Corth. At this level, a computer made oC silicon could do human-type thinking if it were programmed correctly -the conditions for thought at this level are mediumindependent. At the opposHe extreme, one might hold tha.t nothing ca.n think unless it has a soul; minds are not just brains but are something magical and perhaps can only be made by God or produced naturally. In between these two views is the position or philosophers such as John Searle, who argues that mental processes like understanding are fundamentally biologica\\.13& One of Searle's comments sparks me to draw the following a.nalogy. Suppose we wanted to make a machine that could do digestion. This process goes on in humans as an elaborate exchange of molecules through the membranes of cells and involves chemical breakdown and synthesis. To do digestion in silicon or gallium arsenide, one would have to implement an analogous low-level chemical process allowing food material like chocolate and lettuce, but not shoe leather or book bindings, to be partially incorpora.ted into the material of the machine and partially excreted. This is what digestion is . Maybe mental activity has this low-level character . too, so that it would be impossible to implement the necessary conditions for thought in silicon. On the other hand, perhaps thinking is exactly coincident with the activity (digital computation) that goes on in present134Reid , Tbomas,E88aY8 on the Intellectual Powers 0/ Man (Essay I, Cbapter 4), cited in Op. Cit.,Copi,p. 352 135Searle,Minds, Brains, and Science,pp. 28-41 58 technology computers. Perhaps analog computation is required but beyond that there is no physical requirement. 136 Or maybe thinking is beyond material specification altogether. These are the main possibilities as I see them. What is at issue is the scope of the determinant (materialindependent, material-dependent, or extra-material) which will make the conclusion by analogy valid if and only if human-type intentionality does not require something lying outside the similarity assumed to exist between computers and brains. I would class those whom Daniel Dennett calls I computationalists I as believing in the material-independent determinant, • holists* as believers in extra-material requirements, and • connectionists I as believing in material dependence. 137 The most commonly debated analogical arguments in philosophy are abductive: the conclusion, if true, would help to explain observed effects and is therefore accepted as their most probable cause or explanation. The problem arises when more than one hypothesis is consistent with what is observed. In particular, two questions to which arguments by analogy have been applied are the problem of other minds and the question of God's existence. I have discussed the analogical argument for other minds at various points already. C. W. K. MundIe has criticized philosophers for not paying enough attention to this argument, and he concludes his Critique of Linguistic Philosophy wit.h a formulation of the basic argument: \"I shall end with the challenge to identify the fallacy, if there is one, in arguing as follows: In my own case, SI Isome specific kind of stimulus] is always or usually followed by Ml Isome specific kind of mental act or process], Ml is always or usually followed by Bl Isome specific kind of bodily behaviour] and/or Bl is always or usually preceded byMl; John Doe reacted to SI with behaviour Bl, so in view of the many similarities between us, anatomical, cultural, etc., there is some degree of probability that in John Doe SI and Bl were mediated by Ml. 1 138 I take it as given that this argument has abductive legitimacy, which only gives it the status of generating a hypothesis. MundIe seems to be going further, saying that the similarity between another person and me contains a determinant for whether or not Ml follows SI. Actually, he asserts only that the existence of the determinant is probable \"in some degree I , but I do not know what this means so I will just treat the conclusion as definite. The problem in trying to make the conclusion by analogy sound is just that the known similarity does not include a determinant for mental activity. We cannot know what it is like to experience someone else's thoughts without privileged access to those thoughts, and so without a determinant in the similarity, my answer to MundIe's challenge would be that the fallacy in the argument is that it relies on the Similarity Principle. Nothing follows from the fact that others are like me in observed respects -that could all be part .of the wicked conspirator's (or my mind's) plan. In fact, we don't even 136Smith, \"Is Computation Formal?\" (Stanford Philosophy Department Colloquium), May 24, 1985 137Dennett,\"Computer Models and the Mind a view from the East Pole\" ,Timu Literary Supplement,Dec. 14, 1984 138Mundle,A Critique 0/ Linguistic Philosophy,p. 277 know whether any of these observed anatomical similarities are even relevant to mental activity, so I am afraid that the argument by analogy for other minds is destined to remain non-sound and implausible. There must be some reason why we believe in other minds; I agree with A. M. Turing that the idea that everyone thinks is a • polite convention - .1311 The convention is appealing and convenient, and these appear to be the motivation for accepting it. Of equal philosophical importance is the argument by analogy for the existence of God, expressed as the argument from design by Hume in his Dialogue8,140 and earlier -in the general scholium to Sir Isaac Newton's Principia Mathematica - .141 Hume's theist debator Cleanthes expounded it in the Dialogue8: -Look round the world : Contemplate the whole and every part of it: You will find it to be nothing bu one great machine, subdivided into an infinite number or lesser machines, which a.gain admit of subdivisions to a degree beyond what human senses and faculties can trace and explain. All these various machines, and even their most minute parts, are adjusted to each other with an accuracy which ravishes into admiration all men who ever contemplated them. The curious adapting of means to ends, the productions of human contrivance; of human design, thought, wisdom, and intelligence. Since therefore the effects resemble each other, we are led to infer, by all the rules of analogy, that the causes also resemble, and that the Author of Nature is somewhat similar to the mind of man, though possessed of much larger faculties, proportioned to the grandeur of the work which he has executed. By this argument, a posteriori, and by this argument alone, do we prove at once the existence of a Deity and his similarity to human mind and intelligence .• 142 The odd thing about the Dialogues, for many, is that Cleanthes' opponent Philo, a skeptic like Hume, in tbe end concedes -That tbe cause or causes of order in the universe probably bear some remote analogy to human intelligence. _143 To me, the argument from design differs from the argument by analogy for otber minds in that no one has come up witb an alternative to Philo's conclusion whicb has its explanatory power. One can say that what causes universes just isn't known, but Cleanthes offers a possibility we can understand. One can say that tbe universe is more like a tree than a machine, but concluding that no one designed the machine by analogy with the tree is still begging the question because we don't know whether or not the tree has a designer. The claim that a universe could create itself cannot be disproved, but the idea lacks an intuitive analogous case as far as we know. So the argument from design is an abductive analogy whose hypothesis is not strictly valid but to which an equally comprehensible alter- . 139Turing,\"Computing Machinery and Intelligence\", in Op. Cit. ,Horstadter and Dennett,p . 60 140Hume ,Dialogue8 Concerning Natural Religion and the P08thumou8 E88aY8 141Popkin, \"Editor's Introduction\" ,Ibid .,p. x 142Hume,Ibid .,p. 15 143Hume, quoted by Popkin, Ibid .,p. xiii 60 native has not been found. It seems to me that skepticism a.bout God's existence is based not so much on the non-determination of the similarity in th e argument as in observations which its hypothesis has a hard time explaining, e.g. Why would a Deity create evil, allow suffering, etc.? In the sciences, analogies are often abductive also a.nd, like Cleanthes' argument, have only one currently defined explanatory hypothesis, but the hypothesis is usually accepted unless there are observations it does not explain. Perhaps this is an adjunct requirement which is needed for good abductive analogies to be convincing. When an abductive analogy without competing alternatives is unable to meet this addltional requirement, new theories are sought, but consistent new theories in science appear much easier to come by than ones for explailling how the order of the universe came to be. Hume was skeptical not only abou t proofs but also about disproofs. 144 So my interpretation would be that Philo's grudging acceptance of the weak, \"ambiguous* hypothesis is a response to the lack of apparent alternatives, but that tbere is, in his earlier denial that I.he causes of the universe are knowable, the lurking suspicion that the alterna.tive is out there somewhere, inconceivable to us because it has, in our world, no analogue. 144Popkin,Ibid.,p. xiv 61 v. Conclusion What I do not have is a theory that will yield the same analysis of a given analogy from every analyst. I am aware, for instance, that Prettejohn's freedom analogy could be analyzed as a counter-example instead of as a counter-analogy, and that the argument for other minds might be classed as weakly inductive instead of purely abductive. But I think that my theory of analogy does have some fairly clear consequences, which might be enumerated as follows: 1. Treating analogy as a single form of argument and making global statements about its value should be seen to be untenable. Analogies run the gamut from logically valid to completely illegitimate. 2. There is good reason to seek novel analogues which may have less a priori similarity with the central case than others have. Creative thinking involves the discovery of such novel analogies rather than just looking for the most similar analogous case and projecting a conclusion. Since determination and relevance are what are important, an analogous case can be very dissimilar to the central case and still provide useful conclusions. 3. There is good reason to develop the critical thinking abilities needed to recognize when our natural acceptance of the Similarity Principle may be misleading us. A recognition that this principle has no validity is a good first step. And, 4. Analogy has a unique, non-redundant function in logical problem-solving. When one knows a determination rule, one can examine a case analogous to that being worked on and conclude an implication rule at some level of legitimacy. Relative to traditional implication rules, determination constraints lessen the informational detail needed in order to infer specific-case results. The best way to test how useful this is would probably be to implement the situational theory in a computer program. The computer could then be experimented upon, i.e. given an analogy and asked whether the analogy has any cogency. Such results could be compared to those produced by human beings who are asked the same questions. Experiments might also help in discovering whether or not -dyadic similarity is crucial to the understanding of analogies. This, it might be recalled, is a level of equivalence that is really beyond analysis. I have so far assumed that a similarity can always be summarized as an identity of certain relations, but William James argued against this, saying, - ... any theory which would base likeness on identity, and not rather identity on likeness, must fail. It is supposed perhaps, by most people, that two resembling things owe their resemblance to their absolute identity in respect of some attribute or attributes combined with the absolute non-identity of the rest of their being. This, which may be true of compound things, breaks down when we come to simple impressions. _145 One may imagine examples in which two terms might seem similar to us without being explicably similar, e.g. James's example of -blotting paper 145 James, WiIliam,Principles 0/ Psychology (London: Macmillan and Co., 1Sgl),!,pp. 532-533, cited io Op. Cit.,Myers,p. 327 62 voices*, two musical tones,146 and word pairs like 'up' and 'good' which are similar in connotation.147 The real question is whether this primitive level of similarity can be coded in a symbolic processing machine. While inferences cannot be justified solely on tIte basis of similarity, discovering similarity is crucial to the generation of testable analogies. For this reason, the study of similarity and of the analogy of being is a necessary step in defining a complete theory of analogy whlch I have not taken. The limitations of univocal predication may require a more elaborate form of semantic inference than symbolic implication, and the use of analog computing and analogue representations would surely require a clearer notion of the role of association in similarity cognition.148 There are many additional aspects of analogical inference which I have not kad the time to explore. These would include tidying up the adjunct erit ria for inductive and abductive a.nalogy. Implementation of the theory would require algorithms for managing the complexity problems in similarity searches and matchlng, constraint chaining, contradiction cItecking and the like. The cogency of an inductive analogy cannot be determined 8.S the theory stands because there is no measure of how relevant each part of a determinant is to the conclusion. Finally, I have llot investiga.ted how people discover, or how machines should infer, determination constraints -an ability which is clearly needed if a person or machine is to learn on his, her, or its own. But that is a problem for another day and an untired mind. 146Myers, Ibid.,p. 326 147This last example is from Professor David Wellbery, who mentioned it at my senior thesis colloquy 148See Evans,The Varieties of Reference,pp. 292-294, for a discussion of the philosophy of similarity in reference; and Funt,\" Analogical Modes of Reasoning and Process Modeling\" ,IEEE Computer,October 1983,pp. 99-104 on analogue representation, perception, and parallel processing 63 Acknowledgements A great many people helped me, on both sides of the Atlantic, as I was researching and putting together this thesis. I would especially like to thank Professor and Mrs. James Urmson for welcoming me into their home in Cumnor on numerous occasions during the autumn. I think Edwin Good put it best when he remarked that getting Professor Urmson to tutor me in Oxford amounted to *pure luck*. I would also like to thank Professors Good and David Wellbery for their comments at my colloquy; Marsh McCall, Jr. for tutoring me in classical rhetoric despite being swamped as the chairman of classics at Stanford; and Doug Edwards, Russ Greiner, Jeff Lang, Paul Filseth, Bryn Ekroot, Anne Gardner, Jerry Hobbs, David Israel, Stan Rosenschein, and Paul Rosenbloom for helpful discussions. Stuart Russell and David Helman each read through earlier drafts, and I am very grateful for their comments and corrections as well as for the hours of their time which they gave to me in discussing this work. Finally, I would like to thank my advisor, John Perry, who was never too busy to squeeze me in between the hosts of others wanting to see him and spent many hours with me during the year over which this project ranged. If there is one thing I have learned in five years at Stanford it is how to pick a tutor. Works Consulted Achinstein, Peter. -Models, Analogies and Theories-, Philosophy of Science, 1964 (Volume 31), pp. 328-350 Achinstein, Peter. -Variety and Analogy in Confirmation Theory-, Philosophy of Science, Hl63 (Volume 30), pp. 207-221 Agassi, Joseph. -Discussion: Analogies as Generalizations-, Philosophy of Science, Hl64 (Volume 31), pp. 351-356 Anderson, James F. Reflections on the Analogy of Being. The Hague: Martinus Nijhoff, Hl67 Anderson, R. O. -Conclusive Analogical Argument-, Revue Internationale de Philosophie, 1969 (Volume 23), pp. 44-57 Anttila, Raimo. Analogy. New York: Mouton Publishers, 1977 Anttila, Raimo and Warren A. Brewer. Analogy: A Basic Bibliography. Amsterdam: John Benjamins B.V., 1977 Aristotle; John Henry Freese, translator. The WArt W of Rhetoric. Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, 1925 Aristot.1E'; Hugh TredE'nnick, translator. *Prior Analytics*, The Organon I. Ca.mbridge, MA: Harvard University Press, 1938 Austin, J. L.; J. O. Urmson and G. J. Warnock, editors. Philosophical Papers. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1979 Avramides, Anita. -Understanding the Gricean Account of Meaning-. Wolfson Philosophy Society Meeting, Oxford, November 20, 1984 Ayer, A. J. Philosophy in the Twentieth Century. New York: Vintage Books, 1982 Barwise, Jon and John Perry. -Shifting Situations and Shaken Attitudes-. Stanford Center for the Study of Language and Information Report No. CSLI-84-13, August 1984 Barwise, Jon and John Perry. Situations and Attitudes. London: MIT Press, 1983 Beardsley, M. C. Thinking Straight. Englewood Cliffs, NJ: Prentice-Hall Inc., 1975 Black,Max. Models and Metaphor8. Ithaca: Cornell University Press, 1962 Bochenshki, I. M. *On Analogy*, The Thomist, 1948 (Volume 11), pp. 424-447 Braithwaite, Richard Bevan. Scientific Explanation. Cambridge, UK: Cambridge University Press, 1959 *Burrell, David Bakewell. Analogy and Philosophical Language. New Haven: Y31e University Press, Hl73 Burstein, Mark H. • A Model of Incremental Analogical Reasoning and Debugging*, in Proceedings of the National Conference on Artificial Intelligence (AAAI-88). Menlo Park, CA: American Association for Artificial Intelligence, 1983, pp. 45-48 65 Carbonell, Jaime G. -A Computational Model of Analogical Problem Solving*, in Proceeding8 of the Seventh International Joint Conference on Artificial Intelligence (IJCAI-81). Menlo Park, CA: American Association for Artificial Intelligence, 11)81, Volume 1, pp. 147-152 Carbonell, Jaime G. *Derivational Analogy and its Role in Problem Solving*, in Proceedings of the National Conference on Artificial Intelligence (AAAI-89). Menlo Park, CA: American Association for Artificial Intelligence, lQ83, pp. 64-61) Carnap, Rudolf. • Discussion: Variety, Analogy, and Periodicity in Inductive Logic*, Philosophy of Science, 11)63 (Volume 30), pp . 222-227 Carnap, Rudolf. Logical Foundations of Probability. Chicago: University of Chicago Press, Ig63 Carney, James Donald and Richard K. Scheer. Fundamentals of Logic. New York: Macmillan Publishing Co., Inc., 11)74 Chappell, U. C., editor. Hume. Garden City, NY: Anchor Books, 11)66 Chul'chlalld, Paul M. Matter and Consciousness: A Contemporary Introduction to the Philosophy of Mind. Cambridge, MA: MIT Press, 11)84 Cohen, L. Jonathan. The Implications of Induction. London: Methuen & Co Ltd, 11)70 Cohen, Morris R. and Ernest Nagel. An Introduction to Logic and Scientific Method. New York: Harcourt, Brace and Company, 11)34 Constantini, Domenico. -Analogy by Similarity*, Erkenntnis, 11)83 (Volume 20), pp. 103-114 Copi, Irving M. Introduction to Logic. New York: The Macmillan Company, 11)72 Cousins, Adrian. -Recognition and Similarity*. Wolfson Philosophy Society Meeting, Oxford, December 11, 11)84 Curtis, Helena. Biology. New York: Worth Publishers Inc., 11)83 Davidson, Donald. *How Do I Know What I Think?*. First Gareth Evans Memorial Lecture, Oxford, October 30, 11)84 Davidson, Donald. *What Metaphors Mean*, Inquiries into Truth and Interpretation. New York: Oxford University Press, 11)84, pp. 245-264 Dennett, Daniel C. • Computer Models and the Mind -a view from the East Pole*, The Times Literary Supplement, December 14, HJ84 Dennett, Daniel C. and Douglas R. Hofstadter, arrangers and composers. The A-find's I: Fantasies and Reflections on Self and Soul. New York: Bantam Books, Inc., Ig81 66 Dorrough, Douglas C. \"A Logical Calculus of Analogy Involving Functions of Order 2\", Notre Dame Journal of Formal Logic, July IQ70 (Volume 11, Number 3), pp. 321-336 Dreyfus, Hubert. \"From Socrates to Expert Systems: The Limits of Calculative Rationality\". CSLI Colloquium, Stanford, March 14, IQ85 Esper, Erwin A. Analogy and Association in Linguistics and Psychology. Athens, GA: University of Georgia Press, IQn Evans, Gareth. The Varieties of Reference. New York: Oxford University Press, IQ82 Fearnside, W. Ward. About Thinking. Englewood Cliffs, NJ: Prentice-Hall, Inc., lQ80 Fearnside, W. Ward. and William B. Holther. Fallacy: The Counterfeit of Argument. Englewood Cliffs, NJ: Prentice-Hall, Inc., IQ5Q Funt, Brian V. • Analogical Modes of Reasoning and Process Modeling\", IEEE Computer, October IQ83, pp. QQ-I04 Genesereth, Michael And Nils Nilsson. Fundamentals of Artificial Intelligence. Unpublished Manuscript, Jan. 13, IQ85 Gcncsereth, Michael R. \"Metaphors and Models\", in Proceedings of the National Conference on Artificial Intelligence (AAAI-BO). Menlo Park, CA: American Association for Artificial Intelligence, IQ80, pp. 208-211 Gick, Mary L. and Keith J. Holyoak. \"Schema Induction and Analogical Transfer\", Cognitive Psychology, IQ83 (Volume 15), pp. 1-38 Goodman, Nelson. Fact, Fiction and Forecast. Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, IQ83 Hendel, Charles W. Studies in the Phil080phy of David Hume. Indianapolis: The Bobbs-Merrill Company, Inc., IQ63 Hesse, Mary. \"Analogy and Confirmation Theory\", Philosophy of Science, IQ64 (Volume 31), pp. 31Q-327 Hesse, Mary B. Models and Analogies in Science. Notre Dame: University of Notre Dame Press, IQ66 Hodges, Wilfred. Logic. Harmondsworth, UK: Penguin Books, IQ77 Hofstadter, Douglas R. Codel, Escher, Bach: An Eternal Golden Braid. New York: Vintage Books, IQ80 Hofstadter, Douglas R. \"Metamagical Themas: How might analogy, the core of human thinking, be understood by computers?\", Scientific American, September IQ8l, pp. 18-30 Hollis , Christopher. The Oxford Union. London: Evans Brothers Limited, IQ65 Hume, David; Richard H. Popkin, editor. Dialogues Concerning Natural Religion and the Posthumous Essays. Indianapolis: Hacket Publishing Company, IQ80 Hume, David. A Treatise of Human Nature. Oxford: The Clarendon Press, H)60 67 Israel, David J. \"The Role of Logic in Knowledge Representation\", IEEE Computer, October 1983, pp. 37-41 Joseph, H. W. B. An Introduction to Logic. Oxford: The Clarendon Press, 1957 Kahane, Howard. Logic and Contemporary Rhetoric. Belmont, CA: Wadsworth, Inc., 1980 Keynes, John Maynard. A Treati8e on Probability. London: Macmillan &, Co Ltd, 1957 Kling, Robert E. \"A Paradigm for Reasoning by Analogy\", Artificial Intelligence, 1971 (Volume 2), pp. 147-178 Kneale, William. Probability and Induction. Oxford: The Clarendon Press, 1963 Kuipers, Theo A. F. \"Two Types of Inductive Analogy by Similarity\", Erkenntnis, 1984 (Volume 21), pp. 63-88 Kyburg, Henry E., Jr. Probability and the Logic of Rational Belief. Middletown, CT: Wesleyen University Press, 1961 Laird, John. Hume '8 Philosophy of Human Nature. Oxford: Archon Books, 1967 Laing, B. M. David Hume. New York: Russell &, Russell, 1968 Leblanc, Hugues. • A Rationale for Analogical Inference\", Phil080phical Studies, 1969 (Volume 20) pp. 29-31 Leech, Geoffrey. Semantics: The Study of Meaning. Harmondsworth, UK: Penguin Books, 1981 Lewis, Charlton T. and Charles Short. A Latin Dictionary: Founded on Andrews' Edition of Freund's Latin Dictionary. Oxford: The Clarendon Press, 1975 Liddell, Henry George and Robert Scott, et. al. A Greek-English Lexicon Oxford: The Clarendon Press, 1966 Lloyd, G. E. R. Polarity and Analogy: Two Type8 of Argumentation in Early Greek Thought. New York: Cambridge University Press, 1966 Lyttkens, Hampus. The Analogy Between God and the World: An Investigation of its Background and Interpretation of its U8e by Thomas of Aquino. Uppsala: Almqvist &, Wiksells Boktryckeri AB, 1952 MacDonald, Margaret. \"The Philosopher's Use of Analogy\", in Antony Flew, editor. Logic and Language. Garden City, NY: Anchor Books, 1965, pp. 85-106 MacNabb, D. G. C. David Hume: His Theory of Knowledge and Morality. Oxford: Basil Blackwell, 1966 Magee, Bryan. Men of Ideas: Some Contemporary Creator8 of Phil080phy. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1978 Mcinerny, Ralph. Studie8 in Analogy. The Hague: Martinus Nijhoff, 1968 68 McKerrow, Ray E., editor. Exploration8 in Rhetoric: Studies in Memory of Dougla8 Ehninger. Glenview, ll..: Scott, Foresman and Company, 1982 Measell, James S. *Classical Bases of the Concept of Analogy*, Journal of the American Foren8ic AS80ciation, 1973 (Volume 10), pp. 1-10 Mill, John Stuart. A SY8tem of Logic. New York: Harper & Brothers Publishers, 1900 Miller, Jonathan, editor. State8 of Mind: Conversation8 with P8ychological Investigator8. London: British Broadcasting Corporation, 1983 Montague, Richard; Richard H. Thomason, editor. Formal Philosophy. New Haven: Yale University Press, 1974 MundIe, C. W. K. A Critique of Lingui8tic Philosophy, with Second Thoughts -an Epilogue after Ten Year8. London: Glover and Blair Limited, 1979 Myers, Charles M.* Inexplicable Analogies*, Phil080phy and Phenomenological Research, March 1962 (Volume 22, Number 3), pp. 326-333 Nagel, Ernest. The Structure of Science. New York: Harcourt, Brace & World, HJ61 Niiniluoto, Ilkka. • Analogy and Inductive Logic*, Erkenntnis, 1981 (Volume 16), pp. 1-34 Niiniluoto, Ilkka. • Analogy, Transitivity, and the Confirmation of Theories*, in L. Jonathan Cohen and Mary Hesse, editors. Application8 of Inductive Logic: Proceeding8 of a Conference at The Queen8 Col/ege, Oxford, 21-24 August 1 {J78. Oxford: The Clarendon Press, 1980 Norton, David Fate. David Hume: Common Sen8e Morali8t, Sceptical Metaphysician. Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1982 Ortony, Andrew, editor. Metaphor and Thought. New York: Cambridge University Press, 1979 Papineau, David. • Probabilities and Causes*, Journal of Philosophy, February 1985 (Volume 82, Number 2), pp. 57-74 Perelman, Ch. and L. Olbrechts-Tyteca. The New Rhetoric: A Treatise on Argumentation. London: University of Notre Dame Press, 1969 Perrin, Porter G. Writer's Guide and Index to English . Dallas: Scott, Foresman and Company, 1942 Pietarinen, Juhani. • Lawlikeness, Analogy and Inductive Logic*, Acta Philosophica Fennica , H172 (Volume 26), whole issue Pollock, John L. • A Solution to the Problem of Induction*, NOUS, 1984 (Volume 18), pp. 423-461 Polya, George. Induction and Analogy in Mathematics, Volume 1 of Mathematic8 and Plausible Reasoning. Princeton: Princeton University Press, HJ54 6Q Price, H. H. Thinking and Experience. Cambridge, MA.: Harvard University Press, lQ62 Pylyshyn, Zenon W. Computation and Cognition: Toward a Foundation for Cognitive Science. Cambridge, MA.: MIT Press, lQ84 Quine, Willard van Orman. The Roots of Reference. La Salle, IL: Open Court Publishing Co., lQ74 Quine, W. V. and J. S. Ullian. The Web of Belief. New York: Random House, lQ70 Reitman, Walter R. Cognition and Thought: An Information Processing Approach. New York: John Wiley & Sons, Inc., lQ65 Rescher, Nicholas. Introduction to Logic. New York: St Martin's Press, lQ64 Rich, Elaine. Artificial Intelligence. San Francisco: McGraw-Hill Book Company, lQ83 Rissland, Edwina. Hypothetical Examples in Legal Reasoning. Computers and Law Seminar, Stanford Law School, March 13, lQ85 Ross, J. F. Portraying Analogy. New York: Cambridge University Press, lQ81 R.oss, Raymond S. Persuasion: Communication and Interpersonal Relations. Englewood Cliffs, NJ: Prentice-Hall, Inc., lQ74 Russell, Bertrand. Human Knowledge: Its Scope and Limits. New York: Simon and Schuster, lQ48 Sacksteder, William. -Analogy: Justification for Logic-, Philosophy and Rhetoric, lQ7Q (Volume 12, Number 1), pp. 21-40 Sacksteder, William. -The Logic of Analogy-, Philosophy and Rhetoric, lQ74 (Volume 7, Number 4), pp. 234-252 Scriven, Michael. Reasoning. New York: McGraw-Hill, Inc., lQ76 Searle, John. Minds, Brains and Science. Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, lQ84 Shaw, William H. and L. R. Ashley. -Analogy and Inference-, Dialogue: Canadian Journal of Philosophy, lQ83 (Volume 22), pp. 415-432 Sloman, Aaron. The Computer Revolution in Philosophy: Philosophy, Science, and Models of Mind. Hassocks, UK: The Harvester Press Limited, lQ78 Smith, Brian. -Is Computation Forman-. Philosophy Department Colloquium, Stanford, May 24, lQ85 Smith, Norman Kemp. The Philosophy of David Hume: A Critical Study of Its Origins and Central Doctrines. London: Macmillan and Co., Limited, lQ41 Solomon, Robert C. Introducing Philosophy: Problems and Perspectives. San Diego: Harcourt, Brace, Jovanovich, Inc., lQ81 Spohn, Wolfgang. -Analogy and Inductive Logic: A Note on Niiniluoto-, Erkenntnis, lQ81 (Volume 16), pp. 35-52 70 Sternberg, R. J. Intelligence, Information Processing and Analogical Reasoning: The Componential Analysis of Human Abilities. Hillsdale, NJ: La.urence Erlbaum Associates, 1977 Swinburne, Richard. The Justification of Induction. New York: Oxford University Press, 1974 Thibadeau, Robert. \"Reaching for an Understanding about Analogy\". Rutgers Department of Computer Science Report No. DCSTM-8, May 1977 \"This House believes that sexual freedom leads to ruin\". Oxford Union Society Debate, Oxford, October 12, 1984 \"This House calls for a non-nuclear defence policy for Britain\". Oxford Union Society Debate, Oxford, November 27, Hl84 Thomson, J. J. • A Defense of Abortion\", Philosophy and Public Affairs, Fall 1971 (Volume 1), pp. 47-66 Trusted, Jennifer. The Logic of Scientific Inference: An Introduction. Basingstoke, UK: Macmillan Press, 1979 Turing, A. M. • Computing Machinery and Intelligence*, in Daniel C. Dennett and Douglas R. Hofstadter, a.rrangers and composers. The Mind's I: Fantasies and Reflections on Self and Soul. New York: Bantam Books, Inc., 1981 Tversky, Amos. \"Features of Similarity\", Psychological Review, July 1977 (Volume 84, Number 4), pp. 327-352 Urmson, J. O. *The History of Philosophical Analysis* in Richard Rorty, editor. The Linguistic Turn . Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1975, pp. 294-301 von Wright, George Henrik. A Treatise on Induction and Probability. Patterson, NJ: Littlefield, Adams & Co., 1960 Walter, David. The Oxford Union: Playground of Power. London: MacDonald & Co (Publishers) Ltd, 1984 Weitzenfeld, Julian S. *Valid Reasoning by Analogy*, Philosophy of Science, 1984 (Volume 51), pp. 137-149 Wilcox, James R. and H. L. Ewbank. *Analogy for Rhetors*, Philosophy and Rhetoric, 1979 (Volume 12, Number 1), pp. 1-20 Wilson, Harold. The Kennedy Memorial Lecture. Oxford Union Society, Oxford, November 30, 1984 Wilson, P. R. *On the Argument by Analogy*, Philosophy of Science, 1964 (Volume 31), pp. 34-39 Winston, Patrick H. \"Learning and Reasoning by Analogy*, Communications of the Association for Computing Machinery, December H)80 (Volume 23, Number 12), pp. 689-703 Wittgenstein, Ludwig; G. E. M. Anscombe, translator. Philosophical Investigations. New York: The Macmillan Company,\n\nI J"}
{"meta": {"title": "Anthropocene, Capitalocene, Machinocene: Illusions of instrumental reason", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Slijepcevic, Predrag", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "In their seminal work, Dialectics of Enlightenment, Horkheimer and Adorno interpreted capitalism as the irrational monetization of nature. In the present work, I analyze three 21st century concepts, Anthropocene, Capitalocene and Machinocene, in light of Horkheimer and Adorno’s arguments and recent arguments from the philosophy of biology. The analysis reveals a remarkable prescience of the term “instrumental reason”, which is present in each of the three concepts in a profound and cryptic way. In my interpretation, the term describes the propensity of science based on the notion of physicalism to interpret nature as the machine analyzable and programmable by the human reason. As a result, the Anthropocene concept is built around the mechanicist model, which may be presented as the metaphor of the car without brakes. In a similar fashion, the Machinocene concept predicts the emergence of the mechanical mind, which will dominate nature in the near future. Finally, the Capitalocene concept turns a perfectly rational ambition to expand knowledge into an irrational obsession with over-knowledge, by employing the institutionalized science as the engine of capitalism without brakes. The common denominator of all three concepts is the irrational propensity to legitimize self-destruction. Potential avenues for countering the effects of “instrumental reason” are suggested.", "date": "2019", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/SLIACM", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2020-09-16T09:41:59Z"}, "text": "Predrag Slijepčević ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE: ILLUSIONS OF INSTRUMENTAL REASON ABSTRACT In their seminal work, Dialectics of Enlightenment, Horkheimer and Adorno interpreted capitalism as the irrational monetization of nature. In the present work, I analyze three 21st century concepts, Anthropocene, Capitalocene and Machinocene, in light of Horkheimer and Adorno's arguments and recent arguments from the philosophy of biology. The analysis reveals a remarkable prescience of the term \"instrumental reason\", which is present in each of the three concepts in a profound and cryptic way. In my interpretation, the term describes the propensity of science based on the notion of physicalism to interpret nature as the machine analyzable and programmable by the human reason. As a result, the Anthropocene concept is built around the mechanicist model, which may be presented as the metaphor of the car without brakes. In a similar fashion, the Machinocene concept predicts the emergence of the mechanical mind, which will dominate nature in the near future. Finally, the Capitalocene concept turns a perfectly rational ambition to expand knowledge into an irrational obsession with over-knowledge, by employing the institutionalized science as the engine of capitalism without brakes. The common denominator of all three concepts is the irrational propensity to legitimize self-destruction. Potential avenues for countering the effects of \"instrumental reason\" are suggested. The melancholy science from which I make this offering to my friend relates to a region that from time immemorial was regarded as the true field of philosophy, but which, since the latter's conversion into method, has lapsed into intellectual neglect, sententious whimsy and finally oblivion: the teaching of the good life... Our perspective of life has passed into an ideology which conceals the fact that there is life no longer. (Adorno 2005: 15) 1. Introduction Is it possible to analyze capitalism in light of biology? Provided that the question is understood as a philosophical question, a positive answer to it is identifiable in the works of the first generation philosophers of the Frankfurt School. In Dialectics of Enlightenment (DE) Max Horkheimer and Theodor Adorno interpreted KEYWORDS Instrumental reason, Anthropocene, Machinocene, Capitalocene UDK: 004.896 https://doi.org/10.2298/FID1904543S Original Scientific Article Received: 03.05.2019. Accepted: 18.07.2019. PHILOSOPHY AND SOCIETY VOL. 30, NO. 4, 463–644 Predrag Slijepčević: Senior Lecturer, Department of Life Sciences, College of Health and Life Sciences, Brunel University, London; Predrag.slijepcevic@brunel.ac.uk. ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE544 │ Predrag SlijePčević capitalism as an irrational monetization of nature (Horkheimer and Adorno 2002). Here is a metaphor, which explains the relationship between capitalism and nature in the manner close to the Adorno-Horkheimer style of thinking. Let us imagine that capitalism represents a form of a car. The driver of the car is the entire humanity via its socio-economic activity (Hawken et al. 1999; Soete et al. 2015; Schwab 2016). The car has the functioning engine and the functioning mechanism for speed enhancement controlled by the gas pedal. However, the car differs from standard car models in that it lacks the brake. It is not programmed to stop, slow down or reverse back because the economic recession is not computed in the car model. Instead, the car is modeled on the assumption that the global economy must grow – the pressure on the gas pedal is constant. If, for some reason, the car enters the unfavorable territory such as an uphill path, which leads to it slowing down (recession), the car is programmed to immediately search for solutions as to how to avoid such a path and return to the state of acceleration again (Soete et al. 2015). In the language of cybernetics, the car without brakes as a metaphor for capitalism means that modern humanity constantly self-enhances positive feedback. All natural systems are exposed to two types of regulatory pressure. One type of pressure is the positive feedback loop (Camazine et al. 2003: 15–28) – the accelerating car metaphor. The alternative type of pressure is the negative feedback loop (Camazine et al. 2003: 15–28) – the brake metaphor. Constant balancing of positive and negative feedbacks, acceleration and brake, is the source of natural systems' stability or homeostasis. The sources of positive feedback in natural systems such as plant or animal populations, for example, are their capacities to multiply through sexual reproduction and to maintain the scale of population growth through exploiting nutritional and other resources available in the ecosystem (De Angelis et al. 1986: 5–14, Schoener 2011). The sources of negative feedback include their natural predators, lack of nutritional and other resources in the ecosystem, various diseases and ecological catastrophes (De Angelis et al. 1986: 5–14, Schoener 2011). The biosphere itself is the super-system which (i) integrates numerous sub-systems produced by 9 million extant biological species1 (Mora et al. 2011) and (ii) maintains its own homeostasis (Lovelock and Margulis 1974). Modern humanity, as a natural system, defeated all predators, eradicated all major infectious diseases and invented technologies for the ecosystem alteration, thus eliminating important natural sources of negative feedback (Bateson 2000, Schwab 2016). This enabled capitalism, as the dominant human socio-economic form, to become the conquest of nature (Hawken et al. 1999, Moore 2017, 2018). Nature is seen as an unlimited source of cheap capital. The only requirement is the identification of the means by which the capital 1 Estimates of the species number vary. The most recent one (Larsen et al. 2017) suggests that the total number of species is 1-6 billion, with the 70%-90% of the species range representing bacteria. The estimate by Mora et al. 2011 excludes microbes (bacteria and archaea). STUDIES AND ARTICLES │ 545 hidden in nature can be released. In the conquering attempt of this sort, any form of brake becomes an obstacle. Given that a reliance on the positive feedback generates an enormous risk to the system as a whole (De Angelis et al. 1986: 5-14, Bateson 2000: 486–496, Camazine et al. 2003: 15–28), humanity must discover a form of a negative feedback loop. The self-imposed negative feedback loop could enable stabilization of the damaged ecosystem. In other words, without the functioning brake, the accelerating car is doomed to a crash, sooner or later, because the super-system eventually punishes the lack of negative feedback (Bateson 2000: 486–496, De Angleis et al. 1986: 5–14, Camazine et al. 2003: 15–28). Modern humanity has already entered the ecological disaster of its own making, known as the sixth mass extinction of species (Ceballos et al. 2015) or biological \"annihilation\" (Ceballos et al. 2017) which reduces biodiversity required for the long-term survival. Other manifestations of existential risks due to the lack of negative feedback include climate change, potential loss of control over technologies and vulnerabilities of human systemic technologies to external insults (Rees 2003). Thus, the invention of the brake on the imaginary car of capitalism becomes a necessary civilizational requirement. In this paper I will argue that the greatest contribution of the Critical Theory of Frankfurt School, primarily Adorno and Horkheimer, to the modern philosophical, sociological and scientific discourses is demonstration, in an indirect way, that the invention of the brake on the accelerating car of capitalism constitutes an anti-barbaric act and thus a necessary civilizational advance, or more precisely an antidote against self-destruction. I will use the concept of Anthropocene (Crutzen and Stoermer 2000, Lewis and Maslin 2015: 171) and its more recent derivatives, Capitalocene (Moore 2017: 597; Moore 2018: 2) and Machinocene (Price 2016), as the ground for analysis. In the next section, I will outline the investigative platform on which this study is based and explain terminology. In subsequent sections, I will develop new analytics of modernity based on several recent developments in biological sciences. 2. Investigative Context and Definitions of Terms The purpose of this section is to (i) outline the investigative framework on which this study is based and (ii) explain terms Anthropocene, Capitalocene and Machinocene. The main text that forms the investigative basis of the study is DE, first published in 1944. The concepts of Anthropocene, Capitalocene, and Machinocene, all invented in the 21st century, are predictable in principle, by the argumentation expressed in DE. The starting point in constructing the investigative framework is the exposure of the accelerating car of capitalism metaphor (ACM in the rest of text) to the spirit of DE arguments, with a view to merging them together. One of the key concepts of DE is \"instrumental reason\" explicable by the criticism of the foundation of science. Scientific world-view, which dominates western civilization since Enlightenment, is based on the mechanistic understanding of nature. ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE546 │ Predrag SlijePčević In Galileo's mathematization of nature, nature itself is idealized on the model of the new mathematics... Thought is reified as an autonomous, automatic process, aping the machine it has itself produced, so that it can finally be replaced by the machine. (Horkheimer and Adorno 2002: 19). Interpretation of nature as a mechanical system, the machine, can only be invented by a form of reason that becomes irrational – \"instrumental reason\". ACM reflects mechanicism that permeates the scientific world-view dominated by physicalism (Barbieri 2016: 2). In brief, physicalism is the notion that all sciences are reducible to the mechanics of physics (Wächtershäuser 1997, Stoljar 2017). (I will argue later that nature cannot be reduced to mechanistic arguments of physicalism; see the Machinocene section). The shiny and fast car, which we drive, is a mechanical invention par excellence, with all attributes of progressivism. The fuel for the car is science and technology, also recognized by the acronym R&D (research and development) – the humanity's collective laboratory, turned-fuelling-station, which interprets the entire nature as the source for fuel extraction (Hawken et al. 1999, Soete et al. 2015, Moore 2017, Moore 2018). Everything seems perfectly rational in this laboratory. An army of 7.8 million scientists producing 1.5 million research papers and millions of patents per annum works on generating the fuel for the car in the most ingenious ways by applying powerful inventions based on the scientific method (Soete et al. 2015: 14–18). However, the irrationality of the dominant scientific world-view manifests as the inability to see (blindness) that a car without brakes is doomed to a crash. There are enough signs to recognize that the car has already started colliding with its natural habitat. One of the signs is a recently reported phenomenon of \"biological annihilation\", which may damage the biosphere irreversibly (Ceballos et al. 2017: E6089). However, there is no mechanism on the car or within the car, which can detect the crash, the same way the mechanism for braking is non-existent. As a result, the global scientific laboratory-turned-fueling-station, continues to work unabated. The option of stopping the car to assess damage to itself and its habitat is not available. Instead, humanity continues to accelerate the car by using ever more powerful types of fuel leading to ever greater damage–a clear sign of irrationalism of \"instrumental reason\". The ACM model is further rationalized by suggesting that there is no need for inventing brakes (Hawken et al. 1999: 1–21). Instead, nature should undergo voluntary enslavement to capitalism by opening its avenues long enough and wide enough, so that the need for the brake on ACM is eliminated.2 2 This is the key message of the influential book (Hawken et al. 1999: 4). The authors identify four forms of capital: human, financial, manufactured and natural. The first three forms of capital use the fourth form (natural capital or the entire nature) as the material for creating \"cars, highways, cities, bridges, houses, food, medicine, hospital and schools.\" The estimated value of the natural capital is $ 400 – 500 trillion in total, or $ 30 trillion annually (the equivalent of the world economic output). STUDIES AND ARTICLES │ 547 The merger of ACM and the spirit of DE arguments thus represent the investigative framework summarized in Table 1. The merger is formally facilitated by selecting relevant quotes from DE and pairing them with the rationalist and irrationalist components of ACM outlined above (Table 1). This framework will serve as the basis for analysis in subsequent sections of the article. Before starting the analysis it is important to define the terms Anthropocene, Capitalocene and Machinocene. Table 1. The investigative framework of the study constructed by combining relevant quotes from DE and the ACM metaphor discussed in the text. DE ACM Argument for rationalism Enlightenment, understood in the widest sense as the advance of thought, has always aimed at liberating human beings from fear and installing them as masters. (Horkheimer and Adorno 2002: 1) Human technological progress is deceptively rational: a perfect mechanism for enhancing positive feedback. Argument for irrationalism Yet the wholly enlightened earth is radiant with triumphant calamity. (Horkheimer and Adorno 2002: 1) Human technological progress is hopelessly irrational: it lacks negative feedback required for balancing its potentially deadly over-drive. All three terms express, each in its own way, forces of domination which humanity is trying to exert over nature. The term Anthropocene, coined by a Nobel Prize winning chemist, Paul Crutzen, and his colleague Eugene Stoermer (Crutzen and Stoermer 2000) is summarized by the following quote: ...humanity replaced nature as the dominant environmental force on Earth (Rudimman et al. 2015: 38). This message, in the context of the scientific world-view, is the logical consequence of the growth of scientific knowledge governed by physicalism. Knowledge, which is power, knows no limits either in its enslavement of creation or its deference to worldly masters. (Horkheimer and Adorno 2002: 2) However, the physicalist message was countered long before the term Anthropocene was invented: What human beings learn from nature is how to use it to dominate wholly both it and human beings. ...Only thought which does violence to itself is hard enough to shatter myths. (Horkheimer and Adorno 2002: 2) Thus, DE reminds us that the roots of the Anthropocene concept are in \"instrumental reason\" but not in science. The origins of \"instrumental reason\" ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE548 │ Predrag SlijePčević precede science and can be traced to the territory of human culture we call mythology. Given that mythology is an ever-present part of human culture, at least since the origin of languages, the inevitable conclusion is that roots of \"instrumental reason\" may be in the human nature, as argued by biologist Edward O. Wilson (Wilson 2012:56). Science is nothing but a tool in hands of \"instrumental reason\" which becomes the victim of mythologization (see below). The Capitalocene concept is a recent variation on the Anthropocene theme developed by Jason M. Moore (Moore 2017; Moore 2018). It represents a powerful criticism of the Anthropocene concept. Its critique is focused on how Anthropocene misinterprets its historical and philosophical roots. The key argument is that the Anthropocene concept represents a product of philosophical reductionism based on the Cartesian split. The Cartesian split turned humanity into an independent subject and nature into a passive object. This gave a license to the subject to dominate the object. However, humanity and its institutions are an integral part of nature. Moore used the phrases \"humanity-in-nature\" and \"nature-in-humanity\" to contrast the Cartesian stance of humanity and nature as separate and independent entities. Thus, Moore defines capitalism as the global ecology, which combines the quest for power and coproduction with nature into an organic whole. Whether this organic whole has any longterm future is a different matter. The value of the Capitalocene concept is in highlighting important omissions that make Anthropocene almost untenable in the context of new developments in foundations of biology (see below). Also, it helps refine the ACM model. Even though the car is driven by the entire humanity through the acceptance of international regulations for the global capitalist economy (world-ecology) the ACM model itself is (i) invented by the minority and (ii) imposed by the minority on the majority without any explicit approval. Such approval was not required simply because at the time of the origin of the model (Europe around 1450 according to Moore) institutions for approval did not exist. This poses an important question of whether the imposition without approval is part of \"nature-in-humanity\". The term Machinocene, used in a recent essay (Price 2016) expresses the view that AI (Artificial Intelligence) will dominate nature in a not so distant future (the end of the 21st century). The expectation is that some form of machine superintelligence may become autonomous and supersede human intelligence (Bostrom 2014). The Antropocene as the force dominating nature will be replaced by the mechanical mind of Machinocene. This view is based on the mechanistic understanding of nature and as such, it represents a powerful expression of \"instrumental reason\". 3. Analysis Developments in biological sciences in the last several decades suggest that biology may not be fully reducible to physics (Bateson 1979, 2000; Rosen 1991, Capra 1997; Elsasser 1998; Maturana and Varela 1998; Kineman 2011; Slijepcevic STUDIES AND ARTICLES │ 549 2018a). This is not to say that laws of physics are not applicable to biological systems; or that biological systems do not obey the laws of physics. Instead, it may be possible that the behavior of living organisms is not reducible to physicochemical causality. Here is an argument put forward by a mathematician and theoretical biologist Robert Rosen (Rosen 1991: 13): Why could it not be that the \"universals\" of physics are only so on a small and special (if inordinately prominent) class of material systems, a class to which organisms are too general to belong? What if physics is the particular, and biology the general, instead of the other way around? If this is so, then nothing in contemporary science will remain the same. Some of the relevant developments in the biological sciences, which constitute a powerful argument against physicalism, and support the framework outlined in Table 1, will be explored in detail. Given that the physicalist outlook is at the heart of the Anthropocene and Machinocene concepts, I will next outline a critique of these concepts based on the Table 1 framework. The Capitalocene concept, which is closer to the DE style argumentation, will be refined in light of the framework. 3.1 Criticism of the Anthropocene Concept 3.1.1 Mythologization of Science or How to Justify the Progressivism of ACM According to Walter Elsasser, we live in the post-rationalist world. His analysis of Enlightenment parallels DE: The period of Rationalism, in its early phases usually called the \"Enlightenment,\" began, roughly, around 1600 and lasted nearly 350 years, its last ripples being rather rudely terminated by history, through two world wars and, at the end of the second, by the knowledge then acquired of nuclear reactions which makes possible a sudden catastrophic termination of men's activities. Nothing less \"rational\" can readily be thought of. (Elsasser 1998: 127) How can irrationalism of Enlightenment and its product, science, be justified? The answer of Horkheimer and Adorno was powerful. Irrationalism can only be justified by resorting to mythology: Humans believe themselves free of fear when there is no longer anything unknown. This has determined the path of demythologization ... Enlightenment is mythical fear radicalized. (Horkheimer and Adorno 2002: 11). ACM reflects a belief that humanity will conquer the territory of the unknown and therefore free itself from fear. The means for conquest is science based on the notion of physicalism. It is widely accepted by the scientific community that all sciences are reducible to physics. This view is best summarized by a Nobel Prize-winning molecular biologist and the intellectual force behind the Human Genome Project, James Watson: ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE550 │ Predrag SlijePčević There is only one science, physics. The rest is social work (cited in Rose 2005: 83). The pro-physicalist attitude of modern science is further expressed by the title of a popular book, What Remains to Be Discovered, by a former editor of the leading science journal, Nature (Maddox 1999). The assumption on which the book is based is that nature represents a mechanical system. The logic of any mechanical system suggests that the number of steps required to fully understand it is finite and achievable by the human reason. Similarly, modern physics assumes that a scientific theory integrating all physical forces is achievable. Speculation about this theory, known as \"Theory of everything\" (Barrow 2007), found its way into the Hollywood mythology through an eponymous movie. Thus, science in the form of physicalism is being mythologized. The origin of mythologization of science can be traced to the aphorism usually attributed to the father of physicalism, Sir Isaac Newton: If I have seen farther, it is by standing on the shoulders of giants (Merton 1993: 1). We can find the most recent attribution of the aphorism to Newton in the title of an eponymous book, which identified five giants of science: Copernicus, Galilei, Newton himself, Kepler and Einstein (Hawking 2003). However, according to Robert K. Merton, it seems that the Enlightenment's memory stops with Copernicus, Galilei, Kepler, and Newton. In his book, On the Shoulders of Giants, also known by the acronym OTSOG, Merton powerfully argued that the aphorism precedes science and Enlightenment and it is wrongly attributed to Newton by his followers (Merton 1993: 8–11). This discrepancy exposed by Merton indirectly agrees with the DE notion of mythologization of science. By adopting the OTSOG aphorism attributable to the father of physicalism, and by ignoring thinkers who used the aphorism long before Newton, science has been mythologizing physicalism since its beginnings (Cunningham and Williams 1993: 427). The view of nature as a mechanical system, which can be conquered by human knowledge, as well as the notion of OTSOG, are challenged by a biological theory known as evolutionary epistemology (EE). EE is a programme of research in biology and philosophy of science based on three principles: (i) living systems are knowledge systems, (ii) evolution is the process of gaining knowledge, and (iii) there are features shared by all forms of knowledge gain (Plotkin, 1982: 3–13; Bradie 1986: 404, Slijepcevic 2018a: 24). The nature-wide quest for knowledge is practiced by all living systems, from bacteria to humans (Slijepcevic 2018a: 26). One of the proponents of EE was Karl Popper who memorably argued that there is little difference between Einstein and amoeba in their quests for knowledge (Popper 1979: 24–25). Similarly, Robin Dunbar likened science to natural hypothesis testing: all organisms are engaged in testing different possibilities, or natural hypotheses, based on their understanding of local environments (Dunbar 1996: 75). STUDIES AND ARTICLES │ 551 The natural quest for knowledge has its own hierarchy (Figure 1; see also Slijepcevic 2018a). The founders of the knowledge-seeking quest are first living organisms –bacteria. Thus, Bacteriocene must have the primacy over Anthropocene (Figure 1). By the same logic Florocene (or Plantocene) and Insectocene, which emerged long before Anthropocene, must have primacy over it (Figure 1). Thus, the process of life is an epistemological process – epistemology naturalized according to Quine (1969) – coupled with its ontological counterpart into an epistemological-ontological unity (Plotkin 1982: 3–13; Bradie 1986: 404). Humanity is a late actor in the knowledge-seeking theatre of evolution. We are present in this theater, not as the main character, but rather as a background actor or an extra. If the entire process of biological evolution is condensed into an imaginary play or a movie, we only appear at its end, virtually in the last second. Bacteriocene Florocene Insectocene Anthropocene Capitalocene Machinocene Figure 1. A nested evolutionary hierarchy of organisms capable of altering the environment (the suffix \"cene\" is used as in Anthropocene). Capitalocene and Machinocene are derivatives. The fallacy of the Anthropocene concept, according to which humanity dominates nature, is exposed through the term Cyanocene (Sagan 2017). This term reflects the fact that photosynthetic cyanobacteria radically altered the Earth's atmosphere, by polluting it with oxygen, three billion years before all animals and plants emerged in the evolution. How can humanity (the Anthropocene) dominate nature when it depends on the ecological waste created by Cyanocene? It is now clear that bacteria possess intelligence, which some philosophers call \"bacterial cognitive tool-kit\" (Lyon 2015: 4; Lyon 2017: 444–445). Furthermore, our quest for knowledge is dependent on bacteria. For example, our bodies, and the bodies of all plants and animals have accompanying populations of bacteria, which outnumber human cells 10 to 1. These conglomerates ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE552 │ Predrag SlijePčević of bacteria, known as microbiota, turn our bodies into complex ecological systems consisting of 37 trillion human cells (themselves formed by bacteria and archaea) and 400 trillion bacterial cells. The scientific name for meta-organisms (all plants and animals) is holobionts – ecological communities of bacteria and their hosts (Zilber-Rosenberg and Rosenberg 2008: 723). An integral part of this ecological relationship is the microbiota-gut-brain axis (Smith 2015: 314). Bacteria present in our gut drive intestinal cells to produce the neurotransmitter serotonin, which then circulates in the blood (Smith 2015: 314). This leads to altruistic behavior of the host, which benefits bacteria long-term, indicating that the ecological relationships within the holobiont proper, and effects of this relationship on the ecosystem, are complex (Levin-Epstein et al. 2017). Thus, if the concept of Anthropocene is to be taken seriously it must acknowledge that it is standing on the shoulders of Bacteriocene and Florocene. As a matter of fact, the entire biosphere is standing on the shoulders of \"invisible dwarfs\"– bacteria (Figure 1). The OTSOG thus becomes OTSOID (On the Shoulders of Invisible Dwarfs). The OTSOID shatters the concept of Anthropocene by challenging the notion of physicalism in a major way. Nature is not a mechanical system because we live in an environment dominated by living systems invisible to our eyes. Bacteria are the founders of, and the main player in the planetary biosphere (Margulis and Sagan 1997). The biomass of bacteria exceeds the human biomass (Whitman et al. 1998, Kallmeyer et al. 2012). Given that our environment is biological and it consists of living systems (Okasha 2005), we will never be able to conquer it (Ben-Jacob 1998). The reason for this is that living systems are not mechanical systems, which are exhaustible by physicalist knowledge. Gregory Bateson argued that living systems are indeterministic and aesthetic systems, resistant to the conquest by mechanistic science (Bateson 1979; 2000). He famously likened nature to a giant mind beyond our reach. Bateson thought that our propensity for the ecological violence is the consequence of the epistemological error committed by the Western civilization – domination of mechanistic or physicalist epistemology. Walter Elsasser openly challenged physicalism. Elsasser coined the term \"biotonic laws\" to highlight the notion that the behavior of living systems cannot be reduced to physicochemical causality (Elsasser 1958; Elsasser 1998). The school of theoretical biology known as relational biology provides detailed argumentation in support of this thesis (see the section on Machinocene). The key message of relational biology is that living systems may not be computable (Rosen 1991; Elsasser 1998). In other words, living systems are beyond physicalist science. 3.1.2. The Motivation for Building the Car The previous section outlined arguments for mythologization of science. It is worth repeating that the roots of mythologization of science may be in human nature (Wilson 2012), rather than in science itself. Mythologization of science is partly responsible for justification to build the car without brakes (ACM) STUDIES AND ARTICLES │ 553 driven by the entire humanity or the Anthropocene. The aim of this section is to outline the key motive for building the car. This motive, again, may be part of our biology. Homo sapiens belong to a rare group of species practicing the highest form of social behavior known as eusociality (Wilson 2012). Other practitioners of eusociality are rare species of social insects: ants, termites, and bees (Crespi and Yanega 1995, Wilson and Hölldobler 2005). The consequence of eusocial behavior is the emergence of the social collective termed the superorganism in the case of ants, termites, and bees (Hölldobler and Wilson 2009). The equivalents of the human superorganism are modern states (Gowdy and Krall 2013). In the social structures of modern states individual freedom is formatted by the function of the collective: The power of all the members of society, to whom as individuals no other way is open, is constantly summated, through the division of labor imposed on them, in the realization of the whole, whose rationality is thereby multiplied over again. What is done to all by the few always takes the form of the subduing of individuals by the many: the oppression of society always bears the features of oppression by a collective. (Horkheimer and Adorno 2002: 16) Let us search for an explanation of the phrase oppression by a collective within the phenomenon of eusociality. Eusociality is recognized by three features: (i) several generations within the social group, (ii) care for the young and (iii) division of labor including reproductive labor (Crespi and Yanega 1995; Wilson and Hölldobler 2005). In eusocial insects, the above three features of eusociality are easily identifiable (Crespi and Yanega 1995; Wilson and Hölldobler 2005). By contrast, one aspect of the third feature, namely the division of reproductive labor, may not be present in human societies leading some scientists to dispute the notion of human eusociality. For example, ant and bee workers are sterile. The only reproductive worker in their societies is the queen. In human societies, all members are fertile from puberty to middle ages. However, women lose fertility not because of ageing but in a biologically programmed fashion known as the menopause. Research shows that the function of the menopause, also known as grandmother effect, is to help inexperienced daughters raise the young. Thus, the menopause in women may represent a form of reproductive division of labour in human societies (Foster and Ratnieks 2005). Other forms of reproductive division of labour in modern societies may be the surrogate motherhood (Teman 2008) and same-sex marriages, which require either the surrogate motherhood or specialized reproductive technology for raising a family (Eskridge 1993). According to Edward O. Wilson, Homo sapiens is a truly eusocial species (Wilson 2012). Therefore, what Horkheimer and Adorno termed realization of the whole may represent the emergence of the human superorganism – the modern state governed by the physicalist science (Gowdy and Krall 2013; Soete et al. 2015; see also next section). In a further leap of social integration, states form unions (e.g. EU – European Union; ASEAN – Association of South East Asian Nations; ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE554 │ Predrag SlijePčević UNASUR or Union of South American Nations etc.), which eventually form the global socio-economic union (Soete et al. 2015). The new global union cannot function without the international monetary system. Thus, ACM is regulated by a set of internationally approved norms (Soete et al. 2015). A key question becomes how the human superorganism exerts the function of subduing of individuals or oppression of a collective. Is the oppression of an individual by a collective a necessary biological manifestation of eusociality? A neurobiologist Thomas D. Seeley argued in his book, Honeybee Democracy, that this is not the case (Seeley 2010: 218–231). He presented arguments that honeybee societies practice a form of eusocial behavior, which prevents domination of the collective over individuals by allowing each individual worker to participate in the collective decision-making. For example, the influence of the queen as the elite individual is completely suppressed. To demonstrate her value to the collective the queen emits certain pheromones, which are constantly monitored by workers. Once the workers sense that the quality of the signal emitted by the queen is not worthy to the society as a whole, they simply replace the queen in the process of swarming. A large group of honeybee workers splits from the superorganism, raises the new queen by feeding a worker by the queen jelly and collectively searches for the suitable territory for a newly emerging superorganism. Decision-making in the process of the territory search is truly democratic. The group sends hundreds of scouts to identify the most suitable natural habitat for the new superoroganism. Each scout reports back her findings to the collective. The decision is made through a complex process of debating each find and assessing its merit for the collective. The honeybee democracy is based on three principles: (i) all members of the superorganism show mutual respect and have united interests which exclude domination of the queen over the collective, (ii) the \"thinking\" of the society is a truly collective thinking which identifies multiple solutions to any given problem faced by the society, and (iii) the collective wisdom of the society identifies the best solution which is in the interest of all members of the society. It is important to stress that social insects are not automata lacking individuality. Recent research suggests that eusocial insects possess individuality and yet remain part of the eusocial collective (Robinson et al. 2014, O'Shea-Wheller et al. 2017). The way in which modern human superorganisms, or states, practice democracy is in disparity with the principles of the honeybee democracy. First, the elites, who control the capital show little respect towards other members of society suggesting a disparity of interests (Klein 2007). Second, there is no truly collective thinking, which is in the interest of all members of the society. For example, the decision to go to war against Iraq in 2003 was not in the interest of all American citizens, but only in the interest of the elite (Seeley 2010: 223). Third, in societies in which there is a disparity of interests, there can be no collective wisdom (Klein 2007). Differences in principles of eusocial democracy practiced by modern human states, relative to honeybee superorganisms, may be a consequence of the STUDIES AND ARTICLES │ 555 dominant \"instrumental reason\" in the case of humans (Table 1). It is clear from previous arguments that \"instrumental reason\" may be involved in preparing the ground for the emergence of the ACM socio-economic model practiced by the entire humanity. But this model was imposed on the human collective by a small group of its influential members for their own interest (see the Capitalocene section). This small group, the few, then orchestrated the distribution of responsibility on the entire collective. This is reflected in the Anthropocene concept – the entire humanity, or Anthropos, is willingly behind the imaginary dashboard in our accelerating car (ACM). The manipulatory triumph of the few is hidden in the collective pride – the Age of Man – trumpeted from the pages of leading scientific journals (Monastersky 2015). Interestingly, there is evidence that eusocial insects are naturally protected against the practice of \"instrumental reason\" as a form of natural epistemology. In other words, they possess the brakes on their equivalent of the car – they may be naturally programmed to avoid the ACM-type models. Eusocial ants made a social conquest of Earth millions of years before humanity (Wilson 2012). Their global superorganism, which may appropriately be called the Insectocene, can generate enough ecological pressure to seriously damage the environment. For example, leafcutter ants, from the genera Atta and Acromyrmex, harvest fresh leaves from South American forests on the large scale and thus create the ecological pressure (Costa et al. 2008). However, they seem to \"know\" when to stop cutting leaves to allow trees to recover (Hölldobler and Wilson 1990: 623, Strassen 2018) and by doing so avoid serious damage to their natural habitat. Recall the imaginary theater of evolution, as the process of natural epistemology, mentioned earlier. If the play in this theater is condensed into 1.5 hours, eusocial ants appear in it for the entire last minute. By contrast, our time in the play is 500 times shorter, only 0.1 second. Within such a short time span we made irreversible damage to the ecosystem. In other words, we committed an epistemological error which, hopefully, is not irreversible. By contrast, ants live in harmony with the ecosystem. Are their superorganisms resistant to manipulation by the few, like the honeybee superorganisms? 3.1.3. Tool for Building the Car The previous section outlined the key biological motive for building the car – human eusociality. The next question is: what is the tool for building the car? In other words, is there anything within the phenomenon of eusociality responsible for generating such a tool? Horkheimer and Adorno suggested, without being aware of eusociality, that this tool is technology: Kings control technology no more directly than do merchants: it is as democratic as the economic system with which it evolved. Technology is the essence of this knowledge. It aims to produce neither concepts nor images, nor the joy of understanding, but method, exploitation of the labor of others, capital (Horkheimer and Adorno 2002:2). ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE556 │ Predrag SlijePčević Interestingly, Horkheimer and Adorno equated science and technology and identified them as a unified tool available to \"instrumental reason\" in its model building. Power and knowledge are synonymous. For Bacon as for Luther, \"knowledge that tendeth but to satisfaction, is but as a courtesan, which is for pleasure, and not for fruit or generation.\" Its concern is not \"satisfaction, which men call truth,\" but \"operation,\" the effective procedure (Horkheimer and Adorno 2002: 2). Francis Bacon is singled out as the inventor of the physicalist scientific method. The establishment of the Royal Society in 1660 represented institutionalization of Bacon's method, which was taken over by the state as its own tool. The main concern of this institutionalized tool was not the \"truth,\" but \"operation,\" the effective procedure. If we accept that technology is the tool for building the car, the question is whether technology constitutes a natural consequence of eusociality. For example, Horkheimer and Adorno suggested that the realization of the whole may represent the means by which the human superorganism exerts its power. The question can be answered by investigating the collective behavior of eusocial insects. If indeed, eusocial insects show obligate technological behavior then the answer may be affirmative. Let us use Richard Li-Hua's concept of technology to start answering the question (Li-Hua 2013). His concept is a synthetic attempt to unify all definitions of human technologies. According to Li-Hua, all human technologies have four components: (i) technique, (ii) knowledge, (iii) organization of the work process and (iv) the product (Figure 2 A). The technique is a group name for instruments (tools and machines), materials and the way in which instruments and materials are brought into a common function. The knowledge has forms of applied science, skills and intuition. The organization of the work process is the combination of the technique and knowledge with the aim of achieving a certain result. The result is recognizable as the fourth component of technology – the product. The product is the ultimate result of the association of the previous three factors, the technique, the knowledge and the organization of the work process (Figure 2 A). When the collective behavior of eusocial ants from the genera Atta and Acromyrmex is assessed through the Li-Hua's technological prism (Figure 1 A), all four components of technology are identifiable in the practice of ant agriculture (Figure 1 B; Table 2). The source of food for leafcutter ants is the fresh green leaf biomass, which their digestive system cannot process. To overcome this biological barrier leafcutter ants made a symbiosis with a fungus and thus invented their version of agriculture, which is one of the first technologies in animals (Table 2, Mueller et al. 2005, Slijepčević 2018b). The ants bring pieces of fresh leaves to the nest, chew them, and store them in gardens on which a fungus is planted. They fertilize gardens with their own faeces. The fungus processes all the leafy biomass and turns it into food for STUDIES AND ARTICLES │ 557 the entire colony. The ant agriculture meets the above four requirements of technology (Figure 2 B, Table 2, Slijepčević 2018b). Thus, it seems reasonable to argue that technology may constitute a consequence of eusociality – the division of labour within the superorganism generates a collective behavior that becomes an ecological force (Slijepčević 2018b). Furthermore, it may be argued that food production is an obligate requirement for highly eusocial animal collectives (Mueller et al. 2005). The most common way for collective food production is the practice of agriculture identifiable in ants, termites and humans (Mueller et al. 2005). Honeybees produce food through a different technological process: chemical modification of the ready-made plant material. As a result, there may be two forms of eusociality: OWPKnowledgeTechnique Tools & machines Materials Product • Applied science • Skills • Intuition + = • Expertise for leaf cutting • Expertise for handling seeds • Expertise for tending gardens • Expertise for curing infections OWPKT Fungus Plant products Plant biomass Body anatomy Tool invention Product = Food OWPKT Scientific method Nature Science governed by physicalism Product = Eradication of the unknown A B C Figure 2. A. Synthetic definition of technology according to Richard Li-Hua (Li-Hua 2013). For details see the text. B. Analysis of ant agriculture as a form of technology using Li-Hua's definition as a model. (See also Table 2). C. Institutionalized global science as a form of technology (modeled on Soete et al. 2015). OWP – Organization of the Work Process. ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE558 │ Predrag SlijePčević ultra-eusociality in which collective food production is obligate (ants, termites, honeybees and humans) and ordinary eusociality in which it is not (Gowdy and Krall 2016: 181; Slijepčević 2018b: 202). However, humanity achieved a technological leap beyond agriculture. The practice of human agriculture generated an economic surplus (primitive capital), which transformed the agricultural technology into a global technological conquest of nature (modern capital) (Diamond 1991, Mithen 1996, Hawken et al. 1999). The cultural framework for the conquest was the institutionalization of science and adoption of the scientific method by European states. For example, English and French academies of sciences were established in 1660 and 1666 respectively, under state protectorates. Similar practices were employed by other European states soon after. The new practice allowed European states to (i) gradually eradicate the populace's reliance on magic, which was widespread in the pre-Enlightenment Europe and (ii) set humanity on the course of exploitation of nature via institutionalized science (Ferguson 2012). However, DE revealed a weak spot of institutionalized science based on physicalism (see sections 3.1.1. and 3.1.2). Furthermore, modern institutionalized science, a globalized process according to UNESCO, conforms to Li-Hua's criteria of technology (Figure 2 C, Slijepčević 2018b). The global scientific community and its institutions in the form of universities, institutes, and techno-corporations, created and embraced by modern states as the key generator of the capital (Hawken et al. 1999; Soethe 2015) represent the global laboratory Table 2. Ant agriculture as a form of technology. Sources: Mueller et al. 2005, Wilson 2012, Slijepčević 2018b. Technique Knowledge OWP Product The technology of eusocial ants from genera Atta and Acromyrmex. Instruments (Tools & Machines): (i) Sharp jaws controlled by powerful muscles. Ant jaws represent a vibrating knife or microtome. (ii) Ant bodies act as transport vehicles. The material used by ants is the green leaf mass and the fungus. Instinct-based knowledge: (i) how to cut leaves, (ii) how and when to transport pieces of leaves (iii) how and when to form new fungal gardens and (iv) how and when to cure the gardens from infection. Leaves are cut, transported from the cut-off site to the nest and surrendered to other workers. Specialist workers chew the pieces of leaves and turn them into a pulp. The pulp is stored in fungal gardens, fertilized, inoculated by fungal seeds and processed through the agricultural practices. The product is food for the ant colony. The green pulp is completely processed by a symbiotic fungus into an edible product. This is an obligatory process (there is no eusociality without agriculture). STUDIES AND ARTICLES │ 559 turned-fueling-station for ACM (Table 1, Figure 2 C). This means that institutionalized science as a form of technology employed by global humanity may be a consequence of eusociality (Slijepčević 2018b: 222). The problem, according to DE, is that humanity has so far been unable to recognize that the product of institutionalized science – the conquest of the territory of the unknown by physicalist science (Figure 2 C) – is irrational (see below). Thus, the key element that links the practice of human eusociality with modern capitalism is the propensity of the few (the elite in European states responsible for the exploitation of physicalist science) to associate an extra value with the fourth component of technology, the product (Li-Hua 2013, Moore 2017, Moore 2018). The product, as the final component of the eusocial technological process, may be equated with the concept of capital. 3.2. Critique of the Machinocene Concept Let us start this section with a relevant quote from DE, used earlier. The consequence of \"instrumental reason\" is that nature is interpreted as an automated system, or the machine: Thought is reified as an autonomous, automatic process, aping the machine it has itself produced, so that it can finally be replaced by the machine. (Horkheimer and Adorno 2002: 19) The phrase aping the machine is a particularly illustrative description of \"instrumental reason\". It can be interpreted as an attempt of \"instrumental reason\" to force nature to succumb to its rules, which are the rules of science based on physicalism. This is in line with the Anthropocene's principle according to which humanity, not nature, is the dominant ecological force on Earth (see above). The logical continuation of this type of reasoning is the concept of Machinocene – the emergence of the mechanical mind in the form of the machine superintelligence constructed by mechanistic science based on physicalism (Price 2016). Some philosophers and scientists argue that the new mechanical mind may become autonomous – it may not require the human input after a certain point known as a technological singularity (Bostrom 2014, Price 2016). However, the machine autonomy may be an example of flawed reasoning in light of arguments from biology outlined earlier (e.g. Rosen 1991, Elsasser 1998) but also new arguments, which will be outlined below. A school of theoretical biology, known as relational biology, offers a powerful challenge to the concept of instrumental reason and the Machinocene concept, in particular, their mechanistic bases, which are insufficient to fully understand complex systems such as organisms, ecosystems and the biosphere as a whole. If the organizational principles of the biosphere, including the concept of natural mind in the sense used by Gregory Bateson (Bateson 1979, Bateson 2000), cannot be fully grasped by the mechanistic science, it seems likely that the anticipated machine's mind dominance over nature– the Machinocene – may be a case of gross misunderstanding, or Batesonian epistemological error. ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE560 │ Predrag SlijePčević Nevertheless, this misunderstanding is a perfect opportunity for mechanistic science to expand the practice of \"instrumental reason\". The words of the founder of cybernetics, Norbert Weiner, sound prophetic and in unison with ACM: Let us remember that the automatic machine...is the precise economic equivalent of slave labor. Any labor which competes with slave labor must accept the economic conditions of slave labor. (Weinner 1989: 162) The founder of relational biology was a theoretical physicist Nicolas Rashevsky. The school's most influential proponent was Robert Rosen, who established philosophical and mathematical foundations of relational biology. Even though Rosen has not mentioned DE in his writings, he identified a version of \"instrumental reason\": he thought that the mechanistic foundation of science is irrational (Kineman 2007). Here are two relevant quotes from Rosen's book Life Itself which sum up his stance towards the mechanistic understanding of living systems: The question \"What is life?\" is not often asked in biology, precisely because the machine metaphor already answers it: \"Life is a machine.\" (Rosen 1991: 23) It may perhaps be true that the question \"What is life?\" is hard because we do not yet know enough. But it is at least equally possible that we simply do not properly understand what we already know. (Rosen 1991: 17) Let us briefly outline Rosen's understanding of the differences between the organism and the machine. This will bring Rosen's thought in line with the DE argumentation and provide a powerful refutation of the Machinocene concept. Rosen postulated that all living systems are anticipatory systems. He defined the anticipatory system as a natural system that contains an internal predictive model of itself and of its environment. The predictive model allows the system to change the state at an instant in line with the model's prediction. An outline of the anticipatory system is shown in Figure 3. Every organism from a bacterium to an elephant must contain information about self, about species and about the environment, encoded into the organization of the living system. This information acts causally on the present behavior of the organism based on the modeling relations projected to be applicable in the future (Figure 3). The relationship is primarily epistemological. In the natural epistemological process organisms or Natural Systems (NS) generate internal models of themselves called Formal Systems (FS). The links between NS and FS is one of the epistemological-ontological unity in which the natural \"glue\" holding the relationship together is natural information (for details see the legend for Figure 3). Thus, the behavior of Rosen's anticipatory systems at any present instant involves aspects of past, present, and future, because the internal model serves to pull the future into the present. By contrast, physicalist science admits only Reactive systems – those systems that react in the present to changes that have already occurred in the causal chain. Rosen's \"Zeroth Commandment\" is a STUDIES AND ARTICLES │ 561 critique of the dogmatism of mechanistic science, which obeys the so-called objective causality: Thou shalt not allow future state to affect present change of state. (Rosen 1991: 49). One of the postulates of mechanistic science is that the true objective causality cannot argue from final causes. By contrast, living organisms (Figure 3 A) are capable of constructing an internal surrogate of time as part of the modeling relations (Rosen 1985) that eventually produce anticipation. Using the mathematical category theory, which allows mapping of relations between NS and FS (Figure 3) Rosen identified a key difference between the organism and the machine. The machine is not capable of constructing the closed causal loop, whereas every organism, from a bacterium to an elephant, is (Rosen 1991: 241). This roughly means that machines cannot have autonomy as they are not constructed through the principles of self-organization or Natural System Formal System ca us al ity im pl ica tio n Decoding Encoding Natural System Formal System ca us al ity im pl ica tio n Function Structure decoding encoding A B Figure 3. A. The relationship between the natural entity or NS (Natural System – any organism from a bacterium to an elephant) and knowledge of it or FS (Formal System – a species-specific information processing system). Mapping in the model, which is categorytheoretic mapping (based on mathematical category theory), is informational in nature. Information, as a process of encoding and decoding, is a \"glue\" holding NSs and their environments together. \"Encoding\" or abstraction is a set of qualities or quantities (epistemological and ontological) from a NS for use in the FS or a model. Senses employed in a species-specific manner are equated with natural abstractions. Such abstractions reflect what is usually meant by the term biological \"structure\" (see panel B). On the other hand, \"decoding\" (in the epistemological and ontological sense) is best described by Bateson's notion of information as \"a difference that makes a difference\" or \"patterns that connect\" (Bateson 1979). In other words, \"decoding\" is associated with the concept of biological \"function\" as shown in panel B. Thus, structure and function are emergent properties of the modeling relationship \"representing the empirical world emerging from the ontological\". Adapted from Rosen (1991) and Kineman et al. (2007). ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE562 │ Predrag SlijePčević autopoiesis – a process behind the construction of organisms or anticipatory systems, which effectively closes causal loops (Maturana and Varela 1998, Capra 1996). The machine thus remains an automaton lacking the capacity of anticipation and entirely dependent on its creator. Therefore, if there is no closed causal loop in the machine, as Rosen's work based on the category theory suggests, then the concept of Machinocene– an autonomous mechanical mind – may be invalid. Even though Rosen's theories have been criticized by proponents of the mechanistic world-view, the way for refuting the criticism may be in integrating Rosen's theories with the principles of autopoiesis of Maturana and Varela (Maturana and Varela 1998), Bateson's version of natural mind (Bateson 1979, Bateson 2000) and principles of EE (Slijepcevic 2018a). 3.3. Refining the Concept of Capitalocene As stated earlier, the Capitalocene concept shares significant similarities with the DE style of argumentation. Therefore, what follows cannot be called a critique of the Capitalocene concept, but rather an attempt to refine certain points within its structure. Similarly to Horkheimer and Adorno, who identified technology as the key force behind generation of the capital (see above), Jason W. Moore (Moore 2017; 2018) argued that the notion of technics, as used by Lewis Mumford (Mumford 1934: 26), allowed integration of tools and knowledge in a new world praxis – capitalism – capable of opening the doors of nature in the search for cheap capital. The key point, according to Moore, is that humanity is an integral part of nature: \"humanity-in-nature\" or humanity in the web of life. The phrase \"web of life\" is attributed to Chief Seattle: Man did not weave the web of life; He is merely a strand in it. Whatever he does to the web, He does to himself.3 Thus, capitalism silently becomes a way of organizing nature through the technological activity of one of its numerous strands: man. The hierarchical organization of human superorganisms, or states, allows implementation of the practice of \"instrumental reason\" through the imposition of concepts invented by the few, on the entire collective (see above). The collective becomes a slave executor of the will of the inventors. This line of reasoning is in contrast with the reasoning of the Anthropocene concept which is Cartesian: there is an artificial split between humanity and nature. Humanity acts as an artificial external force, which interprets the web of life as a passive foreign territory open to a massive conquest. The identity 3 Adapted by Ted Perry. STUDIES AND ARTICLES │ 563 of true instigators is hidden and deliberately masked through the practice of \"instrumental reason\" – subduing the collective by the few (see above). Lewis Mumford argued that non-European civilizations (Chinese, Greek, Arab etc.) differed from their European counterpart in one important respect. Non-European civilizations were technological civilizations but did not interpret nature as a source of cheap capital. As Mumford commented: They had machines but they did not develop \"the machine\". In other words, only the European civilization followed the mechanistic path of Newtonian science based on physicalism. Similarly to Horkheimer and Adorno, who singled out Francis Bacon as the founder of this path, Moore's colleague Justin McBrein (McBrein 2017: 125) used the general concept of the scientist as \"a gunslinger in a sidereal wild west, an imperialist fantasy that would overcome the contradictions of capitalist surplus extraction.\" Thus, the Capitalocence concept and DE singled out the European civilization as the founder of capitalism and modernity that is affected by irrationalism. For Horkheimer and Adorno, the irrationalism was caused by the Enlightenment's fear of the unknown, which turned a perfectly rational ambition to expand knowledge into an irrational obsession to over-know by taking the map for the territory (Table 1). For Moore, irrationalism is the abstraction of man and its replacement by a new artificial species: the capital or the fourth component of the natural technological process – the product (Figure 2). This new species can be interpreted as collective humanity in its mechanicist vehicle with no brakes fueled by the physicalist science (ACM). As Justin Mc'Brien (Mc'Brien 2017: 116) put it: Capital is the Sixth Extinction personified: it feasts on the dead, and in doing so, devours all life. The deep time of past cataclysm becomes the deep time of future catastrophe; the residue of life in hydrocarbons becomes the residue of capital in petrochemical plastics. Capitalism leaves in its wake the disappearance of species, languages, cultures, and peoples. It seeks the planned obsolescence of all life. Extinction lies at the heart of capitalist accumulation. Here is an outline of developments in biology, which support Moore's concept of \"humanity in the web of life\". Humanity is just one of 9 million species estimated to inhabit the planet (Mora et al. 2011). All our activities, including the socio-economic organization, are formatted by our experiences of being a part of the natural collective from which we emerged in the process of evolution. There is nothing special about us in a biological sense. For example, if the biological success is measured by the contribution to the biomass of the entire biosphere, then the most successful organisms are plants. Their biomass exceeds the animal biomass 1,000 times. As one botanist commented we only exist in traces compared to plants (Mancuso and Viola 2015). Furthermore, we are not special even in the phenomena of technology, as mechanistic science would like us to believe. The inventors of technology among animals are insects (Mueller et al. 2005, Slijepčević 2018b). The first evolutionary form of technology was insect agriculture (Figure 2 B). Our techno-science ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE564 │ Predrag SlijePčević is nothing more than an evolutionary derivative (Diamond 1991). Even modern human technologies such as the Internet and future technologies such as the Internet of Things may have equivalents in bacteria which we do not usually take as intelligent (Margulis and Sagan 1997, Slijepcevic 2017). There is a large body of specialist literature supporting the notion of animal technical intelligence (summarized in Schumaker et al. 2011). Therefore, Moore's argument of humanity being an integral part of the web of life, not only in the material sense but also in the functional sense, which eventually generates a form eusocial practice we call capitalism, is correct. Given the destructive potential of Capitalocene and its deadly effects on the biosphere in the form of biological annihilation (Ceballos et al. 2017), also dubbed the Necrocene (McBrien 2017: 116), an important question is why only the European civilization invented capitalism even though other civilizations had basic technological means at their disposal to develop it long before Europeans. This is the question that begs a comprehensive analysis. Horkheimer and Adorno provided a clue: propensity to over-know or degeneration of Enlightenment. The consequence of this propensity is the ACM model imposed on the entire humanity as a result of the irrational ambition of the few to legitimize potential for self-destruction (Table 1). 4. How to Counter \"Instrumental Reason\" There are three avenues that can be explored to reduce the negative effects of \"instrumental reason\" or even to fully eliminate it. First, given that science based on physicalism most likely interprets nature in a wrong way – a mechanical system or the machine, which can be fully understood by physicalist science – a reform of foundations of science may reverse this epistemological error. Many scientists and philosophers argued that the biosphere is a cognitive system with the epistemological-ontological unity (Lovelock and Margulis, 1974, Bateson 1979, Bateson 2000, Capra 1997, Maturana and Varela 1998, Nicholson and Dupre 2018). The biosphere is not an organism, but a super-system composed of organisms so that organisms form epistemological-ontological unities with their environments consisting of different kinds of organisms. This holarchy4 of systems must be explored by a form of science that should suspend the primacy of physicalism, at least temporarily, to allow biology to take the lead. Anticipatory systems (Rosen 1985, Rosen 1991), mind and nature (Bateson 1979, Bateson 2000, Capra 1997, Maturana and Varela 1998), holarchy (Koestler 1981), symbiogenesis (Sagan 1967, Margulis 1970), nature of biological intelligence (Slijepcevic 2018a), processual biology (Nicholson and Dupre 2018) and a range of other questions in biology must be explored from the new perspective which should confirm, or not, the validity of physicalism. Philosophically, this is a sound approach. The foundation of science is not a given. There is no reason as to why the foundations of physicalism cannot be 4 The term used by Arthur Koestler related to his concept of the holon. STUDIES AND ARTICLES │ 565 challenged by right arguments. One of the components of physicalism ripe for criticism is reductionism. As Karl Popper (Popper 1982: 171) argued: \"None of these reductionist efforts explain the creativity of the universe: life, and its incredible intricacies and wealth of forms.\" Second, a greater emphasis on investigating natural phenomena such as eusociality and technology would allow identifying elements in our ultra-eusociality, which predispose us to the practice of \"instrumental reason\". By the same token, identifying elements of ultra-eusociality in insects, which make them resistant to the development of \"instrumental reason\", as a form of natural epistemology, would be useful. For example, ants could be a good role model for humanity in the search for breaks on the collective car (Slijepčević 2018b). Their biomass is roughly equivalent to the human biomass (Wilson 2012). Yet, ants live in the ecological harmony with the planetary ecosystem. By contrast, the Capitalocene may have already altered the ecological balance of the biosphere irreversibly. One of the most pressing questions is why only the European civilization invented capitalism as the world ecology. Earlier civilizations, Arab, Chinese, Greek, and others, had technological means at their disposal and yet they did not move in the direction of technology dominated by science. Jared Diamond argued that the pre-agricultural humanity was the only form of human superorganism in harmony with nature (Diamond 1991). Finally, the third avenue is the appreciation of the aesthetics of nature as argued by Gregory Bateson (Bateson 1979: 18): Observe, however, that there have been, and still are, in the world many different and even contrasting epistemologies which been alike in stressing an ultimate unity and, although this is less sure, which have also stressed the notion that ultimate unity is aesthetic. The uniformity of these views gives hope that perhaps the great authority of quantitative science may be insufficient to deny an ultimate unifying beauty. Bateson's view parallels views of Elsasser (Elsasser 1998: 4), who thought that biology must take account of the creativity of nature. Nature's creative act is ultimately aesthetic. This is in line with the concept of biophilia (Wilson 1984), the love for living organisms, as the powerful contrasts for the notion of mechanophilia (Slijepčević 2018b: 273), or love for the machine, which typifies the modern world. 5. Concluding Remarks In this study, I attempted to expose the three 21st century concepts to the arguments from DE constructed roughly 60 years earlier in a different historical background, that of the biggest destruction in human history in the form of two world wars and the creation of nuclear weapons as the means for mass destruction. In the post-rationalist world of modernity (Elsasser 1998), the capitalism as the world ecology (Moore 2017; Moore 2018), or ACM in my interpretation (Table 1), become the new means for mass destruction in the form ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE566 │ Predrag SlijePčević of biological annihilation (Ceballos 2017). Thus, the peak of \"instrumental reason\" is the irrational attempt to legitimize self-destruction. The inevitable conclusion is that DE arguments did not lose any of their philosophical and sociological appeals. It can be argued that DE can help us refine the analysis of modernity by integrating its own style of argumentation with the thoughts of scientists critical of the dominant scientific world-view (Bateson 1979; Elassser 1998, Rosen 1991) rooted in the physicalist science. This new framework requires a deep analysis of human eusociality in light of \"humanity-in-nature\" and \"nature-in-humanity\" (Moore 2017, Moore 2018). Some philosophers and scientists think that the emergence of an autonomous machine superintelligence may constitute a qualitatively new phenomenon never experienced before in the human existence and in the existence of the biosphere (Bostrom 2014; Price 2016). This is a bold assumption, which may not be entirely justifiable given the criticism of mechanistic science outlined above. Therefore, there is a pressing need to discuss the concept of \"instrumental reason\" in a truly democratic fashion and assess its future risks. To paraphrase Robert Rosen, we cannot rely on yesterday armies to fight future wars. Acknowledgments Supported by Brunel University London. I wish to thank Drs Sonja Avlijaš, Milan Tasić, and Amir Muzur for their comments on the manuscript. References Adorno, Theodor (2005), Minima Moralia: Reflections From Damaged Life. London: Verso. Barbieri, Marcello (2016), \"What Is Information?\", Philosophical Transactions of the Royal Society A, 374: 20150060. Barrow, Jhon D (2007), New Theories of Everything. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Bateson, Gregory (2000), Steps to an Ecology of Mind. Chicago: University of Chicago Press. –. (1979), Mind and Nature: A Necessary Unity. New York: E. P. Dutton . Ben-Jacob, Eshel (1998), \"Bacterial Wisdom, Gödel's Theorem and Creative Genomic Webs\", Physica A 248: 57–76. Bostrom, Nick (2014), Superintelligence, Oxford: Oxford University Press. Bradie, Michael (1986), \"Assessing Evolutionary Epistemology\", Biology and Philosophy 1: 401–459. Camazine, Scott, Jean-Louis Deneubourg, Nigel R Franks, James Sneyd, Guy Theraulaz, and Eric Bonabeau (2003), Self-Organization in Biological Systems. Princeton: Princeton University Press. Capra, Fritjof (1997), The Web of Life: A New Synthesis of Mind and Matter. London: Flamingo. Ceballos, Gerardo, Paul. R Ehrlich, Anthony D. Barnosky, Andres García, Robert M. Pringle, and Todd M. Palmer (2015), \"Accelerated Modern Human-Induced Species Losses: Entering The Sixth Mass Extinctio\", Science Advances 1(5): e1400253. STUDIES AND ARTICLES │ 567 Ceballos, Gerardo, Paul R. Ehrlich, and Rodolfo Dirzo (2017), \"Biological Annihilation via the Ongoing Sixth Mass Extinction Signaled by Vertebrate Population Losses and Declines\", Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences of the United States of America 114(30): E6089–E6096. Costa, Alan, Heraldo Vasconcelos, Ernane Vieira-Neto, and Emilio Bruna (2008), \"Do Herbivores Exert Top-Down Effects in Neotropical Savannas? Estimates of Biomass Consumption By Leaf-Cutter Ants\", Journal of Vegetation Science 19: 849–854. Crespi, Bernard, J., and Douglas Yanega (1995), \"The Definition of Eusociality\", Behavioral Ecology 6: 109–115. Crutzen, Paul J., and Eugene F Stoermer (2000), \"The Anthropocene\", Global Change Newsletter 41: 17–18. Cunningham, Andrew, and Perry Williams (1993), \"De-centering the Big Picture: The Origins of Modern Science and the Modern Origin of Science\", British Journal for History of Science 26: 407–432. De Angelis, Donald, Post Wilfried M., and Curtis C. Travis (1986), Positive Feedback in Natural Systems. Berlin: Springer-Verlag. Diamond, Jared (1991), The Rise and Fall of the Third Chimpanzee: How our Animal Heritage Affects the Way We Live. New York: Vintage. Dunbar, Robin (1996), The Trouble with Science. London: Faber and Faber. Elsasser, Walter (1998), Reflections on a Theory of Organisms. Baltimor: The John Hopkins University Press. –. (1958), The Physical Foundation of Biology: An Analytical Study. Oxford: Pergamon Press. Eskridge, Wiliam N. (1993), \"A History of Same-Sex Marriages\", Virginia Law Review 79: 1419–1513. Ferguson, Niall (2012), Civilization: The Six Killer Apps of Western Power. London: Penguin Books. Foster, Kevin R, and Francis W. L. Ratnieks (2005), \"A New Eusocial Vertebrate?\", Trends in Ecology and Evolution 20: 363–364. Gowdy, John, and Lisi Krall (2013), \"The Ultrasocial Origin of the Anthropocene\", Ecological Economics 95: 137–147. Hawken, Paul, Lovins Aamory, and Hunter L. Lovins (1999), Natural Capitalism: Creating the Next Industrial Revolution. New York: Little, Brown & Company Hawking, Stephen (2003), On the Shoulders of Giants: The Great Works of Physics and Astronomy. London: Penguin Books. Horkheimer, Max, and Theodor Adorno (2002), The Dialectics of Enlightenment: Philosophical Fragments. Stanford: Stanford University Press. Hölldobler, Bert, and Edward O. Wilson (2009), The Superorganism. New York: W.W. Norton & Company. –. (1990), The Ants. Cambridge: Harvard University Press. Kallmeyer, Jens, Robert Pockalny, Rishi R Adhikari, David C Smith, Steven D'Hondt (2012), \"Global Distribution of Microbial Abundance and Biomass in Subseafloor Sediment\", Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences of the United States of America 109: 16213–16216. Kineman, John J. (2011), \"Relational Science: A Synthesis\", Axiomathes 21(3): 393–437. –. (2007), \"Modeling Relations in Nature and Eco-Informatics: A Practical Application of Rosennean Complexity\", Chemistry and Biodiversity 4: 2436–2457. Kineman, John J, Bela Banathy, Judith A. Rosen (2007), \"The Atomistic Structure Of Relationship: Robert Rosen's Implicate Order\", Proceedings of the 51st Annual Meeting of the International Society for the Systems Sciences, Tokyo, August 5–7, 2007. ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE568 │ Predrag SlijePčević Lewis, Simon L, Mark A. Maslin (2015), \"Defining the Anthropocene\", Nature 519: 171–180. Klein, Naomi (2007), The Shock Doctrine. London: Penguin Books. Larsen, Brendan B., Elizabeth C. Miller, Matthew K. Rhodes, and John J. Wiens (2017), \"Inordinate Fondness Multiplied and Redistributed: The Number of Species on Earth and the New Pie of Life\", The Quarterly Review of Biology 92: 229–265. Levin–Epstein, Ohad Ranit Aharonov, and Lilach Hadany (2017), \"Microbes Can Help Explain the Evolution of Host Altruism\", Nature Communication 8: 14040. Li-Hua, Richard (2013), \"Definitions of Technology\", in Jan Kyrre Berg Olsen, Stig Andur Pedersen, Vincent F. Hendricks (eds.), A Companion to the Philosophy of Technology, Hoboken: Willey-Blackwell, pp. 18–22. Lovelock, James, and Lynn E. Margulis (1974), \"Atmospheric Homeostasis by and for the Biosphere: The Gaia Hypothesis\", Tellus 26: 2–10. Lyon, Pamela (2015), \"The Cognitive Cell: Bacterial Behavior Reconsidered\" Frontiers in Microbiology 6: 264. Lyon, Pamela (2017), \"Environmental Complexity, Adaptability and Bacterial Cognition: Godfrey-Smith's Hypothesis under the Microscope\", Biology and Philosophy 32: 443–465. Maddox, John (1999), What Remains to Be Discovered? New York: Free Press. Mancuso, Stefano, and Alessandra Viola (2015), Brilliant Green: The Surprising History and Science of Plant Intelligence. Washington, D.C: Island Press. Margulis, Lynn (1970), Origin of Eukaryotic Cells. New Haven: Yale University Press. Margulis, Lynn, Dorion Sagan (1997), Microcosmos: Four Billion Years of Microbial Evolution. Berkeley: University of California Press. Maturana, Humberto R., and Francisco J. Varela (1998), The Tree of Knowledge: The Biological Roots of Human Understanding. Boston: Shambhala. McBrein, Justin (2017), \"Accumulating Extinction Planetary Catastrophism in the Necrocene\", in Jason W. Moore (ed.), Anthropocene or Capitalocene? Nature, History, and the Crisis of Capitalism. Oakland: PM Press, pp. 116–137. Merton, Robert K. (1993), On the Shoulders of Giants. Chicago: The University of Chicago Press. Mithen, Steven (1996), The Prehistoty of the Mind. London: Thames and Hudson. Monastersky, Richard (2015), Anthropocene: The Human Age, Nature, 519: 144–147. Mora, Camilo, Derek P. Tittensor, Sina Adl, and Alastair G. Simpson, Bors Worm (2011), \"How Many Species are there on Earth and in the Ocean?\", PLOS Biol. 9(8): e1001127. Moore, Jason (2017), \"The Capitalocene, Part I: On the Nature and Origin of our Ecological Crisis\", Journal of Peasant Studies 44 (3): 594–630. –. (2017), \"The Capitalocene, Part II: Accumulation by Appropriation and the Centrality of Unpaid Work/Energy\", Journal of Peasant Studies 45 (2): 237–279. Mueller, Ulirch G, Nicole M. Gerardo, Duur K. Aanen, Diana L. Six, and Ted R. Schultz (2005), \"The Evolution of Agriculture in Insects\", Annual Review of Ecology, Evolution and Systematics 36: 563–595. Mumford, Lewis (1934), Technics and Civilization. San Diego: Harcourt. Okasha, Samir (2005), \"Multilevel Selection and Major Transitions in Evolution\", Philosophy of Science 72: 1013–1025. O'Shea-Wheller, Thomas, Naoki A. Masuda, Ana B. Sendova-Franks, and Nigel Franks (2017), \"Variability in Individual Assessment Behaviour and its Implications for Collectivedecision-Making\", Proceeding of the Royal Society B 284: 20162237. STUDIES AND ARTICLES │ 569 Plotkin, Henry C. (1982), Learning, Development and Culture: Essays in Evolutionary Epistemology. Hoboken: John Wiley & Sons. Popper, Karl (1982), The Open Universe: An Argument for Indeterminism. London: Routledge. –. (1979), Objective Knowledge: An Evolutionary Approach. Revised Edition, Oxford: Oxford University Press. Price, Huw (2016), \"Now It's Time to Prepare for the Machinocene\", AEON https://aeon.co/ideas/now-it-s-time-to-prepare-for-the-machinocene Accessed 15th January 2019. Quine, Willard V.O (1969), \"Epistemology Naturalized\", in Willard V.O. Quine (ed.), Ontological Relativity and Other Essays, New York: Columbia University Press, pp. 69–90. Rees, Martin (2003), Our Final Century: Will the Human Race Survive the TwentyFirst Century? London: Heinmann. Robinson, Elva J. H, Ofer Feinerman, and Nigel R. Franks (2014), \"How Collective Comparisons Emerge without Individual Comparisons of the Options\", Proceeding of the Royal Society B, 281: 20140737. Rose, Steven (2005), Lifelines. New York: Vintage. Rosen, Robert (1991), Life Itself: A Comprehensive Inquiry into the Nature, Origin and Fabrication of Life. New York: Columbia University Press. –. (1985), Anticipatory Systems: Philosophical, Mathematical and Methodological Foundations. Oxford: Pergamon Press. Rudimann, Wiliam F, Erle C. Ellis Jed O. Kaplan, and Dorian Q. Fuller (2015), \"Defining The Epoch We Live In: Is A Formally Designated ʽAnthropoceneʼ a Good Idea?\", Science 348(6230): 38. Sagan, Lynn (1967), \"On the Origin of Mitosing Cells\", Journal of Theoretical Biology 14: 225–274. Sagan, Dorion (2017), \"Coda. Beautiful Monsters: Terra in the Cyanocene\", in Anna Lowenhaupt Tsing, Heather Anne Swanson, Elaine Gan, and Nils Bubandt (eds.), Arts of Living on a Damaged Planet: Ghosts and Monsters of the Anthropocene, Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, pp. 169–174 Schumaker, Robert, Kristina W. Walkup, and Benjamin B. Beck (2011), Animal Tool Behavior: The Use and Manufacture of Tools by Animals. Baltimore: John Hopkins University Press. Scoener, Thomas W. (2011), \"The Newest Synthesis: Understanding the Interplay of Evolutionary and Ecological Dynamics\", Science 331(6016): 426–429. Schwab, Klaus (2016), The Fourth Industrial Revolution. Geneva: World Economic Forum. Seeley, Thomas D. (2010), Honeybee Democracy. Princteon: Princeton University Press. Slijepcevic, Predrag (2018a), \"Evolutionary Epistemology: Reviewing and Reviving with New Data the Research Programme for Distributed Biological Intelligence\", BioSystems 163: 23–35. –. (2018b), The Saint and the Sinner: How We Misuse Science and the Future of Humanity [Svetac i grešnik: Kako zloupotrebljavamo nauku i budućnost čovječanstva], Akademska knjiga: Novi Sad. –. (2017), \"Microbes Have Their Own Version of the Internet\", https:// theconversation.com/microbes-have-their-own-version-of-the-internet-75642. Accessed 15th January 2019. Smith, Peter A. (2015), \"Brain, meet gut\", Nature 526: 312–314. ANTHROPOCENE, CAPITALOCENE, MACHINOCENE570 │ Predrag SlijePčević Soete, Luc, Susan Schneegans, Deniz Eröcal, Baskaran Angathevar, and Rajah Rasiah (2015), UNESCO Science Report: Towards 2030 (Executive Summary). Paris: UNESCO. Stoljar, Daniel (2017), \"Physicalism\", in Edward N. Zalta (ed.), The Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy (Winter 2017 Edition), https://plato.stanford.edu/ archives/win2017/entries/physicalism/. Strassen, Carl (2018), \"Bergson: Rights, Instincts, Visions and War\", Philosophy Now 124: 10–13. Teman, Elly (2008), \"The Social Construction of Surrogacy Research: An Anthropological Critique of Psychosocial Scholaraship on Surrogate Motherhood\", Social Science and Medicine 67: 1104–1112. Wächtershäuser, Gunter (1997), \"The Origin of Life and its Methodological Challenge\", Journal of Theoretical Biology 187(4): 483–494. Weinner, Norbert (1989), The Human Use of Human Beings: Cybernetics and Society. London: Free Association Books. Whitman, William B, David C Coleman, and William J. Wiebe (1998), \"Prokaryotes: Unseen Majority\", Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences of the United States of America 95: 6578–6583. Wilson, Edward O. (2012), The Social Conquest of Earth. New York: Liveright. –. (1984), Biophilia. Cambridge: Harvard University Press. Wilson, Edward O., Bert Hölldobler (2005), \"Eusociality: Origin and Consequences\", Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences of the United States of America 102(38): 13367–13371. Zilber-Rosenberg, Ilana, and Eugene Rosenberg (2008), \"Role of Microorganisms in the Evolution of Animals and Plants: The Hologenome Theory of Evolution\", FEMS Microbiology Review 32: 723–735. Predrag Slijepčević Antropocen, kapitalocen, mašinocen: iluzije instrumentalnog razuma Apstrakt U svom uticajnom delu Dijalektika prosvetiteljstva, Horkhajmer i Adorno su tumačili kapitalizam kao iracionalnu monetarizaciju prirode. U ovom radu analiziramo tri dvadesetprvovekovna koncepta, antropocen, kapitalocen i mašinocen u svetlu Horkhajmerovih i Adornovih argumenata i skorašnjih argumenata iz filozofije biologije. Analiza otkriva izvandredno prisustvo pojma \"instrumentalnog razuma\" koji je pristuan u sva tri koncepta na duboko zagonetan način. Naša interpretacija je da pojam opisuje sklonost nauke zasnovane, na shvatanjima fizikalizma, da tumači prirodu kao mašinu podložnu analiziranju i programiranju od strane ljudskog uma. Rezultat toga je da je koncept antropocena izgrađen oko mehanicističkog modela, koji može biti predstavljen metaforom automobila bez kočnica. Na sličan način koncept mašinocena predviđa nastanak mehaničkog uma koji će dominirati nad prirodom u skoroj budućnosti. Konačno, koncept kapitalocena pretvara savršeno racionalnu ambiciju za širenjem znanja u iracionalnu opsesiju prekomernim znanjem putem institucionalizovane nauke kao motora kapitalizma bez kočnica. Zajednički sadržalac sva tri koncepta je iracionalna sklonost za legitimacijom samouništenja. Potencijalne mogućnosti za suprotstavljanje efektima \"instrumentalnog razuma\" su predložene. Ključne reči: instrumentalni razum, antropocen, mašinocen, kapitalocen"}
{"meta": {"title": "Antiquarianism as genealogy: Arnaldo Momigliano's method", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/article", "creator": "Gould, Rebecca", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "This essay uses Arnaldo Momigliano's genealogy of antiquarianism and historiography to propose a new method for engaging the past. Momigliano traced antiquarianism from its advent in ancient Greece and later growth in Rome to its early modern efflorescence, its usurpation by history, and its transformation into anthropology and sociology in late modernity. Antiquarianism performed for Momigliano the work of excavating past archives while infusing historiographical inquiry with a much-needed dose of contingency. This essay aims to advance our understanding of the mutual imbrications of antiquarian methods with modern conceptions of history, while also suggesting how antiquarianism can generate alternatives to historical inquiry", "date": "2014", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/GOUAAG-2", "language": "en", "datestamp": "2019-07-10T10:09:47Z"}, "text": "History and Theory 53 (May 2014), 212-233 © Wesleyan University 2014 ISSN: 0018-2656 DOI: 10.1111/hith.10706 ANTIQUARIANISM AS GENEALOGY: ARNALDO MOMIGLIANO'S METHOD REBECCA GOULD1 ABSTRACT This essay uses Arnaldo Momigliano's genealogy of antiquarianism and historiography to propose a new method for engaging the past. Momigliano traced antiquarianism from its advent in ancient Greece and later growth in Rome to its early modern efflorescence, its usurpation by history, and its transformation into anthropology and sociology in late modernity. Antiquarianism performed for Momigliano the work of excavating past archives while infusing historiographical inquiry with a much-needed dose of contingency. This essay aims to advance our understanding of the mutual imbrications of antiquarian methods with modern conceptions of history, while also suggesting how antiquarianism can generate alternatives to historical inquiry. Keywords: antiquarianism, genealogy, historiography, disciplinarity, Herodotus, contingency, doubt, certainty Among the intellectual giants of the twentieth century, Arnaldo Momigliano (1908–1987) will be remembered as the historian who historicized history. In the aftermath of the copious festschrifts, memorial volumes, and critical studies that have appeared during the quarter-century following Momigliano's death, this Italian intellectual is gradually emerging as the twentieth century's most important scholar in two fields that rarely converge in the same intellect: ancient Roman history and the modern historiographical method. Like his near contemporary, Michel Foucault (1926–1984), for whom Momigliano expressed guarded admiration on many occasions, Momigliano bequeathed to us a genealogy of humanistic inquiry extending from antiquity to the present. Momigliano's genealogy culminates in an empirically dense and theoretically ambitious vision concerning the mutual imbrications of history, antiquarianism, and the social sciences, from antiquity to the present. Momigliano's writings plot an itinerary for human knowledge as comprehensive and richly suggestive as Foucault's institutional genealogies of the asylum, the clinic, and the prison, as well as his disciplinary genealogy of philology, biology, and political economy.2 But whereas Foucauldian genealogies expose power 1. I would like to thank my research assistant Joshua Wong (Yale-NUS College) for his assistance with editing this essay. 2. Michel Foucault, Folie et déraison: Histoire de la folie à l'âge classique (Paris: Plon, 1961); Naissance de la clinique: Une archéologie du regard medical (Paris: Presses universitaires de France, 1963); Les mots et les choses (Paris: Gallimard, 1966); Surveiller et punir: Naissance de la prison (Paris: Gallimard, 1975). ANTIQUARIANISM AS GENEALOGY 213 in the process of its emergence from various fields of knowledge, Momiglianian genealogies register the traces of the past on the present. Further, Momigliano elucidates the specificity of history by comparing it with disciplines that engage the past without self-identifying as history.3 This essay examines the most suggestive knowledge form that falls under this rubric, which Momigliano termed \"antiquarian knowledge.\" The antiquarian concept usefully identifies a form of knowledge not always registered within conventional history, particularly in its nineteenthand twentieth-century iterations. Momigliano was hardly the first scholar to consider antiquarianism as a form of knowledge unto itself. Prior to Momigliano's intervention, however, no scholar had studied antiquarianism with reference to the sea changes introduced by modern disciplinary knowledge, nor had ancient antiquarianism been considered in relation to modern knowledge forms such as history. In these respects, Momigliano's interventions were new. In order to better discern the newness of Momigliano's concept of antiquarianism, we must begin with a genealogy of the genealogical principle from which antiquarianism derives. We should also consider the framing of the genealogical method by the thinker whom Momigliano recognized as its most influential modern practitioner, Michel Foucault. ANTIQUARIAN GENEALOGY In different ways and for different reasons, genealogy preoccupied both Momigliano and Foucault throughout their writing careers. Often this preoccupation was accompanied by an engagement with genealogy's preferred medium, archeology. Archeology meant different things for Foucault and Momigliano, but the term surfaces frequently in both oeuvres as a concrete manifestation of the genealogical method, uniting the otherwise seemingly disparate pairing of an ancient historian and a theorist of modern sovereign power. When asked to distinguish between archeology and genealogy, Foucault described archeology as the \"aim\" of his analysis and genealogy as its \"material and methodological framework.\"4 Whereas Foucauldian inquiry is genealogical in its aims and archeological in its method, Momiglianian inquiry is historical in its aims and antiquarian in its methods. To distinguish between these two modes of inquiry is to conceive the reverberations of history beyond a specific discipline while narrating the emergence of the historical method as a disciplinary paradigm. In the context of this essay, that means tracing the modern discipline of history to its origins in post-eighteenth-century Europe. In his classic essay \"Nietzsche, la généalogie, l'histoire\" (1971), Foucault isolates three genealogical registers that help to elucidate Momiglianian antiquari3. Momigliano and Foucault also shared a common engagement with the problem of parrhesia (free speech). Momigliano's classic contribution to this subject is \"Liberty and Peace in the Ancient World,\" in Nono contributo alla storia degli studi classici e del mondo antico (Rome: Storia e Letteratura, 1992), 483-501; Foucault's lectures on parrhesia, delivered at the University of California, Berkeley in 1983, are collected in Fearless Speech (Los Angeles: Semiotexte, 2001). 4. Michel Foucault, \"Foucault replies to questions from the audience at Berkeley's History Department in 1983,\" Audio file transcribed by Arianna Bove at http://www.generation-online.org/p/fpfoucault4.htm (accessed January 26, 2014). rebecca gould214 anism. These three registers are methodological, substantive, and metaphysical.5 The first register pertains to the method that drives antiquarian inquiry. Although he explicitly states that genealogy does not oppose itself to history, Foucault- without invoking Momiglianian antiquarianism-distinguishes between the subject proper to historical inquiry and the subject proper to antiquarian genealogy. Genealogy, writes Foucault, records \"events in their singularity [la singularité des événements] outside any totalizing finality [hors de toute finalité monotone]. Like antiquarianism, genealogy flourishes in realms of minute knowledge [la minutie du savoir] and entails vast accumulations of source material [un grand nombre de matériaux entassés].6 Genealogy's second register pertains to its medium. Genealogy's monuments are constructed, like antiquarian knowledge, from \"petites vérités\" that bear an aura of insignificance, but through methods that are no less rigorous for their seeming obscurity than the seemingly more objective discourses of history. The third register of Foucault's discussion pertains to genealogy's resistance to metaphysics. Foucault insists that genealogy cannot result from \"large, well-meaning errors [grandes erreurs bienfaisantes].\" Foucault concludes with a perhaps unintended allusion to the antiquarian method: genealogy requires \"a certain eagerness [acharnement] for erudition.\"7 Foucault presents these formulations as variations on a theme that originates in Nietzsche's genealogical trilogy-Die fröhliche Wissenschaft, Zur Genealogie der Moral, and Menschliches, Allzumenschliches-although the French thinker is even more invested than Nietzsche in disciplinary methodologies. A fourth dimension of Foucauldian genealogy also deserves attention in this context: namely, genealogy's relation to silence, and the political implications thereof. Foucault imputes to genealogy a burden that can be glossed politically, as the art and science of excavating \"the silences, the world of memory, of itinerant, barely surviving groups, the places of exclusion and invisibility.\"8 Without foreclosing a wide range of possible and even contradictory political deployments, it may be observed that Momiglianian antiquarianism parallels Foucauldian genealogy in its equally profound concern with silences, memories, and with \"places of exclusion and invisibility.\" Whereas Foucault sought to write a counter-history of subjugation, silence acquires life in Momigliano's method through the historian's engagement with what he famously termed \"alien wisdom\": ancient Jewish, Egyptian, and Iranian knowledge as viewed through the lens of post-classical Hellenism.9 Momigliano's investigations of alien wisdom are the empirical counterpart to his theoretical engagement with nonhistorical methods for excavating the past. The genealogical principle is enshrined, among other places in Momigliano's oeuvre, in his remarks on Foucault. Although he did not subject Foucault's work 5. Michel Foucault, \"Nietzsche, la généalogie, l'histoire,\" Dits et écrits (Paris: Gallimard, 1994), II, 136-156. This essay originally appeared in a festschrift to the French Hegelian Jean Hyppolite. 6. Ibid., 136. 7. Ibid., 137. 8. The citation is from Edward Said, \"The Return to Philology,\" in Humanism and Democratic Criticism (New York: Columbia University Press, 2003), 81, referencing his conception of \"humanist philology.\" 9. Arnaldo Momigliano, Alien Wisdom: The Limits of Hellenization (Cambridge, UK: Cambridge University Press, 1990). ANTIQUARIANISM AS GENEALOGY 215 to extended examination in his published writings, Momigliano did attest on three memorable occasions to the significance of the Foucauldian genealogical method for his understanding of contemporary historiography. Each statement is worth considering closely, inasmuch as Momigliano's engagement with Foucault parallels-in certain aspects anticipating and in other respects reflecting-his conception of the antiquarian imagination. Momigliano's first comment on Foucault occurs in an essay on contemporary British intellectual history that he self-consciously frames from the perspective of his native Piedmont. \"The traditional oppositions,\" Momigliano writes, \"between ideas and institutions, between ideology and society, or, quite simply, between beliefs and facts have become far too crude to define the new levels of exploration\" in contemporary intellectual history.10 Momigliano adds that this transformation in modern knowledge is most powerfully registered by \"the astute Michel Foucault\" who has \"put across his new 'archéologie du savoir' to replace 'l'histoire des idées'.\" Paraphrasing Foucault's French, Momigliano adds that Foucault aimed to free the history of thought from its transcendental subjugation (affranchir l'histoire de la pensée de sa sujéction transcendentale). This characterization of Foucault by Momigliano highlights the two thinkers' common interest in change over the longue durée and with specific reference to the organization of disciplinary knowledge. Momigliano's second allusion to Foucault occurs in an Italian article intended to introduce developments in European historiography during the 1960s and 1970s to an Italian readership. Now writing specifically for an Italian audience, Momigliano more ardently appropriates Foucault for his own discipline, history, which means in effect assimilating Foucauldian genealogy to his antiquarian method. Momigliano states that \"If M. Foucault appears in theory as a negator of the historical movement [un negatore del movimento storico], his historical works are nonetheless infused with an original and profound awareness of intellectual changes [cambiamenti intellettuali].\"11 Returning to British intellectual history, in his third pronouncement on the French intellectual, Momigliano compares Foucault to Herodotus in a late essay on the ancient Greek historian who was his most important model for his own historiographical craft.12 \"Perhaps to connect the name Herodotus with that of Michel Foucault,\" Momigliano writes, \"who until yesterday was our most original among our contemporary historians, is the best way to indicate what the Herodotian tradition can still produce.\"13 Measured against Momigliano's profound investment in Herodotus's legacy, detailed throughout the remainder of this essay, the comparison of Foucault to Herodotus appears as the greatest 10. Momigliano, \"A Piedmontese View of the History of Ideas,\" Essays in Ancient and Modern Historiography (Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 2012), 5. 11. Momigliano, \"La storiografia del quindicennio 1961–1976,\" Sesto contributo alla storia degli studi classici e del e del mondo antico (Rome: Storia e Letteratura, 1980), 390. 12. Although Thucydides' historiographical method was the subject of Momigliano's first major scholarly publication, published at the age of twenty-two (\"La Composizione della storia di Tucidide,\" Memoria della Reale Accademia delle Scienze ditorino 2, no. 67 [1930], 1-48), as discussed below, the later stages of his scholarly career evince a much closer affinity for Herodotus. 13. Momigliano, Ottavo contributo alla storia (Rome: Storia e Letteratura, 1987), 23. rebecca gould216 tribute that could have emerged from Momigliano's pen. This comparison also usefully sets the stage for Momigliano's genealogy of antiquarian knowledge. Admittedly, the ancient historian's engagement with history differed sharply from the French theorist who questioned the historical enterprise as such, just as Momigliano's aspirations diverged from those of Hayden White, whose Metahistory (1973) proposed reading historical discourse tropologically, or as Momigliano himself critically phrased it, to reduce history to rhetoric.14 (At the same time, Momigliano referred to White as a \"friend\" and was keen to engage with his claims concerning the frailty of historical knowledge.) As Peter Miller notes in his important study of Momigliano's antiquarian method, the historian of antiquity does not participate in the \"Heideggerian critique of historicity, upon which Foucault rests\" and which questions the \"very foundation in subjectivity that was presupposed by the entire Western historical tradition.\"15 Much of Momigliano's work in fact rejected precisely the forms of skepticism that underwrote the Foucauldian project, and which for Momigliano were epitomized by early modern Pyrrhonists such as Pierre Bayle, Daniel Huet, and La Mothe de Vayer, who attacked both \"traditional historical teaching\" and \"traditional religious beliefs.\"16 Their epistemological divergences notwithstanding, the projects on which Foucault and Momigliano were embarked during the most fruitful periods of their lives-genealogy in the first instance and antiquarianism in the second- share an ethical orientation, an intellectual ambition, and a political goal of fostering appreciation for cultural and conceptual difference. In keeping with their shared commitment to assisting in the development and recognition of alternative knowledge forms, both thinkers transformed, and continue to transform, the methodologies that structure the humanities and social sciences. Their excavations of past textual archives call on us, their posthumous audience, to revise regnant disciplinary distinctions when they cease to generate new kinds of knowledge. In equally compelling if divergent ways, both Momigliano and Foucault crafted knowledge forms that engaged deeply with the past without naturalizing the divisions of intellectual labor-between past and present, fact and fiction, linearity and synchronicity-that structure and arguably constrain modern historiographical inquiry. MOMIGLIANIAN ANTIQUARIANISM Antiquarians from the sixth century bce onwards have found ways to elucidate the documentary records inscribed onto epigraphy, coins, and other material remnants from times past, but a sustained historical account of the actual work done 14. Arnaldo Momigliano, \"La retorica della storia e la storia della retorica,\" Sui fondamenti delta storia antica (Turin: Einaudi, 1984). In Figural Realism: Studies in the Mimesis Effect (Baltimore: Johns Hopkins University Press, 2000), White called Momigliano's polemic \"basically hostile but fair\" (180, n. 20). 15. Peter N. Miller, \"Momigliano, Benjamin, and Antiquarianism after the Crisis of Historicism,\" in Momigliano and Antiquarianism: Foundations of the Modern Cultural Sciences, ed. Peter N. Miller (Toronto: University of Toronto Press, 2007), 364. 16. Momigliano, \"Ancient History and the Antiquarian,\" Journal of the Warburg and Courtauld Institutes 13 (1950), 296 (= Contributo alla storia degli studi classici [Rome: Storia e Letteratura, 1955], 81.) ANTIQUARIANISM AS GENEALOGY 217 by antiquarianism across the disciplines had to wait until the twentieth century. The inaugural manifesto of this modern approach to antiquarian knowledge is Momigliano's 1950 article, \"Ancient History and the Antiquarian,\" published in the journal of the Warburg Institute, Momigliano's institutional home after he was compelled to flee Italy in the years leading up to World War II. Formally part of the University of London, the Warburg Institute was Momigliano's intellectual and institutional haven during what his student Anthony Grafton has termed Momigliano's \"middle period,\" sandwiched between his early empirical studies of Roman history and the interrogations into the meaning and construction of historiographical knowledge of his final decades.17 \"Ancient History and the Antiquarian\" also contains ab ovo ideas that were later reworked for the 1962 Sather lectures, delivered at the University of California, Berkeley, and published posthumously only in 1990, under the title The Classical Foundations of Modern Historiography.18 Already in his 1950 article, Momigliano engaged two disciplinary trajectories to account for ancient and modern ways of narrating and recording the past. Building on the Saussurean distinction between synchrony and diachrony, Momigliano proposed that ancient antiquarianism, for which the loci classici were Herodotus's Histories and Varro's now-lost Antiquitates rerum divinarum (c. 47 bce), was preoccupied with change according to a synchronic axis.19 In Momigliano's reading, Roman antiquarianism was more politically inflected than its Greek counterpart, and thus more \"directly relevant to political life than any Hellenistic treatise on the antiquities of a Greek city.\"20 Due to the vertical temporality intrinsic to the antiquarian method, both Greek and Roman antiquarians were more likely to engage with the ancient than with the recent past. Antiquarians were also more likely to borrow from propagators of myth and were more inclined toward philosophy than were their historian counterparts. Thucydides' dismissal of the Homeric epics as valid sources for historical knowledge, and of Homer, whose authority was \"not equal to those of our own day\" and who, as a poet, was \"expected to exaggerate,\" is one of the earliest extant juxtapositions 17. Anthony Grafton, \"Momigliano's Method and the Warburg Institute: Studies in his Middle Period,\" in Miller, ed., Momigliano and Antiquarianism, 97-126. For more on this period in Momigliano's intellectual trajectory, see Grafton, \"Momigliano at the Warburg: The Origins of a Style,\" American Scholar 73, no. 4 (2004), 129-132; Michael Crawford, \"L'insegnamento di Arnaldo Momigliano in Gran Bretagna,\" in Omaggio ad Arnaldo Momigliano: Storia e storiografia sul mondo antico, ed. Lellia Cracco Ruggini (Como: Biblioteca di Athenaeum, 1989), 27-41. The Warburg Institute also hosted a conference series during 2009 entitled \"The Legacy of Arnaldo Momigliano.\" 18. Momigliano, The Classical Foundations of Modern Historiography, ed. Riccardo Di Donato (Berkeley: University of California Press, 1990). 19. For the synchrony/diachrony distinction (which does not appear in the 1950 article, but does in Momigliano's later work, and which may have derived only indirectly from Saussure), see Ferdinand de Saussure, Course in General Linguistics, transl. Wade Baskin, ed. Perry Meisel and Haun Saussy (New York: Columbia University Press, 2013), 81, 89-98. Herodotus figures much more fully as an antiquarian in Momigliano's later work (for example, Classical Foundations) and is not discussed in this capacity in the 1950 article. 20. Momigliano, \"Ancient History and the Antiquarian,\" 289. For an illuminating study of Varro's antiquarian mind that profits from Momigliano's intervention, see Joseph McAlhany, \"Language, Truth, and Illogic in the Writings of Varro\" (PhD diss., Columbia University, 2003). rebecca gould218 between antiquarian and historical knowledge.21 Notably, Thucydides makes his preference clear in the act of juxtaposing these forms of knowledge. The historian/antiquarian distinction is further elucidated by Herodotus's engagement with Homer. Herodotus also polemicized with Homer over his treatment of Helen, and specifically criticized his predecessor for excluding the Egyptian version of the Helen story from his narrative, but this critique was directed to a fellow traveler within a shared intellectual method. Homer may not have been a historian for Herodotus (indeed the word had yet to acquire currency during Herodotus's lifetime), but he was certainly a storyteller in the Benjaminian sense. Herodotus even accounted for Homer's exclusions in terms of the formal injunctions intrinsic to his chosen genre. Homer, reasons Herodotus, knew of the Egyptian story concerning Helen's sojourn in Egypt, but excluded it from the Iliad, \"since it was not as appropriate for epic composition\" as the story he actually used.22 Yet even as Herodotus criticized certain of Homer's poetic choices, it is notable that his style and sense of vocation was shaped above all by Homer's poetry, as well as by that of fellow antiquarians from a few generations prior, such as Hecataeus of Miletus (fl. 500 bce).23 This intermingling of poetry and history in Herodotus's work had already been recognized in antiquity by the author of On the Sublime, who described Herodotus as \"the most Homeric\" (13.3) due to his style and language. Also indicative of the distance between the historian and antiquarian in antiquity is the fact that whereas Thucydides' military history was confined to the lives of the inhabitants of Hellas, Herodotus's curiosity took him far beyond the boundaries of the Peloponnesian peninsula, partly in consequence of which his influence was less extensive than that of his historian rival. Herodotus narrates the past as a global-and not specifically Greek-enterprise from the very opening of his narrative. Herodotus explains that he writes so that \"the great and wonderful deeds-some brought forth by the Hellenes, others by the barbarians-[would] not go unsung\" (1.1). For Thucydides, the narration of events in time is circumscribed by the interests of specific polities, primarily Sparta, Athens, and other Peloponnesian city-states. By contrast, the Herodotian concept of inquiry/history is autonomous from any imperative, or even desire, to glorify a specific political regime. Consider Herodotus's critique of Hellenic accounts of their gods in his ethnography of Egypt (2.45). This distance is evident in the title Herodotus gave to his opus, istoria (ἱστορία), a noun that at the time of its composition meant simply \"inquiry.\"24 When Herodotus writes of the deeds of kings, it is in order to enhance his text with the narrative appeal of their lives, and 21. Thucydides, History of the Peloponnesian Wars, transl. Benjamin Jowett (Oxford: Clarendon Press, 1900), 8. 22. The Landmark Herodotus, ed. Robert B. Strassler, transl. Andrea Purvis (New York: Anchor Books, 2007), 1.116. All future citations from Herodotus are from this edition, and given parenthetically, with reference made only to book and chapter, not to page number. 23. For Herodotus's debt to Homer, see David Asheri, A Commentary on Herodotus, Books 1-4, ed. Oswyn Murray and Alfonso Moreno (Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2008), 49. Momigliano discusses Hecataeus in Classical Foundations, 9, 15. 24. For this signification, see, among others, Peter G. Bietenholz, Historia and Fabula: Myths and Legends in Historical Thought from Antiquity to the Modern Age (Leiden: Brill, 1994), 24. ANTIQUARIANISM AS GENEALOGY 219 to buttress his account with \"great and wonderful deeds\" (1.1), rather than due to any strategic or political mandate. As Momigliano reflected on frequently over the course of his career, and particularly during the years when he was most intensively embarked on the study of antiquarianism, historians of antiquity regarded the History of the Peloponnesian War as the founding text of their discipline and by comparison discounted the Herodotian legacy.25 Thus, whereas we have an essay from Plutarch's pen entitled \"On the Malice of Herodotus,\" there is no comparable attempt to discredit Thucydides. Herodotus's synchronic evocation of the past-his willingness to situate his narrative self within the stream of events, and to equalize his temporal location with the other temporalities operating in his narrative-precluded his inclusion in mainstream historiography. As Momigliano recounts, \"the very fact that each translator and editor of Herodotus found it necessary to defend him against Thucydides and Plutarch shows that at the beginning of the sixteenth century [Herodotus's] reputation was, generally speaking, quite bad.\"26 The most decisive marker of a change in attitude was the vindication of his work by Heinricus Stephanus, whose Apologia pro Herodoto was published in 1566. As Momigliano notes, Stephanus's work appeared the same year that the political theorist Jean Bodin published his comprehensive exposition of the historical method, Methodus ad facilam historiarum cognitionem (Method for the Easy Comprehension of History), which reframed the discipline of history in unprecedentedly global terms. Whether Bodin was more influenced by the antiquarian or the historical strain of reflection on the past in this endeavor remains an open question. More certain is that Stephanus's account of Herodotus's comparative method is \"a work of decisive importance in European historiography\" that extended the very scope of possible ways of reflecting on the past.27 Like Herodotus, Thucydides recognized the pastness of the past, but in the latter case, the past/present distinction underwrote a one-sided relation. In Thucydides, the historian is severed from his material by virtue of his discursive position. In Herodotus, the \"inquirer\" (to deploy ἱστορία in its literal meaning) affiliates so closely with his subjects, including \"barbarian\" peoples such as the Persians and Egyptians, that he projects the names of Greek gods onto their deities (see 1.131; 2.41; 2.46). Thucydides was the ideal predecessor for historians of later eras, such as Ranke, who regarded it as their task to make the past cohere through archival research that drove, \"like a tank, on indestructible documentary treads.\"28 By contrast, Herodotus was the ideal predecessor for antiquarians like Momigliano who regarded it as their task to narrate the past so compellingly that the narrator's self could merge with his subject. The two roles were not mutually exclusive in all cases, and indeed Momigliano arguably came closer than any other modern thinker to merging the opposed poles of antiquarian and historical 25. See Arnaldo Momigliano, \"Erodoto e la storiografia moderna,\" Aevum 31 (1957), 74-84. 26. Arnaldo Momigliano, \"The Place of Herodotus in the History of Historiography,\" in Secondo contributo alla storia degli studi classici (Rome: Ed. di Storia e Letteratura, 1984), 42. 27. Ibid. 28. Anthony Grafton, \"The Footnote from de Thou to Ranke,\" History and Theory 33, no. 4 (1994), 60. rebecca gould220 knowledge within a single intellect, even as he cognized with greater perspicacity than anyone among his contemporaries the significance of this distinction. Herodotus did not seek Thucydidian coherence for his varied and internally contradictory material, nor did the antiquarians who followed in his footsteps. Ancient antiquarians were motivated by the insight that the boundaries between past and present were in a state of permanent flux. Thucydides' opening statement that \"the character of the events which preceded, whether immediately or in more remote antiquity, owing to the lapse of time cannot be made out with certainty\" typifies the trajectory taken by the discipline of history in modernity.29 The bifurcation between the two approaches to the past was reflected in nineteenth-century history's preoccupation with events rather than institutions and with political rather than social or structural change. By contrast, antiquarianism, like the social-science disciplines that antiquarian knowledge helped to generate, reconstructed distant pasts through synchronic methods. Anthropology, sociology, economics, and other social sciences were concerned with structural change at the level of institutions rather than with the temporary changes signaled by events on the battlefield or at the negotiating table. In short, antiquarianism was for the longue durée; history was for short-term memory. Antiquarians' interest in the longue durée was of course an interest in the past, but the nature, scope, and purpose of this engagement differed radically from that of the historians. Momigliano's paradigmatic contrast over the course of his multi-decade inquiry into the sources of the past in modernity was heavily informed by his interest in the divergent receptions of Herodotus the antiquarian and Thucydides the historian.30 The antiquarian/historian distinction Momigliano made helped to elucidate how forms of knowledge that are frequently indiscriminately merged with history in the modern sense-the sense that Herodotus could never have envisioned, and to which Thucydides approximated much more closely-were classed as antiquarian by the writers and readers of antiquity. Additionally, the complex reception in European historiography of Greek antiquity's two major narrators of the past served for Momigliano as a larger lesson about the relations between emergent disciplines, reminding him of the many ways in which it was possible to organize knowledge about the past. The light Momigliano shed on disciplinary history through this reception demonstrated to him the political, epistemic, and metaphysical significance of the choices made by these two different disciplines: antiquarian inquiry, which inevitably foundered on the impossibility of attaining sure knowledge, and history, which was driven by the quest for certainty. As I discuss in greater detail below, Momigliano's emphasis on the quest for certainty that drove antiquarian knowledge derives more from his understanding of early modern antiquarianism than from the form of knowledge espoused by Herodotus, who (unlike Momigliano) was entirely at home with the contingent conditions that shaped his access to other times and places. But this very projection on Momigliano's part demonstrates the 29. Thucydides, History of the Peloponnesian Wars, 1. 30. The Herodotus/Thucydides contrast is drawn out most explicitly in the Sather lectures (Classical Foundations, 29-54). ANTIQUARIANISM AS GENEALOGY 221 elasticity of the antiquarian concept, which in part constitutes its relevance to the modern discipline of history. Momigliano's intervention is important because he went beyond simply reconstructing a lost historical archive. Momigliano made the antiquarian form of knowledge legible in and for a world haunted by a Foucauldian awareness of the dangers of institutional power, and conscious of the dangerous proximity between scientific positivism and fascism in modernity. This was a world of which Herodotus was innocent even when he laid the framework for the emergence of a future knowledge form. Momigliano was more interested in certainty and less willing to question history's foundational axioms than was Foucault, but both figures were wary, with good reason, of modern technologies of power, and of the state's tendency to manipulate historical truth to its advantage. That his parents and extended family were exterminated in Auschwitz certainly imparted a particular poignancy to Momigliano's engagement with history, and may also have intensified his search for an alternative to his chosen vocation in antiquarian ways of confronting, and mourning, the past.31 ANTIQUARIANISM AND MODERNITY As he was particularly keen to point out in his later work, Momigliano's genealogy of antiquarian knowledge leads from antiquarianism to the social sciences, in particular sociology and anthropology. In an age before history was institutionalized as a subject of instruction in the academy-an event Momigliano dates to the establishment of the first chair in ancient history at Oxford in 162232-or tied to an archive, antiquarian research was characterized by an empirical depth unmatched by the research undertaken in university contexts. Antiquarians engaged nonliterary evidence, and excavated the material culture that later became archeology's provenance. Some titles that exhibit these tendencies include M. Baudelot de Dairval's De L'Utilité des Voyages et de L'Avantage que la recherche des Antiquitez procure aux Sçavans (1698), Edmund Chishull's Antiquitates Asiaticae (1728), Stuart and Revett's The Antiquities of Athens (1762), and Winckelmann's Geschichte der Kunst des Alterthums (1764). A further paradox of Momigliano's historian/antiquarian distinction is that the antiquarian method was more informed by archival research than was the historical method. In this respect if in no others, modern historians such as Ranke inherited premodern antiquarian methods, even as they purged their discipline of other antiquarian heterodoxies. In Momigliano's genealogy of the disciplines, the archive was \"discovered\" by the antiquarian rather than the historian. Momigliano illustrates his argument through the example of Edward Gibbon, who, soon after leaving Oxford, began his real inauguration into antiquarian inquiry by \"spending twenty pounds on the twenty volumes of the Memoirs of the Academy 31. For Momigliano's dedication to his deceased mother, and the most explicit allusion to the Shoah in his entire oeuvre, see Momigliano, Alien Wisdom, vi. 32. Momigliano, \"The Introduction of History as an Academic Subject and its Implications,\" in Ottavo contributo (Rome: Storia e Letteratura, 1987), 161-178. rebecca gould222 of Inscriptions.\"33 Through the introduction to antiquarian knowledge afforded by these epigraphic collections, after having realized that the type of historical inquiry inculcated by the university curriculum could not satisfy his deepest dreams, Gibbon was reborn as an antiquarian, and went on to write the greatest synthesizing work of historical antiquarianism known to modernity. When, in his autobiography, Gibbon later reflected on the decline of antiquarian knowledge during his lifetime, the figures he chose to mark this decline, such as Lipsius and Isaac Casaubon, were best known as philologists during their lifetimes. This suggests an unexplored path for antiquarian knowledge that is beyond the scope of this essay but closely related to my engagement with philology's disciplinary history.34 \"In France,\" recalled Gibbon, \"to which my ideas were confined, the learning and language of Greece and Rome were neglected by a philosophic age.\"35 As a consequence of this downgrading of philological knowledge, antiquarian institutions such as the Académie des Inscriptions were \"degraded to the lowest rank among the three royal societies of Paris: the new appellation of Erudits was contemptuously applied to the successors of Lipsius and Casaubon.\"36 To be an érudit was to be the opposite of a historian, which, in the Age of the Enlightenment, meant being passé. In Momigliano's accounting, historical research before modernity was based primarily on textual documentation rather than on archival reconstruction, which was the antiquarian's domain. Histories aimed to reconstruct precise sequences of events chronologically, whereas antiquarians harbored other, temporally more expansive, ambitions. Alongside their methodological divergences, the historian's subject matter differed from that of the antiquarian. Unlike antiquarianism, which dealt in archival minutiae, history dealt in military conquests and defeats and diplomacy between states. Momigliano's student Anthony Grafton has pursued his teacher's insight concerning the antiquarian origins of the modern historian's archive. Grafton has documented over the course of numerous works that the valorization of the archive inaugurated in the early nineteenth century by Leopold von Ranke represents a break with pre-Rankean historiography.37 Antiquarianism from the sixteenth century onwards nonetheless incorporated into itself a specifically early modern variation on \"archive fever.\" The rapture expressed by the seventeenthcentury Orientalist Athanasius Kircher is a case in point, leading his biographer to ask whether \"anyone before Leopold van Ranke\" had ever expressed \"the 33. Momigliano, \"Ancient History and the Antiquarian,\" 285. 34. I refer to my book-in-progress, \"Philology's Contingent Genealogies,\" which reads the oeuvres of Varro, Vico, Benjamin, Momigliano, and Jacob Bernays as part of a broader conversation about philology's disciplinary history. 35. Edward Gibbon, Memoirs of the Life of Edward Gibbon (London: Methuen, 1900), 123; Momigliano, \"Ancient History and the Antiquarian,\" 308. 36. Gibbon, Memoirs, 308. For Casaubon's method, see Benedetto Bravo, \"Critice in the Sixteenth and Seventeenth Centuries and the Rise of the Notion of Historical Criticism,\" in History of Scholarship: A Selection of Papers from the Seminar on the History of Scholarship Held Annually at the Warburg Institute (Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2006), 162-171. 37. In addition to Grafton, \"The Footnote from De Thou to Ranke,\" see the book-length version of this argument: The Footnote: A Curious History (Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, 1999), 34-121. ANTIQUARIANISM AS GENEALOGY 223 dusty pleasures of archival research with so much visceral pleasure.\" Kircher's antiquarian enthusiasm for the archives radiates from the following passage from the introduction to his Oedipus Aegyptiacus (Egyptian Oedipus, 1652–1655): I consider there to be . . . no art so thoroughly extinct or lost, of which no vestige glimmers in some corner of the world unknown to us, or in some foreign library buried under the covering of a foreign language . . . or which, broken up and dispersed in many pieces by the neglect of time, may not be discovered scattered among the ancient authors.38 Everything is retrievable, suggests Kircher, through the antiquarian method. Given the archival resources at the antiquarian's disposal, and the capacity of the emergent science of philology to reconstruct this lost history, early modern antiquarians subscribe to the belief that nothing is permanently lost to time. The intellectual pursuits cultivated by Kircher and his colleagues diverged from those cultivated by their better-patronized historians whose material was easier to access, more within the mainstream of already-extant knowledge, and less altered by the passage of time. First in antiquity and later in early modernity, antiquarians embraced raw and internally chaotic material that seasoned historians could not accept without seeking to restructure the detritus of the past into meaningful wholes. Whereas the antiquarian's archive consisted of epigraphic inscriptions in obscure and sometimes as-yet-to be deciphered languages (consider antiquarians' attraction to Egyptian, Chaldean, Syriac, and other languages that were barely known, if at all, to the university curriculum), the historian's literary material had already been varnished by predecessors, who had effectively eliminated any internal inconsistencies. Momigliano acknowledged history's heavy rhetorical debt to literary genres and styles, even though he was uncomfortable with the way that theorists of historiographical inquiry, such as Hayden White, used this debt to support their arguments for the tropological status of historical knowledge.39 Equally important and less studied is the inverse of this debt: the emergence of antiquarianism from nonliterary evidence, including coins, inscriptions, and other material remnants and ruins that could not be accommodated within the canons of proper literary style. Early modern antiquarianism was literary in that it too cultivated a new form of knowledge. At the same time, compared to the historiographical writing of its era, the early modern antiquarian imagination, calibrated to the unstructured chaos of modern life, worked less easily within the canons of recognized literary forms. As Walter Benjamin has famously documented, early modern antiquarianism's basic object of analysis was the fragment, and its basic vocation was manifested in the collector, who detaches \"the object from its functional relations\" as he goes about assembling his archive.40 38. Translated in Daniel Stolzenberg, Egyptian Oedipus: Athanasius Kircher and the Secrets of Antiquity (Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 2013), 178. 39. For further on the Momigliano–White debate, see Momigliano, \"The Rhetoric of History and the History of Rhetoric: On Hayden White's Tropes,\" in Comparative Criticism: A Yearbook, ed. E. S. Shaffer (Cambridge, UK: Cambridge University Press, 1981), III, 259-268 (and n. 13). 40. Walter Benjamin, The Arcades Project, transl. Howard Eiland and Kevin McLaughlin (Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, 1999), 207. For more extended reflection, see Benjamin's Ursprung des deutschen Trauerspiels (Berlin: Ernst Rowohlt, 1928). For further kinships between Momigliano and Benjamin, see Miller, \"Momigliano, Benjamin, and Antiquarianism.\" rebecca gould224 Momigliano attributed the decline of antiquarianism in part to the way in which history after Gibbon and Mommsen learned to incorporate antiquarian methodologies and to recognize the value of nonliterary evidence (including epigraphy, coins, and ruins) and to distinguish between primary and secondary sources.41 By incorporating synchrony into itself, history transformed and extended its disciplinary identity. Yet these important insights do not tell the full story of antiquarianism's itinerary or of its relevance to contemporary historiographical inquiry. Most important, they do not tell us what happened to antiquarianism after \"history became a way of seeing how the world was formed, how man came about, what religion and morality were,\" and even came to eclipse other ways of reading the past.42 Once history became what Momigliano calls \"a complicated substitute for revelation\" in the nineteenth century, was there any work left for antiquarianism, or for its distant cousin, philology? Momigliano knew that antiquarianism was concerned with more than the mindless collection of data, that it was possessed of a unique disciplinary logic that could not be subsumed (even when it was assimilated) by history. As a historian, Momigliano was well aware of the logic specific to the antiquarian mind and its capacity for embracing human contingency. Yet this awareness was never fully reconciled to the oeuvre of a historian whose life task was, in the words of his student Peter Brown, \"to maintain truth in historical studies.\"43 A tension was always present in the form of an unresolved question, which may indeed have prevented Momigliano from fully explicating the implications of his history/antiquarian distinction for the future history of disciplinary knowledge. In other work produced at the Warburg, Momigliano argued that ancient history had lost the role it possessed until the eighteenth century as our primary source of knowledge, not only concerning the past, but also with respect to the future. Momigliano made this point in his study of the German Hellenist Friedrich Creuzer (1771–1858), a scholar known for his idiosyncratic combination of mythography, historiography, and philology influential during his lifetime, but largely forgotten in subsequent centuries.44 Like his inaugural study of antiquarian knowledge, Momigliano's article on Creuzer was composed soon after his wartime emigration to England, and thus was conceived at a pivotal juncture in his life. But in the Momiglianian genealogy of modern historiography, Gibbon stands out most prominently as the last historian who, by combining the craft of 41. On the antiquarian distinction between primary and secondary sources, see Momigliano, \"Ancient History and the Antiquarian,\" 286, and Simon Ditchfield, Liturgy, Sanctity and History in Tridentine Italy: Pietro Maria Campi and the Preservation of the Particular (Cambridge, UK: Cambridge University Press, 1995), 12. 42. Momigliano, \"The Introduction of History as an Academic Subject and its Implications,\" 202. 43. Peter Brown, \"Remembering Arnaldo,\" American Scholar 57, no. 2 (1988), 252. Brown notably dedicated one of his best-known works, The Body and Society (New York: Columbia University Press, 1988), to Momigliano's memory. 44. Momigliano, \"Friedrich Creuzer and Greek Historiography,\" Journal of the Warburg and Courtauld Institutes 9 (1946), 152-163. In the wake of Momigliano's work, Creuzer's achievement has attracted more attention. See Josine H. Blok, \"Quests for a Scientific Mythology: F. Creuzer and K. O. Müller on History and Myth,\" History and Theory 33, no. 4 (1994), 26-52, and Stephen N. Larsen, \"Friedrich Creuzer and the Study of Antiquity\" (PhD diss., Princeton University, 2008). ANTIQUARIANISM AS GENEALOGY 225 the historian with the empirical passions of the antiquarian, was able to generate interpretations of antiquity that made that past indispensable for the future.45 By merging antiquarian methods with history, The Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire (1776–1788) heralded the decline of one discipline, antiquarianism, and its replacement by a newly reconfigured discipline of history that borrowed heavily from the form of knowledge it had replaced, frequently without acknowledgment. Much of Momigliano's work on the historian/antiquarian relation was published only posthumously. The most provocative discussion of this topic among Momigliano's published works, his Sather lectures, had to wait decades for publication, notwithstanding their considerable impact on the auditors who were lucky enough to hear them delivered at the University of California, Berkeley, in 1962.46 Perhaps Momigliano delayed the publication of this magnum opus for so many years because he was overwhelmed by the scope of his project, and challenged by the task of synthesizing it into a coherent whole. That Momigliano was awed by the magnitude of the task he had set himself is suggested by his description, in a 1967 letter to the Marxist philologist Sebastiano Timpanaro, of his life's work as having been preoccupied by three themes: \"the influence of Greco-Roman and Jewish historical thought on subsequent generations of historical thought; the organization that ancient political and social structures provided or didn't provide to stabilize peace and to ensure freedom of action and of discussion; [and] the position of Jews and of Jewish civilization [civilità ebraica] in the ancient world and after.\"47 For Momigliano to have assembled the Sather lectures into publishable form during his lifetime would have meant writing his own epitaph. With respect to the project that Momigliano lists first among his lifelong preoccupations, of illuminating the impact of Greco-Roman and Jewish historiography on modern historiographical inquiry, he promises Timpanaro that this theme will \"stand out more clearly in the still unpublished Sather lectures.\" Although Momigliano's vision of antiquarianism and its location within the history of the disciplines was elucidated when these lectures were published, the illumination did not arrive until nearly a quarter-century after the promise was made. As the use made here of Foucauldian genealogy is intended to suggest, even though Momigliano's impact on classical and early modern historiography has been substantial and widely acknowledged, Momiglianian antiquarianism still awaits recognition within the theoretically oriented subdisciplines of historical inquiry, including those, such as critical theory, that engage with the philosophy of history without conceiving of themselves as \"historical\" per se. 45. \"Edward Gibbon fuori e dentro la cultura italiana,\" Studi romani 24 (1976), 9-23; \"Gibbon from an Italian Point of View,\" Daedalus 105, no. 3 (1976), 125-135; \"Gibbon's Contribution to Historical Method,\" Historia: Zeitschrift für Alte Geschichte 2, no. 4 (1954), 450-463. 46. For the impact of Momigliano's genealogy on John Howland Rowe, a historian of anthropology's origins who was a professor at Berkeley when Momigliano delivered his lectures, see his two articles: \"The Renaissance Foundations of Anthropology,\" American Anthropologist n.s. 67 (1965), 1-20, esp. p. 15, n.1, and \"Ethnography and Ethnology in the Sixteenth Century,\" Kroeber Anthropological Society Papers 30 (1964), 1-19. 47. \"Il primo interesse dovrebbe apparire più nitidamente nelle Sather Lectres ancora inedite.\" Cited in Riccardo Di Donato, \"Filologia, marxismo, guerre e altro: dal carteggio Momigliano-Timpanaro,\" La Gazzetta di Pisa 3, no. 7/3 (March 2001), 2-3. rebecca gould226 In addition to obscuring the force of Momigliano's vision, the sporadic publication history of Momigliano's disciplinary genealogy has made it difficult to fully assess the lineage the Italian historian postulated leading from Herodotus and Varro to the modern social sciences. Recent scholarship has drawn attention to the visionary aspects of Momigliano's thinking on this topic, thereby giving credence to Peter Miller's argument that Momigliano authorized his genealogy \"in such an offhand way, in a publication that appeared so long after most people had formed their impression of his notion of antiquarianism, that its call has not been heard, let alone heeded.\"48 Even as the implications of genealogy for Momigliano's method remain unexamined, the existing scholarship on Momiglianian antiquarianism has also not yet come to terms with the fragmentary status of Momigliano's publications on this subject. For a topic so central to his life's work, the slow pace of this highly productive scholar's writings on antiquarianism is somewhat unusual. Momigliano never systematized his genealogy of the disciplines in a scholarly monograph or other comprehensive study. Archival research, of the sort underway at Pisa-based Archivio Arnaldo Momigliano, will surely shed more light on Momigliano's contributions to the history of antiquarian knowledge.49 But a full reconstruction will need to go beyond examining Momigliano's own statements, published and unpublished, and engage with the primary sources on which the greatest modern historian of ancient historical knowledge based his morphology of disciplinary knowledge. We will need, in short, to adopt a Foucauldian perspective on the oeuvre generated by this theorist of modern knowledge forms. Like a latter-day antiquarian, Momigliano violates many conventions of modern academic historiography. He melds past and present with seemingly effortless grace. As if channeling Herodotus into his writing style, Momigliano inserts his historical self into the historian's narrative. Also like Herodotus, Momigliano resists, sometimes vociferously, attempts to reduce history to mere assemblages of dates and names. He prefers instead to emphasize biography. One of the best treatments of Momigliano's method, by G. W. Bowersock, is tellingly entitled \"Momigliano's Quest for the Person.\"50 As Peter Brown accurately noted, Momigliano distinguished himself from his immediate predecessors in the field of the study of Roman antiquity, Mikhail Rostovtzeff, Ronald Syme, and Hugo Jones, because \"he felt that they overlooked that all-important residuum of human 48. Peter N. Miller, \"Introduction: Momigliano, Antiquarianism, and the Cultural Sciences,\" in Miller, ed., Momigliano and Antiquarianism, 52. Among other recent considerations of Momigliano's genealogy, the work of Mark Salber Phillips is noteworthy. See his \"Reconsiderations on History and Antiquarianism: Arnaldo Momigliano and the Historiography of Eighteenth-Century Britain,\" Journal of the History of Ideas 57, no. 2 (1996), 297-316. 49. As the recently published catalog of Momigliano's Pisa archive indicates, vast quantities of Momigliano's writings and correspondence still await publication. See Giovanna Granata, L'Archivio Arnaldo Momigliano: Inventario Analitico (Rome: Edizioni di Storia e Letteratura, 2006). Further unpublished work may be expected from the tenth contributo (in preparation for publication, according to the statement of Riccardo Di Donato, in Miller, ed., Momigliano and Antiquarianism, 68) and Peace and Liberty in the Ancient World: The Cambridge Lectures 1940 (Cambridge, UK: Cambridge University Press, forthcoming). 50. G. W. Bowersock, \"Momigliano's Quest for the Person,\" in The Presence of the Historian: Essays in Memory of Arnaldo Momigliano, History and Theory, Beiheft 30 (1991), 27-36. ANTIQUARIANISM AS GENEALOGY 227 motivation.\"51 When we conceive of Momigliano as a historian whose antiquarian predilections prevent him from erasing his own historicity from his narratives, we are in a better position to understand how the antiquarian method, when applied to modern historiography, can obliterate the distance that conditions and constitutes modern historical inquiry and that lies at the very foundation of historical objectivity.52 In Momigliano's perception, the tension between history and the antiquarian imagination gives rise to new knowledge, and not merely to the destruction of old methodologies. Scholars prior to Momigliano had noted that ancient άρχαιολογία (archeology) as a discipline was preeminently concerned with \"the genealogies of heroes and men and the early foundations of cities.\"53 But Momigliano's readings of άρχαιολογία in ancient Greece and antiquitates in ancient Rome and medieval Europe imparted to an ongoing inquiry a conceptual coherence that, for the first time in modern disciplinary history, could forcefully transform an entire discipline. Antiquarian knowledge as narrated through the Momiglianian prism is crucial to any genealogy of the disciplines, including the Foucauldian one, inasmuch as, more than any other discipline, antiquarianism foregrounds the forms of knowledge history traditionally excluded from its purview. Taking account of epigraphy, numismatics, and other nonliterary artifacts that enter the historiographical record by way of temporal difference (diachrony) rather than through filiation and narrative interest (synchrony), antiquarianism is in potentia a critique of actually existing historiography. It is an argument in favor of the fragment, an appeal to uncertainty, an argument that discerns agency, and hence freedom, not in the ability of retrospective interpreters to ascertain the facts beyond a doubt, but in the ability of archival excavations to instill wonder and awe in those who make their findings lucid to the world.54 Wonder and awe are of course inevitably accompanied by doubt, and herein lies the Achilles' heel of Momiglianian genealogy. For even if it were true that early modern antiquarians \"could justly congratulate themselves that the quality and quantity of the documents they used conferred on the knowledge of the past a greater certainty than that extracted from literary sources\" in their methodological drive for \"greater certainty,\" early modern antiquarians were by no means carrying on the traditions pioneered by their ancient predecessors, who were more concerned with instilling doubt than with establishing certainty.55 Herodotus's invocation of the words of Solon, king of Athens, to the Lydian king Croesus, is instructive in this regard. When asked by the arrogant Lydian king to ratify his 51. Brown, \"Remembering Arnaldo,\" 252. 52. For a stimulating consideration of distance as a normative aspect of post-Romanticist historiography, see, among others, Mark Philips, \"Relocating Inwardness: Historical Distance and the Transition from Enlightenment to Romantic Historiography,\" PMLA 118 (2003), 436-449. 53. Eduard Norden, Agnostos Theos: Untersuchungen zur Formengeschichte religiöser Rede (Stuttgart: Teubner, 1956), 372. 54. Compare Walter Benjamin on a story told by Herodotus in his essay on the storyteller: \"This story from ancient Egypt [by Herodotus] is still capable of arousing astonishment [Staunen] and thoughtfulness [Nachdenken]\" (Benjamin, \"Der Erzähler,\" Gesammelte Schriften-Werkausgabe [Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 1980], 445-446). 55. Riccardo Di Donato, \"Momigliano from Antiquarianism to Cultural History,\" in Miller, ed., Momigliano and Antiquarianism, 75. rebecca gould228 belief that he was the happiest man in the world, Solon replies in an instructively contrarian fashion that indexes the importance Herodotus places on uncertainty as a condition of intellectual inquiry. \"Croesus,\" says Solon, \"human life is pure chance. You seem to be very wealthy, and you rule over many people, but I cannot yet tell you the answer you asked for until I learn how you ended your life\" (1.32.4-5). On encountering these strategically situated lines, the reader is confronted with this ancient antiquarian's epistemic goal. As indicated in Solon's advice to Croesus, this agenda was more interested in instilling doubt, of reminding readers and listeners of the contingent conditions through which their knowledge about the past is constituted, than in establishing certainty. Indeed, had he been able to witness the life taken by the discipline he helped to found, Herodotus would likely have criticized the modern historical quest for fetishizing certainty. Momigliano endorsed modern historiography's sanctification of certainty, and sought to buttress it through the application of antiquarian methods to historical inquiry. For Herodotus, the quest for certainty would have signified inexcusable hubris on a par with Xerxes' refusal to heed Artobanus's advice against waging war on the Athenians, an act that ultimately brought about the defeat of the Persian empire (7.10.3; 7.50.2). Hence, at least with respect to the most important antiquarian of ancient Greece, it needs to be acknowledged, pace Momigliano, that the alignment between antiquarianism and the quest for certainty is not internally consistent, unless the impossibility of knowing can be regarded as a form of certainty in its own right, and methodological inquiry can be structured according to this insight. Because he so closely aligned himself with the historical quest for certainty (while distancing himself from, or simply refusing to recognize, the antiquarian cultivation of doubt), Momigliano never fully cognized the disjuncture between ancient antiquarians' embrace of contingency and early modern antiquarians' quest for certain knowledge. At the same time, Momigliano did go some distance toward recognizing the hermeneutical-and not merely the historical or archival-value of antiquarian knowledge, even when he focused on early modern antiquarianism. In the groundbreaking 1950 article that launched a new subfield of inquiry, Momigliano wrote that early modern antiquarians revealed \"how to use non-literary evidence, but they also made people reflect on the difference between collecting facts and interpreting facts.\"56 By increasing the scope for interpretation in engaging with the past, early modern antiquarians constituted themselves as true heirs to the Herodotian emphasis on doubt. Given Momigliano's abiding interest in history as a means of establishing truth, it goes without saying that the foregoing attempt to vindicate Momigliano's conception of antiquarian knowledge as a form of negative historical inquiry, and as a destruction of certain kinds of historical certainties, requires reading Momigliano the historian against the grain (an activity perhaps more attractive to a scholar of literature, such as myself, than to scholars with other disciplinary affiliations). At the same time, Momigliano's occasional revelations of his anti56. Momigliano, \"Ancient History and the Antiquarian,\" 286. See also on this aspect of Momigliano's methodology, Karl Christ, \"Arnaldo Momigliano and the History of Historiography,\" History and Theory, Beiheft 30 (1991), 5-12. ANTIQUARIANISM AS GENEALOGY 229 quarian self, particularly in his autobiographical writings, as well as his frequently articulated kinship for the renegade antiquarians from Herodotus to Foucault who have haunted the modern historiographical project, suggest that this contradictory intellectual might not have found such a contrarian reading of his oeuvre entirely alien. Momigliano's insights concerning the attractions of antiquarian knowledge in a post-historical age-an age that looks on positivism with increasing skepticism, and that is likely to find more use in the varieties of doubt and contingency than in mirages of certainty-add further substance to such a reading. Throughout his voluminous oeuvre, Momigliano explored and also modified the proposition he first advanced in 1950 that the modern social sciences originated in the ancient antiquarianism of Herodotus, Dionysus of Halicarnassus, and Varro. According to Momigliano's trajectory, antiquarianism breathed its last in response to the so-called Pyrrhonist crisis of the sixteenth to eighteenth centuries, when, due in part to Descartes and Bacon, the possibility of attaining certain knowledge was permanently called into question.57 Culminating in Hume, this new movement derived from Sextus Empiricus, a Hellenistic philosopher whom the major historian of modern skepticism, Richard Popkin, has labeled \"obscure and unoriginal\" although even by Popkin's assessment Sextus had a \"dramatic role in the formation of modern thought.\"58 The antiquarian response to the new Empiricism asserted the value and indeed the necessity of certain knowledge based on the resources of material culture. Numismatics, archeology, textual criticism, and other synchronic methodologies were all either invented or revived during the early modern period, on the basis of ancient collections of epigraphy and other forms of material culture. In spite, or perhaps precisely because, of their dependence on their antiquarian predecessors, Joseph Justus Scaliger (c. 1609) and Giambattista Vico (d. 1744) radically revised ancient precedents.59 Their revisions were accomplished through feats of hermeneutical exegesis, in Vico's case of Roman law, in Scaliger's case of ancient chronology.60 As much as separates the agendas of Herodotus, Varro, Vico, Scaliger, and other major early modern antiquarians who have gone unmentioned here, such as Mabillon (d. 1707) and Montfaucon (d. 1741), Momiglianian antiquarianism, in the revisionary account I have presented here, accommodates, and is enriched by, them all. ANTIQUARIANISM AS GLOBAL KNOWLEDGE FORM Although attention to the antiquarianisms of Europe and Greek antiquity has occupied the bulk of this essay, Asian and Islamicate antiquarianisms have as 57. For an alternative periodization (which questions Momigliano's account), see Markus Völkel, \"Pyrrhonismus historicus\" und \"fides historica\": die Entwicklung der deutschen historischen Methodologie unter dem Gesichtspunkt der historischen Skepsis (Frankfurt: Lang, 1987), 342-344. 58. Richard H. Popkin, History of Scepticism from Erasmus to Spinoza (Berkeley: University of California Press, 1979), 19. 59. Scaliger's most immediate predecessor in this regard was Crates of Mallon; Vico's predecessors were Varro and Augustine. The debates among these figures, internal to the field of antiquarian philology, are discussed in Philology's Contingent Genealogies (see n. 33 above). 60. Worth noting with respect to the ancient/early modern antiquarian connection is M. Terenti Varronis Opera cum notis J. Scaligeri (Paris: A. Turnebi, 1585). rebecca gould230 much to contribute to our conceptualization of antiquarian knowledge as to the emergent critique of modern historical knowledge forms. Non-European antiquarianisms have been as revolutionary in their own milieus as Herodotus's insistence on doubt and the early modern antiquarian quest for certainty were within their respective worlds.61 In disciplinary terms, antiquarianism extends the very meaning and purpose of historical inquiry, by extending the range of legitimate sources, changing the questions that can be posed of material from the past, and shifting the terms according to which the answers are evaluated. In contemporary terms, antiquarianism gives life to the ancient vocation of criticism, which, more in eras past than in times present, has at its most powerful been both historically and philologically inflected.62 None of these functions can reasonably be restricted to any single geography. Once we grasp the mutual debts of antiquarianism and criticism in terms of Momigliano's disciplinary trajectory, antiquarianism's potential to realize itself in contemporary contexts will be unleashed. Friedrich Nietzsche famously warned that antiquarianism can be reduced to \"a blind mania for collecting [Sammelwut], a restless compiling of everything that has ever existed.\"63 Yet in that very movement toward the antiquarian alternative to history-conceived in modern terms as archival reconstruction driven by a passion for the obscure, the forgotten, the oppressed, and the otherwise unassimilated-another form of knowledge stands revealed. The bricoleur figure put forward by French anthropologist Claude LéviStrauss shares with Momigliano's antiquarian, Foucault's genealogist, and Benjamin's collector a special relationship to mythical thought as well as a particular methodology. Most congruently with the ways of knowing cultivated by antiquarians, the bricoleur goes about his work of assembling into systems the fragments that cross his path without taking account of the \"availability of raw materials and tools conceived and procured for the purposes of a project.\"64 A defining characteristic of the bricoleur's methodology is thus that, because his knowledge is constituted from fragments, it is uniquely capable of transcending the time-space coordinates within which it is generated. In my view, this peculiarity goes some distance toward explaining why antiquarian knowledge is better suited to understanding the diversity of world culture, and more adept at dealing with cultural difference, than are the more conservative strains of historical knowledge. The Herodotus/Thucydides contrast that has structured this essay, and that structured much of Momigliano's work, is an obvious illustration of the global 61. Modern scholarship of Asian antiquarianism, particularly that which takes account of Momigliano's intervention, is still in its infancy. The most important recent contribution to this emerging field of inquiry is Antiquarianism and Intellectual Life in Europe and China, 1500–1800, ed. Peter N. Miller and François Louis (Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press, 2012). See also Tamara Chin, \"Antiquarian as Ethnographer: Han Ethnicity in Early China Studies,\" in Critical Han Studies: The History, Representation, and Identity of China's Majority, ed. Thomas Mullaney et al. (Berkeley: University of California Press, 2012). 62. For a brilliant account of the emergence of the concept of criticism in relation to antiquarianism (here in the guise of philology) and history, see Bravo, \"Critice in the Sixteenth and Seventeenth Centuries and the Rise of the Notion of Historical Criticism.\" 63. Friedrich Nietzsche, Werke in drei Bänden, ed. Karl Schlechta (Munich: Carl Hanser Verlag, 1954), I, 228. 64. Claude Lévi-Strauss, The Savage Mind (Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1966), 17. ANTIQUARIANISM AS GENEALOGY 231 scope of antiquarian knowledge, given Herodotus's unchallenged reputation as the most globally attuned writer of Greek antiquity as compared to Thucydides' comparative lack of interest in non-Greek civilizations, but there are others. When Momigliano wrote as a historian, he wrote of ancient Rome, Greece, early modern Europe: subjects that were close to home. When Momigliano wrote as an antiquarian, he wrote of the strange and unfamiliar, of that which was, by definition, impossible to know. The comparative globality of the antiquarian imagination when juxtaposed to the comparative provincialism of the historical imagination helps to clarify antiquarianism's contribution to the synchronically organized comparative social sciences, and in particular to the discipline of anthropology, which has been and continues to be more global in scope than mainstream historiography. (History is arguably the most diverse discipline within the humanities, encompassing nearly all geographies and all ways of knowing, but the point here is simply that the dominant modes of knowing within mainstream historiography are not generally informed by non-European archives.) Herodotus is of course also claimed by the discipline of anthropology, and often with the same enthusiasm that he is assimilated into the canon of history's history.65 Momigliano himself compellingly exemplifies the global outlook facilitated by antiquarian knowledge, for one of the most underappreciated aspects of his intellectual achievements is his deep reading in and knowledge of non-European traditions, which enabled Momigliano to generate profound (if brief) comparative accounts of global historical knowledge.66 During those rare but priceless moments in his oeuvre when Momigliano engaged in comparative reflections on global historiography, the results were striking. Rather than posit the GrecoRoman or European historiographical tradition as the absolute-although he might have been expected to do so, given that these were the areas of his primary expertise-Momigliano consistently viewed Asian and Islamic historiographical traditions on their own terms. In \"Tradition and the Classical Historian\" (1972), Momigliano invoked classical Islamic, Chinese, and Danish historiography to tell us not how they fell short of the Greco-Roman tradition, but to indicate with greater precision the various qualities that the Greco-Roman tradition lacked.67 When Momigliano ponders the problem that has often bedeviled Indologists, and that was famously flagged by Hegel in his lectures on the philosophy of history, concerning the lack of a robust historiographical tradition in premodern India (aside from Islamic historiographies composed primarily in Persian), his comments reflect the antiquarian tendency to understand cultural and historical difference pluralistically, in terms of their own time and place, to approach the seemingly anomalous with humility, and to refrain from engaging in grandiose absolutist and essentialist claims about civilizational difference of the kind that 65. See, for example, James Redfield, \"Herodotus the Tourist,\" Classical Philology 80, no. 2 (1985), 97-118. Redfield incidentally thanks Momigliano for his comments on this essay in his introductory note (p. 97). 66. Grafton alludes to Momigliano's reading of classical Chinese historiography in \"Arnaldo Momigliano: A Pupil's Notes,\" American Scholar 60, no. 2 (1991), 238. 67. Arnaldo Momigliano, \"Tradition and the Classical Historian,\" History and Theory 11, no. 3 (1972), 284. rebecca gould232 the more prolific nineteenth-century historians used to buttress their methodologies. Resisting all of these temptations to which many of his fellow historians succumbed (not least among them Hegel, when he wrote in a self-consciously historicist mode), Momigliano reflects with astonishing accuracy on this problem of the absence of an indigenous historiographical tradition in Indian history, considering how far the subject lies from his actual expertise. \"The poverty of Indian historiography,\" Momigliano writes, \"must be judged with reference to a world in which normally history counted far less than it counts now: indeed history, rather than determining the character of civilization, was normally inferior to religion, rhetoric, poetry, philosophy, and derived its values from them.\"68 Momigliano's methodological response to the problem of the supposed \"absence\" of Indian history presumes no deep erudition concerning Indian knowledge systems.69 It does, however, presume a brilliantly sophisticated framework for engaging in global comparison. The much more common historiographical move (and the one to which, as noted, Hegel succumbed) would have been to present European modernity, when historical discourse was naturalized as a condition for civilizational attainment, as the comparative norm, and to find all civilizations that fell short of this standard to be lacking. Instead of pursuing this conventional path, Momigliano defamiliarizes Europe. He makes strange the world that would make the existence of a robust historiographical tradition into a norm. Such is the antiquarian imagination in action. Some theorists of historical knowledge would argue that such acts of defamiliarization are cultivated by history in general, without presuming any debt to antiquarian inquiry. I would argue to the contrary that history is only favorable to defamiliarization when it is enriched by the antiquarian method, and that all too frequently historians neglect the substantial benefits conferred on their discipline by antiquarian knowledge. The failure of many historians to live up to the broad-minded norms exemplified by Herodotus, Foucault, and Momigliano is largely a function of history's suppression of antiquarian knowledge in consequence of its quest for absolute truth. Momigliano would of course have disagreed with some of the assessments offered here, particularly with respect to his own work. He would have insisted that it was the antiquarians who, even more than the historians, made possible the pursuit of certain knowledge about the events of times past, and, further, that the search for truth necessarily figures into any ethically grounded engagement with the past. These divergences are not matters that can be easily, or even fruitfully, resolved. Rather than seeking to clarify the status of truth in Momigliano's historiography, which many commentators have shown to be central to his intellectual agenda, I have sought to highlight the importance of doubt, a value that in my view permeates Momigliano's work, if less explicitly than the concern for truth, and that is aligned with his profoundly philosophical awareness of the contingency of human knowledge. 68. Arnaldo Momigliano, \"Remarks on Eastern History Writing,\" in Terzo contributo alla storia degli studi classici e del mondo antico (Rome: Ed. di Storia e Letteratura, 1966), 236. 69. The most compelling recent engagement with this problem from the perspective of South Asian studies is Ranajit Guha, History at the Limit of World-History (New York: Columbia University Press, 2003). ANTIQUARIANISM AS GENEALOGY 233 Momigliano's writings do not suggest any extensive conscious engagement with doubt, certainly not with the same intensity as can be observed in Herodotus (see, for example, 7.54.3), or in other, later products of the antiquarian imagination. Yet one of Momigliano's most influential students, the classicist Peter Brown, who consistently describes himself as a historian (rather than an antiquarian), nonetheless has articulated the purpose of historical knowledge in ways that strikingly resemble his teacher's methodological humility, and that evoke Momigliano's ability to empathize with the unknown, the distant, and the foreign. Reflecting on the benefits of historicizing one's own self, Brown writes, \"A little history . . . counters the amiable tendency of learned persons to think of themselves as if they were hang-gliders, hovering silently and with Olympian ease above their field.\"70 In Brown's view, one purpose of history, and particularly histories of our selves, is to teach us that \"we are in no way different from the historical figures whom we study in the distant past: we are embodied human beings caught in the unrelenting particularity of space and time.\" The unrelenting particularity of space and time, of human contingency, human freedom, and the eternal recurrence of doubt, is the domain of antiquarian knowledge. From the point of view of disciplinary critique, and of the disciplinary genealogies on which Momigliano and Foucault were embarked, the value of antiquarianism lies less in its actual yield than in the paths it forges for new forms of intellectual inquiry. Antiquarianism enables the persistent critique of history. It helps us read history against itself. It considers events, people, places, and things in their singularity, as fragments that may or may not cohere into a whole. In chronicling in Foucauldian fashion the normativity of institutions, and in refusing to treat them as immune to the vagaries of power, it offers ways of thinking outside bureaucratic structures, such as the state. Antiquarian inquiry enables material to transform method, and trains humanists and social scientists alike to confront the epistemic consequences of human contingency, even as they seek to reconcile the need for certainty with the ethical advantages of doubt. Rather than positing the perfectibility of the human intellect, antiquarianism recognizes what is not knowable. Frequently, scientifically oriented disciplines in their more positivist phases militate against the humility cultivated by Momigliano and Brown. As perhaps the last great historian to traverse the disparate domains of antiquarianism and history with equal grace, Momigliano's vision enables scholars to reclaim antiquarianism as their rightful vocation among the diversity of humanistic knowledge forms. Momigliano's antiquarian genealogy, like his genealogical antiquarianism, helps those of us concerned with the future of the past and the history of the present to insure that our quests for certain knowledge never lose sight of the contingency of all things human. Yale-NUS College Singapore 70. Peter Brown, A Life of Learning (New York: American Council of Learned Societies, 2003), 6 for this and the following quotation."}
{"meta": {"title": "Applied Ontology: An Introduction", "type": "info:eu-repo/semantics/book", "creator": "Smith, Barry", "subject": "Philosophy", "description": "Ontology is the philosophical discipline which aims to understand how things in the world are divided into categories and how these categories are related together. This is exactly what information scientists aim for in creating structured, automated representations, called 'ontologies,' for managing information in fields such as science, government, industry, and healthcare. Currently, these systems are designed in a variety of different ways, so they cannot share data with one another. They are often idiosyncratically structured, accessible only to those who created them, and unable to serve as inputs for automated reasoning. This volume shows, in a nontechnical way and using examples from medicine and biology, how the rigorous application of theories and insights from philosophical ontology can improve the ontologies upon which information management depends.", "date": "2008", "identifier": "oai:philarchive.org/rec/DORAOA", "language": "zz", "datestamp": "2017-10-23T19:39:03Z"}, "text": "Ontology is the philosophical discipline which aims to understand how things in the world are divided into categories and how these categories are related together. This is exactly what information scientists aim for in creating structured, automated representations, called 'ontologies,' for managing information in fields such as science, government, industry, and healthcare. Currently, these systems are designed in a variety of different ways, so they cannot share data with one another. They are often idiosyncratically structured, accessible only to those who created them, and unable to serve as inputs for automated reasoning. This volume shows, in a nontechnical way and using examples from medicine and biology, how the rigorous application of theories and insights from philosophical ontology can improve the ontologies upon which information management depends. Distributed in North and South America by Transaction Books ISBN 978-3-938793-98-5 M E T A P H Y S IC A L R E S E A R C H E d it ed b y M ar ia E . R ei ch er * Jo h an n a S ei b t B ar ry S m it h * D an ie l v o n W ac h te r Katherine Munn Barry Smith (Eds.) Applied Ontology An Introduction K at h er in e M u n n , B ar ry S m it h (E d s. ) A p p li ed O n to lo g y * ontos verlag9 7 8 3 9 3 8 7 9 3 9 8 5 Katherine Munn, Barry Smith Applied Ontology An Introduction M E T A P H Y S I C A L R E S E A R C H Herausgegeben von / Edited by Uwe Meixner • Johanna Seibt Barry Smith • Daniel von Wachter Band 8 / Volume 9 Katherine Munn, Barry Smith Applied Ontology An Introduction Bibliographic information published by the Deutsche Nationalbibliothek The Deutsche Nationalbibliothek lists this publication in the Deutsche Nationalbibliografie; detailed bibliographic data are available in the Internet at http://dnb.d-nb.de. North and South America by Transaction Books Rutgers University Piscataway, NJ 08854-8042 trans@transactionpub.com United Kingdom, Eire, Iceland, Turkey, Malta, Portugal by Gazelle Books Services Limited White Cross Mills Hightown LANCASTER, LA1 4XS sales@gazellebooks.co.uk Livraison pour la France et la Belgique: Librairie Philosophique J.Vrin 6, place de la Sorbonne; F-75005 PARIS Tel. +33 (0)1 43 54 03 47; Fax +33 (0)1 43 54 48 18 www.vrin.fr 2008 ontos verlag P.O. Box 15 41, D-63133 Heusenstamm www.ontosverlag.com ISBN 978-3-938793-98-5 2008 No part of this book may be reproduced, stored in retrieval systems or transmitted in any form or by any means, electronic, mechanical, photocopying, microfilming, recording or otherwise without written permission from the Publisher, with the exception of any material supplied specifically for the purpose of being entered and executed on a computer system, for exclusive use of the purchaser of the work Printed on acid-free paper FSC-certified (Forest Stewardship Council) Printed in Germany by buch bücher dd ag\n\nTable of Contents Introduction: What is Ontology for? Katherine Munn 7 Acknowledgments 20 1. Bioinformatics and Philosophy Barry Smith and Bert Klagges 21 2. What Is Formal Ontology? Boris Hennig 39 3. A Primer on Knowledge Management and Ontological Engineering Pierre Grenon 57 4. New Desiderata for Biomedical Terminologies Barry Smith 83 5. The Benefits of Realism: A Realist Logic with Applications Barry Smith 109 6. A Theory of Granular Partitions Thomas Bittner and Barry Smith 125 7. Classifications Ludger Jansen 159 8. Categories: The Top-Level Ontology Ludger Jansen 173 9. The Classification of Living Beings Peter Heuer and Boris Hennig 197 10. Ontological Relations Ulf Schwarz and Barry Smith 219 11. Four Kinds of 'Is_A' Relation Ingvar Johansson 235 12. Occurrents Boris Hennig 255 13. Bioinformatics and Biological Reality Ingvar Johansson 285 References 311 Index 329 Introduction: What is Ontology for? Katherine Munn If you are reading this, then chances are you are a philosopher, an information scientist, or a natural scientist who uses automated information systems to store or manage data. What these disciplines have in common is their goal of increasing our knowledge about the world, and improving the quality of the information we already have. Knowledge, when handled properly, is to a great extent cumulative. Once we have it, we can use it to secure a wider and deeper array of further knowledge, and also to correct the errors we make as we go along. In this way, knowledge contributes to its own expansion and refinement. But this is only possible if what we know is recorded in such a way that it can quickly and easily be retrieved, and understood, by those who need it. This book is a collaborative effort by philosophers and information scientists to show how our methods of doing these things can be improved. This introduction aims, in a non-technical fashion, to present the issues arising at the junction of philosophical ontology and information science, in the hope of providing a framework for understanding the essays included in the volume. Imagine a brilliant scientist who solves a major theoretical problem. In one scenario he scribbles his theory on a beer mat, sharing it only with his drinking companions. In this scenario, very few scientists will have the ability to incorporate this discovery into their research. Even were they to find out that the solution exists, they may not have the resources, time, or patience to track it down. In another scenario our scientist publishes his solution in a widely read journal, but has written it in such a sloppy and meandering way that virtually no one can decipher it without expending prohibitive amounts of effort. In this scenario, more scientists will have access to his discovery, and may even dimly recognize it as the truth, but may only understand it imperfectly. No matter how brilliant our scientist is, or how intricately he himself understands his discovery, if he fails to convey it to the scientific community in such a way that they have ready access to it and can understand it, unfortunately that community will not benefit from what he has discovered. The moral of this story is that the means by which knowledge is conveyed are every bit as important as that knowledge itself. The authors' goal in producing this book has been to show how philosophy and information science can learn from one another, so as to create better methodologies for recording and organizing our knowledge about the world. Our interest lies in the representation of this knowledge by automated information systems such as computerized terminologies and taxonomies, electronic databases, and other knowledge representation systems. Today's automation of knowledge representation presents challenges of a nature entirely different from any faced by researchers, librarians or archivists of the pre-computer age. Before discussing the unique challenges posed by automated systems for storing knowledge, we must say a few brief words about the term 'knowledge'. We are not using this term in a sense corresponding to most philosophical theories. What these theories have in common is the requirement that, in order for a belief or a state of mind to count as knowledge, it must connect the person to the truth. That is, a belief or a state of mind counts as knowledge only if its representational content corresponds with the way the world is. Most philosophical theories add the condition that this correspondence must be non-accidental: there must be a causal relation between the belief and its being the case; the person must base the belief on a certain kind of evidence or justification, and so forth (pick your theory). The sense of 'knowledge' used in information science is more relaxed. Terms such as 'knowledge engineering' and 'knowledge management' do not refer to knowledge in the sense of a body of beliefs that are apodictically true, but of a body of beliefs which the scientific community has good reason to believe are true and thus treats in every respect as if they are true. Most researchers recognize that some of these highly justified beliefs are not, in fact, knowledge in the strict sense, since further scientific development could show them to be false. Recognizing this is part of what drives research forward; for part of the goal of research is to cause the number of false beliefs to decrease and the number and nuance of true beliefs to increase. The information stored in automated systems constitutes knowledge in the sense of beliefs which we have every reason to believe are true, but to which we will not adhere dogmatically should we obtain overruling reasons to believe otherwise. (We will often use 'information' in the same sense as 'knowledge'.) This approach, called realist fallibilism, combines a healthy intellectual humility with the conviction that humans can take measures to procure true beliefs about the world. So much for 'knowledge'. What does it mean to store or represent knowledge? (We will use these terms interchangeably.) Say that you have a 8 bit of knowledge, i.e., a belief that meets all the requirements for knowledge. To store or represent it is to put it into a form in which it can be retained and communicated within a community. Knowledge has been stored in such forms as words, hieroglyphs, mnemonics, graphs, oral tradition, and cave scratching. In all of these forms, knowledge can be communicated, passed on, or otherwise conveyed, from one human being to another. Automated information systems pose unprecedented challenges to the task of storing knowledge. In the same way that knowledge is represented on the pages of a book by one person and read by another, it is entered into an automated system by one person and retrieved by another. But whereas the book can convey the knowledge to the reader in the same form in which the writer recorded it, automated information systems must store knowledge in forms that can be processed by non-human agents. For computers cannot read or understand words or pictures, so as to answer researchers' queries in the way that the researchers would pose them, or to record their findings as researchers would. Computers must be programmed using explicit codes and formulas; hence, the quality of the information contained in information systems is only as high as the quality of these codes and formulas. Automated information systems present unique opportunities for representing knowledge, since they have the capacity to handle enormous quantities of it. The right technology enables us to record, obtain, and share information with greater speed and efficiency than ever before, and to synthesize disparate items of information in order to draw new conclusions. There are different sorts of ways in which information systems store knowledge. There are databases designed for storing particular knowledge pertaining to, for example, specific experimental results, specific patients treated at a given hospital during a given time period, or specific data corresponding to particular clinical trials. Electronic health record (EHR) systems, used by hospitals to record data about individual patients, are examples of databases which store such particular knowledge. There are also systems designed for storing general knowledge. General knowledge includes the sorts of statements found in textbooks, which abstract from particular cases (such as this patient's case of pneumonia) and pertain, instead, to the traits which most of those particular cases have in common (such as lung infection, chill, and cough). Systems designed to store general knowledge include controlled vocabularies, taxonomies, terminologies, and so forth. Examples of these 9 include the Gene Ontology, the Foundational Model of Anatomy, and the Unified Medical Language System Semantic Network. Ideally, these two types of system will play complementary roles in research. Databases and other systems for storing particular information should be able to provide empirical data for testing general theories, and the general information contained in controlled vocabularies and their ilk should, in turn, provide sources of reference for empirical researchers and clinicians. How better, for example, to form and test a theory about pneumonia than by culling the clinical records of every hospital which has recorded cases of it? How better to prepare for a possible epidemic than by linking the electronic record systems of every hospital in the country to a centralized source, and then programming that source to automatically tag any possibly dangerous trends? But in order for these goals to be realized, automated information systems must be able to share information. If this is to be possible, every system has to represent this information in the same way. For any automated information system to serve as a repository for the information gathered by researchers, it must be pre-programmed in a way that enables it to accommodate this information. This means that, for each type of input an information system might receive, it must have a category corresponding to that type. Therefore, an automated information system must have a categorial structure readymade for slotting each bit of information programmed into it under the appropriate heading. That structure, ideally, will match the structure of other information systems, to facilitate the sharing of information among them. But if this is to be possible, there must be one categorial structure that is common to all information systems. What should that structure look like? There are several possible approaches to creating category systems for representing information about the world. One approach, which Smith calls the term orientation (see Chapter 4), is based on the observation that researchers often communicate their findings in the form of sentences. What better way to create a category system than to base it on the meanings of the words in those sentences? One problem with this approach is that the meaning of a word often does not remain constant; it may change from context to context, as well as over the course of time. Another problem is that natural language cannot be guaranteed to contain a word which encompasses precisely the meaning one wants to express, especially in scientific disciplines that are constantly making discoveries for which there are not yet established words. Another approach, which is standardly 10 referred to as the concept orientation, attempts to get around these difficulties by substituting words with concepts, seen (roughly) as hypostatizations of the meanings of words into mental entities. In other words, a concept is a word whose meaning has been fixed forever in virtue of being attached to a special kind of abstract thing. Thus, even if some slippage occurs between a word and its original meaning, that meaning will always have a concept to which it adheres. One simple problem with this approach (Smith provides a litany) is that it goes to great lengths to posit a layer of reality – that of concepts – for theoretical purposes only. This raises the question why the structure of the world itself should not be used as a guide to creating categories, an approach known as realism. After all, our knowledge is about the world, not about concepts. A major contention against realism is that reality is just too massive, diffuse, or limitless, for human understanding to grasp. There are far more things in the world, and far more kinds of things, than any one person can think or know about, even over the course of a lifetime. Ask one hundred people what the most basic underlying categories of the world are, and you will likely get one hundred different answers. Even scientific disciplines, which reflect not the understanding of one person but of successive groups of people with similar goals and methods, can produce no more than a perspective on one specific portion of reality, to the exclusion of the rest. The object of their study is limited to a specific domain of reality, such as the domain of living things for biology or the domain of interstellarobjects for astronomy. Human understanding cannot, either individually or collectively, grasp reality as it is in its entirety; hence, the conceptualist does not expect to be able to represent reality in the categories of automated information systems. The realist response developed in this volume (particularly Chapters 1, 3, 4, 6, and 7) is this: we can and should understand the existence of multiple perspectives not as a hindrance to our ability to grasp that reality as it is, but as a means by which we can obtain a deeper understanding of it. For, from the fact that there are multiple perspectives on reality alone, it does not follow that none – or only one – of these perspectives is veridical, i.e., represents some aspect of reality as it truly is. A perspective is merely the result of someone's coming to cognitive grips with the world. Precisely because reality is so multi-faceted, we are forced to filter out some aspects of it from our attention which are less relevant to our purposes than others. Some of these processes of selection are performed deliberately and methodically. For example, biologists set 11 into relief the domain of living things, in order to focus their study on traits shared by them which non-living things do not have. Forest rangers set into relief the domain of a specific geographical area and certain specific features, such as marked trails and streams, which they represent in maps for the purposes of navigation. Often, especially among scientists, the purpose of roping off a particular domain is simply to gain understanding of what the entities within it have in common, and of what makes them different from entities in other domains. The selection of a particular perspective is an act of cognitively partitioning the world: drawing a mental division between those things upon which we are focusing and those which fall outside our domain of interest. (Chapter 6 develops a theory of how we partition the world.) Take as an example Herbert, who is a frog. Let us imagine that Herbert is a domain of study unto himself. We thereby cognitively divide the world into two domains: Herbert, and everything else. Given a partitioning of the world into domains, it becomes possible to create sub-partitions within those domains. Herbert happens to be a frog, in addition to being composed of molecules. Each of these features yields a unique perspective from which Herbert can be apprehended: the coarsegrained level of Herbert as a whole single unit, and the fine-grained level of his molecules. Most of us think of Herbert as a single unit because it is as such that we apprehend him in his terrarium. Although we may know that he is composed of molecules, his molecules are not relevant to our apprehension of him, and so we filter them out. A molecular biologist, on the other hand, may think more about Herbert's molecules than about Herbert as a whole, even though he is aware that those molecules constitute a whole frog. There is only one Herbert that we and the molecular biologist apprehend, but, depending upon our interests and our focus, we may each apprehend him from different granular perspectives. Recognizing that there are multiple veridical perspectives on reality is not equivalent to endorsing relativism, the view that all perspectives are veridical. Here are two examples of non-veridical perspectives on Herbert: one which views him as a composite of the four complementary elements earth, air, fire, and water; another which views him as an aggregate of cells joined by an aberrant metaphysical link to the soul of Napoleon. The existence of multiple perspectives does not imply that we are unable to grasp reality as it is, and the fact that it is possible to obtain deeper understanding of reality through those perspectives does not imply that all perspectives are veridical representations of reality. 12 This is not to suggest that it is always easy to distinguish veridical perspectives from non-veridical ones. In fact, it is this difficulty which forces responsible ontologists and knowledge engineers to temper their realism with a dose of fallibilism. One of the main ways to determine the likelihood of a perspective's being veridical is to assess its explanatory power, that is, the breadth and depth of the explanations it can offer of the way the world works. The four-element perspective on Herbert seemed plausible to certain people at a certain point in history, precisely because it offered a means of explaining the causal forces governing the world. It seems less plausible now because better means of explanation have been developed. Each automated information system strives to represent a veridical perspective on that partition of reality about which it stores knowledge. As we have seen, there are features intrinsic to such systems which render them better or worse for fulfilling this goal. A system which is programmed with a structure that corresponds closely to the structure of the granular partition itself is more likely to be veridical; think of the fourelement perspective versus the molecular one. An information system with the categories 'earth', 'air', 'fire', and 'water' is less likely to serve as basis for an accurate categorization of Herbert's various components than is a system with such categories as 'cell', 'molecule', and 'organ'. The best kinds of categories are natural in the sense that they bring genuine similarities and differences existing in reality to the forefront (this view is developed in Chapters 7 and 8). Natural category divisions tell us something about how the underlying reality truly is. Thus, it is more likely that knowledge of such naturally existing categories will put us in a position to construct systematic representations of that domain which have some degree of predictive power. If we can predict the way in which entities in a domain will behave under certain conditions, we are better able to understand that domain, interact with it, and gain more knowledge about it. Hence the realist, who believes that it is possible for humans to obtain knowledge about the world, seeks to find out, as best he can, what the natural categories of reality are. His goal as a knowledge engineer is to create an information system that is structured in a way that mirrors those categories. Such a system will be prepared to receive information about as wide an array of entities as possible. Then, it should represent information by tagging each piece of information as being about something that has certain traits which make that thing naturally distinct from other entities. 13 Now, there is at least one natural category into which every entity falls: the category of existing things. It follows that there is at least one perspective from which all of reality is visible, one partition in which every entity naturally belongs: the partition of existing things. This partition is admittedly large-grained in the extreme; it does not provide us with more than a very general insight into the traits of the entities it encompasses. But it does provide us with insight into one crucial trait, existence, which they all have in common. It is this partition which constitutes the traditional domain of ontology. Ontology in the most general sense is the study of the traits which all existing things have insofar as they exist. (This is an admittedly airy definition of an abstract notion; see Chapter 2 for elaboration). It is significant that the philosophical term 'ontology' has been adopted by the information-science community to refer to an automated representation (taxonomy, controlled vocabulary) of a given domain (a point developed in Chapter 1). We will sometimes use the term 'ontology' in this sense, in addition to using the philosophical sense expounded in Chapter 2. Since there is one trait, existence, which all entities in reality have in common at the most general level, it is reasonable to suppose that there are other traits which some entities have in common at more specific levels. This supposition conforms to our common-sense assumption that some entities are more alike than others. If this is correct, it would suggest that our ability to understand something about reality in its entirety does not stop at the most general level, but continues downward into more specific levels. The challenge for the realist is to devise a means to discern the categorial subdivisions further down the line; this challenge is taken up in Chapter 9. Clearly, an upper-level system of categorization encompassing all entities would be an enormous step toward the goal of optimal knowledge representation. If all information systems were equipped with the same upper-level category system (sometimes called a domain-independent formal ontology), and if this category system did exhaust the most general categories in reality, then it would be possible to share information among systems with unprecedented speed, efficiency, and consistency. The contributions in this book are aimed at this long-term, but worthwhile, goal. Although the methods developed here are intended to be applicable to any domain, we have chosen to limit our focus primarily to the domains of biology and medicine. The reason is that there are particularly tangible benefits for the knowledge representation systems in these domains. 14 Accordingly, in 'Bioinformatics and Philosophy' (Chapter 1), philosopher Barry Smith and geneticist Bert Klagges make a case for the use of applied ontology in the management of biological knowledge. They argue that biological knowledge-management systems lack robust theories of basic notions such as kind, species, part, whole, function, process, environment, system, and so on. They prescribe the use of the rigorous methods of philosophical ontology for rendering these systems as effective as possible. Such methods, developed precisely for the purpose of obtaining and representing knowledge about the world, have a more than two thousand year-old history in knowledge management. In 'What is Formal Ontology?' (Chapter 2) Boris Hennig brings that most general, abstract domain of existing things down to earth. His goal is to help us understand what the more specific categories dealt with in this book are specifications of. The historical and philosophical background he provides will enable us to view formal ontology afresh in the present context of knowledge management. That context is illuminated in Pierre Grenon's 'A Primer on Knowledge Management and Ontological Engineering' (Chapter 3). Grenon draws upon non-technological examples for two purposes: first, to explain the task of knowledge management to non-information scientists; second, to highlight the reasonableness of the view that knowledge management is about representing reality. He provides insight into the task of the knowledge engineer, who is promoted to the post of ontological engineer when he uses rigorous ontological methods to systematize the information with which he deals. Finally, Grenon describes some current (worrying) trends in the knowledgemanagement field, for which he prescribes a realist ontological approach as an antidote. Some of these trends are elaborated upon in Barry Smith's 'New Desiderata for Biomedical Terminologies' (Chapter 4). Smith chronicles the development of the concept orientation in knowledge management, offering a host of arguments against it and in favor of the realist orientation. In 'The Benefits of Realism: A Realist Logic with Applications' (Chapter 5) Smith goes on to demonstrate the problem-solving potential of a realist orientation. He does so by developing a methodology for linking sources of particular knowledge (such as databases) with sources of general knowledge (such as terminologies) in order to render them interoperable. This would dramatically improve the speed and efficiency of the information-gathering process as well as the quality of the information garnered. Implementing his methodology would require a global switch to 15 the realist orientation in knowledge management systems. Arduous as such a switch would be, his example shows the massive benefits that it would proffer. If we are to reconstruct existing knowledge management systems to reflect a realist orientation, we will need a theoretical blueprint to guide us. We must start by formalizing the most basic commitment of the realist orientation, realist persepectivalism, which is the view that we can obtain knowledge of reality itself by means of a multiplicity of veridical granular partitions. Bittner and Smith (Chapter 6) provide a formal theory of granular partitions for configuring knowledge management systems to accommodate the realist orientation. Only such a theory, they claim, can provide the foundation upon which to build knowledge management systems which have the potential to be interoperable, even though they deal with different domains of reality. How do we build up an information system that succeeds at classifying the entities in a given domain on the foundation of a theory of granular partitions? In 'Classifications' (Chapter 7), Ludger Jansen provides eight criteria for constructing a good classification system, complete with real examples from a widely used information system, the National Cancer Institute Thesaurus (NCIT), which fails to meet them. Nonetheless, he points out, there are numerous practical limitations which an ontological engineer must take into account when constructing a realist ontology of his domain. Since a classification system is, to some extent, a model of reality, the more limited the knowledge engineer's resources (temporal, monetary, technological, and so forth), the greater his system must abstract from the reality it is supposed to represent. But the existence of such practical limitations does not require us to abandon the goal of representing reality. Jansen recommends meeting practical needs with accuracy to reality by distinguishing between two types of ontologies with distinct purposes. The purpose of reference ontologies is to represent the complete state of current research concerning a given domain as accurately as possible. Alternatively, the purpose of application ontologies, such as particular computer programs, should be to fit the most relevant aspects of that information in an application designed with certain practical limitations in mind. Reference ontologies should serve as the basis for creating application ontologies. This way, accuracy to reality can stand side by side with utility without either one needing to be sacrificed. Further, application ontologies that are based on the same reference ontologies will be more 16 easily interoperable with each other than application ontologies based on entirely different frameworks. In 'Categories: The Top-Level Ontology' (Chapter 8), Jansen applies the criteria for good classification to the question of what the uppermost categories of a reference ontology should be. Once we move below the most general category, 'being', what are the general categories into which all existing things can be exhaustively classified? Jansen answers this question by drawing upon the work of that most famous philosopher of categories, Aristotle. He provides examples of suggested upper-level ontologies which are currently in use, the Suggested Upper Merged Ontology (SUMO) and the Sowa Diamond, and argues that they are inferior to Aristotle's upper-level categories. He then presents the upperlevel category system Basic Formal Ontology (BFO), which was constructed under the influence of the Aristotelian table of categories, and makes the case for using BFO as the standard upper-level category system for reference ontologies. Chapter 9 offers an example of the way in which Jansen's considerations can be applied in one sort of theory that underpins the biomedical domain: the theory of the classification of living beings. On the basis of both philosophical and practical considerations, Heuer and Hennig justify the structure of the traditional, Linnaean, system of biological classification. Then they discuss certain formal principles governing the development of taxonomies in general, and show how classification in different domains must reflect the unique ontological aspects of the entities in each domain. They use these considerations to show that the traditional system of biological classification is also the most natural one, and thereby also the best. Knowing how existing things are to be divided into categories is the first step in creating a reference ontology suitable for representing reality. But this is not enough. In addition to knowing what kinds of entities there are, we must know what kinds of relations they enter into with each other. We learn about the kinds of entities in reality by examining instances of these entities themselves. In 'Ontological Relations' (Chapter 10), Ulf Schwarz and Barry Smith argue that this is also the way to learn about the kinds of relations which obtain between these kinds of entities: we must examine the particular relations in which particular entities engage. They endorse the efforts of a group of leading ontological engineers, the Open Biomedical Ontologies (OBO) Consortium, to delineate the kinds of relations obtaining between the most general kinds of entities. 17 In Chapter 11, Ingvar Johansson offers a detailed treatment of one of the relations discussed in Chapter 10, the so-called is_a or subtype relation, which plays a particularly prominent role in information science. Johansson argues that there are good reasons to distinguish between four relations often confused when is_a relations are intended: genussubsumption, determinable-subsumption, specification, and specialization. He shows that these relations behave differently in relation to definitions and so-called inheritance requirements. From the perspective predominant in this book, classifications should be marked by the feature of single inheritance: each species type in a classification should have a single parent-type or genus. The distinction between single inheritance and multiple inheritance is important both in information science ontologies and in some programming languages. Johansson argues that single inheritance is a good thing in subsumption hierarchies and is inevitable in pure specifications, but that multiple inheritance is often acceptable when is_a graphs are constructed to represent relations of specialization and in graphs that combine different kinds of is_a relations. Many relations obtain between continuant entities; that is, entities, such as chairs and organisms, which maintain their identity through time. But reality also consists of processes in which continuant entities participate, which form a different category of entity, namely, occurrent entities. Just like continuants, occurrents can – and must – be classified by any information system which seeks a full representation of reality. For, just as there are continuants such as diseases, so there are the occurrents that are referred to in medicine as disease courses or disease histories. Hennig's 'Occurrents' (Chapter 12) develops an ontology, or classification, of occurrent entities. He distinguishes between processes, which have what he calls an internal temporal structure, and other temporally extended occurrents, which do not. Further, he notes that certain important differences must be taken into account between types of occurrents and their instances. He argues that particular occurrents may instantiate more than one type at the same time, and that instances of certain occurrents are necessarily incomplete as long as they occur. By pointing out these and other important ways in which occurrents differ from continuants, Hennig's work shows the urgency of the need for information systems to obtain clarity in their upper-level categories. Finally, in Chapter 13, Johansson takes a wide-lens view of the junction of philosophy, ontology, and bioinformatics. He observes that some bioinformaticians, who work with terms and concepts, are reluctant to 18 believe that it is possible to have knowledge of mind-independent reality in the biological domain. He argues that there is no good reason for this tendency, and that it is even potentially harmful. For, at the end of the day, bioinformaticians cannot completely disregard the question as to whether the terms and concepts of their discipline refer to real entities. In the first part of the chapter, Johansson clarifies three different positions in the philosophy of science with which it would be fruitful for bioinformaticians to become familiar, defending one of them: Karl Popper's epistemological realism. In the second part, he discusses the distinction (necessary for epistemological realism) between the use and mention of terms and concepts, showing the importance of this distinction for bioinformatics. *** This volume does not claim to have the final say in the new discipline of applied ontology. The main reason is that the ideas it presents are still being developed. Our hope is that we have made a case for the urgency of applying rigorous philosophical methods to the efforts of information scientists to represent reality. That urgency stems from the vast potential which such application can have for rendering information systems interoperable, efficient, and well-honed tools for the increasingly sophisticated needs of anyone whose life may be affected by scientific research – that is to say, of everyone. What the authors of this volume are working toward is a world in which information systems enable knowledge to be stored and represented in ways that do justice to the complexity of that information itself, and of the reality which it represents. 19 Acknowledgments This book was written under the auspices of the Wolfgang Paul Program of the Humboldt Foundation, the European Union Network of Excellence on Medical Informatics and Semantic Data Mining, and the Volkswagen Foundation Project: Forms of Life. In addition, the authors would like to thank the following for valuable comments: Werner Ceusters, Pierluigi Miraglia, Fabian Neuhaus, Michael Pool, Steffen Schulze-Kremer, Cornelius Rosse, Dirk Siebert, Andrew Spear, and the participants of the First Workshop on Philosophy and Informatics in 2003. Thanks are due, also, to Michelle Carnell, Rachel Grenon, Robert Arp, and Dobin Choi. 20 Chapter 1: Philosophy and Biomedical Information Systems Barry Smith and Bert Klagges 1. The New Applied Ontology Recent years have seen the development of new applications of the ancient science of philosophy, and the new sub-branch of applied philosophy. A new level of interaction between philosophy and non-philosophical disciplines is being realized. Serious philosophical engagement, for example, with biomedical and bioethical issues increasingly requires a genuine familiarity with the relevant biological and medical facts. The simple presentation of philosophical theories and arguments is not a sufficient basis for future work in these areas. Philosophers working on questions of medical ethics and bioethics must not only familiarize themselves with the domains of biology and medicine, they must also find a way to integrate the content of these domains in their philosophical theories. It is in this context that we should understand the developments in applied ontology set forth in this volume. Applied ontology is a branch of applied philosophy using philosophical ideas and methods from ontology in order to contribute to a more adequate presentation of the results of scientific research. The need for such a discipline has much to do with the increasing importance of computer and information science technology to research in the natural sciences (Smith, 2003, 155-166). As early as the 1970s, in the context of attempts at data integration, it was recognized that many different information systems had developed over the course of time. Each system developed its own principles of terminology and categorization which were often in conflict with those of other systems. It was for this reason that a discipline known as ontological engineering has arisen in the field of information science whose aim, ideally conceived, is to create a common basis of communication – a sort of Esperanto for databases – the goal of which would be to improve the compatibility and reusability of electronically stored information. Various institutions have sprung up, including the Metaphysics Lab at Stanford University, the Ontology Research Group in Buffalo, New York, and the Laboratories for Applied Ontology in Trento, Italy. Research at these institutions is focused on the use of ontological ideas and methods in the interaction between philosophy and various fields of information sciences. The results of this research have been incorporated into software applications produced by technology companies such as Ingenuity Systems (Mountain View, California), Cycorp, Inc. (Austin, Texas), and Ontology Works (Baltimore, Maryland). Rapid developments in information-based research technology have called forth an ontological perspective, especially in the field of biomedicine. This is illustrated in the work of research groups and institutions such as Medical Ontology Research at the US National Library of Medicine, the Berkeley Bioinformatics and Ontology Project at the Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory, the Cooperative Ontologies Programme of the University of Manchester, the Institute for Formal Ontology and Medical Information Science (IFOMIS) in Saarbrücken, Germany, and the Gene Ontology Consortium. 2. The Historical Background of Applied Ontology The roots of applied ontology stretch back to Aristotle (384-322 BCE), and from the basic idea that it is possible to obtain philosophical understanding of aspects of reality which are at the same time objects of scientific research. But how can this old idea be endowed with new life today? In order to answer this question, we must cast a quick glance back at the history of Western philosophy. An ontology can be seen, roughly, as a taxonomy of entities – objects, attributes, processes, and relations – in a given domain, complete with formal rules that govern the taxonomy (for a detailed exposition, see Chapter 2). An ontology divides a domain into classes or kinds (in the terminology of this volume, universals). Complex domains require multiple levels of hierarchically organized classes. Carl Linnaeus's taxonomies of organisms are examples of ontologies in this sense. Linnaeus also applied the Aristotelian methodology in medicine by creating hierarchical categories for the classification of diseases. Aristotle himself believed that reality in its entirety could be represented with one single system of categories (see Chapter 8). Under the influence of René Descartes and Immanuel Kant, however, the focal point of philosophy shifted from (Aristotelian) metaphysics to epistemology. In a separate development, the Aristotelian-inspired view of categories, species, and genera as parts of a determined order came gradually to be undermined within biology by the Darwinian revolution. In the first half of the twentieth century, this two-pronged anti-ontological turn received 22 increasing impetus with the influence of the logical positivism of the Vienna Circle. Toward the end of the twentieth century, however, there was another shift of ground, in philosophy as well as in biology. Philosophers such as Saul Kripke, Hilary Putnam, David Armstrong, Roderick Chisholm, David Lewis, and Ruth Millikan managed to bring ontological and metaphysical considerations back into the limelight of analytic philosophy under the title 'analytical metaphysics'. This advance has brought elements of a still recognizably Aristotelian theory of categories (as the theory of universals or natural kinds) to renewed prominence. In addition, the growing importance of the new bioethics is helping to cast a new, ontological light on the philosophy of biology, above all in Germany in the work of Nikolaus Knoepffler and Ralf Stoecker. In biology itself, traditional ideas about categorization which had been viewed as obsolete are now looked upon with favor once again. The growing significance of taxonomy and terminology in the context of current information-based biological research has created a terrain in which these ideas have blossomed once more. In fact, biology can be said to be enjoying a new golden age of classification. 3. Ontological Perspectivalism One aspect of the Aristotelian view of reality still embraced by some ontologists is now commonly considered unacceptable, namely, that the whole of reality can be encompassed within one single system of categories. Instead, it is assumed that a multiplicity of ontologies – of partial category systems – is needed in order to encompass the various aspects of reality represented in diverse areas of scientific research. Each partial category system will divide its domain into classes, types, groupings, or kinds, in a manner analogous to the way in which Linnaeus's taxonomies divided the domain of organisms into various upper-level categories (kingdom, phylum, class, species, and so forth), now codified in works such as the International Code of Zoological Nomenclature and the International Code of Nomenclature of Bacteria. One and the same cross-section of reality can often be represented by various divisions which may overlap with one another. For example, the Periodic Table of the Elements is a division of (almost) all of material reality into its chemical components. In addition, the table of astronomical categories, a taxonomy of solar systems, planets, moons, asteroids, and so 23 forth, is a division of (the known) material reality – but from another perspective and at another level of granularity. The thesis that there are multiple, equally valid and overlapping divisions of reality may be called ontological perspectivalism (see Chapter 6). In contrast to various perspectival positions in the history of Western philosophy – for example, those of Nietzsche or Foucault – this ontological variant of perspectivalism is completely compatible with the scientific view of the world. Ontological perspectivalism accepts that there are alternative views of reality, and that this same reality can be represented in different ways. The same section of the world can be observed through a telescope, with the naked eye, or through a microscope. Analogously, the objects of scientific research may be equally well-viewed or represented by means of a taxonomy, theory, or language. However, the ontological perspectivalist is confronted with a difficult problem. How can these various perspectives be made compatible with one another? How can scientific disciplines communicate, and work together, if each treats of a different subdivision or granularity? Is there a discipline which can provide some platform for integration? In the following we will try to show that, in tackling this problem, there is no alternative to an ontology constructed from philosophically grounded, rigorous formal principles. Our task is practical in nature, and is subject to the same practical constraints faced in all scientific activity. Thus, even an ontology based on philosophical principles always will be a partial and imperfect edifice, which will be subject to correction and enhancement, so as to meet new scientific needs. 4. The Modular Structure of the Biological Domain The perspectives relevant to our purposes in the domain of biomedical ontology are those which help us to formulate scientific explanations. These are often perspectives of a fine granularity, by means of which we gain insight into, for example, the number and order of genes on a chromosome, or the reactions within a chemical pathway. But if the scientific view of these structures is to have a significance for the goals of medicine, it must be seen through different, coarse-grained perspectives, including the perspective of everyday experience, which embraces entities such as diseases and their symptoms, human feelings and behavior, and the environments in which humans live and act. 24 As Gottfried Leibniz asserted in the seventeenth century, when perceived more closely than the naked eye allows, the entities of the natural world are revealed to be aggregates of smaller parts. For example, an embryo is composed of a hierarchical nesting of organs, cells, molecules, atoms, and subatomic parts. The ecological psychologist Roger Barker expresses it this way: A unit in the middle range of a nesting structure is simultaneously both circumjacent and interjacent, both whole and part, both entity and environment. An organ – the liver, for example – is whole in relation to its own component pattern of cells, and is a part in relation to the circumjacent organism that it, with other organs, composes; it forms the environment of its cells, and is, itself, environed by the organism. (Barker, 1968, 154; compare Gibson, 1979) Biological reality appears, in this way, as a complex hierarchy of nested levels. Molecules are parts of collections which we call cells, while cells are embedded, for example, in leaves, leaves in trees, trees in forests, and so forth. In the same way that our perceptions and behavior are more or less perfectly directed toward the level of our everyday experience, so too, the diverse biological sciences are directed toward various other levels within these complex hierarchies. There is, for example, not only clinical physiology, but also cell and molecular physiology; beside neuroanatomy there is also neurochemistry; and beside macroscopic anatomy with its subdisciplines such as clinical, surgical, and radiological anatomy, there is also microscopic anatomy with sub-disciplines such as histology and cytology. Ontological perspectivalism, then, should provide a synoptic framework in which the domains of these various disciplines can be linked, not only with each other, but also with an ontology of the granular level of the everyday objects and processes of our daily environment. 5. Communication among Perspectives The central question is this: how do the coarse-grained parts and structures of reality, to which our direct perception and actions are targeted, relate to those finer-grained parts, dimensions, and structures of reality to which our scientific and technological capabilities provide access? This question recalls the project of the philosopher, Wilfrid Sellars, who sought what he called a stereoscopic view, the intent of which is to gather the content of our everyday thought and speech with the authoritative theories of the natural sciences into a single synoptic account of persons and the world 25 (Sellars, 1963). This stereoscopic view was intended to do justice, not only to the modern scientific image, but also to the manifest image of normal human reason, and to enable communication between them. Which is the real sun? Is it that of the farmers or that of the astronomers? According to ontological perspectivalism, we need not decide in favor of the one or the other since both everyday and scientific knowledge stem from divisions which we can accept simultaneously, provided we are careful to observe their respective functions within thought and theory. The communicative framework which will enable us to navigate between these perspectives should provide a theoretical basis for treating one of the most important problems in current biomedicine. How do we integrate the knowledge that we have of objects and processes at the genetic (molecular) level of granularity with our knowledge of diseases and of individual human behavior, through to investigations of entire populations and societies? Clearly, we cannot fully answer this question here. However, we will provide evidence that such a framework for integration can be developed as a result of the fact that biology and bioinformatics have implicitly come to accept certain theoretical and methodological presuppositions of philosophical ontology, presuppositions that pivot on an Aristotelian approach to hierarchical taxonomy. Philosophical ideas about categories and taxonomies (and, as we will see, about many other traditional philosophical notions) have won a new relevance, especially for biology and bioinformatics. It seems that every branch of biology and medicine still uses taxonomic hierarchies as one foundation of its research. These include not only taxonomies of species and kinds of organisms and organs, but also of diseases, genomics and proteomics, cells and their components, biochemical reactions, and reaction pathways. These taxonomies are providing an indispensable instrument for new sorts of biological research in the form of massive databases such as Flybase, EMBL, Unigene, Swiss-Prot, SCOP, or the Protein Data Bank (PDB).1 These allow new means of processing of data, resulting in extraction of information which can lead to new scientific results. Fruitful application of these new techniques requires, however, a solution to the problem of communication between these diverse category systems. 1 See, for example, http://www.cs.man.ac.uk/~stevensr/ontology.html. 26 We believe that the new methods of applied ontology described in this volume bring us closer to a solution to this problem, and that it is possible to establish productive interdisciplinary work between biologists and information scientists wherein philosophers would act, in effect, as mediators. 6. Ontology and Biomedicine There are many prominent examples of ways in which information technology can support biomedical research, including the coding of the human genome, studies of genetic expression, and better understanding of protein structures. In fact, all of these result from attempts to come to grips with the role of hereditary and environmental factors in health and the course of human diseases, and to search for material for new pharmaceuticals. Current bioinformatics is extremely well-equipped to support calculation-intensive areas of biomedical research, focused on the level of the genome sequence, which can search for quantitative correlations, for example, through statistics-based methods for pattern recognition. However, an appropriate basis for qualitative research is less welldeveloped. In order to exploit the information we gain from quantitative correlations, we need to be able to process this information in such a way that we can identify those correlations which are of biological (and perhaps, clinical) significance. For this, however, we need a qualitative theory of types and relations of biological phenomena – an ontology – which also must include very general terms such as 'object', 'species', 'part', 'whole', 'function', 'process', and the like. Biologists have only a rather vague understanding of the meaning of these terms; but this suffices for their needs. Miscommunication between them is avoided simply in virtue of the fact that everyone knows which objects and processes in the laboratory are denoted by a given expression. Information-technological processing requires explicit rigorous definitions. Such definitions can only be provided by an all-encompassing formal theory of the corresponding categories and relations. As noted already, information science has taken over the term 'ontology' to refer to such an all-encompassing theory. As is illustrated by the successes of the Gene Ontology (GO), developing such a resource can permit the mass of terminology and category systems thrown together in rather ad hoc ways over time to be unified within more overarching systems. 27 Already, the 1990s saw extensive efforts at modifying vocabularies in order to unite them within a common framework. Biomedical informatics offered framework approaches such as MeSH and SNOMED, as well as the creation of an overarching integration platform called the Unified Medical Language System (UMLS) (see National Library of Medicine). Little by little, the respective domains were indexed into robust and commonly accepted controlled vocabularies, and were annotated by experts to ensure the long-term compatibility and reusability of the electronically stored information. These controlled vocabularies contributed a great deal to the dawning of a new phase of terminological precision and orderliness in biomedical research, so that the integration of biological information that was hoped for seems achievable. These efforts, however, were limited to the terminologies and the computer processes that worked with them. Much emphasis was placed upon the merely syntactic exactness of terms, that is, upon the grammatical rules applied to them as they are collected and ordered within structured systems. But too little attention was paid to the semantic clarity of these terms, that is, to their reference in reality. It was not that terms had no definitions – though such definitions, indeed, were often lacking. The problem was rather that these definitions had their origins in the medical dictionaries of an earlier time; they were written for people, not for computers. Because of this, they have an informal character, and are often circular and inconsistent. The vast majority of terminology systems today are still based on imprecisely formulated notions and unclear rules of classification. When such terminologies are applied by people in possession of the requisite experience and knowledge, they deliver acceptable results. At the same time, they pose difficulties for the prospects of electronic data processing – or are simply inappropriate for this purpose. For this reason, the vast potential of information technology lies unexploited. For rigorously structured definitions are necessary conditions for consistent (and intelligent) navigation between different bodies of information by means of automated reasoning systems. While appropriately qualified, interested, and motivated people could make do with imprecisely expressed informational content, electronic information processing systems absolutely require exact and well-structured definitions (Smith, Köhler, Kumar, 2004, 79-94). Collaboration between information scientists and biologists is all too often influenced by a variant of the Star Trek Prime Directive, namely, 28 'Thou shalt not interfere with the internal affairs of other civilizations'. In the present context, these other civilizations are the various branches of biology, while 'not to interfere' means that most information scientists see themselves as being obliged to treat information prepared by biologists as something untouchable, and so develop applications which enable navigation through this information. Hence, information scientists and biologists often do not interact during the process of structuring their information, even though such interaction would improve the potential power of information resources tremendously. Matters are changing, now, with the development of OBI, the OBO Foundry Ontology for Biomedical Investigations (http://obi.sourceforge.net/), which is designed to support the consistent annotation of biomedical investigations, regardless of the particular field of study. 7. The Role of Philosophy Up to now, not even biological or medical information scientists were able to achieve an ontologically well-founded means of integrating their data. Previous attempts, such as the Semantic Network of the UMLS (McCray, 2003, 80-84), brought ever more obvious problems stemming from the neglect of philosophical, logical, and especially definition-theoretical principles for the development of ontological theories to light (Smith, 2004, 73-84). Terms have been confused with concepts, while concepts have been confused with the things denoted by the words themselves and with the procedures by which we obtain knowledge about these things. Blood pressure has been identified, for example, with the measuring of blood pressure. Bodily systems, such as the circulatory system, have been classified as conceptual entities, but their parts (such as the heart) as physical entities. Further, basic philosophical distinctions have been ignored. For example, although the Gene Ontology has a taxonomy for functions and another for processes, initially there was no attempt to understand how these two categories relate or differ; both were equated in GO with 'activity'. Recent GO documentation has improved matters considerably in these respects, with concomitant improvements in the quality of the ontology itself. Since computer programs only communicate what has been explicitly programmed into them, communication between computer programs is more prone to certain kinds of mistakes than communication between people. People can read between the lines (so to speak), for example, by 29 drawing on contextual information to fill in gaps of meaning, whereas computers cannot. For this reason, computer-supported systems in biology and medicine are in dire need of maximal clarity and precision, particularly with respect to those most basic terms and relations used in all systems; for example, 'is_a', 'part_of ', or 'located_in'. An ontological theory based on logical and philosophical principles can, we believe, provide much of what is needed to supply this missing clarity and precision, and early evidence from the development of the OBO Foundry initiative is encouraging in this respect. This sort of ontological theory can not only support more coherent interpretations of the results delivered by computers, it also will enable better communication between, and among, the scientists of various disciplines. This is achieved by counteracting the fact that scientists bring a variety of different background assumptions to the table and, for this reason, often experience difficulties in communicating successfully. One instrument for improving communication is the OBO Foundry's Foundational Model of Anatomy (FMA) Ontology, developed through the Department of Biological Structure at the University of Washington in Seattle, which is a standard-setter among bioinformation systems. The FMA represents the structural composition of the human body from the macromolecular level to the macroscopic level, and provides a robust and consistent schema for the classification of anatomical unities based upon explicit definitions. This schema also provides the basis for the Digital Anatomist, a computer-supported visualization of the human body, and provides a pattern for future systems to enable the exact representation of pathology, physiological functions, and the genotype-phenotype relations. The anatomical information provided by the FMA Ontology is explicitly based upon Aristotelian ideas about the correct structure of definitions (Michael, Mejino, Rosse, 2001, 463-467). Thus, the definition of a given class in the FMA – for example, the definition for 'heart' or 'organ' – specifies what the corresponding instances have in common. It does this by specifying (a) a genus, that is, a class which encompasses the class being defined, together with (b) the differentiae which characterize these instances within the wider class and distinguish them from its other members. This modular structure of definitions in the FMA Ontology facilitates the processing of information and checking for mistakes, as well as the consistent expansion of the system as a whole. This modular structure also guarantees that the classes of the ontology form a genuine categorial tree in the ancient Aristotelian sense, as well as in the sense of the Linnaean taxonomy. The Aristotelian doctrine, according to which 30 definition occurs via the nearest genus and specific difference, is applied in this way to current biological knowledge. In earlier times the question of which types or classes are to be included within the domain of scientific anatomy was answered on the basis of visual inspection. Today, this question is the object of empirical research within genetics, along with a series of related questions concerning, for example, the evolutionary predecessors of anatomical structures extant in organisms. In course of time, a phenomenologically recognizable anatomical structure is accepted as an instance of a genuine class by the FMA Ontology only after sufficient evidence is garnered for the existence of a structural gene. 8. The Variety of Life Forms The ever more rapid advance in biological research brings with it a new understanding of the variety of characteristics exhibited by the most basic phenomena of life. On the one hand, there is a multiplicity of substantial forms of life, such as mitochondria, cells, organs, organ systems, singleand many-celled organisms, kinds, families, societies, populations, as well as embryos and other forms of life at various phases of development. On the other hand, there are certain basic building blocks of processes, what we might call forms of processual life, such as circulation, defence against pathogens, prenatal development, childhood, adolescence, aging, eating, growth, perception, reproduction, walking, dying, acting, communicating, learning, teaching, and the various types of social behavior. Finally, there are certain types of processes, such as cell division or the transport of molecules between cells, in every phase of biological development. Developing a consistent system of ontological categories founded upon robust principles which can make these various forms of life, as well as the relations which link them, intelligible requires addressing several issues which are often ignored in biomedical information systems, or addressed in an unsatisfactory manner, because they are philosophical in nature. These issues show the unexplored practical relevance of philosophical research at the frontier between information science and empirical biology.2 These issues include: 2 See also: Smith, Williams, Schulze-Kremer, 2003, 609-613; Smith, Rosse, 2004, 444-448. 31 (1) Issues pertaining to the different modes of existence through time of diverse forms of life. Substances (for example, cells and organisms) are fundamentally different from processes with respect to their mode of existence in time. Substances exist as a whole at every point of their existence; they maintain their identity over time, which is itself of central relevance to the definition of 'life'. By contrast, processes exist in their temporal parts; they unfold over the course of time and are never existent as a whole at one and the same instant (Johansson, 1989; Grenon, Smith, 2004, 69-103). We can distinguish between entities which exist continually (continuants) and entities which occur over time (occurrents). It is not only substances which exist continually, but also their states, dispositions, functions, and qualities. All of these latter entities stand in certain relations on the one hand to their substantial bearers and on the other hand to certain processes. For example, functions are generally realized in processes. In the same way that an organism has a life, a disposition has the possibility of being realized, and a state (such as a disease) has its course or its history (which can be represented in a medical record). (2) The notion of function in biology also requires analysis. It is not only genes which have functions that are important for the life of an organism; so do organs and organ systems, as well as cells and cellular parts such as mitochondria or chloroplasts. A function inheres in a body part or trait of an organism and is realized in a process of functioning; hence, for example, one function of the heart is to pump blood. But what does the word 'function' mean in this context? Natural scientists and philosophers of science from the twentieth century have deliberately avoided talk of functions – and of any sort of teleology – because teleological theories were seen to be in disagreement with the contemporary scientific understanding of causation. Yet, functions are crucial for the worldview (the ontology) of physicians and medical researchers, as a complete account of a body part or trait often requires reference to a function. Further, it is in virtue of the body's ability to transform malfunctioning into functioning that life persists. The nature of functions has been given extensive treatment in recent philosophy of biology. Ruth Millikan, for example, has offered a theory of proper function as a disposition belonging to an entity of a certain type, which developed over the course of evolution and is responsible for (at least in part) the existence of more entities of its type (Millikan, 1988). However, an entity has a function only within the context of a biological 32 system and this requires, of course, an analysis of system. But existing philosophical theories lack the requisite precision and general application necessary for a complete account of functions and systems (Smith, Papakin, Munn, 2004, 39-63; Johansson, et al., 2005, 153-166). (3) The issue of the components and structure of organisms also needs to be addressed. In what relation does an organism stand to its body parts? This question is a reappearance of the ancient problem of form and matter in the guise of the problem of the relation between the organism as an organized whole, and its various material bearers (nucleotides, proteins, lipids, sugars, and so forth). Single-celled as well as multi-celled organisms exhibit a certain modular structure, so that various parts of the organism may be identified at different granular levels. There are a variety of possible partitions through which an organism and its parts can be viewed depending upon whether one's focus is centered on molecular or cellular structures, tissues, organ systems, or complete organisms. Because an organism is more than the sum of its parts, this plurality of trans-granular perspectives is central to our understanding of an organism and its parts. The explanation of how these entities relate to one another from one granular level to the next is often discussed in the literature on emergence, but is seldom imbued with the sort of clarity needed for the purposes of automated information representation. The temporal dimension contains modularity and corresponding levels of granularity as well. So, if we focus successively on seconds, years, or millennia, we perceive the various partitions of processual forms of life, such as individual chemical reactions, biochemical reaction paths, and the life cycles of individual organisms, generations, or evolutionary epochs. (4) We also need to address the issue of the nature of biological kinds (species, types, universals). Any self-respecting theory of such entities must allow room for the evolution of kinds. Most current approaches to such a theory appeal to mathematical set theory, with more or less rigor. A biological kind, however, is by no means the same as the set of its instances. For, while the identity of a set is dependent upon its elements or members and, hence, participates to some degree in the world of time and change, sets themselves exist outside of time. By contrast, biological kinds exist in time, and they continue to exist even when the entirety of their instances changes. Thus, biological kinds have certain attributes in common with individuals (Hull, 1976, 174-191; Ghiselin, 1997), and this is an aspect of their ontology which has been given too little attention in bioinformatics. 33 Existing bioinformation systems concentrate on terms which are organized into highly general taxonomical hierarchies and, thus, deal with biological reality only at the level of classes (kinds, universals). Individual organisms – which are instantiations of the classes represented in these hierarchies – are not taken into consideration. This lack of consideration has partially to do with the fact that the medical terminology, which constitutes the basis for current biomedical ontologies, so overwhelmingly derives from the medical dictionaries of the past. Authors of dictionaries, as well as those involved in knowledge representation, are mainly interested in what is general. However, an adequate ontology of the biological domain must take individuals (instances, particulars) as well as classes into account (see Chapters 7, 8, and 10). It must, for example, do justice to the fact that biological kinds are always such as to manifest, not only typical instances, but also a penumbra of borderline cases whose existence sustains biological evolution. As we will show in what follows, if we want to avoid certain difficulties encountered by previous knowledge representation systems, the role of instances in the structuring of the biological domain cannot be ignored. (5) There is much need, also, for a better understanding of synchronic and diachronic identity. Synchronic identity has to do with the question of whether x is the same individual (protein, gene, kind, or organism) as y, while diachronic identity concerns the question of whether x is today the same individual (protein, gene, kind, or organism) as x was yesterday or a thousand years ago. An important point of orientation on this topic is the logical analysis of various notions of identity put forward by the Gestaltpsychologist Kurt Lewin (Lewin, 1922). Lewin distinguishes between physical, biological, and evolution-theoretic identity; that is, between the modes of temporal persistence of a complex of molecules, of an organism, or of a kind. Contemporary analytic philosophers, such as Eric Olson or Jack Wilson, have also managed to treat old questions (such as those of personal identity and individuation) with new ontological precision (Olson, 1999; Wilson, 1999). (6) There is also a need for a theory of the role of environments in biological systems. Genes exist and are realized only in very specific molecular contexts or environments, and their concrete expression is dependent upon the nature of these contexts. Analogously, organisms live in niches or environments particular to them, and their respective environments are a large part of what determine their continued existence. 34 However, the philosophical literature since Aristotle has shed little light upon questions relating to the ontology of the environment, generally according much greater significance to substances and their accidents (qualities, properties) than to the environments surrounding these substances. But what are niches or environments, and how are the dependence relations between organisms and their environments to be understood ontologically? The relevance of these questions lies not only within the field of developmental biology, but also ecology and environmental ethics, and is now being addressed by the OBO Foundry's new Environment Ontology (http://environmentontology.org). 9. The Gene Ontology The rest of this volume will provide examples of the methods we are advocating for bringing clarity to the use of terms by biologists and by bioinformation systems. We will conclude this chapter with a discussion of the Gene Ontology (see Gene Ontology Consortium, ND), an automated taxonomical representation of the domains of genetics and molecular biology. Developed by biologists, the Gene Ontology (GO) is one of the best known and most comprehensive systems for representing information in the biological domain. It is now crucial for the continuing success of endeavors such as the Human Genome Project, which require extensive collaboration between biochemistry and genetics. Because of the huge volumes of data involved, such collaboration must be heavily supported by automated data exchange, and for this the controlled vocabulary provided by the GO has proved to be of vital importance. By using humanly understandable terms as keys to link together highly divergent datasets, the GO is making a groundbreaking contribution to the integration of biological information, and its methodology is gradually being extended, through the OBO Foundry, to areas such as cross-species anatomy and infectious disease ontology. The GO was conceived in 1998, and the Open Biomedical Ontologies Consortium (see OBO, ND) created in 2003, as an umbrella organization dedicated to the standardization and further development of ontologies on the basis of the GO's methodology. The GO includes three controlled vocabularies – namely, cellular component, biological process, and molecular function – comprising, in all, more than 20,000 biological terms. The GO is not itself an integration of databases, but rather a vocabulary of terms to be used in describing genes and gene products. Many powerful 35 tools for searching within the GO vocabulary and manipulation of GOannotated data, such as AmiGO, QuickGO, GOAT, and GoPubMed (see GOAT, 2003 and gopubmed.org, 2007), have been made available. These tools help in the retrieval of information concerning genes and gene products annotated with GO terms that is not only relevant for theoretical understanding of biological processes, but also for clinical medicine and pharmacology. The underlying idea is that the GO's terms and definitions should depend upon reference to individual species as little as possible. Its focus lies, particularly, on those biological categories – such as cell, replication, or death – which reappear in organisms of all types and in all phases of evolution. It is not a trivial accomplishment on the GO's part to have created a vocabulary for representing such high-level categories of the biological realm, and its success sustains our thesis that certain elements of a philosophical methodology, like the one present in the work of Aristotle, can be of practical importance in the natural sciences. Initially, the GO was poorly structured and some of its most basic terms were not clearly defined, resulting in errors in the ontology itself. (See: Smith, Köhler, Kumar, 79-94; Smith, Williams, Schulze-Kremer, 609-613). The hierarchical organization of GO's three vocabularies was similarly marked by problematic inconsistencies, principally because the is_a and part_of relations used to define the architecture of these ontologies were not clearly defined (see Chapter 11). In early versions of the GO, for example, the assertions such as 'cell component part_of Gene Ontology' existed alongside properly ontological assertions such as 'nucleolus part_of nuclear lumen' and 'nuclear lumen is_a cellular component'. Unlike the second and third assertions, which rightly relate to part-whole relations on the side of biological reality, the first assertion captures an inclusion relation between a term and a list of terms in the GO itself. This misuse of 'part_of ' represents a classic confusion of use and mention. A term is used if its meaning contributes to the meaning of the including sentence, and it is merely mentioned if it is referred to, say in quotation marks, without taking into account its meaning (for more on this distinction and its implications, see Chapter 13). 10. Conclusion The level of philosophical sophistication among the developers of biomedical ontologies is increasing, and the characteristic errors by which 36 such ontologies were marked is decreasing as a consequence. Major initiatives, such as the OBO Foundry, are a reflection of this development, and further aspects of this development are outlined in the chapters which follow.\n\nChapter 2: What is Formal Ontology? Boris Hennig 1. Ontology and Its Name 'Ontology' is a neologism coined in early modern times from Greek roots. Its meaning is easy to grasp; on is the present participle of the Greek einai, which means 'to be', and logos derives from legein, 'to talk about' or 'to give an account of' something. Accordingly, ontology is the discourse that has being as its subject matter. This is what Aristotle describes as first philosophy, 'a discipline which studies that which is, insofar as it is, and those features that it has in its own right' (Meta. 1, 1003a21-2).3 In a sense, every philosophical or scientific discipline studies things that exist. Yet, the term 'ontology' does not apply to every discipline that studies that which is. Although sciences do deal with features of existing things, they do not deal with them insofar as they exist. Special sciences study only certain kinds of things that exist, and only insofar as these things exhibit certain special features. Two different kinds of restrictions are involved in circumscribing what a special science is. A special science either studies only a limited range of things, or it studies a limited aspect of the things it studies. Physics, for instance, studies the physical properties of everything that has such properties. Biology only studies living beings and only insofar as they are alive, not insofar as they are sheer physical objects. Differential psychology studies human beings insofar as they differ from other human beings in ways that are psychologically measurable. Further, two different special sciences may very well have overlapping domains, that is, domains that include the same members. For example, the claims of physics and chemistry apply to the very same things, except that the former investigates their physical properties, while the latter their chemical properties. Ontology differs from such sciences as physics and differential psychology, but not because it considers another special range of things. Every object studied by ontology is also studied by some other discipline. However, ontology studies a different aspect of those things. According to Aristotle, ontology is concerned with everything that exists only insofar as it exists. Existence itself is the aspect relevant to ontology. Hence, ontology will be possible only if there are features that each existing thing has only 3 All translations are the author's unless otherwise specified. because, and insofar as, it exists. Momentarily, we will ask what sorts of features these may be. The objective of this section, however, is to give a preliminary impression of what ontology is by considering the history of the discipline and its name. Although Aristotle's Metaphysics already deals with questions of ontology, the word 'ontology' is much younger than this work. As a title for a philosophical discipline, ontologia has been in use since about the seventeenth century. Jacob Lorhard, rector of a German secondary school, uses this term in his Ogdoas Scholastica (1606) as an alternative title for metaphysics as it was taught in his school.4 However, he does not explain the term further. The book does not contain much more than a set of tree diagrams with the root node of one of them labelled, metaphysica seu ontologia. More prominently, the German philosopher Christian Wolff uses 'ontologia' in 1736 as a name for the discipline introduced by Aristotle in the passage quoted above (Wolff, 1736). The list of topics that Wolff discusses under this heading resembles the one given by Lorhard. It includes the notion of being, the categories of quantity and quality, the possible and the impossible, necessity and contingency, truth and falsehood, and the several kinds of causes distinguished in Aristotelian physics (material, efficient, formal, and final). This choice of topics certainly derives from Aristotle's Metaphysics and such works as the Metaphysical Disputations (1597) by Francisco Suárez. We can gather some additional facts about the early use of the term 'ontologia' by considering the first known appearance of the corresponding adjective in the Lexicon Philosophicum (1613) by Rudolph Goclenius. A foray into his use of 'ontological' will provide insight into how the term came to be used as it today; but, as we will see, there are some important respects in which his usage differs from contemporary usage (and, thus, from the usage in this volume). Goclenius uses 'ontological' in his entry on abstraction, where he discusses abstraction of matter. As everywhere else in his lexicon, he does not present a unified account of the phenomenon in question, but rather lists several definitions and other findings from the literature. In the present context, we are not concerned with what Goclenius means by abstraction and matter, although the concept of matter will become important later in our discussion of formal ontology. Provisionally, matter can be taken to be the stuff out of which a thing is made. To abstract it from a thing simply means to take it away from that 4 The second edition appeared in 1613 under the title Theatrum Philosophicum. 40 thing, in our imagination or in reality. For the time being, we are primarily interested in the sense in which Goclenius uses the epithet 'ontological'. In science, he says, there are three different ways of abstracting matter from given things. First, one may ignore the particular lump of matter out of which a given thing is made, but still conceive of the thing as being made up of some matter or other. According to Goclenius, this is what natural scientists do: they investigate particular samples, and they study their material nature. They are only interested in one sample, rather than another, when the samples differ with respect to their general properties. In studying a particular diamond, for instance, scientists ignore its particularity and consider only those features that any other diamond would have as well. Scientists abstract from a particular thing's matter in order to grasp those general features of a thing in virtue of which it falls under a certain category; but the fact that things of its type are made of some matter or other remains a factor in their account. This is what Goclenius calls physical abstraction. Second, we may ignore all matter whatsoever, in such a way that no matter at all figures in our account of the subject under investigation. This kind of abstraction is practiced in geometry and, accordingly, Goclenius calls it mathematical abstraction. But he also calls it ontological abstraction, glossing the latter term as 'pertaining to the philosophy of being and of the transcendental attributes' (Goclenius, 1613, 16). We will explain this phrase in due course. Finally, Goclenius continues, one may abstract matter from a given thing in reality as much as in thought. The result will be that the entity in question literally no longer possesses any matter. This Goclenius calls transnatural abstraction, of which, he claims, only God and the so-called divine Intelligences are capable. There are at least three important things to note here. First, Goclenius identifies ontological abstraction with mathematical abstraction. He thereby implies that ontology in general, as much as mathematics, is concerned with abstract entities and formal structures. For instance, geometry is concerned with the properties that physical objects have only by virtue of their shape and location. Their other properties, such as color, weight, smell, etc., are irrelevant. In this sense, geometry abstracts from the matter that is shaped and focuses on the shapes themselves. Whether a triangle is made of iron or wood makes no geometrical difference. If formal ontology is abstract in the same sense, it should also abstract from 41 certain properties of things and focus on their more general features. Later, we will explore what these more general features might be. What is important here is that ontological abstraction goes farther than mere physical abstraction. The physicist is not interested in particular samples but, rather, in material things insofar as they are material. According to Goclenius, ontology is not interested in matter at all; since concrete things are composed of matter, ontology is not concerned with concrete things at all, not even in a general way. Second, Goclenius equates ontology with the philosophical doctrine of the transcendental attributes. These attributes include being, oneness (or unity), goodness, and truth. Being and oneness are discussed by Aristotle; goodness and truth are introduced by later authors (Aertsen et al., 1998). These attributes are called 'transcendental' because they apply to every existing thing, regardless of any categorial boundary. That is, they surpass (or transcend) the general categories which distinguish things of different kinds. According to neo-Platonic authors like Pseudo-Dionysius the Areopagite, the transcendental notions not only surpass the categorial boundaries between things, but also the realm of the things to which they apply, that is, the entire world. For instance, Dionysius writes that the 'name being extends to all beings which are; and it is beyond them' (Pseudo-Dionysius, The Divine Names, 5, 816B). In other words, the transcendental attributes are manifested by everything in the world, but they do not apply to themselves. The transcendental attribute being is not itself something that exists. In any case, if ontology studies the features of everything that exists insofar as it exists, then it will also be concerned with the transcendental attributes. Third, Goclenius does not use the epithet 'ontological' in order to indicate something that really or actually happens. When we ontologically abstract matter from a thing, we do not really take away its matter. We do so only in thought. Real abstraction, by contrast, is what Goclenius calls transnatural abstraction, and it occurs when God separates the human soul from its body. In this regard, Goclenius' use of 'ontological' is directly opposed to some of the contemporary uses of this word. When contemporary writers call something ontological, they often mean to indicate that it really obtains, or at least that it has implications for what exists independently of our thoughts. Thus, ontology is often opposed to epistemology; the former is often said to be about what there really is, whereas the latter is only about what we know. A common view, for instance, is that ontology is concerned with the level of things rather than 42 the level of truths. That is, ontology concerns objects in the world, not our thoughts as they are expressed in true propositions or true sentences (Smith and Mulligan, 1983, 73). Goclenius, however, does not distinguish between things and truths. For him, both being and truth are transcendental attributes that apply to everything that is, on every conceivable level. Accordingly, he has no reason to suppose that it makes a difference whether we study things or truths, and ontology may be the study of both. In fact, Goclenius' use of the epithet 'ontological' differs from the modern one in all three respects that we have emphasized. First, ontology is no longer considered to be as abstract as mathematics. It does not abstract from all matter whatsoever, since it must also discuss the general features that things possess by virtue of being material and particular. Second, at least in the tradition of analytic philosophy, ontology does not include a treatment of such transcendental attributes as goodness and truth. Instead, these topics are dealt with in ethics and epistemology. Third, as we have seen, the opposition of real and ontological abstraction appears odd from a modern perspective. We will see, however, that there is also some continuity between Goclenius' and contemporary uses of 'ontology'; ontology is still considered an abstract discipline in the sense that it avoids dependence on particular references. Further, the idea that there are at least two transcendental attributes which surpass the categorial boundaries – namely, oneness and being – is still upheld. Finally, many contemporary thinkers certainly would contrast ontological features and happenings with transnatural ones, that is, features and happenings that surpass the realm of nature. 2. Some Things that are not Formal Ontology So far, we have introduced a rough notion of ontology as the study of features that things have insofar as they exist, and not insofar as they are concrete objects consisting of this rather than that matter. Since ontology, conceived in this way, abstracts from matter in the same way in which mathematics abstracts from matter, ontology would seem to be formal ontology. What is formal ontology? Edmund Husserl, who introduced this term into philosophy, describes it as the 'eidetic science of the object as such' (Husserl, Husserliana, 3/1, 26-27). Eidetic derives from the Greek eidos, which means form. Therefore, we will approach Husserl's formula by 43 means of a brief discussion of the general distinction between matter and form. This will lead to a discussion of experience and its objects, thus enabling us to understand the second part of Husserl's description of the object as such. Husserl deliberately uses the term 'eidetic' instead of 'formal', because he wants to avoid misleading connotations (Husserl, Husserliana, 3/1, 9). He is well-advised in doing so, since there are at least two common – and mistaken – accounts of what it means for a discipline to be formal. First, a discipline is sometimes called formal merely because its claims are expressed by means of formal symbolism or even only a shorthand notation, as when one writes ' x:MAN(x) MORTAL(x)' instead of 'all men are mortal'. Shorthand notations, however, are merely short, and sometimes not even that. There is no particular reason for calling them formal. Logic and mathematics are indeed formal disciplines, and they often use shorthand notations. But logic and mathematics are not formal because they use this kind of symbolism. For one thing, mathematical and logical truths can be expressed perfectly well in prose, although this would often take up more space. For another, any old body of knowledge can be expressed by short and rigorously defined symbols without, thereby, turning into a formal discipline. Logic and mathematics are properly called 'formal' only because they are about formal structures and features; for instance, those of shorthand symbolisms. Hence, formal ontology may indeed use symbolic shorthand notations as far as they are helpful; but it need not do so, and it will not be formal by virtue of doing so. Second, formal ontology has sometimes been opposed to regional or material ontology, and both labels – 'formal' and 'material' – were introduced by Husserl (Husserl, Ideen, §9). There are separate regional ontologies for the domains of physics, biology, differential psychology, and so forth. It has been claimed that formal disciplines are 'set apart from regional or material disciplines in that they apply to all domains of objects whatsoever, so that they are independent of the peculiarities of any given field of knowledge' (Smith and Smith, 1995, 28). According to this view, formal ontologists should only advance judgments that hold true of all objects in general. This is not far from the truth, but some qualifications are in order. For example, it is not the case that every claim that is made within formal ontology applies to everything that exists. Formal ontology can also study the formal features of a limited range of entities, in the same way in which geometry can study the shapes of a limited range of entities. 44 Admittedly, it is difficult to say what it means for a discipline or judgment to be about or apply to something. For instance, it is not clear whether 'beavers are rodents' is about beavers, about rodents, or about the whole world. For in some sense, all judgments are about and apply to the entire world and everything in it. It holds true of the world that, in it, beavers are rodents. We will make the simplistic assumption that judgments apply to the things that are explicitly mentioned in them. On this basis, formal disciplines explicitly mention everything that exists by using very general and abstract descriptions, whereas regional and material disciplines mention only some of existing things, but presumably in more detail. Thus, whether a discipline is formal or not depends on the entities to which its claims refer, and on the way in which it refers to them. However, there are two quite different ways in which a judgment may be said to explicitly mention or refer to particular objects. (1) Judgments like 'Marlene Dietrich was beautiful' or 'that child over there is intelligent' are particular judgments.5 Particular objects are concrete, discrete, and they exist only once. Particular judgments refer to such things by using proper names or demonstrative expressions like 'Marlene', 'this', or 'over there'. Further, their truth depends on the state of exactly those particular things to which they refer. (2) The other way in which a judgment refers to specific things in the world consists in its being specific. Specific judgments hold true only of a limited range of entities, such as the judgment 'some actresses are beautiful'. This judgment holds true only of actresses, and not of other persons or things. Although the truth of specific judgments still depends on the state of particular things, they do not refer to these things by using a demonstrative or name. They are, as it were, about anonymous particular objects. Specific judgments do not apply to everything in general; but they refer to their objects by means of a general form which may single out an unspecified number of particular objects. This distinction between particular and specific judgments is important because it will turn out that a formal ontological theory may only advance specific judgments, but not particular ones. Thus, the point is not that formal ontology applies to all objects alike, but rather that it applies to certain ranges of objects that may be referred to by means of general terms. Whereas formal ontology must not refer to particular beings like Marlene Dietrich or that child over there, it can still refer to specific kinds of beings 5 The distinction is also drawn by Kant, 1781, B95. However, translations usually use 'singular' where we use 'particular', and 'particular' where we use 'specific'. 45 like organisms in general or anonymous children and actresses. Hence, formal ontology may indeed advance judgments about the specific entities within a limited domain of knowledge, as long as none of these judgments are particular ones. Ontology is formal as long as it picks out and applies to particular entities solely by referring to general aspects of them; in other words, to some aspect of their forms. Thus, formal ontology is not the same as general ontology (which would deal only with features that all things share) and, hence, it is not opposed to material or regional ontology. Rather, an ontological theory may be formal and regional at the same time. A regional ontology deals with a limited range of entities, but as long as it does not advance any particular judgments, it can still deal with them in a general way. For instance, the (regional) ontology of occurrents found in Basic Formal Ontology (see Chapter 1) studies only a limited range of entities, namely those that occur or unfold in time, but it does not study specific events or processes in particular, such as the death of Socrates or the Great Depression. But there are still several sciences, such as physics and chemistry, which study specific phenomena in a general way. We have not yet found a way of distinguishing them from formal ontology. 3. Matter and Form According to Aristotle General is the opposite of regional, and formal is the opposite of material. Formal ontology, rather than being non-regional, is non-material. It may study a specific kind of thing, but that does not mean that it studies particular and concrete instances of these kinds. What does this mean? In order to distinguish formal from material ontology, we will now consider the distinction between matter and form. There are at least two different traditional conceptions of the difference between matter and form, which are attributable to Aristotle and Immanuel Kant respectively. This section discusses two ways of drawing the distinction which we will call Aristotelian. We will turn to Kant in the next section. Aristotle develops the distinction between form and matter in his treatment of movement and change. In his Physics, he characterizes matter as the primary underlying substrate from which a concrete thing comes into being and which persists in this thing (II, 3). This might be taken to mean that matter is the persisting subject of any kind of change. But this definition is not tenable, since an organism may change with regard to its 46 matter; it may, for example, gain and lose parts, yet remain the same organism. In this case the organism, not its matter, is the persisting subject of change. Hence, not everything that underlies and persists during a change can be matter. Presumably, what Aristotle meant is that it makes sense to speak of matter only in contexts where some change is possible. The unchanging does not consist of matter, but not everything that may change is, thereby, matter. The result, then, is that he does not provide a complete account of what matter is. Within the later Aristotelian tradition, matter is often identified with the principle of individuation of material things.6 This means that the matter of a thing is what makes it this rather than that thing. Even when things have the same properties and, hence, bear the exact same form, they can differ from each other merely by being made up of different parcels of matter. This brings us back to the above remarks on particularity. Concrete things are particular in virtue of the fact that they are made of matter. To be particular is to exist only once, at some unique location in time and space, and this is why we can refer to particular things in their particularity by using demonstrative expressions like 'here' and 'now'. Therefore, to be material can, in most cases, be taken to be coextensive with being subject to possible reference by demonstratives.7 When a concrete thing is referred to by means of a demonstrative, it is not specified in terms of its general form, but in terms of its matter. Accordingly, we may claim that demonstratives introduce elements into discourse that are non-formal, that is, material. That formal ontology must not refer to matter will then mean that it must not advance judgments that contain demonstrative expressions (Cf. Husserl, Ideen, §7, Husserliana 3/1, 21). But why should formal ontology not employ demonstrative expressions? To be here rather than there, or to occur now rather than earlier, certainly is a formal feature of a thing that it can share with other things. Further, geometry is concerned with exactly such features that objects have by virtue of being here or there, or extending from here to there; and geometry is certainly a formal discipline. The things in our world are in general here, now, there, or then. Therefore, any useful formal ontology that applies to real objects should also include a treatment of 6 See, for instance, Aquinas' commentary on Boethius' De Trinitate, II, q. 4, a. 1-2, Opera (editio Leonina) vol. 50. Cf. Charlton, 1972. 7 This only holds in most cases. Points in space are particular without being material, and there may be immaterial, but particular, things. Aristotle sometimes speaks of intelligible matter in such cases (e.g., Metaphysics Z 10). 47 space and time. But in order to point out the merely spatial difference between two locations, we must employ demonstrative expressions: one of them is 'here' (or at this and that location relative to here), another one is 'over there'. On the face of it, then, the second Aristotelian conception, according to which matter is the principle of individuation of concrete things, is also of no help when it comes to circumscribing formal ontology. It seems that formal ontology must employ demonstrative expressions after all. However, we will see that this is not the case. Formal ontology must not refer to objects by means of judgments containing demonstrative expressions. But how is this possible, given that formal ontology must include references to space and time? In what follows, we will see that there is a difference between an ontology that uses demonstrative reference in order to identify its objects, and an ontology that reflects upon the use of demonstratives, but without using them. This distinction is attributable to Kant. We will now explain it in more detail by turning to Kant's conception of the contrast between matter and form, which differs from the Aristotelian one in several important respects. 4. Kant on Formal Content We are still looking for an understanding of 'form' that enables us to grasp the distinction between formal and material ontology. Kant writes that the concepts of matter and form are 'concepts of reflection'. This means that they are properly used in reflective judgments. In Kant's own terms, reflective judgments express the 'consciousness of the relation of given representations to the different sources or faculties of cognition' (Kant, 1781, B316). In more familiar terms, they state how sense impressions, perceptions, and cognitions relate to the faculties that make them possible. If form and matter are concepts of reflection, they are concepts that figure prominently, or even exclusively, in judgments about how our sense impressions, perceptions, and cognitions relate to the faculties that make them possible. According to Kant, we may achieve knowledge about the world by combining two sources of cognition. The first of these sources Kant calls intuition, which is the capacity or act of representing concrete particular objects, whether real or imaginary, to the mind. But intuition alone does not suffice for cognition. 'Thoughts without content are void', Kant claims, and 'intuitions without concepts are blind' (Kant, 1781, B75). Hence, 48 intuition must be supplemented by what Kant calls judgment, the act or capacity of uniting representations under concepts such as 'existence', 'unity', 'substance', or 'cause'. By bringing representations under such concepts, understanding turns a subjective representation into an objective experience of a real object. For example, a mere sequence of visual experiences is brought under the concept of causation; it turns into an experience of a causal process. Kant claims that all cognition of empirical objects must work in this manner; thus, he is not only talking about our human cognitive abilities, but about what it would take for any rational being to experience an empirical object. We are interested in the way in which Kant draws the distinction between two sorts of content that an experience may have, namely, the material content and the formal content. The distinction between the two sources of cognition, i.e., intuition and understanding, does not straightforwardly map onto this distinction. Put differently, material content is not quite the same as what Kant calls empirical content. The empirical content of experience is supplied by sense perception or other kinds of intuition and, thus, consists in the representation of particular concrete objects. However it is important to see that, according to Kant, the formal content of experience is not, in turn, exclusively supplied by our understanding (which means that not all empirical content is material). Rather, when intuition provides us with the representations of concrete things and locations in space and time, it has already introduced its own forms. According to Kant, the pure forms of intuition are space and time. Kant's distinction between the formal and material content of experience can be understood in the following way. In order to achieve knowledge about any given thing, we must first establish a relation to that thing. We need to relate to it by means of some of its properties, by looking at it, by pointing to it, or by using its proper name. For instance, in order to find out how beavers live, what they eat, and how they look, we need to first locate beavers and observe them. In this case, we depend upon certain characteristic features of beavers in order to identify them as such. As a consequence, then, the fact that they have these properties cannot be something that we discover. For, when we identify an object by means of one of its properties, we cannot possibly find out that it has that property – or even that it does not have this property. We can discover that beavers fell trees, but not that beavers are beavers. The most basic way of identifying physical objects is by virtue of their position in space and time, for instance as this item here, or the table that 49 was here before. Again, everything that answers to the description 'the table that was here before' will necessarily be the table that was here before. If we refer to an object by means of its position in space and time, we cannot possibly find out that it has or does not have this position. In this sense, we know a priori, before looking, that the thing in question, if it exists, occupies this position. This peculiar feature of empirical objects, that they are necessarily located at some certain position in space and time, is not something that we can learn from experience. Rather, according to Kant, we know this before we ever experience any such object since we must know it in order to experience any empirical object whatsoever. Kant writes that it is 'the matter of all phenomena that is given to us a posteriori; the form must lie ready a priori for them in the mind, and consequently can be regarded separately from all sensation' (Kant, 1781, B34). The forms of intuition are space and time, and since we do not learn by sense experience that empirical objects occupy spatiotemporal positions, there may be an entirely formal discipline that is concerned only with space and time. The formal content of an experience of an empirical thing, then, is its a priori content in the sense specified above; it arises from the forms by virtue of which we identify an object before being able to investigate and describe it. When we refer to something as an empirical object and claim that it has a certain color or weight, we know a priori that we are talking about a thing in space and time, and claim to know a posteriori that it has this specific color or weight. That the object is located somewhere in space and time follows from the way in which we must necessarily refer to it and, thus, belongs to the formal content of our experience. The material content of our experience of an empirical thing is the information that we gather by experience: that it has this specific color or weight. So far, the distinction between the formal and the material content of an experience may appear to be entirely relative to the way in which we come to identify a given thing. We may identify something as a rodent and find out that it is also a beaver, or we may identify something as a beaver and find out that it is a rodent. Likewise, it seems that we may refer to something a priori as an item that is located at the North Pole and find out that it is white, or refer to it a priori as a white item and find out that it is located at the North Pole. It seems to depend entirely on us which of the bits of knowledge are a priori, that is, what characteristic we use in order to single out the object, and which bits of information we then gather a posteriori, on the basis of observation. 50 If this is true, it would seem that we may turn the formal content of any experience into the material content of another experience and vice versa. But although this is possible for some kinds of experience, such as the beaver/rodent one, it is not always possible, since there are features that we must presuppose in order to identify any object. For instance, since the most general and basic way of identifying physical objects is by means of their spatiotemporal position, space and time are forms of objects about which we may have a priori knowledge at the most general level. We cannot really refer to a thing as a white item without knowing, at least, where it is or was located at some time. We may ask where the white item that was in Alaska is now, and answer that it is now to be found at the North Pole. In any case, we have already identified the object by means of one of its spatiotemporal positions; thus, we need to understand space and time in general before being able to identify any spatiotemporal object. Yet, although in some sense, we do experience that physical objects are in space and time, this is not something that we could ever find out about them through experience. In order to find out anything about a physical object, we first need to locate it somewhere in space and time. Thus we never find out by observation that a thing is in space and time. In this sense, all our experience is shaped by the forms of space and time, and space and time are introduced by us rather than given to us. Besides the forms of intuition (space and time), Kant claims that there are also a priori forms that our understanding introduces. For instance, whenever we unite two representations in a judgment, we must unite them in one of three ways: either one of them is a feature or attribute of the other; or one of them is a cause of the other; or both are independently and simultaneously existing entities. In any case, we apply a concept a priori to the representations that we combine in order to identify what they represent as real objects in the world. Note that when we unite two representations – for instance, as cause and effect – we may be mistaken. That we apply the concept of cause and effect before being able to refer to a real object does not mean that there necessarily is such an object to which we refer. It may well be that we unite two representations under this concept in order to refer to an object, but that there is no such object. In such a case we will have applied a concept a priori, but in vain. That all our experience is shaped by certain general forms which all possible objects of experience must have does not mean that we construct reality; this is a popular misconception about Kant's philosophy. We do not 51 bring it about that objects are in space and time when we locate and identify them as being in space and time. We use the forms of intuition and understanding in order to capture what is there, in such a way that whatever gets captured will necessarily have certain properties; namely, the properties by virtue of which we captured it. But we did not cause it to have these properties, and there might have been nothing that has these properties. In this sense, space and time and the a priori concepts are the forms by means of which we acquire experience. 5. Kantian Formal Ontology According to the Kantian conception of the contrast between matter and form, formal ontology should be taken to be concerned with the pure forms of intuition and understanding; that is, with the way in which we must determine any object a priori before investigating or observing it. Its subject matter, then, will not be concrete objects, but the forms by virtue of which any experience may relate to an object. These forms will be the forms that all things have insofar as they exist. Kant claims that we can study these forms by investigating the ways in which we identify objects. When extracting such a notion of formal ontology from Kant's writings, some qualifications are in order. Kant does not use the epithet 'ontology' to designate the study of the most general features by means of which we identify objects. Rather, he dismisses traditional ontology, identifying it with a futile attempt to say something about things that no finite rational being could possibly experience. Even to say that there may be such things, and to call them 'things,' is too much. He suggests that we should focus, instead, on our experience and on objects insofar as finite rational beings are able to experience them. Modern ontologists, who certainly do not want to talk about objects that no finite being could possibly experience, may react to Kant's dismissal in two ways. One way is to argue, against Kant, that we do not need to reflect on our cognitive capacities in order to identify the basic structures of the world. It is true that Kant's emphasis on our cognitive judgments, and his claim that we can investigate the basic structure of the world by reflecting on our cognitive capacities, has led to the popular misunderstanding that Kant holds the world to be merely a construction of concepts. This (patently bizarre) thesis is often mistakenly labelled as 'Kantian,' both by its adherents and opponents. This misunderstanding of Kant is by no means benign, and has yielded some potentially disastrous results in modern 52 fields, such as information science, which seek to apply methods of formal ontology to improve the way in which information is collected, stored, and disseminated. The other possible response to Kant's philosophy is the one adopted by Husserl, the founder of formal ontology. Roughly, Husserl continues the Kantian enterprise of investigating the basic structures of the worl